,job_title,company,location,salary,description,counts,city
0,Account Manager,"TitanHouse, Inc.","McLean, VA","$80,000 - $250,000 a year","Account Manager Company HQ: McLean, VAWork Arrangement: 100% in OfficeBase: $50,000-$75000OTE: $80,000-$250,000 Product: Staffing & RecruitingThe Job:Our Client is a rapidly growing technology recruiting firm at an early stage in their life cycle. The focus of this role is to drive customer acquisition and expansion, focusing on both business development activities as well as managing, directing and working effectively with the recruiting team. You will focus on winning long term programs within the IT and Clinical areas in an effort to help the company achieve record-shattering growth. Our client believes in promoting from the ground up and within!Responsibilities:Drive customer acquisition through attending meetings and warm/cold callingProfessionally represent the company through marketing strategiesMaintain and create relationships with industry contactsSell and negotiate Piper’s recruiting services to active and target customersAbility to manage lead and develop AssociatesConsistent high meeting activity, favorable contract terms and increasing average closed deals in order to drive business forwardThe CompanyOur Client is an elite staffing and human capital solutions firm specializing in information technology, life sciences, and clinical solutions. They have a proven track record of delivering high quality talent whether recruiting permanent employees, or staffing projects on a contract or contract-to-hire basis. They also have a proven track record delivering high quality managed services, and consulting all in an effort to help their clients build high performing teams and drive long-term value.For more job information click 'Apply'.Job Type: Full-timePay: $80,000.00 - $250,000.00 per yearSchedule:Monday to FridayEducation:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Sales Experience: 2 years (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",11150,Washington
1,IT Specialist (Customer Support),Government of the District of Columbia,"Washington, DC 20003 (Navy Yard area)","$87,703 - $113,002 a year","This position is in the Office of the Chief Technology Officer (OCTO), Information Technology (IT) Operations, DC-NET and Infrastructure/Engineering. The purpose of the position is to provide expert technical desktop, engineering, and administration support to assigned District government agencies; to resolve a wide range of customer problems, including problems from various levels; and to provide analytical customer requirements.
Duties and Responsibilities
The IT Specialist (Customer Support) diagnoses and resolves problems in response to customer reported incidents. Researches, evaluates, and provides feedback on problematic trends, and patterns in customer support requirements. Provide day-to-day technical support for all personal computer (PC) platforms and associated software packages, network services and Internet applications within the overall OCTOhelps program strategy. Acts as an escalation point for all field technicians. Triages technical issues in an environment that involves multiple forests, domains, and operating systems. Acts as point of contact and interface with different technical support groups within the District, such as network support, wireless support, enterprise application support, server support, and outside vendors whose applications are currently deployed within government agencies. Coordinates with outside support groups to develop and streamline solutions to complex technical issues in specific instances.
The incumbent develops and implements performance and technical customer training plans to ensure that all technicians stay abreast of new and upcoming technologies, such as mobile, cloud, and thin client computing. Installs, configures, troubleshoots, and maintains customer hardware and software. Ensures the rigorous application of information security/information assurance policies, principles, and practices in the delivery of customer support services. Develops customer service performance requirements; develops customer support policies, procedures, and standards; and develops and implements best practice solutions. Researches and keeps abreast of relevant technologies and work with internal service delivery teams on testing and piloting. Works, collaboratively, within an integrated team to achieve the stated tasks and goals of the program. Leads technical staff during advanced projects or large-scale deployments. Actively, drives and develops help desk best practices. Performs other related duties as assigned.
Qualifications and Education
The candidate must possess IT-related education and/or experience as defined in the Information Technology qualification standard (2210 series). In addition to meeting basic requirements, applicant must possess at least one (1) year of specialized experience equivalent to the grade 12 level. Specialized experience is experience which is directly related to the line of work of the position and has equipped the applicant with the particular knowledge, skills, and abilities to successfully perform the duties of the position. Examples of specialized experience includes: strong working knowledge of Microsoft Endpoint Manager, Azure Active Directory, including Group membership, Account Management, GPO Implementation and Organizational Unit Structure.
Licensure and Certifications
Microsoft 365 Certification preferred; Modern Desktop Administrator Associate or Microsoft Certification preferred; and Azure Administrator Associate Certification preferred. It is referred that certification be obtained within first year of appointment.
Only one of the following certifications preferred: Microsoft Windows 10, Microsoft Windows Operating Systems Fundamentals, Apple Certified Support Professional, or Complete Apple Deployment Essentials training.
Working Conditions/Environment
The work is performed in the office or in the field. The work is sedentary in nature; however, some lifting up to 50 lbs may be necessary.
Other Significant Factors
Tour of Duty: Varies
Pay Plan, Series and Grade: CS-2210-13
Salary Range: $87,703.00 - $113,002.00; based on available funding
Type of Appointment: Career Service – Regular Appointment
Collective Bargaining Unit (Non-union): This position is not in a collective bargaining unit
Promotion Potential: No known promotion potential
Area of Consideration: Open to the public
Essential/Emergency Designation: This position may have an Essential or Emergency Employee Designation. The incumbent may be required in essential or emergency situations or when authorized by the agency head to perform critical tasks.
Position Designation: This position as been designated as security-sensitive under the guideline of the DC Personnel Manual. Incumbents of this position are subject to enhanced suitability screening pursuant to Chapter 4 of DC personnel regulations. Accordingly, incumbents must successfully pass a criminal background and consumer credit check as a condition of employment and will be subject to periodic criminal background checks for the duration of their tenure.
Residency Requirement: If the position you are applying for is in the Career, Management Supervisory, or Educational Service at an annual salary of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) or more, you must establish residency in the District of Columbia within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of the appointment and continue to maintain residency within the District of Columbia throughout the duration of the appointment.
EEO Statement: The District of Columbia Government is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified candidates will receive consideration without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, family responsibilities, matriculation, physical handicap, or political affiliation.
Please note that applications received for this vacancy announcement may be considered for other vacant positions within OCTO pursuant to qualifications.
For more information regarding the District of Columbia, OCTO, and additional benefits of employment, please see links below:
www.dc.gov
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tH55ctiReKs (Welcome video from Mayor Bowser)
https://octo.dc.gov/
https://dchr.dc.gov/page/employee-benefits
https://washington.org/",11150,Washington
2,IT Support & Project Specialist,Virginia General District Courts,"Fairfax County, VA","$50,022 a year","Under the general supervision of the IT Projects Manager, this position provides IT support at various levels, including front-line technical support of software and hardware; testing, installation and configuration of new and updated software and hardware; maintenance and support of the Fairfax County GDC website; assisting with the planning and implementation of new technology initiatives; and performance of related work as assigned by management.

This position offers a competitive benefits package, which includes vacation and sick leave, 12 paid holidays, health insurance, retirement, life insurance, deferred compensation and short- and long-term disability.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

The IT Support and Project Specialist backs up and assists the IT Projects Manager for a large, high-volume, limited jurisdiction state court. This position assists GDC employees with the routine use of data applications and case management systems; performs password and other various levels of security support on all network systems; troubleshoots network, application and peripheral equipment problems; provides technology support in courtrooms; assists with loading and testing computer software and management of all IT inventory; supports members of the public with certain applications as appropriate; and supports all IT administrative duties of the Fairfax County GDC website. This position also supports the design, development, testing, and implementation of new and upgraded Fairfax County, Commonwealth, and third-party applications which improve automation, digitization, and case management in the court.

Other duties include providing new users with case management and security protocol training; providing help desk support for the court’s users and directing appropriate inquiries to the Fairfax County Court Technology Office; notifying users of unanticipated computer and application down time; checking for computer viruses using appropriate software; and assisting public with applications on the public terminals. This position also assists the IT Project Manager and other supervisors with general court related projects. May be required to work during non-traditional business hours on occasion.

Minimum Qualifications
Any combination of education, experience, and training equivalent to the following: graduation from an accredited two-year college with an associate’s degree in IT or related field (degree preferred, not required) and/or two years of related professional work experience in such areas as business, court, or public administration. Ability to communicate technical ideas clearly and effectively both orally and in writing. Ability to perform personal computer and network troubleshooting, both on software and hardware. Proficiency in the latest Microsoft Windows operating systems and PC applications, such as Word, Outlook, Excel, and PowerPoint required.

Preferred Qualifications

Special Requirements
All employees receive a 15% county salary supplement in addition to the state salary.

Applicants must pass a criminal background check in order to be considered for employment and may be asked to take relevant pre-employment tests.

Special Instructions to Applicants
A resume and cover letter are required. Applicants must apply online; we do not accept documents via mail or email. Only interviewed applicants will be notified of the filling of the position. No phone calls or e-mails regarding application status.

The Virginia Judicial System is an equal opportunity employer, committed to diversity in the workplace. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, age, national origin or disability. Applicants who need accommodations for an interview should request this in advance by emailing humanresources@vacourts.gov. All candidates are subject to a criminal history background check before being offered employment.

Name Jewel Jefferson

Phone NO PHONE CALLS OR E-MAILS REGARDING APPLICATION STATUS.

Fax

Email We do not accept documents via mail or email; you must apply online in order to be considered. jjefferson@vacourts.gov

Address",11150,Washington
3,Project Manager,NOVACES,"Falls Church, VA 22042","Up to $130,000 a year","Job Description:Facilitate project portfolio planning, organization and management of integration, regulatory and operations projects across the government agency.Engage with project sponsors and stakeholders to develop project plans including the scope statement, work breakdown structure, schedule, and communication plans.Work with agency department leaders to ensure resource availability, workload and performance as well as to drive project vision through effective risk management and manage changes through a defined change management system. Implements the approved actions and workarounds required to mitigate project risk events in order to minimize the impact of the risks on the project.Work closely with key personnel and subject matter experts across all departments to ensure coordinated management of integration project activities.Perform special projects and other duties as assigned and required.Expert assessment, reporting, and preparation of organization to achieve recognition in nationally accepted performance quality award programs.Execute recommended process improvements, and provide draft issuance improvements for government review and acceptance.Requirements:A minimum of seven (7) years experience as a project managerDemonstrated experience planning and directing a project portfolio.Evidence of a favorably adjudicated DoD SECRET clearance.Healthcare IT, business process improvement and Oracle Primavera experience preferred.Education:Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college or university in healthcare administration, business administration, management, or a related field or equivalent work experience.PMP certification or equivalentJob Type: Full-timePay: Up to $130,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceFlexible scheduleFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offProfessional development assistanceReferral programRelocation assistanceTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftSupplemental Pay:Bonus payEducation:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Project Management: 7 years (Preferred)License/Certification:PMP Certification (Required)Security Clearance:Secret (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",11150,Washington
4,IT Support Manager,"Amazon Web Services, Inc.","Arlington, VA",None,"
Bachelor's degree, or relevant experience
2+ years’ experience managing a technical support team

At Amazon, we strive to be Earth’s most customer-centric company where we can find and discover anything we want to buy online. We hire the world’s brightest minds, offering them an environment in which one can relentlessly improve the customer experience. Innovation and creativity are built into the DNA of the company and are encouraged at all levels of employment. Every day we solve complex technical and business problems with ingenuity and simplicity. We’re making history and the good news is we’ve only just begun.
AWS IT Services Support team provides highly-available IT support for Amazon employees worldwide. We provide support for all used client applications, operating systems, email, VPN, mobile devices, and common collaboration services such as SharePoint and Exchange. Our customers may engage us via phone, chat, in person, or trouble ticketing.
You will manage local and/or remote resources and assist the global organization to define the perfect customer experience and own the strategies to create that experience. You will help the group develop and leverage their knowledge base to expedite the resolution of recurrent issues. You will identify ways to proactively reduce requests through automation, documentation, and process improvement. You will set high standards for issue handling, escalation and problem management across the organization and guide the team with metrics and goals that clearly measure their success.
You will work alongside a group of leaders to define the priorities and track the metrics and key performance indicators within the organization as a whole. You will hold service owners accountable to resolve issues on behalf of your customers.

Responsibilities include:

Leading a team of Support Engineers. Recognizing inefficiency and driving process improvement to enhance the productivity of all Amazonian's.
Measuring, monitoring, and maintaining the team’s ability to meet or exceed contact and resolution Service Level Agreements (SLA).
Coordinating a variety of projects in an operational environment.
Written and verbal communication with the ability to present complex technical information in a clear and concise manner to a variety of audiences.
Working with engineering teams to plan for the support of new tools and services and improving the level of support provided for existing ones.
Developing and maintaining policies, procedures, and processes.
Hiring, developing, and retaining great talent.
Reducing contacts through process improvement and root cause analysis.
Responding to inquiries, escalations, and establishing partnerships with key customers and service owners.
An understanding of enterprise IT systems such as Exchange and Active Directory, as well as exposure to a wide variety of technical products and issues
Experience and/or qualification relating to but not limited to: Linux, Cisco, ITIL, and Microsoft
Technical troubleshooting and strong analytical skills
Established time and project management skills with the ability to lead multiple projects simultaneously
Experience in ITIL Framework
Proven ability to operate in an extreme high pressure dynamic fast paced situations, successfully handle multiple competing priorities and possess a high level of discipline while displaying a high degree of flexibility and professionalism
Experience communicating cross-functionally and across management levels in formal and informal settings
Experience in making data-driven decisions

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us",11150,Washington
5,Project Manager,ICF,"Rockville, MD 20850",None,"ICF is a mission-driven company filled with people who care deeply about improving the lives of others and making the world a better place. Our core values include Embracing Difference; we seek candidates who are passionate about building a culture that encourages, embraces, and hires dimensions of difference.
@ ICF Next, we are fearless in finding new ways to solve problems, relentless in making sure it pays off for our clients and committed to making a positive change in the world.
Join our community of mission-driven creatives, communicators, strategists, and technologists to challenge the status quo.
We’re currently hiring for a Project Manager to help to manage and coordinate a variety of activities for our National Cancer Institute client.
As a Project Manager, you will have:
An understanding of the project’s scope and ensure the client and team are on the same page
Demonstrated experience meeting deadlines and ensuring the team has what they need to meet theirs
Demonstrated experience managing a project to schedule and ensuring the client and team understand what is expected of them
The ability to identify and resolve or mitigate areas needing clarification, project dependencies, risks, and issues
The ability to ensure the client and team are always aware of project status, risks, and issues
The ability to be a proactive self-starter, working independently to move projects and tasks forward to completion
The ability to work in a collaborative team environment and co-lead projects with other project managers
The ability to coordinate with multiple stakeholders to schedule meetings
An understanding of project management tools and how to use them consistently and effectively across teams to manage projects
Experience preparing, leading and facilitating status meetings, milestone reviews, and work-in-progress demos to the client in a confident and professional manner
Demonstrated experience planning, organizing, taking meeting notes, and managing the activities of other departments and organizations in order to ensure the on-time and on-budget delivery of projects
As a Project Manager, you also will have:
Five or more years of experience managing relevant projects in a consulting or government environment
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent required
A demonstrated understanding of project management methodology including the ability to identify and resolve issues, manage risk, develop detailed work plans and specifications and run team meetings
A demonstrated ability to manage tight timelines while adhering to budgetary constraints
Ability to work on multiple projects and manage various stakeholders simultaneously
Previous experience working in a scientific field or managing scientific/technical projects is preferred but not required
Job Location(s): Within the current landscape, this role will be supported remotely. This role will ultimately sit at the client’s Rockville office when remote working guidelines are lifted.
Working at ICF
Working at ICF means applying a passion for meaningful work with intellectual rigor to help solve the leading issues of our day. Smart, compassionate, innovative, committed, ICF employees tackle unprecedented challenges to benefit people, businesses, and governments around the globe. We believe in collaboration, mutual respect, open communication, and opportunity for growth. If you’re seeking to make a difference in the world, visit www.icf.com/careers to find your next career. ICF—together for tomorrow.
ICF is an equal opportunity employer that values diversity at all levels. (EOE – Minorities/Females/ Protected Veterans Status/Disability Status/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity). For more information, please read our EEO & AA policy .
Reasonable Accommodations are available for disabled veterans and applicants with disabilities in all phases of the application and employment process. To request an accommodation please email icfcareercenter@icf.com and we will be happy to assist. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodations. Read more about non-discrimination: EEO is the law and Pay Transparency Statement .
Rockville, MD (MD18)",11150,Washington
6,IT PROJECT MANAGER SPECIALIST - (W2/1099 POSITION),DATEC,"Washington, DC",None,"IT Project Manager SpecialistLocation: McLean, VADuration: 6 monthsDescription: - Project management experience in mortgage industryExperience in: - Running complex projects with small-size budget and scope spanning across several systems- Running projects using software development life cycle (SDLC), Agile methodology, Application Maintenance Change Process (AMCP) and project management life cycle (PMLC)- Strong experience in project management processes:- Budget management and resource management- Communication- Risk management- Scope and change request management- Schedule management- Internal controls and quality management- Excellent communication, influencing and collaboration skills- Good organization, presentation and customer service skills.Job Types: Full-time, ContractPay: $99,999.00 per hourApplication Question(s):EMAIL ID?Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",11150,Washington
7,IT Specialist (Project Manager) - SME (Open to both U.S. Citizens and Federal Employees),US Office of the Secretary of Transportation,"Washington, DC","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
The incumbent serves as an IT Project Manager, responsible for managing relationships with DOT Operating Administrations, OST Offices, and overall projects pertaining to the development of modern, enterprise IT Customer Relationship Management (CRM) applications, systems, solutions, and strategies by leveraging Microsoft Dynamics 365 (D365), Microsoft Office 365 (O365) cloud services, and the Microsoft Power Platform.

Responsibilities
The IT Specialist (Project Manager):

Identifies key business and technology drivers that impact application architectures, such as end-user requirements, existing software distribution capabilities, existing application environment (including legacy and packaged systems), and performance and availability requirements. Develops long and short-range strategies.
coordinates all aspects of the project system, development life cycle, such as the planning, implementation, contracts, budget, communication and operations and maintenance.
Operations, disaster recovery, business process re-engineering, systems analysis methodologies; web-based technologies and solutions; IT planning, project management, systems development methodologies, and document and content management.
Is responsible for a high level of customer service while providing the full range of IT support services to effectively, efficiently, and economically enable the COE to execute its safety mission through the application of modern IT strategies and solutions.
Serves as a senior expert for project and contract management, product evaluation, analysis and management of the implementation of a wide-range of services, related to the work flow based, Customer Relationship Management (CRM) applications, including product and delivery to the customers within the Department.
Develops and implements project and program management plans, tools, templates, and activities. Applies management principles including issue/risk management, program and cost control strategy, quality management, system release process, change control management, and transition management. Translates project requirements into detailed designs to be implemented while balancing needs for immediate action.
Applies management principles including issue/risk management, program and cost control strategy, quality management, system release process, change control management, and transition management. Translates project requirements into detailed designs to be implemented while balancing needs for immediate action.

The ideal candidate is a dynamic project manager versed in the system development life cycle of customer relationship management (CRM) projects and application management. We are looking for an independent, self-starter with excellent organization skills and ability to manage multiple, ongoing priority tasks for highly visible Office of the Chief Information Officer.
Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Similar jobs
Chief Technology Officers
End-User Support Specialists
Information Systems Managers
Information Technology Project Managers
Information Technology Specialist (It Specialist)
Managers, Information Systems
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a U.S.Citizen and eligible for consideration.
You must meet specialized experience to qualify.
Required documents must be submitted by the closing date.
Submit application and resume online by 11:59 PM EST on the closing date.
CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT:

SELECTIVE SERVICE: Males born after 12/31/1959 must be registered for the Selective Service.
PROBATIONARY PERIOD: You must complete a one-year probationary period (unless already completed).
TIME-IN-GRADE: Federal applicants must have served 52 weeks at the next lower grade in the competitive or excepted service in the executive branch to satisfy time-in-grade restrictions contained in 5 CFR 300, Subpart F.
DEU REQUIREMENTS: Applicants selected under delegated examining procedures may be required to successfully complete a one-year probationary period (unless already completed).

Qualifications
To meet the minimum qualifications for this position, you must meet the specialized experience qualifications requirement.

To qualify for the Grade 14, you must have at least one year of experience equal or equivalent to the GS-13, it must include:

Experience in managing IT Customer Relationship Management (CRM) application or platform for the development, modernization and improvement of business processes.
Experience in implementation of an agency-wide IT application as a shared service within a customer service environment.
Experience in gathering requirements across multiple stakeholders to ensure the integration of business and program directives.

In addition to meeting the above described specialized experience requirements, your IT experience will be evaluated and be expected to include described experience in the following competencies:

Attention to Detail: Work is thorough and conscientious about attending to detail.
Customer Service: Working with clients and customers (that is, any individuals who use or receive the services or products that your work unit produces, including, individuals who work in the agency, other agencies, or organizations outside the Government) to assess their needs, providing information or assistance, assigning staff to resolve their problems, or satisfying their expectations; knowing about available products and services; committed to providing quality products and services.
Oral Communication: Expressing information (for example, ideas or facts) to individuals or groups effectively, taking into account the audience and nature of the information (for example, technical, sensitive, controversial); making clear and convincing oral presentations; listening to others, attending to nonverbal cues, and responding appropriately.
Problem Solving: Identifying problems; determining accuracy and relevance of information; using sound judgment to generate and evaluate alternatives, and making recommendations based on technical requirements.

For all types of consideration, experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

For additional information about applying to Federal positions, please click on the following link: https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/classification-qualifications/general-schedule-qualification-policies/#url=e4
Education
Additional information
This vacancy may be used by any DOT agency to fill similar positions within 90 days.

FLSA - Exempt
Bargaining Unit 1133

Position Sensitivity - Moderate Risk

The U.S. Department of Transportation strives to ensure that equity, transparency, accountability, collaboration, and communication permeate all that we do for the betterment of the Department, the traveling public, and our nation. As such, DOT values a highly diverse workforce of persons who promote a culture of belonging by respecting the personal dignity and worth of each individual and fostering a positive environment where all feel safe and welcome. If these commitments coincide with your personal ideals and professional aspirations, please consider joining the DOT family.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
DESCRIBING YOUR EXPERIENCE: PLEASE BE CLEAR AND SPECIFIC. WE WILL NOT MAKE ASSUMPTIONS REGARDING YOUR EXPERIENCE. If your resume/ application does not support your questionnaire answers, we will not allow credit for your response(s). Your resume must contain sufficiently detailed information upon which to make a qualification determination. Please ensure that your resume contains specific information such as position titles, beginning and ending dates of employment for each position, average number of hours worked per week, and if the position is/was in the Federal government, you should provide the position series and grade level.

To compete with U.S. Citizens: If you meet the qualification requirements, your application will be placed in one of four categories: Platinum, Gold, Silver or Bronze, which is based upon your responses to the vacancy questions. Within these categories, applicants eligible for veteran's preference that have provided supporting documents will receive selection priority over non-veterans. The top rated applications will be reviewed for the quality of your experience, education and training relevant to the position.

To compete with other competitive status government employees: If you meet the qualification requirements, your application will be scored based upon your responses to the vacancy questions. The top rated applications will be reviewed for the quality of your experience, education and training relevant to the position. If referred, all relevant documents including performance appraisals and awards submitted with your application package will be forwarded to the hiring official for review.

Eligible Federal employees also seeking consideration for noncompetitive reassignment for this position, must indicate interest in the assessment. In eligibility question 14: select Yes/Other/Former Incumbency of a Position brought into the Competitive Service. Noncompetitive federal candidates must have competitive status on a SF-50, meet minimum qualifications, have served at the same grade or higher, and held or exceeded the promotion potential of this position.

All applicants: Your application will be rated on the extent and quality of your experience, education and training relevant to the position. The answers you select in the on-line process must be substantiated in your application package. If upon review, it is determined that your described work history, competencies, and/or supporting documents do not support your answer choices, your application may be updated on your behalf or you may not be referred to the selecting official. Please ensure that your work history provides enough details to support your answers. The Automated Staffing Office is ultimately responsible for determining your final rating.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
RESUME - All applicants must provide a resume created within USA Jobs Resume Builder, that shows relevant experience, education and support the required specialized experience. Formatted resumes can by uploaded later in the application process.

TRANSCRIPTS are REQUIRED if there is a stated education requirement for the series OR if you are substituting education for experience. The transcripts need not be official, but must show that you meet the stated education requirements, including specific major or class requirements.

If you have already qualified and worked in the federal service in this series, you may provide an SF-50 in lieu of transcripts.

PERFORMANCE APPRAISALS/INCENTIVE AWARDS: If applicable, performance appraisals and/or Incentive award documentation may be submitted and forwarded to the selecting official in consideration of your application. To receive credit, submit a recent performance appraisal (dated within 18 months) showing the official rating of record, signed by a supervisor, or statement why the performance appraisal is unavailable (do not submit a performance plan) and/or incentive award documentation dated within the last 18 months (i.e. performance awards, special act or achievement awards, quality step increases, etc.).

VETERANS: Your last DD214 (member 4 copy), Certificate of Release or Discharge From Active Duty, that shows the type of discharge and all dates of active duty is required to verify your eligibility.

If applying to a vacancy opened to all US Citizens under category rating and wish to be considered as a preference eligible, you need to submit a copy of your DD214 (member-4 copy).
If claiming preference eligibility as a disabled veteran, you must submit proof of entitlement of this preference which is normally a valid letter from the Department of Veterans Affairs certifying to the present existence of the service-connected disability and indicating the percentage of your disability. An SF-15 is desired, but not required.
If applying to a vacancy opened Status and you are requesting consideration under Veteran's Employment Opportunity Act (VEOA) (https://www.fedshirevets.gov/job/shav/#veoa), you need to provide a copy of your last DD214 (member-4 copy), which verifies your military service dates, reason for separation, OR certification of separation that shows a discharge date within 120 days of the closing of this announcement, and eligibility for consideration under the Veterans Employment Opportunity Act.

FEDERAL APPLICANTS: You must submit SF-50(s) that verify your highest competitive grade, full performance level, and eligibility as a federal applicant. DO NOT submit an award SF-50 as these often do not verify grade or eligibility. For consideration for a promotion, Box 4 of the SF-50 must show a date that is at least 52 weeks prior to the job announcement closing. We recommend submitting your last promotion SF-50, current SF-50 or within-grade increase SF-50. Pay adjustment raise SF-50s for the current year will not support the 52 weeks’ time-in-grade requirements. https://www.usajobs.gov/Help/working-in-government/service/SF-50/

NON COMPETITIVE APPLICANTS: If requesting concurrent consideration for Non-competitive (NC) appointment eligibility, you must provide the appropriate SPECIAL APPOINTING AUTHORITY DOCUMENTS, such as PCS orders (military spouse) describing move & marriage certificate; letter from VA or DD214 describing 100% disability of spouse; letter from State Vocational Office certifying disability (schedule A), etc. For more information, visit military spouse NC appointments or Persons with Disabilities NC appointments.

DISPLACED EMPLOYEES: If requesting consideration under the Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP) or Interagency CTAP program (ICTAP), you must meet the well qualified standards for this vacancy (meeting minimum requirements for position and scoring at least an 85 or falling in the Gold Category) and provide all of the following documents:

your most recent performance appraisal,
the proof of eligibility letter from the Agency, and
your most current SF-50, displaying current series and grade.

Displaced employees may be eligible for ICTAP or CTAP priority consideration. For more information, please review the OPM Employee's Guide to Career Transition.

Failure to submit any of the required documents by the closing date of the vacancy will result in your removal from consideration for this position. Please review your application prior to final submission and ensure you have submitted all appropriate documents. Uploading documents to USAJobs does NOT ensure inclusion with your application to our system. You must verify that the documents are in the system with your application prior to final submission.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Individuals with disabilities
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Military spouses
Family of overseas employees
Family members of a federal employee or uniformed service member who is, or was, working overseas.
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Open to current and former Federal employees with competitive status, VEOA Applicants, AND All U.S. Citizens.",11150,Washington
8,PROJECT MANAGER – IT MODERNIZATION,"RJM Technologies, Inc.","Washington, DC 20004 (Penn Quarter area)","$100,000 - $150,000 a year","Our client, a fast-growing IT consulting firm to government and industry, seeks a hands-on IT Project Manager to support one of our federal civilian clients with a large-scale IT Modernization program.? The Project Manager will oversee workstreams for Cloud, Cybersecurity, Service Management, Capital Planning and others within an Agile methodology. The ideal candidate will be a seasoned entrepreneurial Project Manager with Federal Government experience providing overall program management including client executive relationship management, team member coordination, and technology roadmap planning and implementation.RESPONSIBILITIESCoordinate activities across disparate teams to deliver successful outcomes for stakeholders.Lead the engineering projects and deployment of technical solutions.Develop and maintains relationships and partnerships with stakeholders, peers, vendors and partners.Lead large programs using an Agile management approach.Facilitate stakeholder collaboration across multiple organizations/divisions within the client organization.Provide oversight to ensure the project’s approach and deliverables comply with customer, company, quality, industry, and regulatory requirements.Facilitate regular project reviews with staff and leadership to ensure consistent reporting and visibility of progress.Support staff in resolving or removing roadblocks to programs and projects.Build strategic cross-functional and cross-organizational partnerships and alliances with stakeholders, peers and direct reports to resolve problems, improve processes or achieve goals.Create a culture of continuous improvement by communicating/deploying enterprise best practices and team engagement to improve cost, quality, delivery, job satisfaction and client satisfaction.Create demand for IT modernization efforts through client interactions, prominence, and personal connections.QUALIFICATIONSBachelor’s Degree and 7+ years of experience performing Information Technology-related Program and Project Management within the Federal Government.Experience leading IT modernization workstreams in Cloud migration, Cybersecurity, ITSM in an Agile methodology.Project Management Professional (PMP) certification.Experience as a trusted advisor to stakeholders / customers, including executive-level.Experience developing and maintaining executive relationships and communications.Experience leading organizational change management activities to adopt improved technologies and processes.Experience implementing project management best practices among project team, including project managers, technical leads, and business analysts.Experience leading a team of highly technical engineers, establishing and socializing the technology roadmap throughout the organization.US Citizenship is required.Job Type: Full-timePay: $100,000.00 - $150,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayExperience:IT Modernization Project Management: 7 years (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",11150,Washington
9,Project Manager,US Federal Aviation Administration,"Washington, DC","$88,211 - $136,714 a year","Duties
Summary
Due to the Pandemic, and individual states with different phases of reopening, the selectee’s report date to the official duty station/facility may be delayed until such time as employees are allowed to report to the workplace. The person selected may telework up to the maximum extent possible, up to and including full time, until it is safe to relocate.

Responsibilities
Serves as a mid-level Project Manager in the Aviation Property Management Organization, Project Management Division (APM-300), the lead organization for space planning and design and construction within the FAA. The work performed by APM-300 supports all FAA Lines of Businesses and Staff Offices.
As the Project Manager, he/she provides project support under the minimal direction of the Manager, Program Manager and/or other experience professionals. The incumbent applies experience and comprehensive knowledge applicable to planning and conducting functional activities for projects/programs. The incumbent is responsible for projects support relating to new construction and/or improvement of new or existing facilities that involve architecture; landscape architecture; interior design; space planning; and civil, electrical, mechanical, plumbing, and structural engineering disciplines.
Monitors and help drive a project from initial scoping through construction and project close-out by coordinating information, providing support through data analysis, and contributing to overall strategy and performance evaluation. Leads planning, coordination, and execution of mid-sized design and construction projects. Supports Program Manager in planning, coordinating, and executing larger or more complex efforts.
Primary tasks involve monitoring project progression, developing budget/financial data, data analysis, formulation of overall strategy, and performance evaluation. Participates in project meetings, on-site construction visits, and pre- and post- occupancy evaluations. Monitors cost, schedule, and performance components of an overall program/project plan and makes recommendations to address issues. Ensures full range of project issues related to space planning, interior design, construction, relocation, furniture, and equipment are supported. Works with design professionals to ensure plans for proposed alteration/renovation projects are in accordance with all applicable building codes and regulations and to ensure all aspects of the project are in accordance with contract plans and specifications.
Assignments frequently require knowledge and experience working across functional and/or organizational lines. Typical assignments may include: providing guidance to less-experienced professionals, leading project teams, preparing and reviewing management reports and/or contractual documents, and developing and recommending improvements to systems and/or processes to improve operational efficiency. The incumbent independently plans time, identifies, plans, and organizes available resources to accomplish projects/programs/activities. He/she makes optimal use of resources to complete activities within established schedules.
Contacts are internal and external. Communication tasks include preparation and disbursement of meeting minutes, briefings, status reports, and white papers. Coordinates with design professionals on deliverables, including drawings and design documents, to meet functional and aesthetic needs of the project and ensure coordination and integration of the mechanical, electrical, and structural engineering disciplines within the interior context.
Established policies/procedures provide guidance for most assignments, but allow considerable discretion for employee to select the most appropriate approach(es) or develop new approaches. Assignments require interpretations of internal and external policies and extrapolations from precedents. He/She resolves most problems and work issues without the assistance of a manager or program manager. Develops and recommends approaches to address current and anticipated problems and issues. Works with management and/or more experienced professionals to solve problems.
Travel Required
25% or less - The job may require up to 25% travel.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
NA
Job family (Series)
0301 Miscellaneous Administration And Program
Similar jobs
Architectural And Engineering Managers
Architectural Managers
Engineering Design Managers
Engineering Managers
Managers, All Other
Managers, Architectural
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
US Citizenship is required.
Selective Service Registration is required for males born after 12/31/1959.
Must submit an SF50 (See Required Documents)
Qualifications
To view the complete OPM qualification standard for the Group Coverage Qualification Standard for Miscellaneous Administration and Program Series, 0301, please refer to:
https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/classification-qualifications/general-schedule-qualification-standards/0300/miscellaneous-administration-and-program-series-0301/
To qualify for this position you must demonstrate in your application that you possess at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to FV-H, FG/GS 12. Specialized experience is experience that has equipped you with the particular knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform successfully the duties of the position.
Specialized experience may include but not limited to: Experience planning, organizing, and controlling all or a major part of multiple, varying, and complex design and construction projects.
Qualifications must be met by the closing date of this vacancy announcement.
Please ensure you answer all questions and follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may impact your rating or may result in you not being considered for the job.
Education
Preview Job Questionnaire
Make sure your resume includes detailed information to support your qualifications and answers to the job questionnaire.
Additional information
We may use this vacancy to fill other similar vacant positions.
Position may be subject to a background investigation.
A one-year probationary period may be required.

FAA employees, their spouses and minor children may not hold stock or any other securities interest in an airline, aircraft manufacturing company, or in a supplier of components of parts to an aircraft manufacturing company. This prohibition is effective on the date of your appointment. If selected, your acceptance of the agency's final offer means you agree to comply with this prohibition. Questions may be directed to an agency ethics official at 9-faa-agc-ethics-office@faa.gov.

The U.S. Department of Transportation strives to ensure that equity, transparency, accountability, collaboration, and communication permeate all that we do for the betterment of the Department, the traveling public, and our nation. As such, DOT values a highly diverse workforce of persons who promote a culture of belonging by respecting the personal dignity and worth of each individual and fostering a positive environment where all feel safe and welcome. If these commitments coincide with your personal ideals and professional aspirations, please consider joining the DOT family.

The person selected for this position may be required to file a financial disclosure statement within 30 days of entry on duty. FAA policy limits certain outside employment and financial investments in aviation-related companies.
As a part of the Federal-Wide Hiring Reform Initiative (streamlining the hiring process), the FAA is committed to eliminating the use of the Knowledge, Skills and Ability (KSA) narratives from the initial application in the hiring process for all announcements. Therefore, as an applicant for this announcement, you are NOT required to provide a narrative response in the text box listed below each KSA.

In lieu of providing a KSA narrative response in the text box listed below each Knowledge, Skills and Abilities (KSA), in your work history, please include information that provides specific examples of how you meet the response level or answer you chose for each KSA. Your work history examples should be specific and clearly reflect the highest level of ability. Your KSA answers will be evaluated further to validate whether the level that you selected is appropriate based on the work history and experience you provided. Your answers may be adjusted by a Human Resource Specialist as appropriate.
Eligible applicants meeting the minimum qualification requirements and selective factor(s), if applicable, may be further evaluated on the Knowledge, Skills and Abilities (KSA) listed in the announcement. Based on this evaluation, applicants will be placed in one of the following categories: score order, category grouping, or alphabetical and referred to the selecting official for consideration.
This is a bargaining unit position.

Links to Important Information: Locality Pay , COLA

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.


IMPORTANT: Applicants may be rated on the extent and quality of experience, education, and training relevant to the duties of the position(s). All answers provided in the on-line process must be substantiated. Ensure that your application package/resume supports your responses.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
Notification of Personnel Action (SF-50).

Only supplemental documentation, e.g. transcripts or veteran's documentation will be accepted in combination with your on-line application. These documents must be uploaded or emailed to Monique.heriegel@faa.gov on or before the closing date of this announcement. All submitted documents should reference the announcement number.

Applicants claiming eligibility for the Expanded Veterans Hiring Opportunity (EVHO), MUST submit a DD Form 214 reflecting character of service to verify eligibility by the closing date of the announcement as requested by the Human Resource Office. Eligibility for EVHO will be considered based on applicable documentation submitted by the closing date.

If you are a current or former Federal employee (including a current FAA employee), you MUST provide a copy of your SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action) containing information in Blocks 15, 17, 18, 19, 22, and 24 so it can be used to verify your position title, series, grade, tenure, and organization of record by the closing date of the announcement. You may fax your SF-50 or upload it into the on-line application. If faxing the SF-50, please ensure you include the vacancy announcement number on the faxed copy.

If you are a current Federal employee and need a current copy of your SF-50, please contact your personnel office. If you are an FAA employee, you can access and print your SF-50 from the eOPF system https://eopf.opm.gov/dot/. If you are a former Federal employee, you can obtain a copy of your SF-50 by writing the National Personnel Records Center Annex, 1411 Boulder Boulevard, Valmeyer, IL 62295. Additional information is available from this link: http://www.archives.gov/st-louis/civilian-personnel/.

Expanded Veterans Hiring Opportunity (EVHO) are those veterans who are honorably discharged from the Armed Forces after completing at least three (3) years of continuous active service. Applicants claiming eligibility for EVHO, MUST submit a DD Form 214 reflecting character of service to verify eligibility by the closing date of the announcement as requested by the Human Resource Office. Eligibility for EVHO will be considered based on applicable documentation submitted by the closing date.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Federal employees - Excepted service
Current excepted service federal employees.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Current or Former Federal Employees; Veterans - EVHO; Also open to former excepted service federal employees eligible under an interchange agreement. Current or former federal employees must have met a one year probationary period or trial period in the competitive or excepted service. Applications will be accepted from preference eligibles and veterans who are honorably discharged from the Armed Forces after completing at least 3 years of continuous active duty service.",11150,Washington
10,IT Project Manager,Telecommunications Development Corp.,"Washington, DC 20009 (Shaw area)","From $100,000 a year","TDC has an immediate need for an IT Project Manager with telcom and radio experience. This Project Manager will be responsible for: Coordinating telecommunication systems and radio installation projectsProject management and leading several teams through different IT objectives that include but are not limited to audio visual software and hardware installation, radio and cell tower installation, vender management, etc.Some on site surveying to evaluate the location and its IT infrastructure for better suitability. The field engineer handovers the blueprint of a given area to the telecom manager for a further decision.Hardware Installation: the project manager takes care of the further installation process in association with the team towards its successful applicable hardware set-up. Test the entire set up as outlined by the requirements of the client to ensure that all device is functional and to assure maximum quality. Requirements8+ years of Project Management experience5+ years of IT Experience5+ years of radio and telcom experienceBachelor's degree in related field.The position is based in the Washington, DC and may require limited travel to client sites. The work will start remote for now until we are cleared to return to the office. Please submit your resume and contact information.Job Types: Full-time, ContractPay: From $100,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offProfessional development assistanceVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)License/Certification:PMP (Preferred)Work Location:One locationBenefit Conditions:Waiting period may apply",11150,Washington
11,IT Infrastructure Project Manager,Inova Health System,"Falls Church, VA 22042",None,"Job Description
Ensures technologies are implemented in adherence to IT standards and policies. Works with project stakeholders to ensure decisions align with the infrastructure strategies defined by senior leadership. Exhibits exceptional oral and written communication skills necessary to coordinate across broad technical and non-technical areas; other technology services staff, customers, vendors, partners and leadership; Ensure successful and cooperative completion of tasks and projects and to resolve problems in a timely manner. Communicates project and team status to internal and external audiences to keep project team informed. Primary accountability is to manage small to medium complexity IT Infrastructure Projects. Responsible for all aspects of project management keeping projects on time, within budget, and within scope. Provides timely status reports to reflect project status, issues and risks. Provide project management or organizing function to focus efforts on completing projects. Guide project resources, stakeholders and vendors in efforts to identify objectives, anticipate obstacles, list and schedule tasks.

Job Responsibilities
Broad technical understanding surrounding the delivery of existing IT services and how IT Standards and Policies are applied.
Possesses strong project collaboration skills and able to focus IT resources on addressing and executing in accordance to meeting the project's timeline.
Manages all phases of testing as evidenced by preparation of test data/scripts, development and execution of tests, verification of test results and user acceptance sign off, in accordance with IS documentation standards.
Coordinates and directs project staff to assure projects/requests are completed within time tables and objectives met as evidenced by project plan documentation.
Provides project management leadership as evidenced by project planning, problem resolution, change control and quality assurance, in accordance with established policy.
Evaluates impact present and/or proposed systems have/will have on the organization as evidenced by detailed cost/benefit, statistical and impact analysis.
Develops system documentation as evidenced by completed policy, procedures and systems specifications, in accordance with IS documentation standards.
Exhibits exceptional oral and written communication skills necessary to coordinate across broad technical and non-technical areas; other technology services staff, customers, vendors, partners and leadership.
Efficiently and effectively communicates and follows up in a positive and meaningful manner with stakeholders on (1) project status and progress, (2) tasks and project priorities and (3) elevation of issues and risks impacting project's delivery.
Communicates effectively and timely the status on project implementations and problem resolutions as needed to all appropriate stakeholders and leadership.
Daily status review with manager in accordance with established policies.
Maintains vendor and user relationships and communicates status and problems in a timely, professional manner as evidenced by status reports and issues list, in accordance with IS documentation standards.
Establishes and maintains positive client/vendor relations.
Leads project task force meetings or work groups.
Writes minutes, vendor project correspondence and status reports, in accordance with IT documentation standards.
Demonstrated ability to work independently and as part of a team within a fast-paced environment
Ability to take on project management accountability for IT Infrastructure projects inclusive of new facility design and construction, major departmental relocation's, new business unit infrastructure build out, new solution deployment, and IT solution upgrades, replacements, and retirements.
Planning, organizing and coordinating across impacted areas and resources for projects from inception to project completion.
Develops project plans which lead to timely and successful project completions measured by meeting project deadline, measured by IS management as well as customer feedback.
Sets appropriate expectations for project activities, setting time frames, pushing for results and communicating status to project stakeholders in a timely manner.
Ensures appropriate communication of project status at all phases including planning, execution, completion, and post implementation reviews.
Understanding of existing IT Infrastructure processes.
Able to interpret project goals, collect specific impacts and translate into a detailed, properly communicated plan.
Coordinates appropriate IT resources and customer team members to meet the project needs ensuring all technology requirements are successfully understood, identified, coordinated, and implemented.
Motivates project team to achieve common goals in the delivery of the project
Focuses project team on IT Infrastructure project delivery while recognizing importance of limiting impacts to customers Identifies requirements for, and facilitates project planning and coordination meetings or conference calls.
Focuses discussions on deliverables and addressing needs of the project.


Additional Requirements

Education:
Associates Degree- Information Systems
College degree or equivalent experience
Experience:
2 years of IT infastructure project management
Skills:
3-5 years Experience Project Management, and computer skills (Microsoft Office).
Experience with training and development of training programs",11150,Washington
12,"Coordinator, Programming",The John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts,"Washington, DC 20566 (Foggy Bottom area)",None,"About The Kennedy Center

“I am certain that after the dust of centuries has passed over our cities, we, too, will be remembered not for victories or defeats in battle or in politics, but for our contribution to the human spirit.” – President John F. Kennedy

The Kennedy Center is the nation’s cultural center and living memorial to President John F. Kennedy. Located on the banks of the Potomac River in Washington, D.C., the Center presents performances across all genres, and is also home to artistic affiliates Washington National Opera and National Symphony Orchestra.

Mission Statement: As the nation's performing arts center, and a living memorial to President John F. Kennedy, we are a leader for the arts across America and around the world, reaching and connecting with artists, inspiring and educating communities. We welcome all to create, experience, learn about, and engage with the arts.

Commitment to Diversity & Inclusion

The Kennedy Center is a welcoming and inclusive culture where everyone benefits - we do it in a way that honors everyone’s humanity. We are able to advance our mission because of committed and passionate employees. We are fortunate to be able to leverage their diverse perspectives, life experiences and skills to inform how our workplace can be a safe, transparent, and replenishing community. Through honest discussion, our focus on DEI, and the creation of a D&I council, we are committed to always being the best versions of ourselves.

Job Description

The Kennedy Center’s Programming Department is a dynamic, creative, and dedicated group of arts administrators. The shared services team includes three unique and boundary pushing teams – Chamber, Classical New Music, and Jazz; Special Programming & Comedy; and Hip Hop Culture and Contemporary Music, allowing for exciting cross-discipline collaboration with an emphasis on work with Artistic Directors Renée Fleming, Joseph “Yossi” Kalichstein, Jason Moran, and Q-Tip.

The Coordinator, Programming will support the administrative aspects and day-to-day operations for all three teams. This position is essential in delivering a variety of services that ensure the efficient operation of the team and advancement of each team’s performance seasons.

The ecosystem of the shared services department requires staff to work across all genres as assigned by the Manager, Programming, learning about each genre while assisting with show duty, festivals, internally produced performances and/or events, and other large-scale projects.

The Coordinator must be able to exercise discretion in order to prioritize assignments and work under significant pressure, as many projects are time sensitive and involve concurrent deadlines. An eagerness to take initiative, communicate, work both independently and in a team setting, and problem solve with a positive attitude are essential.

Duties and Responsibilities

20% Project Management: Act as line producer for performances and other Kennedy Center events including, but not limited to artist advance, contracting, artist payments, and liaising with relevant internal departments (Production, Box Office, Marketing, PR, etc.) for productions in the Terrace Theater, Family Theater, REACH Campus, Millennium Stage, and virtual offerings.

20% Assist with the day-to-day management and administrative support for Chamber, Classical New Music, Jazz, Special Programming & Comedy, and Hip Hop Culture and Contemporary Music genres under the respective Director and/or Assistant Manager and Manager, Programming.

20% Company management including arranging travel, housing, and hospitality for visiting artists when required.

20% Assist the Manager, Programming with day-to-day management and administrative support of the Shared Services Department including, but not limited to taking meeting minutes, expense reimbursements, ordering office and show supplies, and guiding department interns.

10% Communicate confirmed programming information to marketing and confirmed production information to production.

5% Research, ideate, and assist towards implementation thereof, of artists, themes, and concepts as they pertain to Comedy & Special Programming. Attend live performances of new products whenever possible.

5% Payroll processing for all union and non-union employees working on produced shows.

N/A Responds to the needs and requests of Kennedy Center management and staff in a professional and expedient manner; Adheres to all employer policies and procedures.

N/A Other duties as assigned.

Key Qualifications

1-2 years’ experience in an administrative or artist services department.
Interest/knowledge in music or the performing arts.

Skills & Knowledge Qualifications

Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Must exercise good judgment, show initiative, and handle sensitive data in a trustworthy manner.
Strong organizational skills and the ability to work independently as well as in a team environment.
Discretion, maturity, and composure, especially under pressure.
Familiarity of working with contracts strongly encouraged.
Ability to establish priorities and juggle numerous assignments.
High standards and sense of responsibility.
Interest in positive interpersonal interaction, openness to diverse work situations and sense of humor strongly encouraged.

Physical Demands

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Must be able to work odd-hours, including evenings, weekends, holidays, and occasional work beyond 40 hours/week. Must be on-call during certain performances and company travel days.

Work Environment

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

The noise level in the work environment is low. Travel is not required for this position.

Benefits

We offer a comprehensive range of benefits to all full-time employees including: Medical, Dental, Vision, Paid Time Off, Paid Sick Leave, and a 403(b) Retirement Plan",11150,Washington
13,Project Manager Junior,Aquent,"Washington, DC 20005 (Downtown area)",None,"Job Description:
Our large nonprofit in Wash, DC is looking for a Junior Project Manager for a long term role.
Organizing meetings and assisting with event management, including coordinating team members, bios, invitation lists and letters, content/topic/speaker research, event summary

Managing internal team cross organizational meetings including developing agendas, note-taking, calendar updates and maintenance and team communications (via MS TEAMS platform)

Compiling c-suite level briefing books, including bios, research and summaries of topics/people/organizations

Administrative support tasks including drafting correspondence (letter, email, etc.), electronic filing of documents, database inputs and management

Research and drafting corresponding briefing memos on

o issues/topics related to aging and longevity

o organizations and company background and targeted interest areas

o people—bios, expertise, publications and speaking

Marketing support including responsibility for developing, updating, and maintaining marketing kits; identifying and pulling together relevant work product/reports/one-pagers/etc. that are relevant for specific meetings/engagements; working with colleagues in creative services to develop marketing collateral.
Client Description:
Our client is one of the largest non-profits in the US, with a very user-centric vision and a strong social mission. This organization dedicates its efforts on increasing membership with a strong focus digitally, via social media, and digital marketing. The vibe is collaborative, fast-paced, and overall, passionate. The people who work here live and breathe the organization’s mission of enhancing the quality of life, and championing social change.
Work here and:
Help target memberships now and into the future to develop products specifically targeted to those relatively new to the workforce
Have your voice be heard. Our client prides itself on considering the input of all involved in projects
Work with fellow freelancers who know that they’re working on projects designed for the betterment of communities
Work on national campaigns that are targeted by community
Work with others who are interested in outreach and volunteerism
Our client has made customer engagement a priority and is interested in all candidates who are passionate about it as well.",11150,Washington
14,IT Project Manager,US U.S. Mint,"Washington, DC","$87,198 - $113,362 a year","Duties
Summary
The incumbent serves as an IT Project Manager within the United States Mint, Information Technology Directorate, Application Development Division to support Manufacturing Focus Branch.

Responsibilities
If you do not meet any of the categories listed above, you may wish to apply under announcement 21-MINT-288-P, which is open for any U.S. citizen to apply. Please refer to that announcement for details on open period, eligibility, and how to apply.

As a IT Project Manager, you will:

Provide leadership and direction on various projects related to ITD services and mission.
Initiate, plan, and accomplish project goals, perform research and analysis in support of the projects, and identify and resolve project related problems.
Provide guidance, leadership, and support of business reengineering to advance the business of the United States Mint, and serves as the expert specialist/technical advisor, and provides assistance to technical Subject Matter Expert (SME) on assigned projects
Ensure the organization’s strategic plan, mission, and vision, are communicated to the project teams and integrated into the project teams’ objectives, work plans, work products, and services.
Act as a project manager on one or more concurrent project teams.

Travel Required
Occasional travel - 1 to 5 nights per month.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
12
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Similar jobs
Information Technology Project Managers
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be U.S. Citizens or U.S. Nationals
Please refer to ""Conditions of Employment.""
Click ""Print Preview"" to review the entire announcement before applying.
The experience may have been gained in either the public or private sector or volunteer service. One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis. Be sure all experience is documented in your resume by indicating place of employment, job title, length of time performing the duties, and the name and contact information for the supervisor. We must be able to verify this experience in your resume in order for you to receive credit.
Qualifications
You must meet the following requirements within 14 days of the closing date of this announcement.


For the GS-12, you must have one year of specialized experience at a level of difficulty and responsibility equivalent to the GS-11 grade level in the Federal service.

Specialized experience for this position includes:

Experience applying project management principles, practices and techniques to conduct or lead engagements and studies; and
Experience accomplishing the goals of projects by collaborating with technical and business subject matter experts; and
Experience developing work breakdown structures, resource leveling, milestones, predecessor and successor tasks, and reporting project status data; and
Experience applying system design policies and processes, integrating system analysis, software development, data validation and analysis, quality assurance, security and customer support into project plans.

In addition to meeting specialized experience, applicants must also show proficiency in 1) attention to detail, 2) customer service, 3) oral communication, and 4) problem solving.


In addition to the above requirements, you must meet the following time-in-grade requirement, if applicable:
For the GS-12, you must have been at the GS-11 level for 52 weeks.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
We may select from this announcement or any other source to fill one or more vacancies.This is a bargaining unit position.We offer opportunities for telework. (Number of telework days a pay period will be based on agency policy.)We offer opportunities for flexible work schedules.

CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT:
A one year probationary period may be required.
Public Trust – Background Investigation will be required.
Must successfully complete a background investigation.Complete a Declaration for Federal Employment to determine your suitability for Federal employment, at the time requested by the agency.If you are a male applicant born after December 31, 1959, certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System or are exempt from having to do so.Have your salary sent to a financial institution of your choice by Direct Deposit/Electronic Funds Transfer.Go through a Personal Identity Verification (PIV) process that requires two forms of identification from the Form I-9. Federal law requires verification of the identity and employment eligibility of all new hires in the U.S.Obtain and use a Government-issued charge card for business-related travel.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Your application includes your résumé, responses to the online questions, and required supporting documents. Please be sure that your résumé includes detailed information to support your qualifications for this position; failure to provide sufficient evidence in your résumé may result in a “not qualified” determination.

Rating: Your application will be evaluated in the following areas: Project management and Communication. Your application will be rated and ranked among others, based on your responses to the online questions, regarding your experience, education, training, performance appraisals and awards relevant to the duties of this position. A subject matter expert may be used in the evaluation. Your rating may be lowered if your responses to the online questions are not supported by the education and/or experience described in your application.

Referral: If you are among the top qualified candidates, your application may be referred to a selecting official for consideration. You may be required to participate in a selection interview.

If you are a displaced or surplus Federal employee (eligible for the Career Transition Assistance Plan (CTAP)/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Plan (ICTAP)) you must receive a score of 85.0 or better to be rated as “well qualified"" to receive special selection priority.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
A complete application includes 1. A résumé, 2. Vacancy question responses, and 3. Submission of any required documents. Please note that if you do not provide all required information, as specified in this announcement, you may not be considered for this position (or may not receive the special consideration for which you may be eligible).

All applicants are required to submit a résumé either by creating one in USAJOBS or uploading one of their own choosing. (Cover letters are optional.) To receive full credit for relevant experience, please list the month/date/year and number of hours worked for experience listed on your résumé. We suggest that you preview the online questions, as you may need to customize your résumé to ensure that it supports your responses to these questions. Please view résumé tips.

CURRENT AND FORMER FEDERAL EMPLOYEES - Documentation Relating to Your Federal Employment:
Submit a copy of your SF-50, Notification of Personnel Action, which shows your current (or most recent) grade and competitive service status. (The “position occupied” block on the SF-50 should show a “1” and your “tenure” block should show a “1” or “2”.)If you are currently on a Veterans Recruitment Appointment (VRA), submit a copy of an SF-50 showing that. Also, you must submit a copy of your DD214 or other documentation showing dates of service and type of discharge and any other applicable documents such as SF-15, VA letters, etc.Indicate on your application the highest permanent grade you have held; if this grade is different from your current grade, submit a copy of an additional SF-50 showing this grade.

CAREER TRANSITION ASSISTANCE PLAN (CTAP) OR INTERAGENCY CAREER TRANSITION ASSISTANCE PLAN (ICTAP) DOCUMENTATION: If you are a displaced or surplus Federal employee, click CTAP/ICTAP for eligibility and a detailed list of required documents.

If you are applying under a special hiring authority (e.g. Military Spouses, Interchange Agreement, VEOA, VRA, Schedule A Disability, etc.), please see applicant guide for required documentation. In order to be eligible under one of these authorities, you must submit all required documentation as outlined in the applicant guide.

Recommended Documents:
In addition, we recommend that you submit copies of the following:
A list of awards received (if applicable). DO NOT send copies of awards.A copy of your most recent completed performance appraisal.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Our comprehensive benefits are very generous. Our benefits package includes:

Challenging work, opportunities for advancement, competitive salaries, bonuses and incentive awards.Ten paid holidays, 13 days of sick leave, and 13 to 26 days of vacation time each year.Access to insurance programs that may be continued after you retire.A wide choice of health insurance plans, coverage for pre-existing conditions, and no waiting periods. We pay a substantial amount (up to 75%) of the health insurance premiums.A retirement program which includes employer-matching contributions.Learn more about Federal benefits programs at: https://help.usajobs.gov/index.php/Pay_and_Benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Individuals with disabilities
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Family of overseas employees
Family members of a federal employee or uniformed service member who is, or was, working overseas.
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
All candidates who are: Current or former federal employees qualifying as Status Candidates, Federal employees currently serving on a VRA, VEOA eligibles, CTAP/ICTAP eligibles, eligible for special hiring authorities (e.g., the Schedule A appointment for persons with disabilities, or covered by an Interchange Agreement), or Land Management employees eligible under Public Law 114-47.",11150,Washington
15,IT Support Manager,"Amazon Web Services, Inc.","Arlington, VA",None,"
Bachelor's degree, or relevant experience
2+ years’ experience managing a technical support team

At Amazon, we strive to be Earth’s most customer-centric company where we can find and discover anything we want to buy online. We hire the world’s brightest minds, offering them an environment in which one can relentlessly improve the customer experience. Innovation and creativity are built into the DNA of the company and are encouraged at all levels of employment. Every day we solve complex technical and business problems with ingenuity and simplicity. We’re making history and the good news is we’ve only just begun.
AWS IT Services Support team provides highly-available IT support for Amazon employees worldwide. We provide support for all used client applications, operating systems, email, VPN, mobile devices, and common collaboration services such as SharePoint and Exchange. Our customers may engage us via phone, chat, in person, or trouble ticketing.
You will manage local and/or remote resources and assist the global organization to define the perfect customer experience and own the strategies to create that experience. You will help the group develop and leverage their knowledge base to expedite the resolution of recurrent issues. You will identify ways to proactively reduce requests through automation, documentation, and process improvement. You will set high standards for issue handling, escalation and problem management across the organization and guide the team with metrics and goals that clearly measure their success.
You will work alongside a group of leaders to define the priorities and track the metrics and key performance indicators within the organization as a whole. You will hold service owners accountable to resolve issues on behalf of your customers.

Responsibilities include:

Leading a team of Support Engineers. Recognizing inefficiency and driving process improvement to enhance the productivity of all Amazonian's.
Measuring, monitoring, and maintaining the team’s ability to meet or exceed contact and resolution Service Level Agreements (SLA).
Coordinating a variety of projects in an operational environment.
Written and verbal communication with the ability to present complex technical information in a clear and concise manner to a variety of audiences.
Working with engineering teams to plan for the support of new tools and services and improving the level of support provided for existing ones.
Developing and maintaining policies, procedures, and processes.
Hiring, developing, and retaining great talent.
Reducing contacts through process improvement and root cause analysis.
Responding to inquiries, escalations, and establishing partnerships with key customers and service owners.
An understanding of enterprise IT systems such as Exchange and Active Directory, as well as exposure to a wide variety of technical products and issues
Experience and/or qualification relating to but not limited to: Linux, Cisco, ITIL, and Microsoft
Technical troubleshooting and strong analytical skills
Established time and project management skills with the ability to lead multiple projects simultaneously
Experience in ITIL Framework
Proven ability to operate in an extreme high pressure dynamic fast paced situations, successfully handle multiple competing priorities and possess a high level of discipline while displaying a high degree of flexibility and professionalism
Experience communicating cross-functionally and across management levels in formal and informal settings
Experience in making data-driven decisions

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us",11150,Washington
16,IT Project Manager,CACI,"National Harbor, MD 20745",None,"Job Description
What You’ll Get to Do:
IT Project Managers are responsible for the performance of technical projects in accordance with Statement of Work requirements. PMs oversee a variety of technical IT projects of varying size and complexity including office network buildouts, infrastructure and hardware deployment, system integration, physical moves and software development. Candidates will manage the technical direction of projects through all phases; initiation, planning, requirements design, implementation, and testing in accordance with project objectives.
More About the Role:
Responsible for the planning, management, coordinating and executing of project activities.
Provides leadership to a cross-functional technical team to achieve project objectives.
Responsible for the creation of project deliverables (project plan, requirements, roadmaps, etc.).
Works cooperatively with engineering leads to plan and direct project tasks.
Oversees individual operational projects from identification of requirements, analysis and design, development, end-user testing, deployment and production support.
Manage project risks and issues and implement corrective actions.
Provide Rough Order Magnitude (ROM) for project tasks.
Create and maintain detailed project schedules.
Establish working relationship with project sponsors and stakeholders.
Ensure adherence to the customer’s Systems Engineering Life Cycle (SELC) process through all project phases (planning, requirements definition, design, development, integration, test, implementation).
Communicates effectively with a wide variety of technical and non-technical audiences.
You’ll Bring These Qualifications:
Requires bachelor’s degree or equivalent and eight years of project management experience in a technical environment.
Ability to work independently with little direction, supervision, and management oversight.
Ability to obtain a DHS Entrance on Duty (EOD).
Project Management Professional (PMP) Certification.
Experience with Microsoft Project.
Excellent written and verbal communications skills.
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have:
Familiarity with using ServiceNow
What We Can Offer You:
We’ve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.
Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.
We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.
We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nation’s highest priorities.
For over 55 years, the principles of CACI’s unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success.
DHSHP
Job Location
US-National Harbor-MD-MARYLAND SUBURBAN


CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",11150,Washington
17,Human Resources Associate,Hill+Knowlton Strategies,"Washington, DC 20036 (Downtown area)",None,"Hill+Knowlton Strategies is seeking a People + Culture Associate. In this role, you will ensure complete and timely execution of project plans and support the regional People + Culture Managers to coordinate the efforts of these continuous improvement initiatives. Assist with developing and deploying tools and programs, enhancing project management capabilities across the HR function.
Compliance
Assist with preparation of annual compliance reports in the region (AAP, Compensation Survey’s, EEO/Vets, WPP HR Survey, Women Survey, etc.)
Assist with preparing regular reports, i.e. headcount, turnover, hiring statistics, etc.
Maintain and prepare monthly reporting to Finance and Talent Teams
Act as HR record keeper and perform basic analysis in partnership with HR team to provide weekly/monthly/annual reports as needed
Complete Employee verifications
Create employee folders through Microsoft Teams and upload, maintain folders with employee records
Track employee milestone anniversaries and prepare necessary information to send out on their anniversary
Various projects working with the US HR team as specified
Talent Acquisition
Track Temporary employee list and manage contract extensions
Onboarding
Initiate New Hire tickets for creation of laptop and email set up
Coordinate and schedule all new hire onboarding schedules working with both HR and hiring managers
Maintain onboarding paperwork via Jobvite
Handle all new hire tasks including adding to necessary trainings, sending PTO emails out, and travel log
Off-boarding
Create and implement exit interview form for Fellows to complete with separation
Input exit interview data into TalentTree, our HRIS system, to comply with WPP’s global requirements
Initiate termination tickets for leavers for email/overall set up to be turned off
Assist with preparing exit interview summary and analysis
Payroll
Provide HRIS data entry support when needed
About
Hill+Knowlton Strategies is an international public relations company with over 85 offices around the world.

We believe that every corporation, every brand, every client has a public and today’s public is more powerful than ever before. They have the power to topple CEO’s, reshape corporate and brand strategy, kill products and create unicorns. Today’s public demands truth, transparency and the highest behavioral standards.
Our client obsession means constantly evolving new products + services to help brands and the public communicate. Always in beta.
At H+K our belief is that the agency is a canvas for everyone to write their own story. This job description is written at a moment in time; whatever role you take at H+K we expect you to evolve that role; it should be different tomorrow than it is today and set new standards in the industry.
Join our team and harness the power of the public.

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, Hill+Knowlton Strategies does not discriminate against applicants or employees because of their race, creed, color, age, religion, sex, disability, sexual orientation, marital status, military status, national origin, or ancestry.
JT",11150,Washington
18,Special Event Manager (Project Management),US Organization of the Joint Chiefs of Staff,"Arlington, VA","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is part of the Organization of the Joint Chiefs of Staff. The incumbent serves as a principal advisor to the CJCS, the DJ-3 and the DDNHDO/HHD on National Special Security Events, significant and domestic sporting events, exercises and incidents and Support to International Sporting Competition Defense funds while providing options to the J-36, DDNHDO/HHD and DJ-3 requiring time sensitive response to facilitate DoD support to significant special events.
Responsibilities
As a Special Event Manager (Project Management) at the GS-0301-14 some of your typical work assignments may include:

Manages DoD resources, prepares time lines, researches and provides guidance and information, and coordinates with interagency and public-sector components to facilitate DoD support to assigned special events. Directs Combatant Commands, Military Departments, and DoD components to implement defense support to special events.
Represents the Joint Staff while interfacing with Federal, state and local law enforcement, emergency management, and other government agencies, Congressional staffs, and private organizations to negotiate and plan DoD support, develop schedules and plans, execute and track projects, manage finances, and facilitate deliverables.
Interacts with officials inside and outside federal, state and local government, private industry, and the general public.
Participates in emergency response operations for significant national emergencies, disasters, events, incidents, and exercises.
Leads matrixed military, civilian, and contractor personnel while facilitating and executing DoD support to assigned significant international and domestic events.
Directs the Joint Staff execution of DoD support to assigned international and domestic events, exercises, and incidents, such as the Olympics, Paralympics, Special Olympics, and National Special Security Events designated by the Secretary of Homeland Security with cradle to grave coverage.
Manages and directs appropriated funds, military forces, distribution of DoD resources and assets, contracted products and services, and information sharing to ensure security, safety, and logistical functions for special events.
Serves as senior Joint Staff representative to Federal Interagency partners (Departments of Homeland Security, State, Justice, and Interior), White House-level working groups, state and local government agencies, Congressional staffs, and private organizations.
Performs Property Book Officer (PBO) functions, and provides advice to the CJCS, the DJ-3 and the DDNHDO/HHD on all matters related to the Special Events Warehouse Operations, property accountability and responsibility for Special Events specialized security and communications equipment in support of National Special Security Events (NSSE), significant and domestic sporting events, exercises and incidents while utilizing the Support to International Sporting Competition (SISC) Defense funds in providing options to the J-36, DDNHDO/HHD and DJ-3 requiring time sensitive delivery of specialized security and communications equipment to help and respond to facilitate DoD support to significant international, and domestic special events.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - you may be expected to travel in military or commercial aircraft for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
None
Job family (Series)
0301 Miscellaneous Administration And Program
Similar jobs
Managers, All Other
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a U.S. citizen
Males born after 12-31-59 must be registered for Selective Service
Resume and supporting documents (See How To Apply)
Suitable for Federal employment, determined by a background investigation
May be required to successfully complete a probationary period
Work Schedule: Full Time
Overtime: Occasionally
Tour of Duty: Flexible
Recruitment Incentives: May be Authorized
Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA): Exempt
Financial Disclosure: Not Required
Telework Eligibility: This position is telework eligible
Employee must obtain/maintain a Critical Sensitive (Top Secret) security clearance
Drug Testing Designated Position: Yes
Qualifications
You may qualify at the GS-14, if you fulfill the following qualifications:

One year of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-13 grade level in the Federal service:
1. Utilizes project management in the strategic planning and oversight of logistics, inventory management, property accountability and security for special events.


2. Manages long range public events to include development, scheduling, coordinating, managing projects and resources, inspecting costs, work, and contractor performance.


3. Developed innovative solutions to complex problems for national special security events and policy-making architecture utilizing knowledge of interagency stakeholders, negotiation techniques, strategic planning, and global terrorism.

4. Applied conflict resolution to lead a matrixed team of military, civilian, and contract personnel to coordinate support operations with other federal agencies for Ceremonies and Special Events.


Substitution of education may not be used in lieu of specialized experience for this grade level.

Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.
Education
Additional information
Veterans Employment Opportunity Act (VEOA): To be eligible for a VEOA appointment under Merit Promotion procedures, the veteran must be a preference eligible or a veteran separated after 3 years or more of continuous active service performed under honorable conditions.

Interagency Career Transition Assistance Programs: This program applies to employees who have been involuntarily separated from a Federal service position within the competitive service or Federal service employees whose positions have been deemed surplus or no longer needed. To receive selection priority for this position, you must: 1) meet ICTAP eligibility criteria; 2) be rated well-qualified for the position; Well qualified is defined as possessing the type and quality of experience that exceeds the positions minimum qualifications. and 3) submit the appropriate documentation to support your ICTAP eligibility. For more information: https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/workforce-restructuring/employee-guide-to-career-transition/.

Noncompetitive Appointment Authorities: For more information on noncompetitive appointment authority eligibility requirements:
Persons with Disabilities - Schedule A
Special Hiring Authority for Veterans

Special Hiring Authority for Certain Military Spouses
Other Special Appointment Authorities
Males born after 12-31-59 must be registered or exempt from Selective Service (see https://www.sss.gov/RegVer/wfRegistration.aspx

The selecting official may choose to conduct interviews, and once the selection is made, you will receive a notification of the decision.


NOTE: Declining to be interviewed or failure to report for a scheduled interview will be considered as a declination for further consideration for employment against this vacancy.


Selective Service Requirement: Please visit http://www.sss.gov for more information.


For more information, please visit

https://www.dla.mil/Portals/104/Documents/Careers/downloads/DoDGenAppInfo%2012-1-2020.pdf?ver=ECNbdsHtGilTd3OENN4A0Q%3d%3d

Other Notes:


Status candidates must meet time-in-grade requirements (52 weeks at the next lower grade level).


Re-employed Annuitant: This position DOES NOT meet criteria for re-employed annuitant. The DoD criteria for hiring Re-employed Annuitants can be found at: http://www.esd.whs.mil/Portals/54/Documents/DD/issuances/140025/1400.25-V300.pdf

May be required to work other than normal duty hours, which may include evenings, weekends, and/or holidays and/or overtime.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Once the application process is complete, your resume and supporting documentation will be used to determine whether you meet the job qualifications listed on this announcement. If you are minimally qualified for this job, your resume and supporting documentation will be compared to your responses on the Occupational Questionnaire. If you rate yourself higher than is supported by your application materials, your responses may be adjusted and/or you may be excluded from consideration for this job. If you are found to be among the top candidates, you will be referred to the selecting official for employment consideration. Your qualifications will be evaluated on the following competencies (knowledge, skills, abilities and other characteristics):

Competencies:

Communication
Leading a Team/Project
Project Management
Public Safety and Security
Strategic Planning

Military Spouse Preference: If you are entitled to military spouse preference, in order to receive this preference you must choose the spousal eligibility in your application package referencing MSP Military Spouse Preference. Your preference entitlement will be verified by the employing agency. To claim Military Spouse Preference (MSP) please complete the Military Spouse PPP Self-Certification Checklist, save the document and attach it to your application package.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Top Secret
Drug test required
Yes
Position sensitivity and risk
Critical-Sensitive (CS)/High Risk
Trust determination process
National security
Required Documents

Required Documents
The documents you are required to submit vary based on the authority you are using to apply (i.e., applying as a veteran, applying as a current permanent Federal employee, applying as a reinstatement, etc...). Your complete application includes your COMPLETE resume, your responses to the online questionnaire, and documents which prove your eligibility to apply. If you fail to provide these documents, you will be marked as having an incomplete application package and you will not be considered any further.


The following documents are REQUIRED
1. Your resume:

Your resume may be submitted in any format. It must include your name and contact information and support the specialized experience described in this announcement.
For qualifications determinations your resume must contain the number of hours worked per week and the dates of employment (i.e.,"" HRS per week and month/year"" or ""HRS per week and month/year to present"").
For additional information see: What to include in your resume.
2. SF50
All current and former civilian Federal employees must submit a copy of your MOST RECENT SF50 (Notification of Personnel Action) showing your tenure, grade and step, salary, and type of position occupied (i.e., Excepted or Competitive)
3. Veteran's Documents
If applying using veteran's preference or under a Veteran's hiring authority you must submit the following documents:
DD214 showing character of service, SF-15 Form and VA letter showing final percentage, or certification of expected discharge or release from active duty.
PLEASE REVIEW THE BELOW LINK FOR OTHER SUPPORTING DOCUMENTS needed for proof of eligibility:

https://www.dla.mil/Portals/104/Documents/Careers/downloads/FourthEstateRequiredSupportingDocumentation%2011-16-2020.pdf?ver=Lgkkn1HW9a8is7V2lyCS2Q%3d%3d
If you are claiming Military Spouse Preference, you must submit supporting documents with your application package. These documents must provide acceptable information to verify: you reside within the commuting area of your sponsor's permanent duty station (PDS); proof of marriage to the active duty sponsor, proof of military member's active duty status, and other documentation required by the vacancy announcement to which you are applying; and must meet all pre-employment criteria and be eligible for immediate noncompetitive appointment to a position in the competitive service. Documentation required: Marriage Certificate or License, Signed Self-Certification Checklist, Veterans' Preference documentation (e.g., DD-214, VA Letter, Statement of Service, if applicable), Transcripts (if applicable).
Additional documentation required if previously held a federal position: SF-50s (e.g., LWOP, highest grade held, overseas appointments, etc.), SF-75 Information, and documentation of performance rating of record (dated within the last 12 months)
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Individuals with disabilities
Military spouses
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Federal employee means current and former permanent competitive service employees and special authorities (Interchange Agreement agency employees) may apply. Veterans eligibilities include 30% Disabled Vet or more, Individuals with Disabilities means Schedule A, and Veterans Employment Opportunities Act (VEOA) candidates are eligible to apply. Eligible EO 12721 and Military Spouse Preference (MSP) eligible under competitive and non-competitive appointment may apply.",11150,Washington
19,Project Manager,ICF,"Rockville, MD 20850",None,"ICF is a mission-driven company filled with people who care deeply about improving the lives of others and making the world a better place. Our core values include Embracing Difference; we seek candidates who are passionate about building a culture that encourages, embraces, and hires dimensions of difference.
@ ICF Next, we are fearless in finding new ways to solve problems, relentless in making sure it pays off for our clients and committed to making a positive change in the world.
Join our community of mission-driven creatives, communicators, strategists, and technologists to challenge the status quo.
We’re currently hiring for a Project Manager to help to manage and coordinate a variety of activities for our National Cancer Institute client.
As a Project Manager, you will have:
An understanding of the project’s scope and ensure the client and team are on the same page
Demonstrated experience meeting deadlines and ensuring the team has what they need to meet theirs
Demonstrated experience managing a project to schedule and ensuring the client and team understand what is expected of them
The ability to identify and resolve or mitigate areas needing clarification, project dependencies, risks, and issues
The ability to ensure the client and team are always aware of project status, risks, and issues
The ability to be a proactive self-starter, working independently to move projects and tasks forward to completion
The ability to work in a collaborative team environment and co-lead projects with other project managers
The ability to coordinate with multiple stakeholders to schedule meetings
An understanding of project management tools and how to use them consistently and effectively across teams to manage projects
Experience preparing, leading and facilitating status meetings, milestone reviews, and work-in-progress demos to the client in a confident and professional manner
Demonstrated experience planning, organizing, taking meeting notes, and managing the activities of other departments and organizations in order to ensure the on-time and on-budget delivery of projects
As a Project Manager, you also will have:
Five or more years of experience managing relevant projects in a consulting or government environment
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent required
A demonstrated understanding of project management methodology including the ability to identify and resolve issues, manage risk, develop detailed work plans and specifications and run team meetings
A demonstrated ability to manage tight timelines while adhering to budgetary constraints
Ability to work on multiple projects and manage various stakeholders simultaneously
Previous experience working in a scientific field or managing scientific/technical projects is preferred but not required
Job Location(s): Within the current landscape, this role will be supported remotely. This role will ultimately sit at the client’s Rockville office when remote working guidelines are lifted.
Working at ICF
Working at ICF means applying a passion for meaningful work with intellectual rigor to help solve the leading issues of our day. Smart, compassionate, innovative, committed, ICF employees tackle unprecedented challenges to benefit people, businesses, and governments around the globe. We believe in collaboration, mutual respect, open communication, and opportunity for growth. If you’re seeking to make a difference in the world, visit www.icf.com/careers to find your next career. ICF—together for tomorrow.
ICF is an equal opportunity employer that values diversity at all levels. (EOE – Minorities/Females/ Protected Veterans Status/Disability Status/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity). For more information, please read our EEO & AA policy .
Reasonable Accommodations are available for disabled veterans and applicants with disabilities in all phases of the application and employment process. To request an accommodation please email icfcareercenter@icf.com and we will be happy to assist. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodations. Read more about non-discrimination: EEO is the law and Pay Transparency Statement .
Rockville, MD (MD18)",11150,Washington
20,Work Based Learning Program Data Center Project Assistant,"Amazon Data Services, Inc.","Sterling, VA",None,"
High School diploma or equivalent education
18 years or older
Ability to work 40 hours/week. Must be able to work 10 hour shifts as needed.
Able to start August 2021.
1+ years of experience with Microsoft Office Suite - Word, Excel and Outlook required;
1+ years of experience with SharePoint (or similar)

We are currently seeking an Administrative Assistant to serve as support to our Data Center Project Engineers. Ideal candidates will partner with multiple Data Center Project Engineers to handle administrative tasks freeing up their time to focus on organizational goals. A quick thinker, your flexibility and adaptability are key to constantly changing demands and priorities. You will frequently find yourself in the center of everything that happens on the team. You are pivotal to the success of a well-run, efficient, productive and happy team.

In this role, you will wear many hats! Administrative Assistants perform an array of administrative functions critical to running an organization efficiently. You will strategically manage your Data Center Project Engineer's Administration tasks of:

Badge requests and vendor on-boarding
Project input requests
Project funding submission, Vendor Purchase Requests and Orders
Changes to the Risk Assessment, Method of Procedure templates, etc.
Change Management Approvals and schedule coordination
Managing of scopes of work
Track delivery of material with the Power and Cooling Supply team
Coordinate plans for internal equipment transfers
IT equipment procurement
Team wiki updates
Travel arrangements
Update Playbook
Update status at the managers’ request
Misc. project support for new hires Closeout documents (Agile, daily scans, Quality Control, etc.)
Manage requests for access

Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have ten employee-led affinity groups, reaching 40,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and we host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 14 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.


1+ years of experience planning and time management
1+ years of experience in construction, or data center environments
Meets/exceeds Amazon’s leadership principles requirements for this role
Meets/exceeds Amazon’s functional/technical depth and complexity for this role

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workforce. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, visit US Disability Accommodations.",11150,Washington
21,HR Project Manager,SiriusXM,"Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)",None,"SiriusXM and Pandora have joined together to create the leading audio entertainment company in the U.S. Together, we are uniquely positioned to lead a new era of audio entertainment by delivering the most compelling subscription and ad-supported audio experiences to millions of listeners - in the car, at home and on the go. Our talent, content, technology and innovation continue to be at the forefront, and we want you to be a part of it! Check out our current openings below and at www.siriusxm.com/careers.
Position Summary:
We’re looking for a strong Project Manager to help us execute against the HR vision and strategy that supports SiriusXM today and for the future. You’re curious, eager to learn, can build rapport, organize teams against a common goal, and can keep multiple projects on track. You bring structure and harmony to cross-functional efforts. You embody a mindset of change, feel comfortable in a nimble, dynamic and fluid work environment, and enable others to do the same.
The HR Project Manager, reporting into the Head of People Services, will contribute to the overall management of the HR project portfolio as well as directly manage key HR projects, both technical and non-technical. This role will also partner with leaders of HR Centers of Expertise (COE) to understand core activities and influence prioritization of new programs.
Duties and Responsibilities:
The selected candidate will:
Own and effectively manage multiple small to large scale projects and tasks concurrently, including project design, scope and solutions
Lead effective governance across the project management lifecycle
Gain subject matter expertise of project, its business value, customer benefits and needs addressed, and deep dive into business and technical details
Ensure business goals are identified and agreed upon for the project; establish quantitative KPIs with baseline and measure targets
Understand how to apply project management concepts to projects and programs that don’t necessarily fall in the typical SDLC framework
Drive cross-team collaboration in a structured and efficient way seeking to accelerate progress toward goals while removing barriers and roadblocks along the way
Ensure project team and stakeholders have adequate understanding of ownership, timelines, resource needs, risks, contentions, and dependencies
Manage and drive decision making among stakeholders
Track and report project status; communicate regular updates to various constituents using centralized means
Partner with Internal Communications team to determine rollout/launch strategy; manage execution of communications plan
Partner with COEs to develop change management strategies that will drive adoption and enablement for impacted audiences (employees, managers, administrators, departments, etc)
Execute project deliverables utilizing HR PMO tools, templates and methodology
Identify improvements to streamline and simplify the PMO processes to meet the evolving needs of the business
Supervisory Responsibilities:
None
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree or equivalent
Minimum of 5 years in program/project management role and/or management consulting.
Experience managing people projects / HR initiatives a plus
Requirements and General Skills:
Must have excellent interpersonal, presentation, and influencing skills
Exemplify organization and attention to detail in all that you do
Familiarity with business process design/improvement/management methodology and tools
Must be a self motivated team player able to work effectively with general guidance toward objectives
Bachelor's degree or equivalent
Experience using models like DACI and AGILE and applying operation models to drive execution and decision making
Technical Skills:
Proficient in Google suite (Docs, Sheets, Slides) and Microsoft Office (WORD, Excel, PowerPoint & Project)
More details about our company benefits can be found here!
Our goal at SiriusXM+Pandora is to provide and maintain a work environment that fosters mutual respect, professionalism and cooperation. SiriusXM+Pandora is an equal opportunity employer that does not discriminate on the basis of actual or perceived race, creed, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, alienage or citizenship status, age, disability or handicap, sex, gender identity, marital status, familial status, veteran status, sexual orientation or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws.
The requirements and duties described above may be modified or waived by the Company in its sole discretion without notice.",11150,Washington
22,IT Project Manager,Telecommunications Development Corp.,"Washington, DC 20009 (Shaw area)","From $100,000 a year","TDC has an immediate need for an IT Project Manager with telcom and radio experience. This Project Manager will be responsible for: Coordinating telecommunication systems and radio installation projectsProject management and leading several teams through different IT objectives that include but are not limited to audio visual software and hardware installation, radio and cell tower installation, vender management, etc.Some on site surveying to evaluate the location and its IT infrastructure for better suitability. The field engineer handovers the blueprint of a given area to the telecom manager for a further decision.Hardware Installation: the project manager takes care of the further installation process in association with the team towards its successful applicable hardware set-up. Test the entire set up as outlined by the requirements of the client to ensure that all device is functional and to assure maximum quality. Requirements8+ years of Project Management experience5+ years of IT Experience5+ years of radio and telcom experienceBachelor's degree in related field.The position is based in the Washington, DC and may require limited travel to client sites. The work will start remote for now until we are cleared to return to the office. Please submit your resume and contact information.Job Types: Full-time, ContractPay: From $100,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offProfessional development assistanceVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)License/Certification:PMP (Preferred)Work Location:One locationBenefit Conditions:Waiting period may apply",11150,Washington
23,Associate Operations Officer,World Bank Group,"Washington, DC 20433 (Foggy Bottom area)",None,"Job #: req12201

Organization: IFC

Sector: Investment

Grade: GF

Term Duration: 3 years 0 months

Recruitment Type: International Recruitment

Location: Washington, DC,United States

Required Language(s): English

Preferred Language(s): French, Spanish

Closing Date: 6/18/2021 (MM/DD/YYYY) at 11:59pm UTC


Description

IFC—a member of the World Bank Group—is the largest global development institution focused on the private sector in emerging markets. We work in more than 100 countries, using our capital, expertise, and influence to create markets and opportunities in developing countries. In fiscal year 2020, we invested $22 billion in private companies and financial institutions in developing countries, leveraging the power of the private sector to end extreme poverty and boost shared prosperity. For more information, visit www.ifc.org
IFC’s Manufacturing, Agribusiness and Services (MAS) department covers sectors which are essential for economic growth and for basic human needs such as food, shelter, a habitable and sustainable climate, jobs, and health and education. MAS clients play a critical role in production of the goods and services demanded by consumers and required for infrastructure and global supply chains.
Through the business it does with its private sector clients, IFC's priorities in MAS are: (i) increasing productivity and access to goods and services, while supporting low carbon growth and introducing gender-smart solutions; (ii) making IFC the financing partner of choice for targeted clients, in part through its world-class industry expertise; (iii) supporting select local companies to grow while improving their transparency, efficiency and sustainable competitiveness; (iv) catalyzing investment; and (v) developing client, sector and country-level solutions that can be scaled and replicated.
To further enhance the development impact of its investments, IFC delivers Advisory Services (AS) with the aim to reduce operational risks, foster productivity, and adopt responsible business practices to transform markets and improve people's lives. The Associate Operations Officer will support a number of Advisory Services initiatives run by the MAS global advisory team under the overall supervision of the Global MAS Advisory Manager and in close collaboration with the relevant Global Platform Leads.

Duties and Accountabilities:
The Associate Operations Officer will have an active hands-on role in a variety of advisory and project management tasks. Responsibilities include, but are not limited to two broad areas of work:
1. Support the operations of global donor partnerships which are funding advisory services housed in MAS, such as the Global Agriculture and Food Security Program (GAFSP), the Food Land Use and Restoration Program (FOLUR), the Global Health Platform (GHP) and others:Work closely with advisory project leads to develop a program pipeline. Ensure portfolio reporting and support link with World Bank projects as requiredAttend project supervision meetings to be on top of implementation progress and support the dissemination of lessons learnedManage the organization of various Steering Committee meetings, including taking minutes and supporting the teams in completing follow-up tasksAct as the focal point for compiling and disseminating communications materials, including conferences and webinars, in close coordination with the MAS communications team and the Development Partner Relations teamWork closely with IFC’s finance, results measurement, and operations teams to prepare and finalize implementation plans, presentations, supervision documents, donor reports and proposals.
2. Support global MAS Advisory platform leads by acting as a project coordinator for select initiatives with clientsEngage with internal, external and client teams, coordinate activities and oversee implementation timelines including budget and consultantsOrganize missions and track post-mission follow-upPrepare management and system reportsGather lessons learned and prepare case studies, events, interviews, videos for internal and external audiences as neededPrepare donor proposals and donors reports as requiredOversee the budget and project cycle reporting according to IFC project governance and procedures, including project supervision and completion reports.

Selection Criteria
Commitment to IFC and the World Bank Group’s mission, strategy and values;Master’s degree in Business/Finance, International Development, or related fields across manufacturing, agribusiness and services;At least 5 years of relevant practical experience in a related field, preferably in the private sector;Familiarity with IFC Investment and Advisory servicesStrong analytical and problem-solving skills and sound business judgment to identify issues and present creative and practical solutions;Demonstrated ability to work in teams, attention to detail and drive for results;Ability to work independently to develop solutions and quickly course correct post-feedback;Excellent written and verbal communication skills in English. French or Spanish language abilities a plus;Proficiency in Microsoft Excel, PowerPoint, Word

Poverty has no borders, neither does excellence. We succeed because of our differences and we continuously search for qualified individuals with diverse backgrounds from around the globe.",11150,Washington
24,Project Manager - CTJ (Secret),Microsoft,"Washington, DC",None,"Microsoft is on a mission to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. Our culture is centered on embracing a growth mindset, a theme of inspiring excellence, and encouraging teams and leaders to bring their best each day. Growth mindset encourages each of us to lean in and learn what matters most to our customers, to create the foundational knowledge that enables us to make customer-first decisions in everything we do. In doing so, we create life-changing innovations that impact billions of lives around the world. You can help us achieve our mission.
Microsoft Federal
Microsoft Federal delivers a single unified organization centered around our customer: All critical customer functions are brought under the same organizational umbrella. Bringing together the breadth and depth in our space with a razor sharp focus on serving the U.S. Government. Our federal customers’ expectations of how to contract, interact, and partner with us are changing, and they need to evolve at the pace of the private sector. Launching a nimble, empowered organization with comprehensive resources allows us to work hand in hand with our customers to accelerate their technology innovation, whether through R&D or through direct contracting.
Microsoft Federal serves the U.S. Government (USG), allowing Microsoft to support the growing government business. The organization supports the capabilities and requirements to service USG through direct sales, contracting, and billing with the USG. Microsoft Federal entity will meet obligations of manage contracts with the USG through six business teams and three enablement teams.
We are committed to empowering our teams, building upon our strategic investments, and delivering the technology to achieve federal missions. As our federal customers pursue their work, from defending the nation, to serving its citizens in challenging times, they look to Microsoft to help them innovate, and they expect end-to-end engagement tailored to their needs.
Microsoft has been committed to and continues to heavily invest in supporting our Federal Government. Microsoft Federal offers our full spectrum of products and services, including hardware, software, online products, and consulting and services.
Join us and be one who helps to empower the US government! That’s incredible reach. When you combine that with your own inspiration, plus the freedom and support to make your ideas happen, you can make a huge impact.
Part leader, part mentor, and part consultant, our team of Project Managers comprises an unusual mix of project management and consulting skills, along with a passion for technology. We are responsible for keeping the project team working on the highest priority tasks, removing risks and impediments, and leading the communication with the end customer. As a trusted advisor to our customers, you will be responsible for the successful execution of one or more projects at a time, providing guidance, coaching, and project leadership. By mentoring and influencing, you will drive the highest quality and the strongest sense of customer focus on each project.
Responsibilities
The Services Delivery Project Manager (PjM) is responsible for engagement execution within a formal Statement of Work (SOW) to drive predictable behaviors in terms of project process and outcomes (accomplished on time, on budget, and according to customer specifications). The Services Project Manager supports the Account Delivery Executive (ADE) in the areas of ensuring delivery engagement quality and achieving high customer satisfaction. The PjM:
Delivers engagements within the constraints of schedule, features/functionality, and budget.Manages the work that must be done to deliver an integrated solution usually composed of products, services, or a formalized solution offeringEstablishes a strategy of continuous risk management that enables proactive decisions and actions throughout the project life cycle and create an environment to support it where the project team has visible, measurable, and repeatable processes for managing these risksExecutes established (as mutually agreed to) policies and procedures for the project, e.g. quality assurance, team reference guide, communication plan, and setting up the environment.Manages (as mutually agreed) Microsoft resources, partners and/or customer resources and materials (equipment, supplies, stock, or consumable/perishable items) used to complete tasks in a project.Maintains the Master Project Plan, the Communication Plan (communications within the team and between the team and external entities), and the Master Project Schedule.Monitors project health relative to resources (people and optionally funding/cost), schedule (time), and features (the solution and its quality) as specified by the established project protocol.Reconciles actual versus planned performance, analyzes variances, evaluates possible alternatives and takes appropriate corrective actions (control) as specified by the established project protocol.Collects, reviews and publishes project status reports for resources (people and optionally funding/cost), schedule (time), stakeholder management, and features (the solution and its quality) that influence project performance and completion.Follows the principles of the Microsoft Solutions Framework (MSF), the Microsoft Operations Framework (MOF) and the current Services methodology (MSDM) in project delivery
QualificationsProject Management skills including financial management, planning, scheduling, reporting, resource management, communications, risk management, dependencies, scope, time, quality and budget.Passion for technology: experience in either Microsoft infrastructure, Microsoft cloud, Microsoft Security, Office365, or Microsoft Productivity solution implementations is a plus.Ability to think strategically, work effectively in ambiguous situations and respond favorably to change, execute effectively, work under deadline pressure and manage multiple projects.Strong verbal and written communication skills, with a strong history of building effective interpersonal relationships.Refined presentation skills and ability to communicate with a variety of different audiences including C-suite team members.PMP Certification (preferred) or equivalent (approximately three years of project management experience, plus a college degree)Ability to work with diverse cultures and customers
The successful candidate must be a U.S. Citizen. Citizenship Verification: This position requires verification of US Citizenship to meet federal government security requirements.
The successful candidate must have an active U.S. Government Secret Security Clearance. Ability to meet Microsoft, customer and/or government security screening requirements are required for this role. Failure to maintain or obtain the appropriate clearance and/or customer screening requirements may result in employment action up to and including termination.
Clearance Verification: This position requires successful verification of the stated security clearance to meet federal government customer requirements. You will be asked to provide clearance verification information prior to an offer of employment.
Cloud Screening: Candidates must be able to successfully complete and pass a Microsoft Cloud background screening. Required Cloud Screenings will be administered on a recurring bi-annual basis.
Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application or the recruiting process, please send a request via the Accommodation request form.
Benefits/perks listed below may vary depending on the nature of your employment with Microsoft and the country where you work.",11150,Washington
25,Customer Service Supervisor (Contact Center),Enlightened Inc.,"Washington, DC 20036 (Downtown area)",Up to $22 an hour,"We are in search of Customer Service Supervisor (CSS) to become an essential part of our Washington, DC team! The Customer Service Supervisor monitors the daily operations of the Customer Service Representatives (CSRs) to ensure quality, customer experience and performance metrics are met. The Supervisor provides departmental leadership and supervision of contact center employees. The supervisor will be responsible for the productivity, quality and timeliness of work completed for their assigned team members.The supervisor will conduct regular coaching and feedback sessions with the individual agents on his/her assigned team. The supervisor will report to the Customer Service Manager. He/She may also participate in interviewing and hiring recommendations and complete performance evaluations for members of their team.**DC Residents Strongly Encouraged To Apply**Key TasksProvide departmental leadership in assigned functional areaResponsible for supervision of contact center employees to assure productivity, quality, and timeliness of work in the completion of assigned projects and departmental goalsMonitor CSR quality and performance and provide feedback and coaching as appropriate.Monitor staff attendance/schedule adherence and enter exceptions, as necessary, into the workforce management toolManage unplanned shrinkageAssist with or deliver training alerts/critical updates to keep team current on changes that may occur in information or proceduresPerform tasks to assure service level and quality requirements are metParticipate in interviews and recommend hiring of contact center staff, as neededMaintain department records related to CSR coaching and performance improvementComplete employee performance assessment at end of assignmentImmediately report system issues to manager or appropriate parties.Continually look for and suggest process improvements that will benefit our customersMay be required to work weekends, holidays, or off-shift, as necessaryQualifications and SkillsHigh school diploma or GED requiredSix-months supervisory or leadership experience preferredCustomer Service or Contact Center experience (2-3 years) requiredBachelor’s or Associate’s degree preferredSKILLS AND ABILITIESExcellent customer service, leadership and team interaction skills requiredDemonstrated ability to coach team members to higher levels of performanceMust have the ability to organize simultaneous tasks for individual assignments and the workflow of others within the unitProven ability to work as a team member quicklyABOUT ENLIGHTENED:  Enlightened delivers end-to-end IT solutions with a focus on Cybersecurity, Management Consulting, and Software Development and Integration. As part of the Enlightened team, you will contribute in a meaningful way to projects that make a difference in our nation and around the world.As one of the Washington Metropolitan-area’s fastest growing IT companies, we are always looking for creative, passionate and responsible employees. We acknowledge that intelligent, dedicated employees are our greatest asset and are continuously adding to our talented and diverse team. If you feel innovation, integrity and a drive to deliver are key components to success, we invite you to become Enlightened.WHY ENLIGHTENED? We provide a work environment that is positive, challenging, and that supports employees’ commitment to their communities. As an organization, we are dedicated to continual improvement and growth. We empower all employees to apply their unique background and expertise to serve our clients.Enlightened is firmly committed to treating all employees, customers, and partners with fairness, dignity, and equality. This includes providing an equal opportunity work environment. We do not discriminate nor tolerate discrimination in any form to include discrimination or harassment based on age, sex, sexual orientation, ethnicity, culture, religion, disability, or financial status.Job Type: Full-timePay: Up to $22.00 per hourSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayEducation:High school or equivalent (Required)Experience:Supervising experience: 1 year (Required)Customer Service: 2 years (Required)Work Location:One locationThis Job Is:A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to applyA job for which all ages, including older job seekers, are encouraged to applyOpen to applicants who do not have a college diplomaA job for which people with disabilities are encouraged to applyCompany's website:www.enlightened.comBenefit Conditions:Waiting period may applyOnly full-time employees eligibleWork Remotely:YesCOVID-19 Precaution(s):Remote interview processSocial distancing guidelines in placeVirtual meetingsSanitizing, disinfecting, or cleaning procedures in place",11150,Washington
26,IT Project Manager,E-INFOSOL LLC,"Washington, DC 20004 (Downtown area)",None,"E-INFOSOL is seeking a IT Project Manager to support a contract in the Chantilly, Virginia area.
Job Description
The IT Project Manager will:
Provide technical leadership, demonstrated through leading meetings such as scrums, team meetings, and customer briefs, reporting of team status, identifying risks.
Supports a technology and innovation office, Agency stakeholders and program management
Research and document user profiles, analysis tasks, workflows, and user scenarios.
Collect and document user requirements.
Create user interface design specifications.
Work closely with product designers and process engineers developing applications.
Oversee usability testing.
Design and develop user surveys to obtain user feedback.
Work directly with high level clients requiring
Requirements
ClearanceActive Top-Secret clearance
Minimum Education PreferredBachelor’s degree, or higher, in an IT technical field or business
Minimum Experience Required
5 + years of experience in IT Project Management or Technical Lead position
10+ years of IT related experience
PMP certification highly preferred
Shall have the ability to design desirable user interfaces that meets the users’ needs and taste
Has experience with task management via JIRA and supporting software development efforts.
Excellent Communications Skill
Exceptional Presentation Skills
Understands Cloud Technologies (e.g., AWS, Azure)
About E-INFOSOL:
E-INFOSOL is a Service Disabled and Veteran Owned Small Business (SDVOSB) located in the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area. We are a premiere IT Security, Cloud and Virtualization provider servicing both federal and state government, and private sector customers. Through strategic partnerships with top industry players such as Amazon Web Services (AWS), VMware, Microsoft and Nutanix, we are able to provide an array of IT products and solutions, combining them with our expertise.
Why E-INFOSOL:
E-INFOSOL has 10 years in the digital world expanding with new clientele and jobs rapidly. E-INFOSOL is constantly aware of, technical changes within IT and wants to ensure future candidates can make a difference with contributing their different skills and knowledge. We offer an array of architectural, engineering, and information technological jobs to a diverse group of candidates. Come join the E-INFOSOL family and be a part of the vast growing culture that contributes to the world.",11150,Washington
27,Quality Manager,Goodwill of Greater Washington,"Washington, DC 20510 (Capitol Hill area)",None,"Quality Manager
Senate Buildings (Dirkson, Hart and Russell), 119 D Street, NE, Washington, District Of Columbia, United States of America Req #4053
 Monday, June 14, 2021
Impact Your Future, While Impacting Your Community. Our Company. Your Career. Together We Transform Lives!

GOODWILL OF GREATER WASHINGTON IS A DRUG FREE WORK ENVIRONMENT!
Align your passion and purpose at Goodwill

Goodwill offers careers in a variety of exciting and interesting fields throughout the greater Washington, DC region. Working at Goodwill offers competitive wages, a sustainable career path, diverse, equitable, and inclusive workplace culture, and makes a lasting and positive impact on our community. It takes Goodwill to do great things. Join our team.

POSITION SUMMARY:
Supports management team by providing expertise in quality systems and practices. Provides a quality system that supports requirements and ensures process improvement, best practices and work consistency. Performs site inspections. Provides reports to analyze performance deficiencies, quality performance outcomes, metrics, and makes recommendations for the Vice President of Contracts. This position is responsible and will be held accountable for behaving in accordance with divisional and organizational RISE values and expectations.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Develops and delivers a quality system with support of technical devices, reporting and visual aids to enhance customer satisfaction and drive operational efficiency. Provides periodic reports, analysis, and recommendations on quality control outcomes to Vice President of Contracts.
Along with the VP of Contracts and Director of Contract Operations, drives continuous improvement of the Division’s Quality Systems and trains key staff on “tools of quality” and important quality concepts needed for successful system implementation / revision.
Prepares and develops site specific quality control plans for each contract site. These QC Plans should address the specifications outlined in the individual Scopes of Work. QC Plans should be updated at a minimum on an annual basis.
Using inspection technology, conducts weekly visual inspections at contract sites with greater than 10 FTEs according to the scope of work at the individual contract sites. All other contract sites shall be inspected on a monthly basis. Inspections may include areas such as office cleaning, floor care, stairway and elevator cleaning, restrooms, lobby areas, and external work premises including sidewalks.
Responsible for creating and submitting quality control reports to contract managers, supervisors and customers.
Manages and monitors performance improvement and overall performance of the company’s quality approach and makes recommendations / takes action to improve where appropriate.
Develop Corrective Action Plans (CAP) in coordination with the site Project Manager. The CAP should include, but is not limited to items such as: staff retraining, updated SOPs, and recommended equipment/supplies.
*This position requires frequent travel to contract locations within the DC Metropolitan area.
Other Duties and Responsibilities:
Provides additional support in the form of training and coaching managers.
Supervisory Responsibility:
This position has no supervisory responsibilities.
Required Qualifications:
College Diploma or equivalent. Certification in Quality-related course curriculum such as ISO 9000, Six Sigma, Lean Manufacturing can be substituted for the education requirement.
At least three years quality experience, preferably with at least one year serving in a quality capacity in the custodial or service related field.
Experience in training of Quality Management Systems and processes (ISO 9000, Six Sigma, Lean, TQM, Kaizen, etc.)
Prefer knowledge of janitorial processes and basic procedures.
Advanced beginner to Midlevel computer skills proficiency particularly with Microsoft Office including Excel.
Excellent interpersonal skills.
Excellent oral and written communication skills.
Excellent attention to detail.
Demonstrated decision making and problem solving ability.
Ability to apply good judgment in sensitive situations.
Ability to successfully work with staff at all levels throughout the organization.
Preferred Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience and certifications (see above).
Knowledge and or experience with CleanTelligent or related quality inspection software
Previous Project Management experience on an AbilityOne project or a commercial cleaning project.
Implementation of large scale quality initiatives, such as ISO 9000, Six Sigma, Lean, Kaizen.
Knowledge of SCA.
Physical Demands
Sedentary
Lifting up to 10 pounds maximum and occasionally lifting and/or carrying such articles as dockets, ledgers, and files. Walking and standing are required only occasionally.
Light
Lifting, carrying, pushing and/or pulling of up to 20 pounds. Walking or standing to a significant degree.
Medium
Lifting 50 pounds maximum with frequent lifting and/ carrying objects weighing up to 25 pounds.
Heavy
Lifting 100 pounds maximum with frequent lifting and/ carrying objects weighing up to 50 pounds.
Work Environment
Limited
General office environment infrequently exposed to extreme atmospheric conditions (temperature, noise, fumes, dust, etc.)
Moderate
Occasionally exposed to extreme atmospheric conditions (temperature, noise fumes, dust, etc.)
High
Frequently exposed to extreme atmospheric conditions (temperature, noise fumes, dust, etc.)
We are proud to be an EEO/AA employer minority/female/disability/vet. We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse testing.

 GOODWILL OF GREATER WASHINGTON IS A DRUG FREE WORK ENVIRONMENT!
Other details
Pay Type Salary",11150,Washington
28,IT SPECIALIST (INFOSEC),US Naval Sea Systems Command,"Washington Navy Yard, DC","$103,690 - $172,500 a year","Duties
Summary
You will serve as an IT SPECIALIST (INFOSEC) in the NAVSEA COMMAND INFORMATION OFFICE of CARDEROCK DIV NS, located at the Washington Navy Yard, D.C.

This position is part of the Warfare Centers Personnel Demonstration Project. The NT-6 pay band encompasses positions equivalent to GS-14 and GS-15.
Responsibilities
You will serve as the Cyber Scientific and Technical Intelligence Liaison Officer (Cyber STILO) supporting NAVSEA (SEA-00G), with intelligence information, threat assessments, and in special security and special operations matters.
You will serve as a liaison to provide technical support to the intelligence community (i.e. CIA, NSA, DIA, ONI, and Army, Air Force and DOE) for the interpretation and evaluation of intelligence information relating to cyber.
You will work within the Navy, Department of Defense, and National intelligence communities to make known NAVSEA requirements for cyber intelligence information and communicate this information between the IC and NAVSEA.
You will consult and advise NAVSEA leadership and all subordinate offices/command elements concerning sensitive compartmented projects, special operations and the characteristics of relevant adversarial cyber capabilities and intentions.
Travel Required
25% or less - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
None
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a US Citizen.
Must be determined suitable for federal employment.
Must participate in the direct deposit pay program.
New employees to the Department of the Navy will be required to successfully pass the E-Verify employment verification check. To learn more about E-Verify, including your rights and responsibilities, visit e-verify.gov
Within the Department of Defense (DoD), the appointment of retired military members within 180 days immediately following retirement date to a civilian position is subject to the provisions of 5 United States Code 3326.
Males born after 12-31-59 must be registered for Selective Service.
You will be required to obtain and maintain an interim and/or final security clearance prior to entrance on duty. Failure to obtain and maintain the required level of clearance may result in the withdrawal of a job offer or removal.
This position is designated as a Cyber IT/Cybersecurity Workforce position. You must obtain and maintain the credentials as described in SECNAV M-5239.2 for specialty area 111-All Source Analyst, Level Advanced within 12 months of appointment.
Successful completion of a pre-employment drug test (including marijuana) is required. A tentative offer of employment will be rescinded if you fail to report to the drug test appointment or fail the test. You will be subject to random testing.
This position may require travel from normal duty station to CONUS and OCONUS and may include remote or isolated sites. You must be able to travel on military and commercial aircraft for extended periods of time.
You may be required to perform occasional work at a shipyard or on-board a ship.
Qualifications
Your resume must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience at or equivalent to the next lower pay band, NT-05 (GS-13/14 equivalent) in the Federal service or equivalent experience in the private or public sector. Specialized experience must demonstrate the following: Evaluating and overseeing the validation and operation of Information Technology (IT) ship systems or networks to ensure compliance with cybersecurity requirements.
Your experience must reflect skill in the following areas: attention to detail, customer service, oral communication, and problem solving.

Additional qualification information can be found from the following Office of Personnel Management website:
https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/classification-qualifications/general-schedule-qualification-standards/2200/information-technology-it-management-series-2210-alternative-a/

Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., professional, philanthropic, religious, spiritual, community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
This position is covered by the Department of Defense Priority Placement Program.

Additional vacancies may be filled by this announcement.

This position is eligible for part time, full time or ad-hoc telework at the discretion of management.

A tentative offer of employment will be rescinded if the selectee fails to meet the pre-employment requirements, including failure to report to any of the scheduled appointments.

If you are unable to apply online and request information about the Alternate Application process, please contact the Department of Navy's Employment Information Center.

Federal annuitant information: The selection of an annuitant is subject to the Department of Defense and Department of the Navy policy on the employment of annuitants. Policy information may be found at: http://www.secnav.navy.mil/donhr/Documents/CivilianJobs/FedCivAnnuitants.pdf

ICTAP Applicants: To be considered well-qualified and exercise selection priority as an ICTAP candidate, displaced Federal employees must satisfy all qualification requirements for the position and receive a rating in the highly qualified category (score 85) or higher. ICTAP candidates must provide copies of all of the following documentation at the time of application: 1) agency notice; 2) most recent performance appraisal; and 3) most recent SF-50 or notification of personnel action that includes position, grade level, and duty location. Applicants who do not provide this documentation will not receive consideration as an ICTAP candidate. For more information about ICTAP eligibility please review the following link: https://www.usajobs.gov/Help/working-in-government/unique-hiring-paths/federal-employees/ictap/

Military Spouse Preference applicants will receive priority consideration at the Full Performance Level (FPL) and if determined to be Best Qualified at the FPL, and selected, must be placed at the FPL. A BQ military spouse possesses knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies comparable to others who meet the competitive referral criteria for the specific position.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
In order to qualify for this position, your resume must provide sufficient experience and/or education, knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform the duties of the specific position for which you are being considered. Your resume is the key means we have for evaluating your skills, knowledge, and abilities as they relate to this position. Therefore, we encourage you to be clear and specific when describing your experience.

When the application process is complete, we will review your resume to ensure you meet the hiring eligibility and qualification requirements listed in this announcement. You will be rated based on the information provided in your resume and responses to the Occupational Questionnaire, along with your supporting documentation to determine your ability to demonstrate the following competencies:
ACCOUNTABILITY
CYBERSECURITY
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY POLICY AND PLANNING
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROJECT MANAGEMENT
NETWORK OPERATION
WRITTEN COMMUNICATION

You should list any relevant performance appraisals and incentive awards in your resume as that information may be taken into consideration during the selection process. If selected, you may be required to provide supporting documentation.

If after reviewing your resume and supporting documentation, a determination is made that you inflated your qualifications and/or experience, your score may be adjusted to more accurately reflect your abilities or you may be found ineligible/not qualified.

Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating or consideration for employment.

All eligibility and qualifications requirements must be met by the closing date of this announcement.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Sensitive Compartmented Information
Drug test required
Yes
Position sensitivity and risk
Special-Sensitive (SS)/High Risk
Trust determination process
National security
Required Documents

Required Documents
You are required to provide documentation that supports the eligibility and qualification claims made in your resume and assessment questionnaire. You must submit the applicable documents listed here and those listed with the eligibilities you select in the announcement questionnaire with your application package. Applicants who do not provide supporting documentation that fully support their claims will not be referred to the hiring manager. Cover letter is optional.

A complete resume is required. Your resume must show relevant experience, job title, duties and accomplishments. Your resume must show complete information for each job entry to support minimum qualifications. The following information should be provided in your resume, but it is acceptable to provide elsewhere in your application package: employer's name, starting and end dates (Mo/Yr), hours per week, and pay plan, series and grade level (e.g. GS-0201-09) for relevant federal experience.TIP: A good way to ensure you include all essential information is to use the Resume Builder in USAJOBS to create your resume.

Are you applying for a promotion? If you are a current GS employee applying for a higher grade than the grade that you currently hold you must provide an SF-50 that shows that you have held the next lower grade for at least one year. Some SF-50s effective within the last 52 weeks will not demonstrate you have held the next lower grade for at least one year (e.g. General Adjustment SF-50 from this year). In many cases, we need to see two (2) SF-50s to determine time-in-grade and eligibility for promotion. If you are a DoD employee, you can obtain a copy of your SF- 50(s) from MyBiz.

Are you claiming membership in any professional organizations, or possession of a license, certificate or credentials? Check the Conditions of Employment section above to see if any are required. If you claim membership, license, certification, or credentials, you must submit a copy of said document in your application package.


Are you using education as a substitute for some or all of the experience requirement? Is there a basic education requirement for this position? Check the Education section above to see what is allowed and what is required. Any claims you make in your resume or assessment questionnaire regarding education or degrees MUST be supported by submitting with your application official or unofficial transcripts or a list of courses, grades earned, completion dates, and quarter and semester hours earned issued from your school. While unofficial transcripts are acceptable for initial application, an official transcript will ultimately be required if you are selected for the position. You may submit a copy your degree(s) if specific coursework does not have to be verified.

Are you a veteran claiming 5-point veterans' preference or claiming sole survivorship preference? You must submit a copy of your latest DD-214 Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty (any copy that shows all dates of service, as well as character of service [Honorable, General, etc.] is acceptable) OR a VA letter that shows dates of service or service connected disability AND character of service. If you have more than one DD-214 for multiple periods of active duty service, submit a copy for each period of service. If you were issued a DD-215 to amend aforementioned information on the DD-214 you must submit that too. If you are not sure of your preference eligibility, visit the Department of Labor's website: Veterans' Preference Advisor

Are you a disabled veteran or claiming 10-point veterans' preference?
If you are eligible to claim 10 point veterans preference you must submit a DD-214 Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty as described above for 5-point preference.

You must also provide the applicable supporting documentation of your disability (e.g. disability letter from the VA) as described on Standard Form-15 (SF-15). http://www.opm.gov/forms/pdf_fill/SF15.pdf.

Are you an active duty service member? Active Duty Service Members are required to submit a statement of service printed on command letterhead and signed by the command. The statement of service must provide the branch of service, rate/rank, all dates of service, the expected date of discharge and anticipated character of service (Honorable, General, etc.).

Documents submitted as part of the application package, to include supplemental documents, may be shared beyond the Human Resources Office. Some supplemental documents contain personal information such as SSN and DOB and some documents such as military orders and marriage certificates may contain personal information for someone other than you. You may sanitize these documents to remove said personal information before you submit your application. You must provide an un-sanitized version of the documents if you are selected.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
VEOA eligibles and DoD Military Spouse Preference (MSP) eligible, current or former time-limited employees that occupied a position located at a Defense Industrial Base Facility (DIBF) or Major Range and Test Facilities Base (MRTFB)",11150,Washington
29,Office Assistant,Houlihan Lokey,"Washington, DC",None,"Scope
Houlihan Lokey’s Washington DC office is seeking an Office Assistant to assist the Office Manager (OM) with all phases of facilities management, office equipment maintenance, supply inventory, reception, production of presentation materials, basic administrative duties, and other office services projects and functions as directed.
Location: Houlihan Lokey’s Washington, DC office
Schedule: Full time; 40 hours per week; Monday – Friday, 8:30 am to 5:30 pm Eastern Time (ET)

Responsibilities
Assist the OM with facilities cleanliness, management, and repairs, including interaction with engineering and building maintenance as well as perform office security functions.
Perform all duties associated with the production of presentation materials to include printing, binding, and delivery.
Attend to all office equipment, troubleshooting problems and calling for service as necessary; perform required checks of the AED system.
Maintain inventory of all office, pantry, IT, and production supplies, interact with vendors, and conduct distribution and stocking of supplies.
Assist in the set-up of new hire offices/cubicles and provide training in office procedures/production functions.
Maintain conference room schedules; attend to the general cleanliness and sanitization of conference rooms and maintain associated audio-visual equipment; assist with set up/breakdown for meetings.
Perform basic administrative functions to include greeting visitors, screening telephone calls, arranging for parking or transportation for office visitors, maintain parking database and order funds for parking, distribute mail and packages received, and coordinate shipments from the office.
Be a team player, dealing effectively with co-workers and external visitors at all levels.
Perform additional duties as assigned.
Basic Qualifications
3 years or more of office services or administrative experience.
Knowledge of Microsoft office suite.
Display exceptional customer service and organizational skills.
Be able to perform basic administrative duties.
Be able to multi-task.
High school diploma or GED equivalent.
Be able to lift/carry items of up to 25 pounds.
We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",11150,Washington
30,IT Project Manager,"Emerging Tech, LLC","Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)","$100,000 a year","Must be authorized to work in the US
Job Summary
Emerging Tech is seeking a technically savvy and high-energy professional to fill a Information Technology (IT) Project Management position. The successful candidate will manage critical, day to day project activities, proactively manage risks and issues, and collaborate with technical and non-technical team members. This individual should have the ability to quickly earn the trust of key internal and external stakeholders, lead and inspire teams, set project direction and approach, resolve conflict, deliver tough messages with honesty and grace, and occasionally execute with limited information and ambiguity. The successful applicant will have the opportunity to play a major role in the IT-enabled transformation of connected healthcare.
Required Skills:
Strong leadership with excellent written and oral communications.
Effectively communicate with colleagues, stakeholders, and leaders at all levels of the organization to gather data and information and to support strategic plans and proactively provides updates on project status
Build partnerships with all support groups and teams
Act as a driver for process design, documentation and improvements as needed.
Perform ad-hoc requests as made by the Director of Operations, including but not limited to process workflow design, designing, and managing emergent processes, and other areas.
Oversee the IT Operation process for the review, analysis and closure of action requests, vendor deliverables and travel plans, including identifying appropriate POCs, triaging requests and actions, coordination of approval/review meetings, ongoing tracking of submissions, review/technical editing of responses before returning to requestors and reviewing status.
Ability to working closely with key stakeholders at all levels of the organization.
Experience with technical project life cycles and project methodologies.
Create and manage project plans as well as track project performance and progress.
Ability to track project costs (Budgets v Actuals).
Conduct schedule analysis, data mapping across schedule dependencies and follow up with the scheduler owners, as needed.
Strong Risk and Issue management with the ability to effectively communicate and mitigate or escalate risks & issues with stakeholders and executive level management when required.
Ability to work with technical team and to identify solutions for system problems when working with new technology.
Capable in providing technical and project related direction to systems analysts, programmers and other technical personnel on assigned tasks.
Proficient in Office 365 and all Microsoft Products.
Ability to create and update Integrated Master Schedule (IMS) using MS Project
Minimum of 10 years of experience with a related Bachelors Degree or 18 years of relevant experience may be substituted for the degree requirement.
Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Systems, Business or related scientific/technical discipline.
Preferred but not required:
PMP or Equivalent Certification
Experience with Cerner and/or other EHR preferably with sustainment activities.
Health Care Experience
Benefits:
Retirement Plan
Group Health Insurance (Health, Dental, and Vision)
Paid Time Off
Referral Bonus
Opportunity for Performance Evaluation/Retention Bonus
Compensation:
Competitive – Based on Skills and Experiences
Full Time Direct Hire
Annual Salary: $100K +
cmC1iae1Fl",11150,Washington
31,IT Project Manager,Binary Blue,"Rockville, MD",None,"IT Project Manager Share
Job Tracking ID : 513064-760054
Job Level : Management
Level of Education : BA/BS
Job Type : Full-Time/Regular
Date Updated : 02/18/2021
Years of Experience : 5 - 7 Years
Starting Date : 04/01/2021
Job Description

Binary Blue is seeking a Project Manager to support our client’s initiative with Enterprise Permitting Solution, automation, and documentation efforts. Binary Blue team will report directly to the Chief of Information Technology Services.

Responsible for ensuring work performed under Task Order is within scope, consistent with requirements, and delivered on-time and on budget. Identifies critical paths, task, dates, testing and acceptance criteria. Monitor issues and provides resolutions for weekly senior management status reports.

This position also requires the ability to quickly learn new applications, processes, and system-based steps in order to effectively present project dashboards/materials in a clear format according to user role(s). Further, candidate will partner with the Change Manager, Change Management staff and other business partners to develop and facilitate project meetings.

Candidate will be responsible for, but not limited to, the following:

IT Project Management and understanding of business and technical objectives
Manage project scope, creates and implement communication plans
Communicate to client/vendors, stakeholder, system owner and project sponsor
Establishes project plan, creates project charter, work plan, schedule and milestone
You will be working alongside with our client to facilitate knowledge transfer.
Create visually clear and impactful project documentation
Collaborate with functional subject matter experts to design strategic communications, internal marketing, and training materials
Manage stakeholder expectations and encourage positive behaviors in response to operational and organizational change
Manage multiple priorities simultaneously; Deliver high quality, thoughtful Change Management products with little guidance and within short time frames
Assess operational and organizations needs through interviews, surveys, and focus groups to identify gaps and align related strategic initiatives to the County Executives’ objectives and mission
Develop organizational metrics to baseline and measure success over time in conjunction with stakeholders
Establish strong and credible relationship with management and employees to successfully build trust, collaboration and integrity
Demonstrate experience and knowledge of principles, practices, and systems of organizational design, change management, and organizational development
Experience and Skills

At least 5 years of demonstrated project management experience at State or Federal agencies

Ability to work independently and meet deadlines in a fast-paced environment with multiple and changing priorities.
Strong communication skills at all levels of management
Demonstrated consensus/coalition building with stakeholders, management, and employees at all levels in the organization
Experience in developing and designing training curriculum, job aides, training material utilizing multimedia tools such as Adobe Captivate, Camtasia, Word, PowerPoint, and other web-based tools

Additionally, to be successful the candidate(s) will:
Work well in a changing environment and maintain a strong positive perspective
Display a strong organizational commitment and interpersonal skills
Display teamwork within a process driven environment
Back to job search",11150,Washington
32,Project Manager - IT Services,NeoSystems,"Tysons Corner, VA",None,"Job purpose

The NeoSystems IT Services Project Management Office (PMO) manages projects and activities for all IT Services organizations. As such, the PMO has an opportunity for a Technical Project Manager that will become part of an integrated team of professionals supporting our customers embarking on technology implementations focused on security technologies, cyber security, and compliance in an agile and adaptive methodology.


Duties and responsibilities

Management and delivery of cybersecurity solutions.
Develop detailed and integrated project plans including dependencies, risks and resources
Establish and review project budgets
Lead project planning sessions
Coordinating staff and internal resources
Project status reporting and performance monitoring
Ensuring project success by monitoring deadlines, budgets, resourcing and deliverables
Escalate issues and mitigate risks to ensure project success
Managing relationships with clients and stakeholders
Review statements of work for accuracy and clarification of work efforts
Review of deliverables and work product to ensure quality assurance
Assisting in defining clear deliverables, roles and responsibilities on assigned projects
Coordinate governance and process plans with clients and internal teams:
Risk Migration
Communication
Success Criteria
Project Closure
Status reporting to internal executive sponsors and stakeholders
Support process management and documentation activities


Qualifications

Qualifications include:

Experience in cybersecurity solutions, CMMC and other complex compliance projects
5-10 active project management experience
BA/BS in appropriate field or equivalent work experience
Proven work experience in project management and enterprise level engagements in fields of technology implementations
Use of Project Management software such as Microsoft Project, Smartsheets, Wrike, etc.
Strong working knowledge and use of Microsoft Office tools
Excellent client-facing and internal communication skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Solid organizational, detailed and multitasking skills
Project Management Professional (PMP), Agile certifications (Scrum) or equivalent experience
Ability to manage multiple project engagements simultaneously (10-15)


Working conditions

As part of the Project Management team, Project Managers work normal business hours, however, from time to time may be required to alter schedules and activities based on support of client activities and engagements where clients may be in other time zones or even countries that are not US based. Allow this is a remote position, it may require the candidate to travel to client meetings when necessary. It is expected that travel will be less than 25% for this role.

EOE M/F/D/V",11150,Washington
33,District Manager,Trek Bicycle,"Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)",None,"A bit about us
Trek is an awesome place to work, with amazing benefits for all employees. We build only products we love, provide incredible hospitality to our customers, and change the world by getting more people on bikes. When you’re on our team, you’re taken care of, encouraged to learn and grow, and given lots of opportunities to do so. Give us your best, and we’ll give it right back. Sound pretty sweet? Then come join us!

What you'll do
Successful District Managers are responsible for providing leadership to ensure their assigned stores deliver outstanding customer service, meet all operating objectives, sales, and financial goals, and follow company policies and procedures. The District Manager is also responsible for ensuring store employees are properly motivated and trained and that qualified replacements are developed and ready to fill positions opened through expansion and turnover.
Position Responsibilities:
Maintaining exemplary customer service within the retail stores
Developing and executing plans to improve store and area performance as needed
Recruiting, developing, and motivating Store Managers who exceed internal and external customer expectations
Establishing a strong customer service/selling culture
Analyzing P&L results and trends to increase and maximize sales
Developing strategies to increase market share and store revenues
Controlling labor hours, cash, store audits, and shrinkage
Performing complete and thorough district reviews of each store on a consistent and frequent basis to determine that the stores are operating in accordance with all company policies and procedures, including but not limited to cash security and compliance policies and procedures
Other duties as assigned
Position Requirements:
A minimum of three years’ multi-unit management experience in industries such as hospitality, financial services, retail and restaurant
Ability to engage with customers
Ability to drive sales through others
Ability to develop positive relationships with internal and external customers
Strong desire to exceed corporate initiatives and inspire excellence in a team
Superior verbal and written communication, and presentation skills
High-energy, collaborative leadership expertise
Personal vehicle in good repair, valid driver’s license, and current proof-of-insurance
Must be able to drive for company business as required
Must manage a number of projects at one time and handle frequent interruptions to meet the needs and requests of customers
Must be able to travel between stores regularly",11150,Washington
34,External Engagements Project Manager - Washington DC,"Lindahl Reed, Inc.","Washington, DC",None,"External Engagements Project Manager - Washington DCLocation:  Washington DCJob Type:  Part-TimeSalary:  Commensurate with experienceExperience: 10+ years relevant experienceDate Updated: June 2nd, 2021Company DescriptionNow is the time to join Lindahl Reed, Inc. Lindahl Reed is a professional services company that provides program management, engineering and technical, and management advisory services to federal, state, institutional, and commercial customers nationwide. We offer expertise in the health, energy, and environmental markets. Lindahl Reed was founded on the belief that we can advance a safer, healthier, and more resilient and sustainable world. Our solutions allow clients to work smarter and gain unique insights and understanding into their organization as well as improve decision-making to help meet their mission, business, compliance, and operational challenges – now and into the future. We are hiring creative, motivated, and talented people with a passion for doing what's right, what's smart, and what works.Description/Job SummaryLindahl Reed is looking to support the Air Force Office of Energy Assurance with an experienced External Engagements Project Manager.The External Engagements Project Manager provides executive-level support and management for all communications requirements.For OEA, develops/updates standard operating procedures, presentations including monthly senior leadership briefing and weekly staff meeting, handling of internal/external audits, periodic organization performance reviews, perform gap assessments, tracking and/or responding to headquarters taskers/inquiries, assemble/coordinate travel & conference approval packages, process travel vouchers.The External Engagements Project Manager serves as senior advisor to the OEI External Engagement Director and OEA Operations Division Chief and supervises the external engagement contractor team.The External Engagements Project Manager is responsible for independently coordinating and completing project activities with internal and external stakeholders and overcoming obstacles, ensuring each task and deliverable is completed on schedule.Qualifications, Skills, and Experience: Experience managing all aspects of the design, implementation and execution of an organization’s strategic communications plan.Experience with energy projects and DoD executive organizations.Responsible for ensuring all products created and published are in alignment with messaging and are being delivered to the target audience.Responsible for ensuring all tasks in the annual communication plan are being completed and released on time.Requires Congressional experience.Requires strong interpersonal skills to provide leadership to, collaborate, and work with a diverse team.Requires strong written and oral communication skills to clearly and succinctly provide recurring and ad-hoc project updates and synthesizing information for key decision briefs.At least 10 years of relevant experience.All positions require a background check after acceptance of our offer. The selected candidate may be eligible to begin employment before the background check has been finalized. However, continued employment with Lindahl Reed will be contingent upon the timely results of candidate’s reference/background check. This position may require special credentialing, clearance, and access as a condition of employment. In the event the government or client does not sponsor or approve your clearance, it may result in termination of your employment. We are an Equal Employment/Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate in hiring on the basis of sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religious creed, national origin, physical or mental disability, protected Veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law.For more information, view the EEO is the Law Poster and Pay Transparency StatementApplicants have rights under Federal Employment Laws view the following posters to see more information:Family & Medical LeaveEqual Opportunity EmploymentEmployee RightsThis job description is not a contract and may be adjusted as deemed appropriate in Lindahl Reed’s sole discretion.Job Type: Part-time",11150,Washington
35,Project Manager-IT,FUTRON INCORPORATED,"Woodbridge, VA 22193","Up to $150,000 a year","This position requires a Secret Security Clearance, PMP Certification, and will Travel to various job locations!Preferred Experience: 2 to 3 years of experience working with the US Military on IT projects including: providing ongoing status briefings and reports to Senior Commanders.Organizing large scale programmatic rollouts of technology solutions at multiple or single sites.Experience managing multiple AV or network integration projects.Leading a team of engineers using successful PM strategies to execute pre and post sales requirements to fulfill customer project needs.Approve expenditures that are not related to an assigned project up to $1500.00Related to assigned projects, the Project Manager has the following authority: to make day-to-day decisions regarding scope, cost, price, time and schedule, quality, communications; facilitate meetings; represent Futron for negotiating contracts, subcontracts, change orders, and purchase orders; direct authority over site personnel; approve change orders; approve any additional equipment from original contract.Principles, Duties, and Responsibilities: The Project Manager plans, directs and coordinates activities of designated projects to ensure that goals of project completion within a specific time frame and budget are obtained by performing the duties personally or through subordinate supervisors. Activities may include the following: Negotiate subcontracts and purchase orders; prepare, review, revise, and update construction schedules; review submittals, plans, and specifications; correspond with subcontractors, suppliers, and owners via verbal and written documentation; ensure proper job documentation is being prepared, submitted, and filed; keep higher management informed of project status; prepare, maintain, and update project budgets; prepare change order proposals, assist in negotiations; assist in the preparation of subcontractor ""scope of work"" portions of the subcontracts; assist in the resolution of technical and/or vendor/partner issues; bid preparation, and site visits for new jobs; solicit bids from subcontractors and material suppliers and do estimates/takeoffs for proposed projects; prepare subcontracts and purchase orders for start-up; conducts briefing and orientation for site personnel; establish progress schedule for projects; maintain schedule; support the preparation of invoices; attends progress meetings with customers, and provide guidance/assistance to on site personnel; review and approve subcontractor and supplier invoices as required; ensure that all closeout documentation is submitted to the customer at project completion.Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities Requried: AccountingComputer SkillsBlueprint readingAbility to lead, train, and motivate staff at all levelsGood communication skills (oral and written)Bachelor Degree and 3-5 years of experience or 7-10 years of experienceBasic foundation in Project Management methodologies and PMP may be required.Gathering, accessing, and integrating informationDecision makingFacilitate meetingsIdentify critical success factors and risks for assigned projects.Negotiate and resolve conflictsUS Citizens, Non Felons; the position will require an active secret security clearance.Military experience preferred; Veterans' are encouraged to applyMathematical aptitudeKnowledge of ISO 9001:2015 preferredSoftware Proficiency Desired: MS Office Suite including Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Internet Explorer, Publisher, and ProjectAdobe AcrobatRoxio CD creatorVarious Graphics programsDell applicationsWin ZipRequires the ability to operate equipment such as but not limited to: Equipment used on the jobComputerOffice equipmentFax machineCell phoneBroadband internet access including router and LANCopierScannerWorking Conditions: Business Office and Construction SiteMust be able to climb ladders and lift equipment, may require work overhead and on lifts.Must be able to handle criticism and remain calm and effective in highly stressful situations. Keep emotions in check, control anger and avoid aggressive behavior even in very difficult situations.Futron Incorporated is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.Job Type: Full-timePay: Up to $150,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offProfessional development assistanceReferral programVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridaySupplemental Pay:Bonus payEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:Project Management: 5 years (Required)License/Certification:PMP (Required)Security Clearance:Secret (Required)Willingness To Travel:50% (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",11150,Washington
36,IT Specialist (IT Operations Manager) - DIRECT HIRING AUTHORITY,US Export-Import Bank of the United States,"Washington, DC","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
Announcement may be used to fill similar positions within 90 days of the closing date.

This announcement will be used to fill vacancies through OPM-authorized Direct Hire Authority (DHA) for IT Specialist (Information Security and Cybersecurity), GS-2210-09 through GS-2210-15; 5 U.S.C. 3304(a)(3), 5 CFR part 337.


This position is processed under Direct Hire authority. Veterans' Preference and Category Rating procedures DOES NOT APPLY.

For more information, click here:

About this agency
Responsibilities
Due to the current events surrounding COVID-19, telework will be mandatory. When it is determined that EXIM will be moving to the reopening phase, the expectation will be to physically return to the office. Telework days and any waiting periods for eligibility will be determined at that time.

This position is located in the Office of Information Management and Technology (CIO), Infrastructure Engineering Unit at the Export Import Bank of the United States (EXIM).

At the full performance level, duties include, but are not limited to:

Serves as an IT Operations Manager and is responsible for daily IT Infrastructure operational support and management activities which consist of customer support, commodity computing support, commercial off-the-shelf (COTS) & Government off-the-shelf (GOTS) applications support, helpdesk operation, overseeing contractor's work and their day-to-day activities which consist of installation, maintenance, repairs, and replacements of IT hardware, software, and office productivity applications, including desktops, laptops, mobile devices, servers, storage (SAN), operating systems, network devices, datacenter equipment, backup systems, Internet/Intranet, LAN/WAN, cloud services, network, systems and security engineering work.
Maintaining the assets inventory and software/hardware licenses by ensuring that deployed hardware and software are compliant with the terms and conditions of the procurement, license terms, warranty, security, and service level agreements.
Assisting the IT Director by providing budgeting, IT assets refresh plan, preparing task orders, invoice tracking and timely authorization for payments, allocation, and evaluation for exceptional contractor performance, tracking of budget and schedules and/or level of effort for contractor performance ensuring costs, schedules and levels of effort and deliverables are consistent with the contracts.
Monitoring and overseeing the security of the agency's IT infrastructure and components by designing, modifying, enhancing, testing, and implementing standard baseline configurations for deployed workstations, servers, appliances, network components and client software by ensuring adherence to applicable Government regulations, policies, and standards for IT security and Privacy as defined by the agency's policies and procedures.

Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
U.S. Citizenship
Background and Security/Suitability Investigation
You may be required to serve a one year probationary period
Specialized experience MUST be documented on your resume
Current or Former Political Appointees: If you are, or have been employed in the last 5 years, you must disclose this information. Failure to do so may result in disciplinary action including removal from Federal Service.
Qualifications
Specialized Experience (Credit for Specialized Experience on resume must reflect 40 hours/Full-time per week for each period of work):


GS-14: You must have one (1) year of specialized experience that has equipped you with the particular knowledge, skills, and abilities to successfully perform the duties of the position, and that is typically in or related to the work of the position to be filled. To be creditable, specialized experience must have been equivalent to at least the GS-13 level in the Federal Government. Specialized experience includes:
Experience overseeing Information Technology (IT) projects supporting infrastructure engineering and operations in the areas of systems, network and security operations;
Experience overseeing helpdesk operations and management, customer outreach and training;
Experience evaluating contract performance, budgeting, invoice tracking and timely authorization for payments; and
Experience serving in the capacity of a Contracting Officer Representative (COR) for IT Help Desk, End-User Support, Network Operations and Engineering, and IT Operational Security Services projects.
In addition to the Specialized Experience noted above, applicants must also meet and demonstrate the IT-related experience demonstrating each of the four competencies listed below:
Attention to Detail: Is thorough when performing work and conscientious about attending to detail.
Customer Service: Anticipates and meets the needs of both internal and external business partners and customers (any individuals who use or receive the services or products that your work unity produces including the general public, individuals who work in the agency, other agencies, or organizations outside the Government). Provides information or assistance. Delivers high quality products and services; is committed to continuous improvement. Effectively manages customer relationships.
Oral Communication: Makes clear and convincing oral presentations to individuals and groups. Listens effectively; clarifies information, as needed. Speaks and writes in a clear, concise, organized, and convincing manner that is appropriate to the audience. Facilitates an open exchange of ideas to ensure all group input is considered. Handles technical, sensitive, or controversial topics with agility involving executives/managers as appropriate.
Problem Solving: Identifies and analyzes problems, weighs relevance and accuracy of information, generates and evaluates alternative solutions, and makes sound recommendations.
Education cannot be substituted for experience at the GS-14 grade level.

For qualification determinations, your resume must contain the following for each work experience listed:
Organization/Agency's Name
Title
Salary (series and grade, if applicable)
Start and end dates (including the month and year)
Number of hours you worked per week
Relevant experience that supports your response to the specialized experience that is stated in the job announcement
If your resume does not contain this information, your application may be marked as incomplete and you will not receive consideration for this position.

Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community; student; social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

Part-time and/or unpaid experience related to this position will be considered to determine the total number of years and months of experience. Be sure to note the number of paid or unpaid hours worked each week.

Foreign Education: If you are qualifying by education and/or you have education completed in a foreign college/university described above, it is your responsibility to provide transcripts and proof of U.S. accreditation for foreign study. Please visit the following links for more information:
http://www.naces.org
http://www.fceatlanta.com
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.

Additional information on the qualification requirements is outlined here.

All requirements must be met by 06/17/2021, the closing date of the announcement.
Education

Additional information
Current or Former Political Appointees: Pursuant to the Office of Personnel Management (OPM) oversight authority under section 1104(b)(2) of title 5, United States Code (U.S.C.) and section 5.2 of title 5, Code of Federal Regulations, OPM requires agencies to seek their approval prior to appointing any current or former political appointee to a permanent position (without time limits) in the civil service. A former or recent political appointee is someone who held a political appointment covered by OPM's policy within the previous 5-year period. OPM's oversight in this area safeguards merit system principles as well as fair and open competition free from political influence. If you are currently employed, or have been employed within the last 5 years, you must disclose this information. Failure to disclose this information could result in disciplinary action including removal from Federal Service.

Please visit the following link for the types of political appointments.

Agency Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP) or the Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP) Eligibles: If you have never worked for the Federal government, you are not CTAP/ICTAP eligible. Information about ICTAP or CTAP eligibility can be found by clicking here to access OPM's Career Transition Resources website.

Veterans: All veterans must meet the qualification requirements of the position for further consideration. For more information on veterans' preference, please click here.

Selective Service: If you are a male applicant born after December 31, 1959, you must certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System, or are exempt from having to do so under the Selective Service Law.

This agency provides reasonable accommodation to applicants with disabilities. If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application and hiring process, please notify the agency. The decision on granting reasonable accommodation will be made on a case-by-case basis.

Ethical Standards/Financial Disclosure:


EXIM is committed to the highest ethical standards. As an employee, you will be covered by the criminal conflict of interest statutes and the Standards of Ethical Conduct for Employees of the Executive Branch. You will be required to complete new employee ethics training within 3 months of your appointment.

If this position is subject to financial disclosure requirements (either public or confidential depending upon your position), you will be required to complete a new entrant financial disclosure report within 30 days of your appointment.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
You will be evaluated for this position based on how well you meet the qualifications above.

This position is processed under a Direct Hire authority; therefore, veteran's preference and Category Rating procedures do not apply.

Your resume and supporting documentation will be used to determine whether you meet the job qualifications listed on this announcement. If you are minimally qualified for this position, your resume and supporting documentation will be referred to the selecting official for employment consideration.

You will be notified by email if your application is forwarded to the hiring official for further consideration.

If it is determined that your technical competencies do not meet the proficiency requirements for this position to move forward to the next evaluation stage, you will be notified by email.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Moderate Risk (MR)
Trust determination process
Credentialing, Suitability/Fitness
Required Documents

Required Documents
Your application package should include the following documents:

Your Resume (applicants are required to submit a resume with job title, series/grade (if federal employee), duties and accomplishments, employer's name, starting and ending dates of employment, number of hours worked per week, and annual salary). If your resume does not contain this information, your application may be marked as incomplete and you will not receive consideration for this position.
Proof of Veteran's Preference - DD-214 (Member 4 Copy), if you are a veteran. Additionally, applicants claiming 10-point preference must complete Standard Form (SF)15, Application for 10-Point Veteran Preference, as well as additional documentation required by the SF-15, such as a VA letter, if applicable. If a DD-214 (Member Copy 4) is not available, other documentation listing the beginning and ending dates of active service and the type of discharge must be submitted to verify eligibility.
Unofficial Transcripts, if the position has an education requirement or if you are using education to qualify. If selected for the position, you must provide an official transcript before appointment.
Proof of U.S. accreditation for foreign study, if applicable.
Special Priority Selection rights under CTAP or ICTAP: Submit a copy of your agency notice, copy of your most recent performance appraisal (with at least a satisfactory rating), and your most current SF-50 position title, grade level, and duty location, if applicable.
Submission of any required documents listed in vacancy announcement, if applicable.
Please note that if you do not provide all required information/documents, as specified in this announcement, you may not be considered for this position (or may not receive the special consideration for which you may be eligible).
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
United States Citizens",11150,Washington
37,Learning Project Specialist,International Baccalaureate,"Bethesda, MD",None,"The goal of the International Baccalaureate® (IB) is to contribute to a better world through education. To reach this goal we must attract, develop, and retain highly skilled, motivated and value-driven people. If you share our passion and commitment for making change happen and providing the very best in international education, we invite you to apply for one of our current job opportunities.
Job Duties:
Manage the instructional design and development of professional development learning products
Liaise with Learning and teaching, PDD, IBEN, and MEP teams over development needs
Manage external developers, quality assurers and editors as appropriate, to ensure all output is high quality and built with best practice instructional design and principles
Stick to deadlines and within budget
Work on the development and support the best practice use of online platforms, wherever required
Oversee the management of innovation projects to pilot and launch new professional development products
Strive for quality improvement and driven by evaluative feedback
Plan and implement change to ensure legacy workshops represent best practice in e-learning pedagogy
Coordinate the selection, training and recruitment of online content developers
Develop and manage training workshops
Attend and sometimes present at IB regional and industry conferences to ensure PD products reflect emerging e-learning best practice and continue to meet the needs of PD’s strategic objectives
Establish and monitor quality assurance procedures with L&D Sr Manager and Head of PD
Contributing to longer-term PD strategic plan
Contributes to the planning and expenditure relating to a development budget of approximately $1,000,000
Develops educator learning opportunities that support more than 70,000 teaching practitioners worldwide in multiple languages, in collaboration with the learning and development manager and the Head(s) of PD
Manages the recruitment and remotely monitors the performance of more than 140 online workshop facilitators and/or workshop developers and 6 IB Curriculum Coordinators
Job Requirements:
A first degree or equivalent
At least 3-4 years’ relevant work experience related to project management
Demonstrable professional experience in an education environment
Excellent command of the English language
A high degree of flexibility and adaptability when working in a small team environment
Good understanding of current developments in online learning environments, especially the open source platform Moodle, web conferencing technologies etc.
Ability to manage projects with multiple stakeholders and deadlines
Managing a range of different PD offerings and providers
Developing and nurturing relationships with current and potential partners and internal academic staff
*The IB is an equal opportunity employer. It provides employment opportunities to employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, ethnicity, national origin, age, physical or mental disability, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic status, or status in any group protected by federal, state, or local laws.*
""This job is offered on local terms and conditions and is at will.""",11150,Washington
38,District Manager,GoPuff,"Washington, DC",None,"Gopuff is seeking a District Manager to join the operations team. We are looking for a self-starting and entrepreneurial strong leader; to lead the DMV territory. The District Manager role is an intense and fast-paced role within goPuff that requires drive, grit, positivity, and enthusiasm for the challenge. In this role, you will lead a team of General Managers. Ultimately, the success of the territory rests on your shoulders and is determined by your ability to execute and effectively lead a team that is hyper-focused on delivering a perfect experience for our customers.
Qualifications
10+ years of relevant experience in retail, supply chain, operations, consulting, or data-driven project management
Leadership and management experience required of multi-location teams
Demonstrated ability to manage large onboarding programs to train and onboard high performing employees
Degree in Business, Operations, Supply Chain, Management, Science, Technology, Engineering, Math, or a related field
Adept at analytical work and the ability to motivate others in a deadline-driven environment
Demonstrated ability to solve complex problems under pressure
Analytical and critical thinking ability
Strong communication and organization skills
Able to balance attention to detail with swift execution
Must be willing to travel at least 90% of the time
Responsibilities
Support your territory team of local general managers in their daily efforts to ensure that we have the proper direction for managing day-to-day operations
Coach and develop team members in your sites to continue to improve while preparing them to take on new roles and responsibilities
Develop a deep bench of talent by focusing on performance management and succession planning
Track daily/weekly/monthly/quarterly/annual metrics to measure success and develop strategies to improve the experience that we deliver to our customers
Develop and oversee upward reporting to ensure HQ leadership is connected to the field
Serve as the liaison between department rollout, local territory execution and other department leadership partners
Acquire top talent through direct involvement in the interview, hiring, and on-boarding process
Ensure your sites are operating at appropriate staffing levels and anticipate needs
Assist in the launch of new sites within your territory
Regionally-based leader dedicated to their territory
The only predictable thing about life is that it’s wildly unpredictable. That’s where we come in.

When life does what it does best, customers turn to Gopuff to deliver their everyday essentials, and to get through their day & night, work day and weekend.

We’re assembling a team of thinkers, dreamers & risk-takers...the kind of people who know the value of peace of mind in an unpredictable world. (And people who love snacks.)

Like what you’re hearing? Welcome to Gopuff.
The Gopuff Fam is committed to an inclusive workplace where we do not discriminate on the basis of race, sex, gender, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or familial status, age, ancestry, disability, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws. We believe in diversity and encourage any qualified individual to apply. We are an equal employment opportunity employer.",11150,Washington
39,"Manager, Project Delivery","Palladium Group, Inc.","Washington, DC",None,"Manager, Project Delivery
Company Overview:
Palladium is a global leader in the design, development and delivery of Positive Impact - the intentional creation of enduring social and economic value. We work with foundations, investors, governments, corporations, communities and civil society to formulate strategies and implement solutions that generate lasting social, environmental and financial benefits.
For the past 50 years, we have been making Positive Impact possible. With a team of more than 2,500 employees operating in 90 plus countries and a global network of more than 35,000 technical experts, Palladium has improved - and is committed to continuing to improve - economies, societies and most importantly, people's lives.
Palladium is a child-safe organisation, and screens applicants for suitability to work with children. We also provide equal employment to all participants and employees without regard to race, color, religion, gender, age, disability, sexual orientation, veteran or marital status.
This position is located in either Washington, DC or Chapel Hill, NC.
Primary Duties and Responsibilities:
Project Management
Plan and manage project start-up and closeout, supporting in-country corporate registration as needed;

Serve as the project’s primary liaison with corporate services, Senior Managers, Project Delivery, and Compliance and Project Excellence Hub;

Prepare and maintain project specific components of the project management manual;

In collaboration with the Compliance and Project Excellence Hub and corporate services, provide training and guidance to project staff on, and ensure compliance with, company policies and client rules and regulations (covering as required risk management, project planning, human resource management, monitoring, reporting, finance, procurement, logistics, IT, communications, audit support and all other project managements matters);

Establish project offices and office infrastructure; facilitate field office leases;

Participate in the development, implementation, and monitoring of project work plans, tracking project deliverables and monitoring project delivery against spending forecasts;

Support development and presentation of internal and external reporting (for example: quarterly Internal Project Reviews, CPARs, project risk assessments, annual reviews, and client deliverables);

Ensure project issues and risks are logged, reported on, managed and mitigated; and escalate risks and issues to Practice and Project Excellence and Compliance Hub leadership, as required;

In collaboration with Risk Management, conduct spot checks on processes and internal controls including asset management procedures;

Ensure all corrective actions for assigned projects are implemented and report back to confirm their completion via the risk register;

Serve as a point of contact with service providers and address contractual matters as required;

Support development of project subcontractor, grant management, and procurement procedures compliant with internal and client’s rules and regulations;

Report monthly on the status of partner budgets/invoicing and grants;

Manage planning and coordination of inputs from the company’s security team as needed;

Contribute to technical assistance through reviews, engaging in work planning and discussions with the field team, etc. to build skills with the goal of taking on a more senior role, such as director of project delivery or a functional area.
Contract and Client Relationship Management
Monitor and maintain compliance with head/prime contracts including agreement action requests (i.e., travel, personnel changes, grant approvals, budget realignments, etc.);

Liaise with C&C to communicate with contracting and agreement officers or other client representatives on any matters that make legal or financial commitments for Palladium;

Monitor and report on overall progress against agreed targets, milestones, outputs and activities;

Develop, manage and support contract amendments as required;

Liaise with and respond to requests from clients in conjunction with the project’s director, including providing or giving inputs on reporting;

Support project advocacy with internal and external stakeholders.
Financial Management
Ensure company policies for financial management are implemented and are compliant with the client’s rules and regulations;

Ensure that project levels of delegated authority issued are in accordance with Palladium’s Expenditure Approval and Signature Authority Policy and Guidelines and manage the process for higher-level approvals as required;

Collaborating with Financial Management establish project charge codes, ensuring they meet client and project requirements for cost allocation, monitoring and evaluation, and reporting;

In collaboration with Treasury, facilitate project bank accounts set-up with appropriate company and project signatories;

Ensure the project financial calendar is adhered to including monitoring, reconciling, and reporting expense advances monthly;

Leads monitoring budget progress against forecast as one metric to track project progress against its work plan; proactively seeks to solve shortages or overages against the frozen forecast as needed;

Review monthly Funds Transfer Requests (FTRs) to ensure they reflect budget progress and forecasting and seek approval for them as needed;

Review cashbooks / field vouchers and ensure supporting documentation is complete;

Serve as a coordinator for service providers and approve (or obtain approval for) work orders and invoices; ensure the accuracy of client invoices (including monthly, milestone and performance based invoices);

Monitor, reconcile and report expense advances monthly;
Support the external audit process as needed and ensure retention of project records is compliant with company and client policy;
Human Resource Management and Recruitment
Oversee project human resource planning, recruitment, contracting, with field teams and coordinate inputs from Compliance, HR, and Talent Acquisition teams (i.e. benefits, local labor law, etc.);

Working with associate, maintain project data on relevant HR systems for short-term and long-term staff and consultants; is maintained accurately;

Lead the mobilisation and demobilisation of all international staff (short-term and long-term) including contracting (in coordination with HR) and travel management;

Serve as primary supervisor to one or more Associate(s), Project Delivery, or Senior Associate(s), Project Delivery;

In conjunction with the PMU, and the Senior Manager, Project Delivery, engage in employee onboarding and training, educating new staff on policies, procedures, tools, and Palladium’s culture;

Actively monitor, review, correct, and provide feedback on all supervisee’s work products, providing additional training and support where necessary;

Take a proactive role in staff development, including working with supervisees to identify professional development opportunities, and holding monthly coaching sessions to advise them on project management best practices, core competencies, and general work skills and behaviors.
Business Development / Other
Contribute to company growth by ensuring assigned projects are managed well, ensuring Palladium is seen positively by clients for consideration in future business development;

Participate in capture planning, providing inputs on implementation requirements;

Provide input and support business development of the company as required.

Complete other duties as assigned.
Reporting requirements
The role reports to the Project Director. For multiple projects, the role has dual reporting requirements to the various relevant Project Directors. Reporting requirements include:
Attendance at all regular management team meetings,

Provision of regular updates to the line manager, including updates on Key Result Areas (KRAs) and any other material matters and/or areas of concern,

Monthly submission of financials and forecasts, and contributions to Practice and corporate reporting;

Other reporting as requested by the line manager.
Relationships
The role is to support the Data for Impact project and other IDIQs and awards and will report to the Director, Measurement and Learning..

As delegated, the role liaises with clients, technical area specialists, corporate services, professional service providers, and other stakeholders as required.
Authority levels
The role carries a degree of autonomy on project management with appropriate consultation. The role is required to analyse and make sound recommendations to the line manager;

The role may carry expenditure and/or signatory authority for project-related costs and documents;

Oversee and manage Senior Project Associates and Project Associates as assigned;

Contribute to process improvement through innovative and cost-effective ideas and suggestions.
Required Qualifications:
Essential Knowledge, Skills and Experience

Works with respect and dignity for all colleagues and promotes a cooperative team working environment.

Formal Project Management training and expertise is helpful.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Financial acumen and the ability to interpret and analyse financial reports.

Sound problem solving and decision making skills.

Strong management skills with ability to mentor, coach, lead, develop and evaluate staff.

Ability to travel and work in developing countries for extended periods of time if needed.

Adaptability to work with a low level of supervision and as a part of a team as needed.
Desirable Knowledge, Skills and Experience
Prior experience with USAID contracts and cooperative agreements is helpful.
Fluency in Spanish, French, Portuguese, or Arabic is preferred.",11150,Washington
40,"Manager, Strategic Outreach & Partnerships (Remote)",Mindset Scholars Network,"Washington, DC","$90,000 a year","For your application to be considered, please follow our Application Instructions below carefully. We have a specific ask in lieu of a traditional cover letter.
This is a new role at the Student Experience Research Network (formerly Mindset Scholars Network). Reporting to the Student Experience Research Network’s Director of Strategic Outreach & Partnerships (DSOP), the Manager, Strategic Outreach & Partnerships will be a key contributor to our team’s collective efforts to connect people and ideas across research, practice, and policy to advance relevant scientific knowledge and improve decision-making by education system leaders. The Manager will contribute expertise in program management and knowledge of our target audiences in education to the strategy, design, implementation, and execution of SERN's outreach initiatives. This role will engage SERN's key external stakeholders, with a focus on intermediary and influencer organizations that shape decision-making in education, such as policy organizations, system-level providers, funders, developers of education resources, and teacher preparation organizations.
We are seeking someone with prior experience working closely with these education audiences, who is interested in the practical implications of social science research, and who is looking for opportunities to stretch their leadership and strategy skills in navigating and coordinating a rapidly evolving, complex ecosystem of leaders across research, practice, policy, and philanthropy.
To read our long-form job description, visit: http://studentexperiencenetwork.org/wp-content/uploads/2021/03/Student-Experience-Research-Network-Manager-Strategic-Outreach-Partnerships-Position-Description.pdf
To apply, please see our application instructions below.
About Student Experience Research Network (SERN)
SERN is grounded in an interdisciplinary understanding that, in order to learn and thrive, students need to experience respect as valued people and thinkers—and that the practices, policies, and norms in education and society have inequitably shaped this experience of school depending on who students are and the opportunities they are afforded. Research from across the social sciences is essential to understanding the ways these structures systematically and differentially shape students’ experience of school—and how these structures can be changed. But this knowledge-building is too often siloed within academic disciplines and disconnected from the needs and perspectives of education stakeholders. SERN connects people and ideas across research, practice, and policy to promote research that is responsive and interdisciplinary, and to enable its timely application to decision-making in education.
Responsibilities and Tasks
Program Management
Independently manage initiatives that support our target audiences. This includes designing project plans, scoping and managing work by other staff/vendors, managing project deadlines/budgets, and all other necessary aspects of project management
Collaborate with outreach team in designing, planning, and executing creative learning experiences that build the awareness and capacity of leaders in education to integrate a focus on student experience into their strategies and programming
Collaborate with outreach team in creating accessible resources (e.g., research syntheses and evidence summaries, infographics, videos) that translate key research into clear insights
Develop and maintain organizational systems and procedures that enhance team effectiveness and smooth workflow for outreach priorities
Portfolio Development
Advise DSOP in designing a portfolio of outreach activities and partnerships that will position SERN to achieve its impact goals
Stay up to date on current matters of practice and policy, relevant academic research, and the perspectives of SERN’s target audiences to help identify needs for new resources on students’ experience of school for the K-16 education sector
Support the building of new organizational relationships with individuals and entities that could provide opportunities for future SERN strategic outreach activities
Work with DSOP to conceptualize and scope new initiatives that respond to evolving needs among our target audience
Other duties: Perform other duties as assigned, including contributing to team meetings and retreats, and supporting the Executive Director as needed with grant writing and reporting.
Education, Experience, Knowledge, Skills and Ability
7+ years’ professional experience with growing levels of responsibility and independence
5+ years’ experience working in the education sector, including experience with leaders in practice, policy, and/or philanthropic organizations
Experience managing a portfolio of multiple projects, programs, and/or initiatives, including scoping and managing work by other staff and/or vendors
Experience designing and facilitating effective adult learning experiences
Exceptional communication skills, including written, verbal, and graphical
Comfortable speaking and collaborating with senior leadership of all levels
Proficient in Microsoft Office & Google Docs; experience using project management and CRM tools
Ability to work in a small, highly motivated and fast-moving telecommuting environment
Time management skills to handle the competing priorities of several ongoing projects
Culturally open-minded, flexible, open to suggestions and opinions, eager to learn and grow, direct but polite, and organized in all aspects of work (including communication)
Ability to collaborate productively and harmoniously in a team, while also being able to self-manage completion of work tasks
Valued and Non-Essential Education, Experience, Knowledge, Skills and Ability
Experience working with policy influencer organizations (e.g., think tanks, policy advocates, associations or networks, policy consulting firms) and/or federal or state policymakers
Experience synthesizing ideas from education research and translating that research
Experience working remotely
How to Apply
We welcome and encourage people from underrepresented backgrounds who can bring unique perspectives to the table to apply. We are looking for people committed to cultivating an inclusive work environment that prioritizes continuous professional ‘stretching’ and growth, and helping each other make a positive contribution to the world. People in all United States locations are encouraged to apply but must be willing to work within Pacific, Mountain, Central, or Eastern time zones. Once it is safe to do so, this position will require up to 5% domestic travel.
To apply, a resume and responses to two written questions will be required. Instead of a typical cover letter, please address the following short answer questions (limit of 300 words per question):
1. One of SERN’s core values is seeking a more just and equitable education system for students. Please explain why you think it is important to focus on students’ experience of school as an element of equity in education.
2. SERN's work connects people and ideas across research, practice and policy to advance relevant scientific knowledge and improve decision-making by education system and institution leaders. SERN engages with intermediary and influencer organizations that shape decision-making by leaders in education systems and institutions, such as policy organizations, system-level providers, funders, developers of education resources, and teacher preparation and professional learning organizations, among others. Please describe an example of a time when you worked closely with either an education influencer or intermediary in an impactful way.
Compensation and Benefits
Salary: $90,000
Benefits: Comprehensive benefits package that includes 100% employer-paid health, dental, and vision insurance, 3% employer match on 401k contributions, pre-tax transportation benefits, and paid holidays, vacation, sick, and volunteer time off.
Hiring Statement
Student Experience Research Network is a project of New Venture Fund (NVF), a 501(c)(3) public charity that incubates new and innovative public-interest projects and grant-making programs. NVF is committed to attracting, developing and retaining exceptional people, and to creating a work environment that is dynamic, rewarding and enables each of us to realize our potential. NVF’s work environment is safe and open to all employees and partners, respecting the full spectrum of race, color, religious creed, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, political affiliation, ancestry, age, disability, genetic information, veteran status, and all other classifications protected by law in the locality and/or state in which you are working.
Compensation and Benefits

Salary and Wage: Total compensation: $90,000 with a comprehensive benefits package",11150,Washington
41,Project Manager (Remote Opportunity),VetsEZ,"Washington, DC",None,"VetsEZ (Veterans EZ Info, Inc.), a verified Service-Disabled Veteran-Owned Small Business (SDVOSB), is a leading provider of information technology services to commercial and government markets. VetsEZ is a company of Subject Matter Experts with deep expertise in Healthcare IT and Benefits Delivery. VetsEZ strongly believes in making complexity EZ by providing tangible solutions that improve day-to-day business transactions, maximize efficiencies, eliminate risks, and reduce costs for our clients. For more information, visit us at www.vetsez.com (http://www.vetsez.com/).
VetsEZ is looking for a Project Manager to work with a government customer to support the IT program management and technical support teams.
Responsibilities:
Create strategies and plans for interfaces for multiple complex IT systems/subsystems, ensuring full functional, and performance capabilities are retained
Facilitate the review and analysis of systems documentation for interfaces
Coordinate with development teams and user groups to assess risks and ensure requirements and project goals are met
Coordinate with cross-organizational interface development teams to meet project goals, monitor, and report on progress
Provide oversight of project milestones to ensure goals are met and to provide expertise/risk analysis as required
Requirements:
BS degree in Information Technology or a related discipline
A minimum of 10 years of experience
Experience managing Information Technology related projects
Experience with life cycle and project management methodologies
Experience in tracking costs, schedule, and performance progress
Strong ability to identify and mitigate risks
Additional Qualifications:
Knowledge and experience in VA processes and systems
Knowledge of information technology (IT) management
Ability to hold a security clearance
Benefits:
Medical/Dental/Vision
401k with Employer Matching
Corporate Laptop
PTO + Federal Holidays
Training opportunities
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.
Sorry, we are unable to offer sponsorship at this time.",11150,Washington
42,Junior Project Manager - Marketing & Communications,"Sharp & Company, Inc.","Washington, DC","$40,000 - $60,000 a year","Applications will not be considered unless a cover letter is provided. Please do not contact Sharp & Company directly about this position. Only applications through Indeed will be considered. Job DescriptionCompany Description: Sharp & Company is a small, women-owned, full-service communications firm that specializes in strategic branding and public involvement for transportation clients such as the Virginia Department of Transportation, the Maryland Department of Transportation, the District Department of Transportation, and the Montgomery County Department of Transportation.Job Description: Sharp & Company is looking for a Junior Project Manager. Do you enjoy working on a team to develop innovative and effective communications strategies? How about taking complex technical information and translating it into simple-to-understand messages? If that sounds interesting, this is the perfect job for you! This position will allow you to work on a regionally significant infrastructure project in Washington DC, connecting with various stakeholders while enhancing your communications, marketing, and advertising expertise.Worksite location – All positions are remote to Sharp & Company’s offices. This position may require you to work onsite in Washington, DC, and occasionally attend site visits in Rockville and Gaithersburg (estimated 1-2x a month).TasksThis position will primarily do the following:Supports project manager as neededSupports the strategic and tactical operation of the projectCoordinates with the client and creative team for development and approvals of meeting materialsSupports management of budgetCoordinates with other company staff to complete assignments by requesting other company services (example, creative services, public meetings staffing, reports, media services, PR services, etc.)Plans, organizes, and executes public outreach campaigns including writing public information plansPlans meetings and outreach eventsOversees development of content for outreach materials.Secures necessary approvals for contentOrganize and collect equipment, materials, signage, etc. for public meetingsStaff public meetings for any project as necessaryAttend weekly staff meetings (in person or via Zoom)Participate in and support all projects as staffing is neededSkillsCollege degree1-3 years of communication experience requiredKnowledge of the public information process at transportation agencies a plusExperience developing and implementing public information plansExperience organizing and executing public outreach marketing plansStrong writing skillsOur BenefitsOur reputation is built upon the talents and integrity of our employees. We value the contributions of each and every person who is a member of our organization. We offer challenging career opportunities, competitive salaries, and a comprehensive benefits package that includes the following:Health, Vision, and DentalPaid holidaysPaid vacation/sick leaveMedical benefits401KLong- and short-term disabilityEducation and networking opportunitiesApplications will not be considered unless a cover letter is provided. Please do not contact Sharp & Company directly about this position. Only applications through Indeed will be considered.Salary Range: $40,000 - 60,000 (Depending on experience)Job Type: Full-timePay: $40,000.00 - $60,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offReferral programVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayExperience:Marketing: 1 year (Required)Writing skills: 1 year (Required)Work Location:Multiple locationsWork Remotely:Yes",11150,Washington
43,Program Manager,US Customs and Border Protection,"Sterling, VA","$144,128 - $172,500 a year","Duties
Summary
As our nation navigates the COVID-19 pandemic, CBP is committed to delivering our mission to safeguard America's borders and enable legitimate trade and travel. Staffing mission critical positions remains a high priority. Be reassured that CBP is still hiring, despite potential hiring process step delays due to restrictions to in-person activities.
Responsibilities
Organizational Location: This position is with the Department of Homeland Security, within U.S. Customs and Border Protection, Office of Field Operations, National Targeting Center - National Vetting Center in Sterling, VA.

This position will allow you to use your expertise in managing and overseeing various programs which have an agency-wide and government-wide impact. Apply for this exciting opportunity to direct programs that strengthen the Department's ability to perform homeland security. This position starts at a salary of $144,128.00 (GS-15, Step 1) to $172,500.00 (GS-15, Step 10) with promotion potential to $172,500.00 (GS-15, Step 10).

In this Program Manager position you will become a key member of a team of Homeland Security professionals managing a variety of agency-wide law enforcement programs. Typical work assignments include:

Managing and directing all operations and facilities related to programs, policies, and new and continuing initiatives of OFO with operational functions that are worldwide.
Establishing overall OFO managerial and administrative objectives, developing long-range plans and identifying required resources in order to promote an efficient, economical and progressive organization.
Interpreting and implementing local and higher echelon policies and regulations.
Reviewing all programs for effectiveness and ensuring that trends are identified and presented in concert with the urgency dictated by the condition.
Determining programs that require closer review and evaluation. along with providing OFO perspective on all CBP operational programs and serves as an integrator or lead on selected programs, projects and subprograms at the request of the EAC.

Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
Yes
Promotion Potential
15
Job family (Series)
0340 Program Management
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a U.S. Citizen to apply for this position
Males born after 12/31/1959 must be registered with Selective Service
Primary U.S. residency for at least three of the last five years (additional details below)
You may be required to pass a background investigation
CBP follows the DHS Drug-Free Workplace Plan for drug testing procedures
As an employee of CBP, you will be joining a workforce that is dedicated to accomplishing our mission while maintaining the trust of our Nation by strictly adhering to all government ethics standards. Your conduct will be subject to the ethics rules applicable to all Executive Branch employees, and to CBP employees specifically, as well as the criminal conflict of interest statutes. Once you enter on duty, these rules include obtaining approval for outside employment or business activity, to ensure such employment or business activity is not prohibited and does not interfere or conflict with performance of your official duties. Please review further details via the following link.

Qualifications
Experience: You qualify for the GS-15 grade level if you possess 1 year of specialized experience equivalent to at least the next lower grade level, performing duties such as:
Working with classified information and developing or implementing vetting policies and procedures for the purpose of ensuring government-wide homeland security missions are integrated to meet organizational goals.
Making national level policy decision focusing on policy set by the National Security Council to develop national level policy and oversee implementation of policies that cut across multiple agencies and departments to align organizational activities.
Applying management techniques, methods, and principles to assure optimum utilization of personnel, equipment and space, and to accomplish program objectives.
Possessing leadership experience with financial management including secure appropriate funds, prepare, justify and/or manage program budgets, use cost-benefits analysis to set priorities and track expenses.
Providing written and oral reports with conclusions, alternatives and recommendations, on national policies, projects or studies for an organization.


Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

You must meet all qualification requirements, including education if applicable to this position, subject to verification at any stage of the application process by 06/18/2021.

The Office of Personnel Management (OPM) must authorize employment offers made to current or former political appointees. If you are currently, or have been within the last 5 years, a political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee in the Executive Branch, you must disclose this information to the Human Resources Office.

Background Investigation: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) is a federal law enforcement agency that requires all applicants to undergo a thorough background investigation prior to employment in order to promote the agency's core values of vigilance, service to country, and integrity. During the screening and/or background investigation process, you will be asked questions regarding any felony criminal convictions or current felony charges, the use of illegal drugs (e.g., marijuana, cocaine, heroin, LSD, methamphetamines, ecstasy), and the use of non-prescribed controlled substances including any experimentation, possession, sale, receipt, manufacture, cultivation, production, transfer, shipping, trafficking, or distribution of controlled substances. For more information visit this link.

Residency: There is a residency requirement for all applicants not currently employed by CBP. Individuals are required to have physically resided in the United States or its protectorates (as declared under international law) for at least three of the last five years. If you do not meet the residency requirement and you have been physically located in a foreign location for more than two of the last five years, you may request an exception to determine if you are eligible for a residency waiver by meeting one or more of the following conditions:
Working for the U.S. Government as a federal civilian or as a member of the military
A dependent who was authorized to accompany a federal civilian or member of the military who was working for the U.S. government
Participation in a study abroad program sponsored by a U.S. affiliated college or university
Working as a contractor, intern, consultant or volunteer supporting the U.S. government


Probationary Period: All employees new to the federal government must serve a one year probationary period during the first year of his/her initial permanent federal appointment to determine fitness for continued employment. Current and former federal employees may be required to serve or complete a probationary period.
Education
The competencies or knowledge, skills, and abilities needed to perform this job are:

Superior knowledge and experience in national level policy decision making processes, with a focus on policy development in support of USG wide policy set by the National Security Council.
Experience in developing national level policy and overseeing implementation of policies that cut across multiple agencies and departments to align organizational activities.
Knowledge of financial management principles needed to secure appropriate funds, prepare, justify and/or manage program budgets, use cost-benefits analysis to set priorities and track expenses in support of the DHS mission.
Ability to effectively communicate, both orally and in writing, and an ability to grasp conceptual ideas and exercise original thought where there is an established time limit for deliberation, consultation and evaluation, and to present well considered and sound recommendations or decisions.
Ability to direct complex studies requiring application of advanced analytical and statistical methods and techniques, and lead studies and analysis teams, as necessary.

Additional information
This position is not covered under the bargaining unit.

Managerial Probationary Period: You may be required to serve an 18 month probationary period upon appointment.

Leadership Training: All newly appointed GS-15s are required to complete mandatory training. The training will be scheduled by the Office of Training and Development within the first 90 days of appointment. The duration of the training will include 5 weeks of in residence training in Harpers Ferry, WV. Note: This training may be waived if previously completed.


Financial Disclosure is required.

Telework may be available on a regular recurring or situational basis.

DHS uses E-Verify, an Internet-based system, to confirm the eligibility of all newly hired employees to work in the United States. Learn more about E-Verify including your rights and responsibilities.

Please view the video ""Protecting America 24/7"" to learn more about CBP's Office of Field Operations.

Follow U.S. Customs and Border Protection on Twitter @CustomsBorder

The Department of Homeland Security encourages persons with disabilities to apply, to include persons with intellectual, severe physical or psychiatric disabilities, as defined by 5 CFR § 213.3102(u), and/or Disabled Veterans with a compensable service-connected disability of 30 percent or more as defined by 5 CFR § 315.707. Veterans, Peace Corps/VISTA volunteers, and persons with disabilities possess a wealth of unique talents, experiences, and competencies that can be invaluable to the DHS mission. If you are a member of one of these groups, you may not have to compete with the public for federal jobs. To determine your eligibility for non-competitive appointment and to understand the required documentation, click on the links above or contact the Servicing Human Resources Office listed at the bottom of this announcement.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
We will review your resume and supporting documentation to ensure you meet the minimum qualification requirements. If you meet the minimum qualifications, we will use an assessment questionnaire to place you in one of three categories based on your experience, education, and training.

If you meet the minimum qualifications, you will be placed in one of the following categories:

Best Qualified: Applicants possessing experience that substantially exceeds the minimum qualifications of the position and demonstrate high proficiency in all of the critical competencies, including all Selective Placement Factors (SPF), and appropriate Quality Ranking Factors (QRF) as determined by the job analysis.
Well-Qualified: Applicants possessing experience that exceeds the minimum qualifications of the position and demonstrates acceptable proficiency in all of the critical competencies, including all SPF's and appropriate QRFs as determined by the job analysis.
Qualified: Applicants possessing experience that meets the minimum qualifications of the position and demonstrate basic proficiency in most of the critical competencies, including all SPFs and appropriate QRFs as determined by the job analysis.


If you are best qualified, you may be referred to the hiring manager for consideration and may be called for an interview. Preview the job questionnaire https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11120534

Veterans: Qualified veterans who have a compensable service-connected disability of at least 10% are listed in the best-qualified category, except when the position being filled is scientific or professional at the GS-09 grade level, or higher. This position is not considered scientific/professional. Other 10 point preference eligibles and veterans with 5 point preference who meet the eligibility and qualification requirements are placed above non-preference eligibles within the category in which they qualify. View information on veterans' preference.


Agency Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP) and Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP) Eligibles: If you have never worked for the federal government, you are not CTAP/ICTAP eligible. View information about CTAP/ICTAP eligibilityon OPM's Career Transition Resources website. To be considered eligible under CTAP/ICTAP, you must be placed in the Well-Qualified category for this position, as described above. In addition, you must submit the supporting documents listed under the Required Documents section of this job announcement.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Top Secret
Drug test required
Yes
Required Documents

Required Documents
Your resume: A resume describing your job-related qualifications is required and will be used for the purpose of reviewing your qualifications and determining what training, if any, would be required when placed. A resume in English is required. It must contain your full legal name, address, phone number, complete work history including a detailed description of your duties, the dates you performed those duties (MM/DD/YY), your hours worked per week, job title, as well as series, grade, and salary (if applicable). For additional required items, see the link above.
Your responses to the job questionnaire: https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11120534
Are you claiming special priority selection rights under the Agency Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP) or the Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP)? You must submit a separation notice; your most recent SF-50 (noting your current position, grade level and duty location); a copy of your most recent performance rating; an agency certification that you cannot be placed after injury compensation has been terminated; an OPM notification that your disability annuity has been terminated; or a Military Department of National Guard Bureau notification that you are retired under 5 U.S.C. 8337(h) or 8456.
Are you a veteran? To apply veterans' preference you must submit proof of eligibility as appropriate for your preference type:
Five Point Preference: DD 214 listing the character of service and either qualifying medal(s) or service period.
Ten Point Preference: DD 214 showing character of service and supporting documentation as listed on the Standard Form 15 (application for 10 Point Veterans' Preference). Submitting an SF-15 with your application is encouraged. Veterans with a service-connected disability must also submit a VA Disability Award letter dated 1991 or later, OR supporting documentation as listed in the SF-15.
If you are currently serving on active duty, you must submit a written statement from the armed forces certifying your dates of service, rank, expected character of service, and anticipated date of separation. If you apply with a written statement at this stage, your preference will be verified by a DD 214 upon separation from the military.
View more veterans' information.
Are you a current or former federal employee? If yes, it is recommended that you submit a copy of your SF-50(s) (Notification of Personnel Action) to support your experience. Examples of appropriate SF-50s include promotions, within-grade increases and accessions.
Are you a current or former political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee? Submit a copy of your applicable SF-50, along with a statement that provides the following information regarding your most recent political appointment:
Position title
Type of appointment (Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES, or Presidential Appointee)
Agency
Beginning and ending dates of appointment
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.",11150,Washington
44,IT Project Manager (Network/Infosec),"US Offices, Boards and Divisions","Washington, DC","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
Incumbent serves as an IT Project Manager resolving highly complex and controversial IT application, network and system security functions, defining objectives, and interpreting policies that rely on to meet their mission requirements. Performs assigned functions in the following Infrastructure and Operations Section: Network Operation (NetOps).
Responsibilities
Manages the design, implementation, and support for network.
Diagnoses and resolves network problems and developing network backup and recovery procedures.
Creates and follows plans for long-term projects. Modifies project plans, as required.
Identifies and implements new solutions that may be more efficient, more effective, and/or less expensive.
Assists with policies and procedures to ensure information systems reliability and accessibility and to prevent and defend against unauthorized access to systems, networks, and data.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - Business travel required 10% of the time.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
None
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a United States Citizen or National.
You must successfully pass a security/background investigation and a drug screening.
Selective Service registration is required, see the ""Requirements"" section for full details.
Additional selections may be made from this recruitment, for up to 90 days, if openings occur in other offices serviced by JMD Human Resources.
Financial Disclosure: If selected, you may be required to disclose financial information in accordance with DOJ and Federal ethics guidelines.
This position requires a Federal Acquisition Certificate for Contracting Officers Representative (FAC-COR) and/or Federal Acquisition Certificate for Program Manager (FAC-PM) Level III within 12 months of appointment.
This position requires candidate to be able to hold a security clearance at the TOP SECRET/SCI security clearance.
Qualifications
To qualify for the position of IT Project Manager (Network/Infosec) at (GS-2210-14), you must meet the basic qualification requirements listed below AND possess the required specialized experience specific to this series and grade. You will need to demonstrate experience of 1-year (52-weeks) at the next lower grade level (GS 13) to qualify.

Basic Qualifications:
Attention to Detail - Is thorough when performing work and conscientious about attending to detail.
Customer Service - Works with clients and customers (that is, any individuals who use or receive the services or products that your work unit produces, including the general public, individuals who work in the agency, other agencies, or organizations outside the Government) to assess their needs, provide information or assistance, resolve their problems, or satisfy their expectations; knows about available products and services; is committed to providing quality products and services.
Oral Communication - Expresses information (for example, ideas or facts) to individuals or groups effectively, taking into account the audience and nature of the information (for example, technical, sensitive, controversial); makes clear and convincing oral presentations; listens to others, attends to nonverbal cues, and responds appropriately.
Problem Solving - Identifies problems; determines accuracy and relevance of information; uses sound judgment to generate and evaluate alternatives, and to make recommendations.
AND

Specialized Experience Statement: For the GS 14, you must have one year of experience at a level of difficulty and responsibility equivalent to the GS 13 grade level or pay band in the Federal service. At a minimum, specialized experience must be in or related to the following:

1. Plans and coordinates the installation, testing, operation, troubleshooting, and maintenance of hardware and software systems;
2. Resolves hardware/software interface and interoperability problems; ensuring systems availability, functionality, integrity, and efficiency, while maintaining systems configuration;
3. Coordinates with appropriate parties to respond to security issues. Contributes to documentation preparation by drafting and coordinating responses;
4. Promotes awareness of security issues to management; and/or
5. Reviews and evaluates software and systems design or modification proposals for identifying possible security risks that should be considered during further systems design and programming.

You MUST meet all qualification requirements, by the closing date of this announcement, 06/14/2021.

YOUR RESUME MUST support your responses to the online questionnaire and the qualification requirements. Failure to do so may result in an ineligible rating. See the ""Required Documents"" section for important notes about what information you must include in your resume!
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
This announcement is being advertised under a government-wide Direct-Hire Authority issued by OPM for positions in certain hard-to-fill occupational fields. Veterans Preference and other Category Rating procedures do not apply to this announcement.


Applicants must simply be determined possess the specialized experience required of the position. The hiring office may interview and select any qualified candidate of their choosing from the qualified pool. See OPM, Direct Hire Authority for more information...

Other Information:

Reasonable Accommodation Statement: Federal agencies must provide reasonable accommodation to applicants with disabilities where appropriate. Applicants requiring reasonable accommodation for any part of the application and hiring process should contact the hiring agency directly. Determinations on requests for reasonable accommodation will be made on a case-by-case basis.
DOJ EEO Statement/Policy: http://www.justice.gov/jmd/eeos/08-eeo-policy.pdf
Selective Service: If you were born male, on or after December 31, 1959, you must certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System, or are exempt from having to do so under the Selective Service Law. Additional information is found at: www.sss.gov.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications described above.

Per Direct-Hire Authority requirements, all qualified candidates will be referred to the hiring office for consideration in approximate receipt of application.
Once the job opportunity announcement closes (at 11:59 pm ET on06/14/2021), a review of your resume and supporting documentation will be conducted, the information will be compared against your responses to the assessment questionnaire to determine your eligibility for Federal employment, and then whether you are qualified for this particular position. Per Direct-Hire Authority requirements, all qualified candidates will be referred to the hiring office for consideration. The hiring office may select any qualified candidate without regard to special eligibility considerations. Veterans' preference is not applicable.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Top Secret
Drug test required
Yes
Position sensitivity and risk
Special-Sensitive (SS)/High Risk
Trust determination process
National security
Required Documents

Required Documents
The following documents are required for this vacancy:

Resume
SF-50/ Notification of Personnel Action

IMPORTANT RESUME INFO: Please review the USAJOBS Resume Writing Tutorial on YouTube before applying.
At a minimum, your resume must list each of the following items for every employment referenced. If you leave out important information we may not be able to credit your experience and you may be rated ineligible.
official position title,
employer name and contact information,
start and end dates (including month and year),
hours per week worked,
a detailed list of duties performed, accomplishments, and
your highest salary (or grade/step) achieved.
NEED HELP?
If you need help submitting your documents, please review the Applicant Help Site, Documents page. If you need help understanding document requirements, contact Kim Hall at kim.r.hall@usdoj.gov or 202-598-5013 during normal business hours. If you're having difficulty with your application or document submission, don't wait until the last minute, contact us right away so we can help you before the announcement closes.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
This position is being filled using Direct-Hire Authority.",11150,Washington
45,Digital Project Manager,OnMessage Inc,"Alexandria, VA 22314 (Northeast area)","$40,000 - $60,000 a year","OnMessage is a team of creative professionals. We consist of several knowledgeable senior digital strategists, copywriters, and email and ad marketers who have experience at every level of U.S. politics: national, statewide, congressional, state legislature and city-level campaigns. We pride ourselves in electing conservative candidates who stand strong for their principles. Our people believe in what we’re doing. We play aggressive offense. And most of all, we’re in it to win.Our Digital Team is driven by teamwork, captivating design, close partnerships, deep questions, and constant collaboration. Together with our partners, we craft strategic experiences and stories for a variety of candidates and advocacies across a range of digital environments.We are currently seeking a Project Manager to execute digital strategy on behalf of conservative initiatives. The Project Manager will be responsible for the following:· Act as a day-to-day digital lead on a variety of digital campaign activities· Post social media content and review analytics.· Develop and refine fundraising copy for a variety of digital mediums, including social media, email and sms· Coordinate email/sms fundraising, including email/sms mock-ups, email/sms sending, and analytics.· Collaborate on paid digital campaigns with ad buyers and clients across all social media channels and ad platforms· Contribute to the planning and development of clients’ fundraising calendars· Analyze and report on digital campaign metricsQualifications: · Interest in political campaigns;· Interest in digital marketing;· Competency in computer software programs, such as Microsoft Office;· Excellent writing and verbal communication skills;· Ability to work in a fast-paced environment;· 0-2 years of professional experience.Compensation and Benefits: · The salary for this position is commensurate with experience.Job Type: Full-timePay: $40,000.00 - $60,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceFlexible scheduleHealth insuranceVision insuranceSupplemental Pay:Bonus payWork Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",11150,Washington
46,Project Manager - IT Services,NeoSystems LLC,"Tysons Corner, VA",None,"Job purpose
The NeoSystems IT Services Project Management Office (PMO) manages projects and activities for all IT Services organizations. As such, the PMO has an opportunity for a Technical Project Manager that will become part of an integrated team of professionals supporting our customers embarking on technology implementations focused on security technologies, cyber security, and compliance in an agile and adaptive methodology.
Duties and responsibilities
Management and delivery of cybersecurity solutions.
Develop detailed and integrated project plans including dependencies, risks and resources
Establish and review project budgets
Lead project planning sessions
Coordinating staff and internal resources
Project status reporting and performance monitoring
Ensuring project success by monitoring deadlines, budgets, resourcing and deliverables
Escalate issues and mitigate risks to ensure project success
Managing relationships with clients and stakeholders
Review statements of work for accuracy and clarification of work efforts
Review of deliverables and work product to ensure quality assurance
Assisting in defining clear deliverables, roles and responsibilities on assigned projects
Coordinate governance and process plans with clients and internal teams:
Risk Migration
Communication
Success Criteria
Project Closure
Status reporting to internal executive sponsors and stakeholders
Support process management and documentation activities
Qualifications
Qualifications include:
Experience in cybersecurity solutions, CMMC and other complex compliance projects
5-10 active project management experience
BA/BS in appropriate field or equivalent work experience
Proven work experience in project management and enterprise level engagements in fields of technology implementations
Use of Project Management software such as Microsoft Project, Smartsheets, Wrike, etc.
Strong working knowledge and use of Microsoft Office tools
Excellent client-facing and internal communication skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Solid organizational, detailed and multitasking skills
Project Management Professional (PMP), Agile certifications (Scrum) or equivalent experience
Ability to manage multiple project engagements simultaneously (10-15)
Working conditions
As part of the Project Management team, Project Managers work normal business hours, however, from time to time may be required to alter schedules and activities based on support of client activities and engagements where clients may be in other time zones or even countries that are not US based. Allow this is a remote position, it may require the candidate to travel to client meetings when necessary. It is expected that travel will be less than 25% for this role.
EOE M/F/D/V",11150,Washington
47,Entry Level to Senior Level IT Project Managers,Agiletal,"Herndon, VA 20170",None,"Entry Level to Senior Level IT Project Managers (Multiple Positions)
Job Duties:
Plan & initiate, information technology (IT) projects.
Serve as liaison between business & technical aspects of projects.
Plan project stages & assess business implications for each stage.
Assure deadlines, standards, & cost targets are met. Develop & update project plans forIT projects including project objectives, technologies, systems, information specifications,schedules, & funding.
Monitor & track project milestones & deliverables. Confer with project personnel to identify & resolve problems.
Utilize Java/.NET, PL/SQL relational database applications, Oracle, XML, Web-services, HTML, CSS, Ajax, Design Patterns, Unix, andWindows. May require travelling for setting up various systems at various client sites across the nation, and perform feasibility studies
Please send resume
Cover Letter and Salary requirements by regular mail to Agile Technologies Inc
400 South Avenue, Suite 8, Middlesex, NJ 08846.",11150,Washington
48,Project Manager,ClientSolv Technologies,"Tysons, VA 22182",None,"Company Description
ClientSolv Technologies is an IT solution firm with over a decade of experience serving Fortune 1000 companies, public sector and small to medium sized companies. ClientSolv Technologies is a woman-owned and operated company that is certified as a WMBE, 8a firm by the Federal government's Small Business Administration.

Job Description
We are seeking a Project Manager for a long-term contract (with the option to hire) in the D.C. area. This role can work remotely until the end of 2021 (at that point, this role will be based out of the D.C. office- onsite). If you are within commuting distance to the D.C area or will be relocating the D.C. area, let's chat!
In this role, you will be responsible for:
Defines, develops and executes project plans, including scope definition, expectations, activities, cost estimates, and schedules
Works with the business group to determine and understand business requirements
Manages projects from concept through the planning, analysis, design, testing, implementation, and transition phases
Directs and leads Project Teams by developing and coordinating work plans, schedules, milestones, deliverables, and training
Manages project budgets including risk and impact of changes to project plans
Identifies and minimizes project risks or constraints that would impact project deliverables
Maintains/archives project documentation
Ensures project deliverables are met in accordance with customers’ expectations
Sets, manages, and communicates client expectations for the project
Identifies, escalates and/or resolves issues associated with project(s) ensuring deliverables conform to established quality and schedule
Monitors and controls risks to ensure timelines are met and project goals are attained
Facilitates project team and client meetings for the resolution of project issues
Provides project status reports to management
Works closely with Procurement to clearly define and understand contracts, including language, scope, pre- and post-award, contract closure, basic legal aspects, and risk management
Serves as primary point of contact for project management and related issues.
Secures resources and ensures optimum utilization of those resources, meeting budgetary requirements
Allocates project team assignments to ensure accountability, establishes a team environment, manages personnel changes, and executes the training plan
Establishes team objectives and assignments, reviews work products, and provides timely feedback to staff regarding performance; may provide input to team members’ performance appraisals
Promotes team building and skills development of project team members
Provides guidance to help team members and stakeholders
Fosters relationships with staff, peers, and business unit
Participates in contract management efforts, including contract development, monitoring and issue resolution

Qualifications

Experience in progressively responsible administrative positions that demonstrate the ability to work independently and manage multiple priorities effectively
Effective planning, organizational, and problem solving skills
Experience working with all levels of employees, management, stakeholders, and vendors
Effective interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills
Demonstrated skill in exercising initiative, good judgment, and making sound and timely decisions
Demonstrated skill achieving goals and objectives
Proficiency with PCs and related software applications (word processing, spreadsheet, presentation, and database applications
Desired Qualifications and Education Requirements:
Advanced Degree in Business, Management, Economics, Finance, or related field
Extensive experience managing multi-disciplinary project lifecycles for financial institutions
Additional Information
This long-term contract (with the option to hire) is located in the D.C. area but can be remote until the end of 2021 (at that point, this role will be based out of the D.C. office- onsite). If you are within commuting distance to the D.C area or will be relocating to the D.C. area, let's chat!
Due to the Federal contracts being supported, this role is open to US Citizens or Permanent Residents.",11150,Washington
49,Project Policy Manager,Aquent,"Washington, DC 20005 (Downtown area)",$48 an hour,"Job Description:
We have an opening for an experienced Project Manager with one of our non-profit Travel, Loyalty & Membership clients in the Washington, DC area!
***Candidates MUST be in the Washington, DC area***
The project manager will support project coordination, stakeholder outreach, product marketing, and research related to this clients Housing Issue Area, the clients Livability Index, and other priorities related to Livable Communities within the clients Public Policy Institute’s Family, Home and Community Team.
Responsible for coordinating team member participation in meetings, maintaining written meeting notes, recording decisions, facilitating communication among staff and contractors, and ensuring on-time execution and follow-up of task assignments by leveraging team project management systems (Confluence, Teams, Github).Perform ad-hoc research on livability indicators, trends, and innovations and work within the client Library on executing literature reviews.Solicit feedback on work products from the clients state and national staff.Coordinate with communications staff and team members to keep website content up-to-date and advise on page design and content to drive engagement.Develop, organize, and maintain a Livable Communities image library, craft social media posts, and evergreen tweets. Develop and execute plan to increase sign-ups of e-alert and newsletter distribution lists.

The ideal candidate is familiar with community livability and city planning spaces, knows where the conversations about neighborhoods, housing, transportation and aging-in-place are taking place, and is able to promote PPI resources to key audiences via multiple channels, including social media, team webpages, blogs, conferences, and podcasts. Strong project management skills , excellent written and oral communication skills required.
Client Description:
Our client is one of the largest non-profits in the US, with a very user-centric vision and a strong social mission. This organization dedicates its efforts on increasing membership with a strong focus digitally, via social media, and digital marketing. The vibe is collaborative, fast-paced, and overall, passionate. The people who work here live and breathe the organization’s mission of enhancing the quality of life, and championing social change.
Work here and:
Help target memberships now and into the future to develop products specifically targeted to those relatively new to the workforce
Have your voice be heard. Our client prides itself on considering the input of all involved in projects
Work with fellow freelancers who know that they’re working on projects designed for the betterment of communities
Work on national campaigns that are targeted by community
Work with others who are interested in outreach and volunteerism
Our client has made customer engagement a priority and is interested in all candidates who are passionate about it as well.
Requirements:
Freelancing long-term with Aquent gets you access to some pretty cool things:
You're paid weeklySubsidized health and dental benefits after your first four weeks of work (averaging at least 20 hrs/wk)Paid Sick Leave for all US and Canada talentAccess to Fidelity 401(k) with company matchAccess to FSA Program (pre-tax payment toward bus or train passes, etc.)Direct deposit for your paycheckAccess to our Talent Rewards Program (we reward for referrals!)Access to free online courses via Aquent's Gymnasium, to help you develop your skills: http://gymnasium.aquent.com/Aquent support: your Aquent Agent checks in with you during the course of your contract to make sure you're happy and progressing according to your expectations (we're also there to be looking for new opportunities for you when you're close to wrapping up)Not the job for you? Tell your friends and reap the Rewards! https://aquent.com/rewards/",11150,Washington
50,"Creative Project Manager, War Room",American Progress,"Washington, DC 20005 (Downtown area)","$60,000 a year","American Progress has an immediate opening for a Creative Project Manager to join the War Room’s growing creative team. The War Room’s mission is to develop innovative and compelling visual content that builds the emotional and visual case for progressive policies and values.
A strong candidate for this role will work as part of a digital team that creates shareable graphics, advertisements, websites, email newsletters, and videos. The Creative Project Manager’s responsibilities include overseeing the production process behind the deliverables the War Room produces, ensuring that the team navigates tight turnarounds, and coordinating tasks and activities with internal and external stakeholders.

The ideal candidate for this role is an excellent problem solver, actively monitoring project status and proactively communicating and addressing any challenges that arise. The Creative Project Manager will resolve obstacles and manage change requests as needed, working across teams to adjust timelines, project scope, and/or resources as needed. They will ensure stakeholder feedback is incorporated in a timely manner and that final deliverables meet project requirements.

This is a full-time position funded through March 2022.

Responsibilities:

Manage, optimize, and execute projects that advance American Progress’ strategic goals.
Keep all timelines and project plans up to date, identifying process gaps, workflow improvement needs, resource deficiencies, and potential roadblocks—and escalate to the Senior Director of Digital Creative as needed.
Lead weekly product meetings where the Creative team reviews upcoming deliverables and assesses work flow across video and design teams.
Review new requests and gather relevant information and scope of project so it can be assigned.
Move projects forward, ensuring the right resources are assigned to the right projects and all necessary parties are informed of the latest developments.
Continually evaluate the effectiveness of the creative team’s processes, proactively proposing new ideas and methods to improve overall performance and efficiency.
Stay up-to-date on the latest trends and best practices in project management.
Manage and traffic deliverables to internal approvers during the review process.
Develop and maintain strong working relationships with internal and external stakeholders.

Requirements and qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience in production or a related major and three to five years of professional experience.
Detail-oriented, process-driven with an understanding of what goes into the creative process.
A forward-thinking mindset and unique ability to anticipate and solve problems before they occur.
Ability to get things done through well-executed processes and fostering a cooperative team spirit.
Ability to interpret creative briefs and understand the resources and skills required to deliver high-quality work.
Experience working in content production at a news organization, creative agency, political organization, or nonprofit.
Knowledge of basic project management tools, interfaces, and visual asset databases.
Extremely strong organizational and communications skills.
Ability to juggle multiple projects and meet deadlines in a fast-paced environment.
A solid understanding of the creative process and cross-media ad specs for digital is preferred.
Sound editorial and ethical judgment.
Highly creative with a commitment to innovation and experimentation.
A positive team player with a passion for progressive change.
Collaborative and open to developing new skills as needed.

American Progress offers full and competitive benefits packages. Candidates from diverse backgrounds are strongly encouraged to apply. This position has a starting salary of $60,000.

This position is part of a bargaining unit represented by IFPTE Local 70.

To Apply

Please follow the link below to the online application. When completing the application, be sure to combine your cover letter and resume/CV into one Word or PDF file and upload this combined document. The system does not allow for multiple files.

This announcement will remain posted until the position is filled. No phone calls, please.
Please note that only those individuals whose qualifications match the current needs of this position will be considered applicants and will receive responses from American Progress.
Thank you for your interest in American Progress.",11150,Washington
51,Information Technology Project Manager (APPSW),U.S. Department of State,"Arlington, VA","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Overview
Accepting applications
Open & closing dates

06/08/2021 to 06/14/2021

This job will close when we have received 100 applications which may be sooner than the closing date. Learn more
Service

Excepted

Pay scale & grade

GS 14

Salary

$122,530 to $159,286 per year

Appointment type

Permanent

Work schedule

Full-timeLocation

1 vacancy in the following location:
Arlington, VA
1 vacancy
Relocation expenses reimbursed

No

Telework eligible

Yes as determined by agency policyThis job is open to
The public

U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.

Announcement number

DFAS/FSI-2021-0037

Control number

603794700

DutiesDuties
Summary

This serves as public notice for the use of OPM's Direct Hire Authority, Applicants who meet the qualification requirements will be forwarded to the selecting official for consideration.

Learn more about this agency
Responsibilities
Develops, modifies, or provides input to project plans.
Coordinates and integrates project activities, manages, leads, or administers project resources and monitors project activities and resources to mitigate risk.
Implements or maintains quality assurance processes, makes improvements, solves problems, or takes corrective action when problems arise.
Identifies project documentation requirements or procedures, and develops and implements product release plans.
Evaluates systems for compliance with all cybersecurity policies, principles, and protocols and proposes solutions to cybersecurity problems with enterprise-wide effect.
Oversees and directs activities regarding corporate academic management software.
Travel Required

Occasional travel - May be required.

Supervisory status

No

Promotion Potential

14

Job family (Series)

2210 Information Technology Management

Similar jobs
Information Technology Project Managers
Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Direct Hire Authority will be used to fill this position.
Incumbent will be subject to random drug testing.
Verification of employment eligibility in the United States is required.
One year probationary period, unless excepted by regulation.
Must be able to obtain and maintain a Top Secret security clearance.
U.S. Citizenship is required.
Qualifications

Applicants must meet all the required qualification requirements, including education and any selective placement factors described below by the closing date of this announcement. If you are qualifying based on education OR if there are mandatory education requirements listed below, you MUST submit a copy of your college transcript with your application.

Applicants applying for the GS-14 grade level must meet the following requirements:

Have IT-related experience demonstrating EACH of the four competencies AND specialized experience listed below:

Attention to Detail - Leading others by setting the standards for the quality of work, even in the most difficult and/or high pressure circumstances; reviewing and editing work completed by others to ensure that the quality of work meets acceptable work standards.
Customer Service - Using expertise and experience to address complex problems, questions, or complaints; anticipating customer needs and modify a team's work activities, processes, and practices to meet these needs; collaborating outside of own team to organize planning sessions that elicit ideas for improving customer service and support.
Oral Communication - Clearly explaining and defending complex ideas, appropriately adapting to each audience's level of knowledge; using well-constructed, fact-based arguments to persuade stakeholders/officials to take action on suggestions for improvement.
Problem Solving - Providing precedent setting solutions to unique problems not previously encountered; helping team make decisions which are complicated by the number and nature of existing policy, guidelines, and organizational goals; identifying the root causes of problems; developing systemic solutions to address them and prevent them from reoccurring.

AND

Have at least 1 full year of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-13 level in the Federal service which provided you with the particular knowledge, skills and abilities to perform the duties of the position.

Qualifying specialized experience must demonstrate the following:

Experience conducting and monitoring projects.

Experience developing, testing and implementing new or modified application software.

NOTE: In order to qualify for this position, your experience MUST be IT related; the experience may be demonstrated by paid or unpaid experience and/or completion of specific, intensive training (for example, IT certification), as appropriate.

There is no substitute of education for specialized experience for the GS-14 position.

Education

See the qualifications section of this vacancy announcement for education requirements, if applicable.

Additional information

For reasonable accommodation at the U.S. Department of State, please contact the Office of Accessibility and Accommodations at (202) 663-3474 or ReasonableAccommodations@state.gov.

EMPLOYMENT ELIGIBILITY VERIFICATION PROGRAM (E-Verify) – U.S. law requires organizations to employ only individuals who may legally work in the United States - either U.S. citizens, or foreign citizens who have the necessary authorization. This agency utilizes E-Verify to compare information from the Form I-9, Employment Eligibility Verification, to data from U.S. Department of Homeland Security (DHS) and Social Security Administration (SSA) records to confirm employment eligibility. If the employee’s information does not match DHS and/or SSA records, the employee is given an opportunity to resolve the problem. If eligibility cannot be verified, employment will be terminated.How You Will Be Evaluated

You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.

Under the provisions of the Direct-Hire Authority, veterans' preference does not apply. Traditional rating and ranking of applications does not apply. For this announcement, all applicants will be assessed to determine if they meet the qualifications for this position, specifically the education, specialized experience, and knowledge, skills, and abilities (KSAs) necessary to perform the work of the position. Applicants will not be rated or ranked. All applications that meet the required qualifications will be referred to the selecting official in the order in which the applications were received.

Your qualifications will be evaluated on the following KSAs and other characteristics that are relevant to the duties of this position and must be fully supported by information in your resume:

Knowledge of information technology specialty areas.
Knowledge of Information Technology Systems and Program Management.
Knowledge of project management principles and methods as well as software design concepts.
Ability to interpret and apply legislation, statutes, policies, and regulations governing information technology.
Ability to analyze technology hardware and software for solutions.

Your resume serves as the basis for qualification determinations and must highlight your most relevant and significant work experience and education (if applicable) as it relates to this job opportunity. Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Your resume should include the dates of all qualifying experience (from month/year to month/year) and the number of hours worked/volunteered per week.

For assistance with creating a resume, please click here. Agency Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP) or Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP) candidates must be well qualified for the position to receive consideration for selection priority. Candidates are considered well qualified if their knowledge, skills, and abilities (KSAs) exceed the minimum qualifications described in the announcement.

Applicants must meet all qualification requirements by the closing date of this announcement. Your application package must contain sufficient information to make a valid determination that you meet the basic/specialized experience requirements as stated in this job opportunity announcement for each grade level(s) for which you are applying and support your answers to the self-assessment questions related to basic eligibility.

To preview questions please click here.Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance

Top Secret

Drug test required

Yes

Position sensitivity and risk

Critical-Sensitive (CS)/High Risk

Trust determination process

National security

Required DocumentsRequired Documents

All required documents listed below, that are applicable to you, must be submitted to our automated system ""Gateway to State"" by 11:59 p.m. Eastern Time (ET) on the closing date of this announcement.

1. Resume - your resume or any other written format you choose should contain the required information as specified in the “How You Will Be Evaluated” section. Insufficient information will result in an ineligible rating.

2. A completed online job specific self-assessment questionnaire through the Department’s automated system “Gateway to State”.

3. Transcripts - if applicable, see the Qualifications section of the announcement. If selected, an official/sealed college transcript(s) will be required to verify education prior to employment.

4. If you are qualifying based on other criteria listed under the Qualification Section of this announcement, you MUST submit the required supporting documentation (certificates, certifications, etc.) with your application.

5. Veterans’ preference does not apply to this vacancy. If you are a veteran, you may indicate your veteran’s status on your resume. Any supporting documentation received from veterans will be retained to document veteran’s status if selected. If you are a 5-point veteran, you may provide a copy of your DD-214 Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty (Member Copy 4 is preferable) which must show the type of discharge and dates of active duty. If you are currently on active duty, you may provide a certification on letterhead from your military branch which contains your military service dates, expected date of discharge or release, and the character of service to show that your military service was performed under honorable conditions. The expected date of discharge or release must be no later than 120 days after the certification is submitted for consideration for this vacancy announcement. If the appropriate information is not submitted to confirm your current or expected discharge status, dates of service, etc., you will not receive credit for the claimed active duty military service.

If you are a 10-point veteran, in addition to the DD-214 or certification, you may also submit a current version of the SF-15 (Application for 10-Point Veteran Preference), dated October 2013, and any documentation required by this form to support your claim. Previous editions of the SF-15 will not be accepted.

For further information regarding Veterans, click here. If you are a Sole Survivor veteran, you may provide a copy of your DD-214 (Member Copy 4 is preferable) or another form of official documentation which shows your discharge or release from active duty occurred on or after August 29, 2008 and was based on a sole survivorship discharge.

To gain access to your DD214 online, please visit: http://www.archives.gov/veterans/military-service-records/get-service-records.html

6. CTAP/ICTAP eligibles must submit a copy of the appropriate documentation with their application. See links below:

ICTAP Considerations
CTAP Considerations

If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:

Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.

Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.

BenefitsBenefits

A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding.
Opens in a new window
Learn more about federal benefits.

Review our benefits

Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.

How to Apply

Prepare your application in USAJOBS To start your application, click Apply and we’ll walk you through the process where you’ll attach a resume and any required documents. During the application process you can review, edit, delete, and update your information. We’ll automatically save your progress as you go, so you won’t lose any changes. Please carefully read all the instructions before you apply. You have until 11:59 p.m. Eastern Time (ET) on the closing date of this announcement to complete the application process.

STEP 1: Select the ""Apply On-line"" button and follow the instructions to register or sign into USAJOBS.

STEP 2: Submit a detailed resume or any other written format you choose documenting your job-related qualifications, experience, and education (if applicable). Cover letter is optional. If you submit a cover letter, you must also submit a resume. Please see the How You Will Be Evaluated section for specific information that should be outlined in your resume.

STEP 3: Answer the job-specific self-assessment questions on-line through the U.S. Department of State’s Gateway to State automated application system. The questions will be used to evaluate your qualifications and experience for this position.

STEP 4: Submit all required documentation applicable to you, as listed in the Required Documents section of this announcement, to the Department’s Gateway to State automated application system prior to the closing date of this announcement.

For instructions on how to view the status of your supporting documentation, please click here.

Technical assistance with your on-line application is available through the Help Desk at mgshelp@monster.com or by calling (866) 656-6830 between the hours of 7:00 a.m. and 7:00 p.m. ET

ALTERNATE APPLICATION PROCEDURES

NOTE: If applying online poses an extreme hardship, you may request alternate application procedures to submit your application package by fax. Contact the Human Resources office listed on the announcement between the business hours of 8:15 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. ET at least 2 working days prior to the closing date of this announcement. The application package for alternate application procedures must be submitted and received in the Human Resources office no later than 11:59 p.m. ET on the closing date of this announcement. Paper applications and information sent by mail WILL NOT BE ACCEPTED.Agency contact information
Ernesto Serrano
Phone

317-212-2494

Fax

000-000-0000

Email

ernesto.serrano12.civ@mail.mil

Address

U.S. Department of State
Defense Finance and Accounting Services (DFAS)
8899 East 56th Street
Indianapolis, Indiana 46249
United States
Learn more about this agency
Next steps

After all application packages have been received, we will review your resume to ensure you meet the basic qualification requirements. After we review and evaluate all applications, the most highly qualified candidates will be referred to the hiring manager for further consideration for possible interviews in approximately two weeks after the announcement closes. After a tentative job offer, we will conduct a suitability review and/or security background investigation, which generally takes an average of at least two to six months. You will be notified up to four times during the hiring process:

1. Upon receipt of your application.

2. Upon minimum qualification determinations.

3. After the certificate is issued.

4. After final selection is made.

For instructions on how to view the status of your application, please click here .

Multiple positions may be filled from this announcement.Fair & Transparent
Fair & Transparent

The Federal hiring process is setup to be fair and transparent. Please read the following guidance.

Equal Employment Opportunity Policy

The United States Government does not discriminate in employment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy and gender identity), national origin, political affiliation, sexual orientation, marital status, disability, genetic information, age, membership in an employee organization, retaliation, parental status, military service, or other non-merit factor.

Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) for federal employees & job applicantsReasonable Accommodation Policy

Federal agencies must provide reasonable accommodation to applicants with disabilities where appropriate. Applicants requiring reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process should follow the instructions in the job opportunity announcement. For any part of the remaining hiring process, applicants should contact the hiring agency directly. Determinations on requests for reasonable accommodation will be made on a case-by-case basis.

A reasonable accommodation is any change to a job, the work environment, or the way things are usually done that enables an individual with a disability to apply for a job, perform job duties or receive equal access to job benefits.

Under the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, federal agencies must provide reasonable accommodations when:

An applicant with a disability needs an accommodation to have an equal opportunity to apply for a job.
An employee with a disability needs an accommodation to perform the essential job duties or to gain access to the workplace.
An employee with a disability needs an accommodation to receive equal access to benefits, such as details, training, and office-sponsored events.

You can request a reasonable accommodation at any time during the application or hiring process or while on the job. Requests are considered on a case-by-case basis.

Learn more about disability employment and reasonable accommodations or how to contact an agency.Legal and regulatory guidance
Financial suitability
Social security number request
Privacy Act
Signature and false statements
Selective Service
New employee probationary period",11150,Washington
52,Project Manager,"ANALYGENCE, Inc.","Washington, DC",None,"Company DescriptionANALYGENCE, Inc. (ANALYGENCE) is a Disadvantaged, Veteran-Owned professional services small business established in 2010 on the principle of providing our customers with results driven professionals that understand the dynamic customer environment and can be relied upon to help them achieve their objectives. ANALYGENCE works with customers to develop and execute innovative strategies to improve processes and achieve customer goals. Our people are service-oriented professionals with varying military, government and industry backgrounds, who understand the level of commitment and flexibility it takes to progress customers forward in a dynamic work environment. We cater to the specific needs of each individual customer to help them lay out a path for success.Job DescriptionANALYGENCE is searching for a Project Manager to join our team supporting DHS CISA SETA.Initiate the project and get the team in place to fulfill client goals.Create and implement project plans.Set up a regular reporting cadence for government stakeholders.Work with team and government leads to establish project processes and procedures.Establish rapport with various stakeholders on the project.Work with government leads to support project goals, strategies, and milestones.QualificationsMust have current TS/SCI eligibilityMaster’s degree (MBA, MS, or the like)20+ years’ experience in government services, 15+ years of which supporting DHS as a Federal employee or contractor, and at least 2 years of experience directly supporting the NRMCProject Management Professional (PMP) certificationExcellent communication and team building skills; ability to juggle competing priorities and timelines; skilled in long- and short-term planningAdditional InformationANALYGENCE, Inc. is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decision without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class.Job Type: Full-time",11150,Washington
53,"Project Manager, International Affairs",Aquent,"Washington, DC 20005 (Downtown area)",None,"Job Description:
We are looking for highly motivated self starters with a strong orientation to make a difference. Must have strong research, writing, and communication skills.

Seeking sharp self-starter interested in international affairs and with a social impact orientation. This is a fantastic opportunity for a motivated and curious individual who is interested in our social mission to improve the lives of older adults around the world.

Responsible for managing and advancing a few key projects for the Global Thought Leadership (GTL) team, including but not limited to:
Editorial and project management assistance to support all aspects the production of the 2021 edition of our international periodical, The Journal. Responsibilities would include:
o research support to identify potential expert contributors to the Journal and to help build Clients' network of Latin American stakeholders;
o project management to ensure that editorial and production deadlines are met
o helping to build and curate our distribution list for stakeholders around the world
o assist in the developing and conducting social media campaigns for Journal and broader GTL team content
o editing and fact-checking journal article submissions
Project management support for our Living, Learning, and Earning Longer (LLEL) initiative.Assistance creating databases to manage the resources we are accumulating on:Targeted research support related to global aging issues
Position requires strong written and verbal communications skill, including editorial skills. Excel and PowerPoint skills also necessary.
Client Description:
Our client is one of the largest non-profits in the US, with a very user-centric vision and a strong social mission. This organization dedicates its efforts on increasing membership with a strong focus digitally, via social media, and digital marketing. The vibe is collaborative, fast-paced, and overall, passionate. The people who work here live and breathe the organization’s mission of enhancing the quality of life, and championing social change.
Work here and:
Help target memberships now and into the future to develop products specifically targeted to those relatively new to the workforce
Have your voice be heard. Our client prides itself on considering the input of all involved in projects
Work with fellow freelancers who know that they’re working on projects designed for the betterment of communities
Work on national campaigns that are targeted by community
Work with others who are interested in outreach and volunteerism
Our client has made customer engagement a priority and is interested in all candidates who are passionate about it as well.",11150,Washington
54,Health Scientist,US Food and Drug Administration,"Silver Spring, MD","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
This Direct-Hire position is in the Center for Devices and Radiological Health at FDA. CDRH is responsible for protecting and promoting public health. We ensure that patients and providers have access to safe, high-quality medical devices and safe radiation-emitting products and accessible science-based information about the products we oversee. We facilitate medical device innovation by advancing regulatory science, providing consistent and efficient regulatory pathways for U.S. devices.
Responsibilities
This position(s) is located in the CDRH, Office of Clinical Evidence and Analysis (OCEA), Division of Clinical Evidence and Analysis 1, Clinical Evidence Outcomes Research Team (DCEA1-8), in Silver Spring, Maryland.
OCEA provides policy and program support regarding clinical trials, biostatistics, real-world evidence, epidemiological analysis and outreach and collaboration with hospitals and other external stakeholders.
OCEA provides policy and program support for clinical evidence and human subject protection and regulatory oversight of medical device clinical investigations, good laboratory practice, and good clinical practice in support of premarket review.
OCEA also provides biostatistical and epidemiologic analyses, as well as support in the development of data infrastructure and expertise on clinical investigations and real-world evidence.
As an Health Scientist in OCEA, DCEA1-8 you will:
Plan, direct, and review the technical evaluation and research of the team in all areas of medical device and radiation-emitting electronic products;
Lead the team in the determination of the adequacy of information submitted and the thoroughness of data contained in scientific protocols, findings of studies or medical device evaluations submitted to the Agency by the regulated industry;
Collaborate and prepare comprehensive, concisely written reviews regarding scientific protocols, findings of studies or medical device evaluations; and
Plan, coordinate, and evaluate the program activities of the team.
Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
0601 General Health Science
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Citizenship Requirement: You must be a U.S. Citizen to be considered for this advertisement unless explicitly stated otherwise.
Direct Deposit: You will be required to have all federal salary payments electronically deposited into a bank account with a financial institution of your choice.
Background Investigation Requirement: All employees must pass a security investigation. Failing to pass the background check may be grounds for removal or legal action. If hired, you may be subject to additional investigations at a later time.
FDA participates in e-Verify: All new hires must complete the I-9 form; this information will be processed through e-Verify to determine your employment eligibility. If a discrepancy arises, you must take affirmative steps to resolve the matter.
Certification of Accuracy: All information concerning eligibility and qualification is subject to investigation and verification. False representation may be grounds for non-consideration, non-selection, or appropriate legal action.
Qualifications
The position of Health Scientist falls under the 0601 occupational series. To qualify for this position at grade GS-14, you must meet the following:


Basic Requirements

Bachelor's or graduate/higher level degree: major study in an academic field related to the medical
field, health sciences or allied sciences appropriate to the work of the position. This degree must be
from an educational program from an accrediting body recognized by the U.S. Department of
Education at the time the degree was obtained.

NOTE: Applicants must submit all relevant transcripts that demonstrate you possess the required education to meet the Basic Qualifications.


AND


Minimum Qualifications

You must have one year (52 weeks) of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-13. This experience includes:

Reviewing quality, clinical, scientific, and other data in support of a variety of medical device and radiological health programs;

Advising on the adequacy of research study documentation, protocols, epidemiologic methodologies, data analyses, medical device evaluation and/or interpretations of results; and

Managing, directing or overseeing the work of a team or working group or leading a project.

Specialized experience is experience that equipped the applicant with the particular knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform successfully the duties of the position, and that is typically in or related to the work of the position to be filled.

All qualification requirements must be met by 11:59 pm (Eastern Time) on 06/16/2021. If, after reviewing your resume and/or supporting documentation, a determination is made that you have inflated your responses when compared to your background information, you may be deemed ineligible or your score may be adjusted to more accurately reflect your skills and abilities. You must continue to meet all requirements through the hiring process.

You may be asked to provide additional information at a later time. All interview requests and selection decisions are at the full discretion of the hiring office.

NOTE: It is your responsibility to ensure your responses and appropriate documentation is submitted prior to the closing date . To verify your application is complete, log into your USAJOBS account, https://my.usajobs.gov/Account/Login, select the Application Status link and then select the More Information link for this position. The Details page will display the status of your application, the documentation received and processed, and any correspondence the agency has sent related to this application. Your uploaded documents may take several hours to clear the virus scan process.

IN DESCRIBING YOUR EXPERIENCE, PLEASE BE CLEAR AND SPECIFIC. WE WILL NOT MAKE ASSUMPTIONS REGARDING YOUR EXPERIENCE. Qualifications are based on breadth/level of experience. In addition to describing duties performed, applicants must provide the exact dates of each period of employment (from MM/YY to MM/YY) and the number of hours worked per week if part time. As qualification determinations cannot be made when resumes do not include the required information, failure to provide this information may result in disqualification. Applicants are encouraged to use the USAJOBS Resume Builder to develop their federal resume.

Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.
Education
EDUCATION:

TRANSCRIPTS:
Positions which are scientific or technical in nature often have very specific educational requirements. You must submit an official transcript, unofficial transcript, or a list including courses, grades earned, completion dates, and quarter and semester hours earned. If you are using education completed in foreign colleges or universities, see the Foreign Education section below for additional requirements.


Pay careful attention to the Qualifications and Education sections to identify vacancies where a transcript is required. Even if you hold a similar position or are a current employee, you are not exempt from transcript requirements.

Electronic Transcript Caution: If you have obtained your transcripts electronically, the file might contain security measures that could prevent our application system from reading the file. Therefore, you should consider asking the institution to provide the file in a non-secured electronic format. Alternatively, you could scan or take a photo of the printed copy of the transcript. If your uploaded transcript cannot be read by our system, you may receive consideration and credit for the information we can access.

See the Application Manager Documentation for tips on submitting your paper-based documents.


FOREIGN EDUCATION
Applicants
using part or all of their education completed outside of the U.S. to meet the qualification requirements
, must have their foreign education evaluated by an accredited organization to ensure that the foreign education is comparable to education received in accredited educational institutions in the U.S. We will only accept the completed foreign credential evaluation.

To be acceptable, the foreign credential evaluation must include/describe at a minimum, the following information: (1) The type of education received by the applicant; (2) The level of education in relation to the U.S. education system, and state that its comparability recommendations follow the general guidelines of the International Evaluation Standards Council; (3) The content of the applicant's educational program earned abroad, and the standard obtained; (4) The status of the awarding foreign school's recognition and legitimacy in its home country's education system; and (5) Any other information of interest such as what the evaluation service did to obtain this information, the qualifications of the evaluator, and any indications as to other problems such as forgery.
Note: Some positions require the completion of specific courses or a specified number of credit hours. Therefore, the foreign credential evaluation should provide information similar to that of an official transcript, to include a list of the courses taken, quarter and/or semester hours awarded, the cumulative grade point average (GPA), honors received, if any, date degree awarded.

Applicants can request an evaluation from a member organization of one of the two national associations of credential evaluation services listed below:
National Association of Credential Evaluation Services (NACES)
Association of International Credentials Evaluators
(AICE)

Credential evaluations are not free, and applicants are responsible for the cost of the selected service.
For more information about this requirement, please visit the U.S. Department of Education website for Foreign Education Evaluation
Additional information
For some advertisements, the Food & Drug Administration receives hundreds, even thousands, of applications from job-seekers. Because of this high level of interest in positions with the FDA, the agency reserves the option of setting an application number limit.


When an application limit is set, USAJOBS will close the vacancy at 11:59 pm Eastern Time on either:
(A) the day the limit is reached,
-OR-
(B) the pre-defined closing date of 06/16/2021, whichever comes first.

If the limit is reached before 11:59 pm ET, all applications in excess of the limit will continue to be accepted until 11:59 pm ET.

The application limit, if applicable, for this advertisement is: 100

For more information about announcement closing, see: https://www.usajobs.gov/Help/faq/job-announcement/expiration/

Additional Conditions of Employment:
Pre-employment physical required: no
Drug testing required: no
License required: no
Mobility agreement required: no
Immunization required: no
Bargaining Unit Position: yes, 3591
Telework eligible position: Telework is at the discretion of the supervisor.
This position may require financial disclosure reporting and will be subject to FDA's prohibited financial interest regulation. If you are hired, you may be required to divest of certain financial interests. You are advised to seek additional information on this requirement from the hiring official before accepting any job offers. For more information please visit the FDA Ethics web page: https://www.fda.gov/about-fda/jobs-and-training-fda/ethics.
Additional Information:
Incentives may be authorized; however, this is contingent upon funds availability. If authorized, certain incentives will require you to sign a service agreement to remain in the Federal government for a period of up to 3 years. Note: This statement does not imply nor guarantee an incentive will be offered and paid. Incentives include the following: moving expenses, recruitment or relocation incentive; student loan repayment, superior qualifications appointment, creditable service for annual leave for prior non-federal work experience or prior uniformed military service, etc.
Additional selections may be made for similar positions across the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) within the local commuting area(s) of the location identified in this announcement. By applying, you agree to have your application shared with interested selecting official(s) at HHS. Clearance of CTAP/ICTAP will be applied for similar positions across HHS.
If you are serving, or have served in the last 5 years (from 06/16/2021) as an Executive Branch political, Schedule C, or Non-career SES appointee, HHS/FDA may be required to obtain approval by the Office of Personnel Management (OPM) prior to beginning employment. You can find out if you have held one of these appointment types by looking at your Standard Form 50s in your Electronic Official Personnel Folder (eOPF), in Section 5 where the legal authorities are listed. If you have served or are currently serving, you must provide a copy of your SF-50, Notification of Personnel Action, documenting this appointment. In addition, you will be required to respond to the question in the assessment and certify your responses to the questionnaire. See Political Appointee FAQ - OPM for more.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
This is a direct hire announcement. Traditional rating and ranking of applications, and veterans' preference does not apply to this vacancy. We will evaluate you against the basic qualifications. Qualified applicants will be referred for consideration in accordance with the Office of Personnel Management direct hire guidelines. Note: Volunteer experience can also be used as qualifying experience.

Once the job opportunity announcement closes (at 11:59 pm Eastern Time on 06/16/2021), a review of your résumé and supporting documentation will be conducted, the information will be compared against your responses to the assessment questionnaire to determine your eligibility for Federal employment, and then whether you are qualified for this particular position. If, after reviewing your resume and/or supporting documentation, a determination is made that you have inflated your responses when compared to your background information, you may be deemed ineligible.

If you are referred to the hiring manager for consideration, you may be further evaluated based on an interview; review of requested work samples, writing samples, most recent performance evaluation(s), or professional references; or results of an oral presentation or work-related test. Failure to comply with any of the additional assessment requirements will result in removal from further consideration. These assessment methods/tools may also be listed under Key Requirements.

Interagency / Career Transition Assistance Program (I/CTAP): Well-Qualified is defined as an applicant who meets the qualification standards and eligibility requirements for the position, including minimum educational and experience requirements; any medical qualifications and suitability; is able to perform the essential duties of the position, with or without reasonable accommodation; meets any applicable selective placement factors for the position (such as the ability to speak a specific language or any other factor required immediately upon hire); and is able to satisfactorily perform the duties of the position upon entry. Learn more on the USAJOBS Career Transition Assistance Site.

Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your eligibility.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Moderate Risk (MR)
Trust determination process
Credentialing
Required Documents

Required Documents
Resume
Transcript
A document that is required must be submitted by all applicants because the document is needed to verify your qualifications, education, or other eligibility information. Failure to provide one of the documents in the list below may result in your application being considered incomplete.

Cover Letter
DD-214/ Statement of Service
Disability Letter (Schedule A)
Disability Letter (VA)
License
Other supporting documentation not listed above
PCS Orders
Performance Appraisal
Professional Certification
Resume
Separation Notice (RIF)
SF-15
SF-50/ Notification of Personnel Action
Transcript
These documents may be required for some applicants. Applicants relying on education to qualify, those seeking consideration under a special hiring authority, or those who need to verify a license or certification, will need to submit appropriate supporting documentation from this list. RESUME REQUIREMENTS:
The federal government has very specific resume requirements. If you have not written a federal resume before, you should watch this Resume Writing Tutorial video on the USAJOBS YouTube channel, or read through a helpful Resume Writing FAQ on the USAJOBS Help Site to learn what details you should, and should not, include in your resume.

At a minimum your resume should list the position title, employer, start and end dates (including month and year), salary (or grade and step), hours worked per week, and a list of duties performed or accomplishments, for EACH position listed. A CV (curriculum vitae) may not contain enough information to meet these resume requirements.

Displaced employees:
If you are a former Federal employee who was displaced due to a Reduction-in-Force (RIF) or surplused by some other means, please submit a copy of the separation letter or RIF notice from your agency. To be selected under I/CTAP, you must still be found well-qualified for this position. See the How You Will Be Evaluated section for the agency's definition of well-qualified. Learn more on the USAJOBS Career Transition Assistance Site.

Learn more about supporting documents and documentation requirements on USAJOBS:
How to Understand the Required Documents Section
What Types of Documents May I Need?
How to Manage Your Documents on USAJOBS

If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
You must be a U.S. Citizen or U.S. National. Foreign nationals or legal permanent residents are not eligible for consideration. This is a direct hire authority announcement. Traditional federal rules regarding rating, ranking, and veterans' preference do not apply. This vacancy will also be used to clear CTAP/ICTAP.",11150,Washington
55,Information Systems Manager,Alutiiq,"Washington, DC 20037 (Foggy Bottom area)",None,"NEA/AC Information Systems Manager Roles and Responsibilities:
Development and maintain (including technical support and management) of the MEPI project management database (known as the MEPI database) and other MEPI web-based tools to include MEPI alumni products. The MEPI database should consistently provide a current snapshot of each ongoing MEPI-managed projects.
Provide technical assistance to MEPI implementing partners to properly input required reports and requests to the database and explain all related interactions.
Maintain and update a database user roster, staff a help desk, administer log-ins and passwords, assign appropriate user roles with associated permissions and train staff.
Identify a process for the review and approval of requested database changes
REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS AND EXPERIENCE:
NEA/AC Information Systems Manager Qualifications and Experience:
Candidate must have demonstrated experience of at least 3 years of database or IT management.
Analytical and problem solving skills
Strong technical skills
The ability to work well under pressure
Attention to detail
Team Working skills
Organization and time management
Interpersonal and communication skills
Management and leadership skills",11150,Washington
56,Resident Services - Part-Time,Berkshire Residential Investments,"Washington, DC",None,"....Tag you're it!!!!!....
Our “IT factor” means we are the best in what we do and are always striving to be even better!
Team “IT FACTOR”
Berkshire is a nationally respected property management team that creates memorable and valuable experiences for all of our stakeholders by attracting fun, engaging talent that is committed to excellence in everything we do! We own and manage our own properties, and we have one asset that sets us apart from the others –Berkshire people.
We offer 3 weeks of vacation, personal development plans, great insurance, a 25% rent discount (and so much more!)... Take a look at what makes us different….
Our vision is to kindle an exceptional experience one relationship, one investment, one neighborhood, at a time.
Here is what your day might look like....
As one of our Resident Services Coordinators your day is all about BEING FLEXIBLE!!! The go to person!! The Residents and the site departments depend on you!! Your day includes supporting the Leasing department (and stepping in when necessary to sell/lease) working with renewals and helping the maintenance team to ensure great service! Paying attention to the details makes you the person the resident’s love to see!
Being that go to person for the residents! You’ve got the answers!!
Be the right-hand person for the leasing team!! Helping to greet prospective clients and possibly showing the property if a helping hand is needed
You might work with the residents and team to promote our lease renewals
Be the voice of the property handling our phone calls.
Processing the service request from resident, to maintenance and the follow up
Be entrepreneurial with suggestions and ideas for improving resident satisfaction and events
We Believe:
Berkshire is committed to providing equal opportunity in all practices, which affect employees and applicants for employment. The company shall ensure that decisions affecting employees are made without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, citizenship, genetic information, or any other protected category under federal, state or local law. Berkshire's Equal Employment Opportunity Policy requires the commitment of every Property Manager and Supervisor. All employees are expected to participate in and actively support these efforts.
This position is part-time.
Education
Preferred
High School or better in Business
Skills
Required
Communication
Customer Service
Preferred
Creativity Innovation
Behaviors
Required
Team Player: Works well as a member of a group
Preferred
Innovative: Consistently introduces new ideas and demonstrates original thinking
Enthusiastic: Shows intense and eager enjoyment and interest
Motivations
Preferred
Ability to Make an Impact: Inspired to perform well by the ability to contribute to the success of a project or the organization
Self-Starter: Inspired to perform without outside help",11150,Washington
57,Retail Associate,WASHINGTON NATIONALS,"Washington, DC 20003 (Capitol Hill area)",None,"Summary:
The Retail Sales Associate delivers an exceptional fan experience at Nationals Park by achieving goals related to sales, customer service, inventory maintenance, merchandising and loss prevention.
The Nationals are a military-friendly organization actively recruiting veterans and spouses.
Responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Sell merchandise to fans and customers utilizing Point of Sale (POS) registers.
Adhere to strict cashier policies and procedures.
Achieve sales productivity and incentive goals.
Provide outstanding Guest Experiences customer service.
Accurately check-in and process new merchandise (count, hang, ticket, organize, etc.).
Merchandise products in a professional and organized manner.
Process markdowns and ticket products as directed.
Accurately sign and identify products being displayed and sold.
Participate in physical inventories and periodic cycle counts.
Accurately account for documents and various media in an organized manner.
Maintain daily detailed communications with team leader.
Execute internal product transfers as directed.
Accurately maintain retail supply and signage inventories.
Organize and preserve retail fixture inventories.
Participate in set-up and tear-down of fixtures and stands for events and games.
Maintain a clean and organized selling location.
Provide assistance and training for other team members when needed.
Assist the Stand Supervisors or General Manager with coordination and execution of special projects as directed.
Assure protection of company assets while adhering to corporate retail loss prevention policies and procedures.
Perform other duties as assigned.
REQUIREMENTS:
Minimum Education and Experience Requirements:
High School Diploma/equivalent or equivalent military experience
At least two years of retail sales experience. Preferred in a sports and entertainment concession environment.
Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities necessary to perform essential functions
Must be able to work 80% of the game days and events at Nationals Park during the season.
Detail oriented with strong organizational skills.
Positive attitude and strong work ethic is a must.
Excellent Communication Skills.
Ability to work independently and responsibly in a fast paced environment.
Computer knowledge and/or experience including but not limited to retail point of sale registers.
Ability to work flexible and/or extended hours based upon business needs.
Uphold Core Values: Excellence, Performance, and Accountability. These core values set the tone in everything we do, help us succeed on and off the field, make a difference in the community and provide the best guest experience in sports. It is important that the person in the position commits themselves to these core values so that we can constantly move forward in the same direction – Together
Physical/Environmental Requirements
Job requires employee to function in a high activity and heavily crowded outdoor professional sports venue. May work at heights. Employee will be exposed to inclement weather of varying degrees. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand for long periods of time, walk long distances, and climb up/down stairs. The employee is required to stoop, kneel, crouch, or sit and must lift and/or move up to 45 pounds
Education
Preferred
High School or better in ACCOUNTANT",11150,Washington
58,Assistant Project Manager,TDB,"Arlington, VA",None,"TDB Communications, Inc. is seeking qualified Project Managers:

Assist with ensuring smooth functioning of contract operations.
Assist with staffing of administrative, technical, IT, writer/editor, and professional positions.
Manage daily operations of the contract.
Possess in-depth knowledge of day-to-day operations, contract requirements, and workflow processes.
Serve as primary POCs for the COR.
Conduct quarterly status meetings with the COR to discuss the status of all services being received under this contract.
Act as the corporate representatives with authority to make commitments on behalf of the company in all administrative and technical matters related to this contract.
Responsible for the supervision and direction of all company personnel assigned to this contract.
Responsible for timely submission of all required reports and report project management staff changes to the COR.
Must be available day-to-day for requests from the COR or alternate COR.

Minimum Qualifications:


Demonstrated skills in personnel management.
responsibilities, leading and directing the work to others, and monitoring project completion.
Must have six (6) years or more of demonstrated experience in the field managing large project(s).
Project Management certification is preferred.
Must have at least a Bachelor’s degree or higher in Business or a Business related field.


TDB Communications, Inc. is an EEO Affirmative Action Race/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Veteran/Disability Employer
Required Skills

Required Experience",11150,Washington
59,IT PMO Generalist,Lime,"Washington, DC",None,"Lime's mission is to realize a future for transportation that is shared, electric and carbon-free. As the world's leading provider of shared electric vehicles, Lime partners with cities to deploy electric bikes, scooters and mopeds to serve any trip under five miles. One of Time Magazine's 100 Most Influential Companies in 2021, Lime has powered more than 200 million rides in more than 150 cities across five continents, spurring a new generation of clean alternatives to car ownership. Learn more at li.me
We're looking for an experienced Program Manager to support our growing Information Technology team.

In this role, you will be a key leader within our organization and have overall responsibility for program management of the IT product portfolio, creating an environment of innovation and product excellence, grow the IT PMO team in line with business objective, including implementation of relevant processes and tools, be responsible for key financials, and work with procurement and other leaders for critical vendor negotiations and agreements in addition to supporting the SOX/Compliance initiatives.
The ideal candidate should have work experience in chaotic fast paced environments and is open to learning and adapting to changing business needs and technology stack. The candidate will be given the opportunity to establish, build and grow relationships with executives.

What You'll Do
 Management of the portfolio of IT projects and lead one or more of the critical IT programs that are integral to the success of the IT
Create and maintain regular portfolio updates (i.e.: weekly, monthly, quarterly)
Building and maintaining relationships with adjacent teams in other functions to ensure success of Enterprise Applications deployments, infrastructure programs, and critical security initiatives.
Be responsible for budgetary activities including the costed bill of materials, the program budgets, PMO budgets (headcount, expense, etc.)
Partner with other Program leaders within IT and outside to ensure strong collaboration across other peer team members and peer PMs
About You
5+ years experience in Program Management
IT industry experience is desired but not necessary
Strong technical aptitude which is necessary to drive program deliveryExcellent communication (written, spoken) at all levels of the enterprise
Lime is an Equal Opportunity Employer, but that’s only the start. We want people with different backgrounds, abilities, identities, and mindsets to join us—not just to do great work, but to build a better, more representative world.",11150,Washington
60,Help Desk Specialist,"Earth Resources Technology, Inc","College Park, MD",None,"Background
The mission of the National Weather Service (NWS), an agency within the Department of Commerce's National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA), is to provide weather, water and climate forecasts and warnings for the United States, its territories, and its adjacent waters and oceans to protect life and property and to enhance the national economy. The Weather and Climate Infrastructure Services (WCCIS) contract supports the NWS's Central Processing and Information Dissemination portfolios. The contract is managed by the National Centers for Environmental Prediction (NCEP) Central Operations (NCO).

WCCIS supports NCO's mission which is to deliver national and global weather, water, climate and space weather guidance, forecasts, warnings and analyses to a broad range of users and partners. These products and services respond to user needs to protect life and property, enhance the nation's economy, and support the nation's growing need for environmental information.

Position Description
Will work with applicable Project Manager to address tickets that have the potential to negativity impact an SLA. Will process requests for ticket transfer, escalation, or re-assignment. Monitor helpdesk for ticket compliance to SLA. Monitor resource availability and workload balance. Compile weekly and ad-hoc metrics and reporting. Actively monitor helpdesk for un-assigned tickets:

Categorize tickets to applicable team
Ensure appropriate contact distribution (cc - list) is applied
Assign to technicians

Required Skills

Excellent communication skills both written and oral.
Experience with spreadsheets and word processing software (such as Microsoft Word, Google Docs).
Experience working in a Help Desk/Ticket-based environment.
Organized and detail-oriented person who can manage a queue of tickets from the beginning to the end.
Ability to follow a process for twice daily intake of new tickets with very few errors - it's an export from the ticket system into a spreadsheet.
Ability to cover the phone and have an excellent phone manner.
Keep the Help Desk manager informed of day's events.
Ability to find someone to cover phones if they are away; a very conscientious person.
Ability to multi-task.
Does not have be overly technical, but if the person has some knowledge of IT terminology, a plus.
Experience with gathering statistics and reporting out a plus.
Assist the Help Desk manager prepare for the weekly ticket briefing to the NCO leadership - they must make sure the spreadsheet info is updated, formatted properly and consistently, etc.

Desired

Specific experience managing Help Desk queues in a Ticket Management System.
Experience reporting on metrics.
Experience documenting procedures and policies.
Experience with Service Now.

Must be a US Citizen or Permanent Resident and be able to pass a background investigation to obtain a security badge to enter the applicable government facility.

Education
High School diploma, related discipline, or equivalent.",11150,Washington
61,Project Manager,"E-Logic, Inc.","Washington, DC","$90,000 - $105,000 a year","Support for the following: planning activities, tasking activities, personnel utilization by labor category, project financials, costs, schedules, and issues/risks management plan.provide a report that identify all activities which IT Security related, and the percentage of time the activities consumed in the previous monthIdentify, track, and manage project risks that may affect the project objectives and document their characteristics.Managing risks and issues and outlines the risk and issue management activities.Ensuring compliance with all program requirements; ensuring the delivery of quality products through effective testing and validation; ensuring compliance with Certification and Accreditation requirementJob Type: Full-timePay: $90,000.00 - $105,000.00 per yearApplication Question(s):What is your desired salary?Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:Project Management: 5 years (Preferred)System Engineering Life Cycle: 5 years (Preferred)Risk Management: 5 years (Preferred)License/Certification:PMP (Preferred)",11150,Washington
62,IT Project Manager,n-Link Corporation,"Washington, DC 20004 (Downtown area)",None,"COMPANY OVERVIEW:
n-Link Corporation was founded in 1995 as a high-end enterprise IT solutions firm attracting high-flying performers to join our company of owners. As a woman-owned small business, the founder created an Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP) in 1999 and 10 years later became 100% ESOP owned. In 2011, the company was selected as a ""Top Small Company Workplaces"" by Inc. Magazine and was awarded the prestigious ""Innovation Award"" by the National Center for Employee Ownership (NCEO). It has also won a place on Inc. Magazine's 500/5000 fastest growing companies in America for 2013, 2014 and 2015.
~Position is contingent upon award notification~
JOB OVERVIEW:
We are currently seeking a highly qualified IT Project Manager to lead a team at the EPA in Washington, DC. This position is pending award notification.
The PM will be accountable and responsible for overseeing the operational planning, establishment, execution, and evaluation of information technology and related systems. The PM serves as the government’s major point of contact and provides overall leadership and guidance for all contractor personnel assigned to location. The PM is responsible for the quality and efficiency of the Task Order to include both technical issues and business processes. The PM assigns taskings to contractor personnel, supervise on-going technical efforts, and manages overall Task Order performance. The ideal candidate would have at least 5 years of experience managing projects involving information technology and related systems.
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Responsible for all aspects of the development and implementation of assigned projects and serves as a single point of contact for those projects.
Takes projects from original concept through final implementation.
Interfaces with all areas affected by the project including end users, computer services, and client services. Defines project scope and objectives.
Develops detailed work plans, schedules, project estimates, resource plans, and status reports.
Conducts project meetings and is responsible for project tracking and analysis.
Ensures adherence to quality standards and reviews project deliverables.
Manages the integration of vendor tasks and tracks and reviews vendor deliverables.
Provides technical and analytical guidance to project team.
Recommends and takes action to direct the analysis and solutions of problems.
QUALIFICATIONS/REQUIREMENTS:
10 years demonstrated experience in Program Management, Information Systems, Business, or related field
5 years PM experience (3 of the last 5 years must have been on contracts of similar scope and complexity)
Experience with Earned Value Management (EVM) activities related to information system implementation projects
PMP or equivalent certification
Ability to obtain NACI (Active Security Clearance preferred)
Strong analytical (technical/non-technical problem-solving) skills.
Strong written and verbal communication skills with the ability to communicate technical and security-related concepts to a broad range of technical and non-technical staff and management.
EDUCATION:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Information Systems, Operations Management, Business or highly related field of study. Masters Degree in IT or Business preferred.
EEO COMPANY STATEMENT:
~n-Link is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate against otherwise qualified applicants on the basis of race, color, creed, ancestry, religion, orientation, age, sex, marital status, national origin, disability, genetic information, handicap or veteran status. ~ In addition, if you would like to requast a copy of our Affirmative Action Plan, you can do so by placing a formal request.
Section 508 Disclaimer: n-Link is committed to ensuring that our Career Portal Site is accessible to the widest possible audience. We are continually improving accessibility by following all recommended guidelines outlined in Section 508 of the Rehabilitation Act Amendments of 1998. If you or someone else, needs assistance in applying to one of our advertised positions, please contact someone from our Human Resources Team for assistance. Please describe the nature of the problem and the section where the difficulty was encountered. We will do our best to provide you with the information you require so that you are able to apply to the position. We can be contacted via email hr@n-link.net or by calling (541) 362-6192. Thank you!~
z9tZHswCNc",11150,Washington
63,Project Manager,cove,"Washington, DC 20036 (Dupont Circle area)","$50,000 - $65,000 a year","About You
You are a jack of all trades able to lead various projects and ensure deadlines are met while juggling multiple timelines and operational tasks. You thrive in a fast-paced environment and can make smart, nimble decisions under pressure. You have a design eye either professionally or personally and understand how someone's physical space can impact their happiness, productivity, and more. You're looking to build upon your prior success in project management while exploring a new opportunity and supporting a growing start-up like cove.

Things about you:
You are highly organized; an 'on top of it' kind of person.

You are looking for an opportunity to flex your project management skills while exploring a new industry or helping to build out processes for a scaling company.

You understand how to communicate with both internal and external stakeholders in order to align on priorities and deadlines.

You have a design eye and are interested in helping design beautiful, functional spaces.
About the role
As a Project Manager at cove, you will own and execute various projects while working alongside our Director of Operations to improve our project management processes and vendor relationships. At cove, we provide property owners and companies with technology and services to enhance the tenant experience. Our services include design, IT/AV planning and implementation, furniture purchasing, budgeting, and overall support for office setup and operations. As a Project Manager you will lead small to medium projects and assist with large projects. You will play a key role in ensuring we meet client deadlines and communicate progress on the various tasks related to their project. Additionally, you will be a key member of a growing team, working cross-functionally with our Partner Success, Experience, and Product teams. Responsibilities

Project Management: execute projects independently using playbook and support larger-scale projects. Ensure we meet client deadlines and complete scope as determined.

Budget Management: Research and understand client needs and market pricing in order to build out budgets and help determine value proposition for various project components.

Consulting: At times, consult on design for spec suites, furniture selection, IT/AV, and floor plans for new spaces. Work alongside clients to provide a solution that meets their needs.

Service Development : Build your expertise and experience in the market through a variety of projects to support the growing needs of the business. Contribute ideas for process improvements, playbook, and strategy. Identify, vet, and catalog new vendors.
Qualifications

At least two years of project management experience: particularly experience in construction, IT/AV setup, or design-related projects.

Budgeting experience. Excel or Google Sheet knowledge. Knowledge of invoices and experience working with vendors.

Ownership Mentality. Able to drive results and work through challenges independently while managing various priorities.

Written and verbal communication skills. Able to communicate well with various audiences including clients, vendor, and internal stakeholders.

Team player. Willing to jump in where needed, interested in growing skills and building up expertise.

Preferred. Experience with Monday.com, Asana or another project management software.

Preferred. Experience and knowledge of IT/AV installation and vendor management.

Open to travel as needed.
Job Details

Location: Opportunity to work remotely or from home from time to time however this role is located in Washington, DC and will require someone full time in this area. Additional travel may be requested.

Compensation: starting salary range of $50-65k commensurate with experience. However, growth opportunities and increase of scope are possible. Please share your salary expectations if they fall outside of this range.

Start date: We are looking for candidates who are available to start immediately.",11150,Washington
64,Data Specialist I,ARK Solutions,"Washington, DC",None,"Project Description:
Provide litigation support services

Position Details:
Role Title: Data Specialist I

Education / Certification Requirement: Undergraduate degree preferred; preferably in the computer science or information management/technology fields.
Technical certification valued.
Position-specific Required Skills: This is an entry level position.
Requires some experience with the applications actually being supported.
Knowledge of file manipulation applications and experience with LAW, IPRO, ICONECT, and Relativity, is extremely helpful.
Knowledge of Governments IT environment, including office automation networks, PC and server based applications very helpful

Position-specific Desired/Required Skills Performs loading, conversion services, and database indexing.
Creates and modifies files for upload into COTS products and performs individual file conversion in support of electronic file processing.
Must be able to ensure the accuracy of data loading, manipulation, and conversion by performing and documenting quality and accuracy checks.
Performs basic tasks related to exporting data from contractor and DOJ databases.

Day-to-Day Responsibilities: This is an entry level position under the supervision of a Senior Data Specialist or data processing manager.
Performs loading, conversion services, and database indexing.
Creates and modifies files for upload into COTS products and performs individual file conversion in support of electronic file processing.
Must be able to ensure the accuracy of data loading, manipulation, and conversion by performing and documenting quality and accuracy checks.
Performs basic tasks related to exporting data from contractor and DOJ databases.

Required Skills:
Data Specialist, years of Experience",11150,Washington
65,Senior Technical Project Manager,Kaizen Dynamics,"Washington, DC 20003 (Navy Yard area)",$90 - $100 an hour,"The Senior Technical Project Manager (STPM) will oversee the management of all assigned projects. The successful candidate will be responsible for providing technical project planning and project management that adheres to best practices and will ensureResponsibilities:? Evaluates complex situations using multiple sources of information.? Acts as Scrum Master and utilizes Scrum Agile framework to manage the project.? Manages and appropriately escalates delivery impediments, risks, issues, and changes associated tosolution development initiatives.? Leads cross-functional teams and interacts with all staff levels.? Analyzes, plans, and develops requirements documents (both functional and technical), building functionalmodels, developing procedures, developing functional and technical architectures.? Assigns and monitors work of project team members as necessary.? Designs and implements processes to monitor and control resources, budget, risks and value to projectgoals and objectives.? Establishes, plans, and executes major milestone reviews and decision gates to ensure projectcompletion.? Exercises excellent verbal and written communication skills and interacts professionally with a diversegroup; software developers, UI/UX Designers, Solutions Architects, agency business and technicalowners, SME’s and senior executive management.? Effectively manages scope throughout the project duration.? Maintains accurate project schedules, financial burn rates, change management, project plans, and statusreports.? Will convey a high level of understanding in the areas of software application programming, database andsystem design.? Will resolve conflicts by demonstrating leadership and appropriate decision-making competencies.? Understands, tracks and articulates issues / risks / action items; works with responsible owners toaddress the items on a timely basis; and update the appropriate stakeholders as neededJob Types: Full-time, ContractPay: $90.00 - $100.00 per hourSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:TECHNICAL Project Manager: 10 years (Required)Salesforce implementation projects: 6 years (Required)Rally: 3 years (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",11150,Washington
66,Human Resources Specialist,US Drug Enforcement Administration,"Arlington, VA","$87,198 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
These positions are located in the Drug Enforcement Administrator (DEA), Human Resources Division.

This position(s) primary purpose is to support the Office of the Deputy of Human Resources in maintaining and ensuring agency-wide Recruitment and Placement accuracy, and consistency in interpreting and applying Recruitment and Placement standards.
Responsibilities
As a Human Resources Specialist your typical work assignments may include:

Consults with and advises senior Human Resources and organization managers on recruitment, examination, and selection processes, regulations, and requirements;
Coordinates and advises on the implementation and utilization of automated and recruiting systems, tools and processes;
Provides authoritative guidance on complex problems or issues that are new, highly controversial, and/or precedent setting in nature;
Administering agency recruitment and placement plan that includes developing and issuing vacancy announcements, determining qualifications, identifying critical skill requirements, chairing/coordinating evaluation panels, and processing personnel actions;
Participates in management meetings to discuss organizational changes, turnover, changes in skill requirements, position allocations/authorizations, and other issues impacting recruitment programs.

Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13
Job family (Series)
0201 Human Resources Management
Similar jobs
Human Resources Specialists
Specialists, Human Resources
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a U.S. Citizen
You must submit to a pre-employment drug test.
Employment is subject to the successful completion of a background investigation, verification of qualifications, completion of onboarding forms, submission of required documents, and any other job-related requirement before or after appointment.
Applicants must meet all qualification requirements by the closing date of this announcement.
You may be required to serve a probationary period.
Selected applicants will be required to complete an online onboarding process.
DEA uses e-Verify, an Internet-based system, to confirm the eligibility of all newly hired employees to work in the United States.
Selective Service: Males born after 12/31/59 must be registered or exempt from Selective Service (see http://www.sss.gov/).
Current Federal employees cannot transfer unused Time Off Awards to DEA.
Qualifications
Applicants must meet the Specialized Experience requirements as noted below. Qualification claims will be subject to verification.


You must demonstrate in your resume at least one (1) year of qualifying specialized experience equivalent GS, 11 for the GS 12 grade level and GS 12 for the GS 13 grade level. Specialized experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience. One year of specialized experience for this position includes:

GS 12: 1) Applying analytical methods to identify, evaluate, and recommend to management appropriate action (s) to resolve complex interrelated problems and issues; 2) Researching and interpreting Human Resources regulations for example CFR (Code of Federal Regulations), DE (Delegated Examining) Handbook, and agencies MP (Merit Promotion) policies and procedures to apply special hiring authorities to perform internal and external recruiting strategies; applying a full range of recruitment and staffing principles, concepts, practices, and techniques; 3) Providing assistance and guidance to managers, employees, and job applicants.

GS 13: 1) Independently applying Human Resources Management (HRM) principles, concepts, regulations, and practices, using analytical methods and techniques to provide technical advisory guidance on complex human resources needs and concerns for an organization; 2) Analyzing and providing solutions to complex human resources problems; 3) Providing authoritative advice and guidance to managers and employees on merit promotion principles, delegated examining, and applying veterans preference, and special hiring authorities; interpreting and applying Federal Human Resources laws, rules, and regulations to analyze and evaluate agency hiring policies and programs, and developing and overseeing human resources projects.

Competencies: Your qualifications will be evaluated on the basis of your level of competencies in the following areas:

Customer Service
Personnel and Human Resources
Problem Solving
Technical Competence
Writing

Time-In-Grade Requirement: Applicants who are current Federal employees and have held a GS grade any time in the past 52 weeks must also meet time-in-grade requirements by the closing date of this announcement. For a GS-12 position you must have served 52 weeks at the GS-11. For a GS-13 position you must have served 52 weeks at the GS-12. The grade may have been in any occupation, but must have been held in the Federal service. An SF-50 that shows your time-in-grade eligibility must be submitted with your application materials. If the most recent SF-50 has an effective date within the past year, it may not clearly demonstrate you possess one-year time-in-grade, as required by the announcement. In this instance, you must provide an additional SF-50 that clearly demonstrates one-year time-in-grade.

Note: Time-In-Grade requirements also apply to former Federal employees applying for reinstatement as well as current employees applying for Veterans Employment Opportunities Act of 1998 (VEOA) appointment.

It is the responsibility of the applicant to ensure that the appropriate documentation is submitted prior to the closing date of this job opportunity announcement. Your resume serves as the basis for qualification determinations and must highlight your most relevant and significant experience as it relates to this job opportunity announcement. Be clear and specific when describing your work history, human resources cannot make assumptions regarding your experience. Your application will be rated based on your resume.

All qualification requirements must be met by the closing date of this announcement.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
Background Investigation: To ensure the accomplishment of its mission, DEA requires each and every employee to be reliable and trustworthy. To meet those standards, all selected applicants must undergo and successfully complete a background investigation (Critical-Sensitive/Top Secret, Special-Sensitive/Top Secret, or Non-critical Sensitive/Secret). This review includes financial issues such as delinquency in the payment of debts, child support and/or tax obligations, as well as certain criminal offenses and illegal use or possession of drugs. Must be able to perform the essential duties of the position, with or without reasonable accommodation. DEA committed to maintaining a drug-free workplace and, therefore, conducts random and other drug testing of its employees in order to ensure a safe and healthy work environment.

EEO POLICY STATEMENT

Reasonable Accommodations Request: Federal agencies must provide reasonable accommodation to applicants with disabilities where appropriate. Applicants requiring reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process should follow the instructions in the job opportunity announcement. For any part of the remaining hiring process, applicants should contact the hiring agency directly. Determinations on requests for reasonable accommodation will be made on a case-by-case basis.


Veterans' Preference: Certain veterans are eligible to apply as a status candidate under the Veterans Employment Opportunity Act (VEOA). View Feds Hire vets for more information For more information on veterans' preference see http://www.fedshirevets.gov/.

Current or Former Political Appointees: The Office of Personnel Management (OPM) must authorize employment offers made to current or former political appointees. If you are currently, or have been within the last 5 years, a political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee in the Executive Branch, you must disclose this information to the Human Resources Office.

Interagency/Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP/CTAP): This program applies to Federal service employees whose positions have been deemed surplus or no longer needed, or employees who have been involuntarily separated from a Federal service position within the competitive service. To receive selection priority for this position, you must: (1) meet CTAP or ICTAP eligibility criteria; (2) be rated well-qualified for the position with a score of 85 or above; and, (3) submit the appropriate documentation to support your CTAP or ICTAP eligibility. Well-Qualified includes those applicants whose knowledge, skills, and abilities clearly exceed the minimum qualification requirements for the position. For more information visit: http://www.opm.gov/rif/employee_guides/career_transition.asp

Additional selections may be made beyond the total number of vacancies specified using this vacancy announcement. Further selections may also be made for additional organizational divisions and/or units within the duty location(s) listed above.

Recruitment and/or Relocation Incentives will only be considered and approved under conditions specified provided the agency has determined that the position is likely to be difficult to fill in the absence of an incentive and funding for such an incentive is available.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.

Applicants will only be considered for the Eligibilities for which they claim in the job questionnaire AND must provide the supporting documentation. Applicants will not be considered for Eligibilities for which they did not claim, regardless of the documentation submitted with the application.
You will be evaluated for this position based on your experience and/or education reflected in your resume. Your resume must support your responses to the job specific assessment questionnaire. To remain in consideration for this position, please ensure your resume covers this requirement and that your resume has been successfully submitted as part of your on-line application package.
NOTE: Your resume and supporting documentation will be verified. If you rated yourself higher than what is supported by your application material, you may be excluded from consideration for this job opportunity announcement. Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating or consideration for employment.

We will review your resume and supporting documentation to ensure you meet the minimum qualification requirements. If you meet the minimum qualifications, your experience, education, and training will be rated using an assessment questionnaire.

If you are best qualified, you may be referred to the hiring manager for consideration and may be called for an interview.
ASSESSMENT QUESTIONNAIRE: You must submit a completed assessment questionnaire. Unless otherwise stated, we will only use the information above to determine your qualifications. Not providing the required information may result in a determination that you do not meet minimum requirements for the position (e.g., an ineligible rating) or a lower rating.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Top Secret
Drug test required
Yes
Required Documents

Required Documents
RESUME: Your resume must thoroughly describe how your skills and experiences align to the criteria defined in the ""Qualifications"" section of this announcement and it must support your responses to the assessment questionnaire. We cannot assume you have performed the necessary experience required for this position regardless of your employment history or academic career.

To ensure all of the essential information is in your resume, we encourage you to use the USAJOBS online Resume Builder. If you choose to use your own resume, you must ensure it contains all of the required information and you organize it so we can associate the following information for each experience/position: Job title; Name of employer; Beginning and ending dates of employment (month/day/year format); Hours worked per week. We will assume full-time unless otherwise stated. We will prorate part-time employment in crediting experience; Detailed description of job duties, accomplishments, related skills, and responsibilities to include any supervisory/managerial responsibilities and number of staff supervised (if applicable)and; Series and grade or equivalent (if a federal position). If the position has an education requirement or you are qualifying based on education, submit a legible copy of your unofficial college transcript from an accredited college/university. The transcript copy must reflect the college/university name and/or logo. Applicants are highly encouraged to proactively order a copy of their official transcripts to be delivered to their home address so transcripts will be readily available if selected. If selected, you will be required to provide official transcripts prior to establishing your start date.

OPM must authorize employment offers for former or current Political Appointees. If you are currently, or have been within the last 5 years, a political Schedule A, Schedule C or Non-Career SES employee in the Executive Branch, you must disclose this information. Submit proof of your former or current status, such as your SF-50. Please see here.

All current Federal employees and reinstatement eligible applicants must submit an SF-50, Notification of Personnel Action, documenting proof of competitive status, tenure, position, and grade level. Most recent SF-50 if you are a current or former Federal employee. An SF-50 showing your time-in-grade eligibility must be submitted with your application materials. If the most recent SF-50 has an effective date within the past year, it may not clearly demonstrate you possess one-year time-in-grade, as required by the announcement. In this instance, you must provide an additional SF-50 that clearly demonstrates one-year time-in-grade. Award 50's do not provide sufficient information and will not be accepted for the purpose of verifying time-in-grade. Examples of appropriate SF-50's include: Within grade increases at the highest grade held; or Promotions with an effective date more than one year old; or SF-50's at the highest grade held with an effective date more than one year old.

Do not include a photograph or video of yourself, or any sensitive information (age, date of birth, marital status, protected health information, religious affiliation, social security number, etc.) on your resume or cover letter. We will not access web pages linked on your resume or cover letter to determine your qualifications.


REQUIRED DOCUMENTATION FOR CAREER TRANSITION CLAIMS If you are claiming special priority selection rights under the Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP), submit a copy of your agency notice, most recent performance rating and most recent SF-50, Notification of Personnel Action, noting your current position, grade level and duty location. If you have never worked for the federal government, you are not ICTAP eligible. To be considered eligible, you must be placed in the well-qualified category for this position. Please see ICTAP eligibility.

If you do not provide the required information, we will assume you are not eligible or you do not wish to be considered for any preference or eligibility.

Please do not submit any other supplementary documentation that is not requested of you. To protect your personal information, we will only send your resume and cover letter to the selecting official or hiring manager.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Family of overseas employees
Family members of a federal employee or uniformed service member who is, or was, working overseas.
Individuals with disabilities
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Clarification from the agency
Merit Promotion, VEOA Eligibles",11150,Washington
67,Special Assistant,US Government National Mortgage Association (Ginni...,"Washington, DC","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is located in the Department of Housing and Urban Development, Government National Mortgage Association Ginnie Mae.
Responsibilities
As a Special Assistant, you will:
Serve as a Special Assistant in the Office of Enterprise Data and Technology Solutions (OEDTS) and report directly to Ginnie Mae's Chief Information Officer (CIO) who is also the Senior Vice President (SVP) of Enterprise Data and Technology Solutions. Perform a wide variety of administrative assignments and program studies, projects, and analyses that often cross functional, and organizational, and program office boundaries. Be knowledgeable on mortgage loan and mortgage-backed securities (MBS) programs, operations, and related information management infrastructures to deal with the full range of issues and concerns within Ginnie Mae's CIO Program area. Serve as the advisor to the SVP/CIO to help articulate and execute Ginnie Mae's mission, strategies, and activities to achieve its goals.Present the views of the SVP/CIO in correspondence and other communications within Ginnie Mae, with HUD managers and program officials, and other government agencies, and with a wide array of external stakeholders. Serve as a liaison for matters of importance and assumes responsibility for responding to requests as directed by the SVP/CIO. Work in collaboration with all functions within Ginnie Mae to ensure alignment across strategy, information solutions, project risk management, operations production, and its various cloud and other platforms supporting Ginnie Mae's $2.1 trillion mortgage-backed securities program.Define, lead, and execute special projects assignments concerning high-level program operations, data and infrastructure and policy issues brought to the immediate attention of the SVP CIO. Resolve issues and dispose of matters, which he or she is expected to coordinate, arbitrate or decide on behalf of the SVP CIO. Such matters include high-level programmatic issues (including MBS programs, operations or infrastructure issues or initiatives), policy issues or external relationships, which for reasons of sensitivity or urgency must be resolved quickly.
Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
0301 Miscellaneous Administration And Program
Similar jobs
Assistants, Office
Office Assistants
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
The official duty station for this position will be in Washington, District of Columbia. Failure to report to duty at this location may be grounds for a disciplinary action, including removal.
Key Requirements:
Please refer to ""Conditions of Employment.""
U.S. Citizens and U.S. Nationals

Qualifications
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement.

Specialized Experience:
To be qualified for this position at the GS-14 level, you must have at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-13 level. Specialized experience for this position is defined as:
Providing mortgage backed securities (MBS) program and procedural regulation guidance related to Ginnie Mae mission, vision and strategic plan; ANDProviding policy and procedural recommendations concerning internal administrative operations, organizational and management initiatives related to office-wide priorities, mission and vision; andProviding advice and direction to senior managers on operational programs for a variety of management activities across an organization; ANDPerforming a wide variety of projects in order to meet organizational goals

Experience may have been gained in either the public, private sector or volunteer service. One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis. To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/day/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week on your resume.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
OTHER INFORMATION:

We may select from this announcement or any other source to fill one or more vacancies.
Relocation expenses will not be paid.
Recruitment incentive may be offered.
This is a non-bargaining unit position.
This position is Exempt from the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA).
HUD offers alternative and flexible work schedules.

CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT:


A. This is a term position. A term position does not confer eligibility for transfer to another agency. A term employee does not acquire competitive status or eligibility to be converted to a career conditional appointment, nor is the time served under a term appointment creditable toward career tenure. A term appointment carries no implied or specific commitment of consideration for, or placement into, a permeant appointment.

B. The employment of a term employee ends automatically at the expiration of his or her term. Term employees, who were previously in a career or career-conditional status, will not automatically be able to return to their career or career-conditional position once the term is over; they may, however, reapply for the career or career-conditional position if it is available.
A one year probationary period may be required.
Must successfully complete a background investigation.
Complete a Declaration for Federal Employment to determine your suitability for Federal employment, at the time requested by the agency.
Have your salary sent to a financial institution of your choice by Direct Deposit/Electronic Funds Transfer.
If you are a male applicant born after December 31, 1959, certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System or are exempt from having to do so.
Go through a Personal Identity Verification (PIV) process that requires two forms of identification from the Form i-9. Federal law requires verification of the identity and employment eligibility of all new hires in the U.S.

HUD employees are subject to a number of government-wide and HUD specific ethics laws and regulations, including restrictions on working in a real estate related business, and having Section 8 tenants, along with other prohibited interests and activities. To review applicable ethics rules and HUD specific restrictions, please visit https://portal.hud.gov/hudportal/HUD?src=/program_offices/general_counsel/ethics.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Your application includes your résumé, responses to the online questions, and required supporting documents. Please be sure that your resume includes detailed information to support your qualifications for this position; failure to provide sufficient evidence in your resume may result in a ""not qualified"" determination.

Rating: Your application will be evaluated in the following areas: Communication, Interpersonal Skills, and Technical Competence.

Category rating will be used to rank and select eligible candidates. If qualified, you will be assigned to one of three quality level categories: Best Qualified, Better Qualified, and Qualified (Good) depending on your responses to the online questions, regarding your experience, education, and training related to this position. Your rating may be lowered if your responses to the online questions are not supported by the education and/or experience described in your application.

Veterans' preference is applied after applicants are assessed. Preference-eligibles will be listed at the top of their assigned category and considered before non-preference-eligibles in that category.

Qualified preference-eligibles with a compensable service-connected disability of 10% or more will be listed at the top of the highest category.

Referral: If you are among the top qualified candidates, your application may be referred to a selecting official for consideration. You may be required to participate in a selection interview.

If you are a displaced or surplus Federal employee (eligible for the Career Transition Assistance Plan (CTAP)/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Plan (ICTAP)) you must be assigned the middle category or better to be rated as ""well qualified"" to receive special selection priority.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
A complete application includes 1. A résumé, 2. Vacancy question responses, and 3. Submission of any required documents.

Please note that if you do not provide all required information, as specified in this announcement, you may not be considered for this position (or may not receive the special consideration for which you may be eligible)

All applicants are required to submit a résumé either by creating one in USAJOBS or uploading one of their own choosing. (Cover letters are optional.) To receive full credit for relevant experience, please list the month/date/year and number of hours worked for experience listed on your résumé. We suggest that you preview the online questions, as you may need to customize your résumé to ensure that it supports your responses to these questions. Please view résumé tips.

VETERANS' PREFERENCE DOCUMENTATION: If you are claiming veterans preference, please see applicant guide for required documentation In order to be considered for veterans preference, you must submit all required documentation as outlined in the applicant guide.

CAREER TRANSITION ASSISTANCE PLAN (CTAP) OR INTERAGENCY CAREER TRANSITION ASSISTANCE PLAN (ICTAP) DOCUMENTATION: If you are a displaced or surplus Federal employee, click CTAP/ICTAP for eligibility and a detailed list of required documents you must submit in order to be eligible.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
U.S. citizens or U.S. Nationals; no prior Federal experience is required.",11150,Washington
68,Management and Program Analyst,US Federal Aviation Administration,"Washington, DC","$73,336 - $113,677 a year","Duties
Summary
Due to the Pandemic and individual states with different phases of reopening, the selectee’s report date to the official duty station/facility may be delayed until such time as employees are allowed to report to the workplace. The person selected may telework up to the maximum extent possible, up to and including full time, until it is determined by state and Federal officials that employees are allowed to report to the workplace where this position is located, on a regular basis.

Responsibilities
The PMO provides program and acquisition management for the systems and capabilities that modernize and sustain the National Airspace System (NAS) to advance NAS programs from concept to operation while providing technical support for air traffic control automation and decision support systems. Selectees will be assigned to one of the following organizations within the PMO: Integrated Services and Analysis, AJM-1; Air Traffic Systems, AJM-2; Enterprise Services, AJM-3; and Surveillance Services Directorate, AJM-4.
The incumbent applies quantitative and qualitative analysis to define the utility basic tenets and guidelines for preparing the Master Integrated Program Schedule. He/she uses skill applying fact-finding and investigative techniques to define program requirements and to assist in the development of program briefs for working papers. He/She will assist senior analysts in the development and execution of the Integrated logistics Support Plan (ILSP). Identifies and assists in the implementation of alternative logistics support practices. Performs multiple and varying assignments under the limited direction of a manager, project/program manager, team leader, and/or more experienced professional.
The incumbent supports senior specialists by assembling and reviewing acquisition packages, requests for proposals, bids, or quotations by checking documents for errors and ensuring that standard or special provisions comply with applicable policies and regulations. The incumbent participating on acquisition strategy or source selection panels to determine if a written source selection plan is necessary and to document strategy. He/She will provides market research data to senior management. The incumbent identifies market place requirements to identify supply or service sources. He/She maintaining automated tracking systems, assists with financial analysis and reporting to include analyzing budgets assigned to large-scale technical aviation programs and services to record, reconcile, validate and track data; identify discrepancies and conduct various analytical studies.
Incumbent applies experience using advanced automated tools and financial systems, such as macros, pivot tables, advanced filtering, etc. to create graphics and charts for inclusion in presentations to senior officials. The incumbent participates as an active team member in planning, monitoring, and conducting special projects, studies, and initiatives. The incumbent analyze problems, identifies significant factors, gathers and interprets pertinent data, and applies established rules and procedures in order to recommend effective solutions. Contacts are typically internal and external to the PMO to share information and to explain the applications of policies and procedures. The incumbent may have frequent contact throughout the PMO and other customers on routine matters such as data gathering, explaining processes and project status. The incumbent mentors more junior analysts.
The incumbent uses considerable discretion when selecting approaches, established policies and procedures are available for most assignments. The incumbent resolves most problems and work issues without the assistance of a more experienced professional or manager and refers problems and work issues that require additional attention. The Team Manager periodically reviews work at major milestones and al completion, for policy compliance and alignment with the requirements of projects and/or other work activities.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Travel Required
25% or less - The job may require up to 25% travel.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
NA
Job family (Series)
0343 Management And Program Analysis
Similar jobs
Enterprise Data Manager
Information Systems Managers
Logistics Managers
Managers, Information Systems
Managers, Logistics
Managers, Operations
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
US Citizenship is required.
Selective Service Registration is required for males born after 12/31/1959.
Must submit an SF50 (See Required Documents)
Qualifications
TO QUALIFY AT THE FV-H (GS/FG 12) level Candidates must have one year (52 weeks) of SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE equivalent to at least the next lower grade level (FV-G or FG/GS-11) that is typically related to the line of work of the position to be filled and which has equipped the applicant with the particular knowledge, skills, and abilities to successfully perform the duties of the position. To be creditable, specialized experience must have been at least equivalent to the next lower level in the normal line of progression for the occupation in the organization.
SPECIALIZE EXPERIENCE is defined as:
Experience assembling and reviewing acquisition packages, requests for proposals, bids, or quotations; OR
Experience using advanced automated tools and financial systems, such as macros, pivot tables, advanced filtering, etc. to create graphics and charts for inclusion in presentations to senior officials.
You should include relevant examples of the specialized experience in your work history. Errors or omissions may impact your rating or may result in you not being considered.
Eligible applicants meeting the minimum qualification requirements and/or selective placement factor(s) (SPF) may be further evaluated on the Leadership & Management Dimensions and/or Technical Requirements listed in the announcement. Based on this evaluation, applicants will be placed in one of the following categories: (1) score order; (2) category grouping; or (3) alphabetical; or (4) priority grouping referred to the selecting official for selection consideration.
Answer all questions to the best of your ability. DO NOT ASSUME THAT BECAUSE YOU HOLD, OR HAVE HELD THIS POSITION, YOU WILL AUTOMATICALLY BE FOUND ELIGIBLE. You may be asked to provide evidence or documentation that you have this type of experience later in the selection process. Your responses are subject to verification through job interviews, or any other information obtained during the application process. Any exaggeration of your experience or any attempt to conceal information can result in disqualification.
Applicants who fail to demonstrate possession of any of the above criteria AND who do not provide the required documentation will receive no further consideration for this position.
Applicants may be asked to verify information on your application for employment with the FAA.
All qualification requirements must be met by the closing date of this vacancy announcement.
Education
Education cannot be substituted for experience.
Preview Job Questionnaire
Make sure your resume includes detailed information to support your qualifications and answers to the job questionnaire.
Additional information
We may use this vacancy to fill other similar vacant positions.
Position may be subject to a background investigation.
A one-year probationary period may be required.

The person selected for this position may be required to file a financial disclosure statement within 30 days of entry on duty. FAA policy limits certain outside employment and financial investments in aviation-related companies. www.faa.gov/jobs/working_here/financial_disclosure_requirements

The U.S. Department of Transportation strives to ensure that equity, transparency, accountability, collaboration, and communication permeate all that we do for the betterment of the Department, the traveling public, and our nation. As such, DOT values a highly diverse workforce of persons who promote a culture of belonging by respecting the personal dignity and worth of each individual and fostering a positive environment where all feel safe and welcome. If these commitments coincide with your personal ideals and professional aspirations, please consider joining the DOT family.
NOTES:
As a part of the Federal-Wide Hiring Reform Initiative (streamlining the hiring process), the FAA is committed to eliminating the use of Knowledge, Skills and Ability (KSA) narratives from the initial application in the hiring process for all announcements. Therefore, as an applicant, you are NOT required to provide a narrative response in the text box listed below each KSA.
In lieu of providing a KSA narrative response in the text box listed below each KSA section, in your work history, please include information that provides specific examples of how you meet the response level or answer you chose for each KSA. Your work history examples should be specific and clearly reflect the highest level of ability. Your KSA answers will be evaluated further to validate whether the level that you selected is appropriate based on the work history and experience you provided. Your answers may be adjusted by a human resource specialist as appropriate.
This Level (Low Risk) position requires favorable adjudication of a National Agency Check and Inquiries (NACI) background investigation prior to appointment.
This position is covered by the FAA Core Compensation plan. Additional information about core compensation is available on the following website: http://jobs.faa.gov/FAACoreCompensation.htm.
Some, all, or none of the referred candidates may be interviewed.
This announcement is also being advertised under VA# AWA-AJM-21-0029RJ-72689. Please review both vacancy announcements before making application to determine your eligibility to apply.
This is a bargaining unit position.

Links to Important Information: Locality Pay , COLA

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.


IMPORTANT: Applicants may be rated on the extent and quality of experience, education, and training relevant to the duties of the position(s). All answers provided in the on-line process must be substantiated. Ensure that your application package/resume supports your responses.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
ALL applicants MUST submit the following:

(1) resume with complete work history; and

(2) a copy of your most recent SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action).

For guidance on how to create a Federal resume, visit http://www.archives.gov/careers/jobs/forms/resume-guide.pdf.

Failure to submit all required documents by the closing date will result in a finding of ineligible. We are not responsible for incomplete, illegible or missing documents.

Please DO NOT email your application documents. We cannot accept documents received via the email system. Documents sent via email will NOT receive consideration.

Applicants claiming eligibility for the Expanded Veterans Hiring Opportunity (EVHO), MUST submit a DD Form 214 reflecting character of service to verify eligibility by the closing date of the announcement as requested by the Human Resource Office. Eligibility for EVHO will be considered based on applicable documentation submitted by the closing date.

If you are a current or former Federal employee (including a current FAA employee), you MUST provide a copy of your SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action) containing information in Blocks 15, 17, 18, 19, 22, and 24 so it can be used to verify your position title, series, grade, tenure, and organization of record by the closing date of the announcement. You may fax your SF-50 or upload it into the on-line application. If faxing the SF-50, please ensure you include the vacancy announcement number on the faxed copy.

If you are a current Federal employee and need a current copy of your SF-50, please contact your personnel office. If you are an FAA employee, you can access and print your SF-50 from the eOPF system https://eopf.opm.gov/dot/. If you are a former Federal employee, you can obtain a copy of your SF-50 by writing the National Personnel Records Center Annex, 1411 Boulder Boulevard, Valmeyer, IL 62295. Additional information is available from this link: http://www.archives.gov/st-louis/civilian-personnel/.

Expanded Veterans Hiring Opportunity (EVHO) are those veterans who are honorably discharged from the Armed Forces after completing at least three (3) years of continuous active service. Applicants claiming eligibility for EVHO, MUST submit a DD Form 214 reflecting character of service to verify eligibility by the closing date of the announcement as requested by the Human Resource Office. Eligibility for EVHO will be considered based on applicable documentation submitted by the closing date.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Federal employees - Excepted service
Current excepted service federal employees.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Also open to former permanent excepted service federal employees eligible under an interchange agreement. Current or former permanent federal employees must have met a one year probationary period or trial period in the competitive or excepted service. Applications will also be accepted from preference eligibles and veterans who are honorably discharged from the Armed Forces after completing at least 3 years of continuous active duty service.",11150,Washington
69,Deputy Project Manager IS/IT,"Orbis, Inc.","Washington, DC 20003 (Navy Yard area)",None,"Deputy Project Manager IS/IT
Washington, DC
This position supports the Naval Sea Systems Command (NAVSEA) Office of the Commander Staff including Chief of Staff, Strategic Planning, Command Administrative Services (SEA 00 Staff) and Corporate Operations & Total Force (SEA 10).
NAVSEA is the Department of Navy’s (DON’s) central activity for designing, engineering, integrating, building, and procuring U.S. Naval ships, shipboard weapons, and combat systems. NAVSEA's responsibilities also include the maintenance, repair, modernization, and conversion of in-service ships and their weapons and combat systems.
This position provides overall technical, program planning and management, and administrative support for Information System and Information Technology (IS/IT) in the following areas:
NAVSEA Electronic Records Management System
Corporate Operations and Total Force Technology, Information Systems (IS), and Data Management (DM)
Plan, facilitate and manage customer’s understanding of IT software’s capabilities, training and capability deployment, sustainment, and governance in alignment with Enterprise-wide policy/Federal requirements, including HR and IT security requirements.
Support NAVSEA Command inspections
Assist with other program area functions, as assigned.

Required:
Minimum of 5 years of experience managing large-scale (more than $1M/year) or complex (multiple stakeholders) IT projects/business systems such as enterprise resource planning systems, data warehouses, SharePoint portals.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Bachelor’s degree or professional certifications in IT/IS or data analysis areas.
US Citizen with Secret Security Clearance

Desired:
Has 10 years of experience managing large-scale (more than $1M/year) or complex (multiple stakeholders) IT projects/business systems such as enterprise resource planning systems, data warehouses, SharePoint portals.
Holds an advanced degree in IT/IS or data analysis areas.

ORBIS offers an excellent benefits package and competitive salary in a professional atmosphere.",11150,Washington
70,"Fellow, Lift Solar Everywhere Project",Groundswell Inc.,"Washington, DC 20003 (Navy Yard area)",$20 an hour,"FELLOW, LIFT SOLAR EVERYWHERE PROJECTABOUT THE POSITIONThis is an exciting, 4 month funded fellowship opportunity for a qualified individual with interest and expertise in serving low- and moderate-income households with solar energy, and in expanding residential solar and community solar programs and policies nationwide.You will work with Groundswell as a part of the LIFT Project, a three-year, national research collaborative funded by the US Department of Energy (DE-EE0008567).About LIFTLIFT is a collaboration of four non-profits led by Groundswell that includes Southface, Clean Energy Works, and Elevate Energy. It is funded by the U.S. Department of Energy's Solar Energy Technology Office: Accelerating Low-Income Financing and Transactions for Solar Access Everywhere, or “LIFT Solar.” The project is entering into a critical phase of the research and analysis this summer while pivoting to the construction of our online “Toolkit.” The Fellow must possess a range of skills in both data science and human process to support our activities.How LIFT WorksThe LIFT team gathers both project-level finance data and customer experience data (surveys) from solar and community solar projects that include low-income households. After collecting both types of data, we anonymize and integrate the data streams for analysis.LIFT is using this analysis to build a free ""Toolkit"" -- on online resource that would allow utilities, municipalities, solar developers, and others to enter a few inputs and generate recommendations for optimal solar program designs (both financing recommendations and program elements) for their regulatory environment. The Toolkit will include case studies featuring successful low-income solar programs.The Fellow reports to Groundswell’s Senior Program Director (Labs), who is the LIFT program manager. The Fellow will work alongside other Groundswell colleagues and LIFT partner organizations in a collaborative, team-driven environment, frequently communicating and engaging directly with project team members at other organizations. Groundswell encourages potential candidates to review our “Labs” mission before applying.KEY RESPONSIBILITIESScheduling and organizing frequent meetings between collaborative partners, potential data sources from utility and developer organizations, and other solar and finance organizations.Organizing project schedules to secure data; Tracking communications with data sources.Capturing notes and themes from weekly, monthly, and quarterly meetings with internal team organizations and with the LIFT Research Advisory Council, a group of senior executives that guide LIFT’s work. Preparing notes and observations from these interactions for later follow-up in a systematic manner is required.Communications: Under the supervision of the Program Manager, prepare draft blog entries, conference presentations, or other written communications that publicize LIFT’s research discoveries.The Fellow will assist the LIFT Program Manager to recruit and prepare potential subject matter experts for webinar and conference presentations as guest speakers and panelists, in service to the research objectives of LIFT.Depending on the capacities and interests of the candidate, they will be asked to perform independent research for publication concerning LIFT’s objectives: energy justice, economic access to renewable resources, energy regulatory treatment of clean energy delivery, and other matters, under the direction of the Groundswell Research Director (Dr. Elvis Moleka). Research may be technical or policy oriented, depending on the capacities of the Fellow.Preferred Capacities and Qualities of the FellowExhibit strong planning abilities and capacities in organizing materials and information. The ability to quickly identify patterns and generate order from large bodies of information is desirable. A command of excel is highly desirable.Capacity to digest and interpret/explain data patterns to lay audiences in plain language, without judgement, is highly valued.Strong communication skills (both written and interpersonal) are essential. Candidates must demonstrate tact and emotional intelligence in interacting appropriately with colleagues at every level, and from private industry, state, local and Federal governments, utilities, and non-profit organizations.Be a self-starter, motivated, able to work independently (under supervision) but also within a team structure. The ideal candidate must also have the self-awareness to know when they must check in with supervisors for guidance and approval before taking action.Be willing to take direction from Groundswell supervisors in a spirit of servant leadership and humility.Demonstrate the ability to multitask and prioritize objectives in a dynamic work environment. Time management skills are essential.Demonstrate a track record of attention to detail and project closure. The work will require flexibility, diligence and creativity in problem solving.Candidates who share Groundswell’s values of cheer and “service as a privilege” are preferred.Groundswell is a values-driven social enterprise committed to a culture of belonging, and we invite you to review our strategic plan and valuesas you apply.OTHER DUTIESThis position description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITYN/AWORK ENVIRONMENTDue to the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, Groundswell is operating on a fully remote basis. As such, this position is eligible for remote work, and the LIFT Fellow is expected to have access to a suitable remote work environment including access to a stable internet connection and a phone. Groundswell will provide a computer for the Fellow’s use as needed. Following the lifting of pandemic restrictions and in alignment with Groundswell’s re-entry plan, this job operates in a professional office environment.Groundswell’s work days are Monday through Friday, our work days are 8 hours, and core hours are 9:30AM to 4:30PM. This position is eligible for remote work.TRAVELUS travel is not anticipated for this position. Commuting from the Fellow’s residence to the Groundswell office, if office operations are reinstated, may be negotiated and are the responsibility of the Fellow.DESIRED EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCEAt least three years of undergraduate college education is required, with preference for college graduates or Master’s level degree candidates in economics, finance, business, community development, public policy, environmental studies, or law. Equivalent work experience in a related field, including field experience with electric utilities or any energy organization will be considered.Proficiency in Microsoft Office: Excel, Word, PowerPoint, etc.Proficiency in Google Suite: Docs, Sheets, Slides etc. and familiarity with other platforms such as Dropbox, and operating platforms such as Slack, TEAMS, etc. strongly preferred.Strong verbal and written communication skills. Writing samples will be required following an initial interview.Familiarity with state utility regulatory systems is desirable, but not required.SUPERVISIONThe Fellow will report to Groundswell’s Senior Program Director, Labs.COMPENSATIONThis is a part-time position 20 hours per week with compensation paid on an hourly basis at $20.00 per hour and is classified as non-exempt Under the Fair Labor Standards Act. You will be required to record all work time utilizing Groundswell’s time tracking system. You will be paid semi-monthly on the 15th and the last day of the month. This position is eligible for the following benefits: Groundswell’s monthly $45 cell phone and $75 internet reimbursements along with 24 hours of paid sick leave.Groundswell is an equal opportunity employer.Job Types: Part-time, InternshipPay: $20.00 per hourBenefits:Paid time offSchedule:Day shiftWork Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",11150,Washington
71,"IT Program and Project Manager, Mid",Booz Allen Hamilton,"Anacostia, DC",None,"The Challenge:
You know the secret to a successful project is tracking the balance between resources and performance. You can look at metrics, identify risk indicators, and plan changes to keep the project within budget and on time while achieving goals successfully. What if you could use those project management skills to make a difference supporting our DoD client. We have an opportunity for an IT Program & Project Management Support team member.
We have an opportunity for a program manager to evaluate and recommend project management best practices and how to incorporate them into project work packages as defined by project definition and business rules. Analyze metrics in regards to aligning actions to strategy, and measuring and managing performance using industry best benchmarks to improve project and cost center performance. Assist the government to develop and update training plans, guides, reports, and other materials as well as coordinate training.
Empower change with us.
You Have:
3 years of experience with IT program management
Experience with communications management to ensure that critical processes, project deliverables, and portfolio information is properly disseminated
TS/SCI clearance
BA or BS degree
Nice If You Have:
Experience with performance management improvement support, including workforce training
Experience with maintaining an Integrated Master Schedule
Experience with investment management cost centers, lifecycle costs, and resource management
Knowledge of Governance Risk and Compliance (GRC) management to ensure that projects support appropriate policy, risk standards, and compliance requirements
Knowledge of vendor management to ensure that vendors, contracts, and Service Level Agreements are aligned
Project Management Professional (PMP) and ITIL v3 Foundations Certifications
Clearance:
Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information; TS/SCI clearance is required.
Build Your Career:
Consulting at Booz Allen means empowering you to provide your customers with the best support. With a consulting career at Booz Allen, you can expect:
a large business consulting community
access to experts in virtually every field
a culture that focuses on supporting our employees
We have opportunities that provide stability while offering variety, so you can find the right fit for your career — and your life. You’ll also have access to a wealth of training resources through our Consulting University, an online learning portal where you can access more than 5000 functional and technical courses, certifications, and books. Build your technical skills through hands-on training on the latest tools and tech from our in-house experts. Pursuing certifications? Take advantage of our tuition assistance, onsite courses, vendor relationships, and a network of professionals who can give you helpful tips. We’ll help you develop the career you want, as you chart your own course for success. With contracts across the globe in multiple industries, no matter where you want to go with your consulting career, we have the path the takes you there.
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.
APC7",11150,Washington
72,"Manager, Robotic Process Automation (RPA)",Amazon.com Services LLC,"Arlington, VA",None,"
5+ years of managing and developing a team of engineers
Deep knowledge of Blue Prism, UIpath or Automation Anywhere
Hands on RPA and system integration experience
Experience in business process mapping
Experience leading an RPA office, COE or consulting practice
Project and program management experience using backlog and release management tooling (JIRA, etc.)
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Supply Chain, Industrial Engineering or related field

Amazon has an immediate opening for a Manager of Robotic Process Automation (RPA) to joining the Finance Operations (FinOps) team, a global shared service for Amazon.

A day in the life
This Senior Technical Leader will hire and develop of team of RPA Engineers and lead the strategy, design and execution of a new RPA Center of Excellence (COE) that can operate with the agility and scale of Amazon. You must be results orientated and measure success with fact and data. Apply your domain expertise to:

Build and invent, customer-centric automated solutions to improve productivity and speed while reducing defects
Champion Lean and process simplification
Partner with multiple technology teams to facilitate seamless automation
Drive adoption of RPA
Develop and present ideas for continuous improvement and investment

About the hiring group
The Accounts Receivable organization is an integral component of Finance Operations. Finance Operations is a global organization covering the areas of Accounts Payable, Accounts Receivable, Payroll, ACES (Amazon Customer Experience System), Procurement, Tax, Controllership, Accounting, Tech and much more. The Global Accounts Receivable team (GAR) is creating a Center of Excellence in Robotics Process Automation to streamline processes across our global shared service locations.

Job responsibilities

Lead the strategy, design and execution of a new RPA COE
Work cross functionally with process leaders, process analysts and technologists
Showcase capabilities, cultivate use-cases and drive adoption of RPA
Stays current with industry and Amazon best-practices
Build a new team of process analysts and automation engineers
Define and execute roadmap with speed and precision
Ensure our bots meet a high bar on controllership, monitoring with recovery and policy adherence

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.


Attention to detail and creating clarity when dealing with ambiguity
Ability to work cross functionally in a fast-paced and rapidly changing environment
Ability to guide and influence senior leadership
Create a strategy and deliver it with a focused, pragmatic approach
5+ years of relevant experience in a large finance operations environment

",11150,Washington
73,Launcher (Entry-Level),REEF,"Washington, DC",None,"Launcher

Location: Washington DC

Who You'll Work For
REEF's mission is to connect the world to your block.

We transform underutilized urban spaces into neighborhood hubs that connect people to locally curated goods, services, and experiences.

With an ecosystem of 4,500 locations and a team of 15,000 people, REEF is the largest operator of mobility, logistics hubs, and neighborhood kitchens in North America.

Together we are leveraging the power of proximity to keep our communities moving forward in a sustainable and thoughtful way.

What You'll Do

Schedule and conduct operations site walks to ensure site is qualified for product

Visit city permitting departments to process applications, follow up on requests, and ensure permits are issued in a timely manner

Obtain all required documents to process registration

Ensure documents are stored in correct repositories & circulated to relevant departments

Place PO's for various project mile-stone needs and update Project Management Tool (Asana) daily

Travel within city daily as requested and work out of local office when not in field

Escalate bottlenecks and explore creative/timely solutions with Launcher II and Regional Director

Complete all permitting applications and vessel registration paperwork in an expedited and accurate manner to ensure timely product launches

Ensure clear communication of process changes to Manager and contribute to maintaining process documents (e.g. permitting requirements process)

Manage multiple project milestones in tandem

Follow process to place PO's (e.g. vessels, small ware, etc.); track and update PM tool regularly for visibility

Responsible for estimating key project milestone dates used by cross-functional teams to plan their in-market operation

Responsible for launching set # of vessels in market

What We Want From You:
Great attitude! Ambitious and ready to learn!

Strong project management and organizational skills.

Ability to figure it out on own with limited resources.

Excited to work in the field on the ground level and own project

Availability during nights and weekends (as may be required from time to time)

Flexible to work on special out-of-market engagements

50-60% Travel 2-5 months duration may be required

What We'll Provide
Medical
Dental
Vision
Life and Disability
401K
Paid Time Off (PTO)

PHYSICAL DEMANDS:
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.

Frequently operate small office equipment such as a computer, tablet, and copier/printer, telephone.

Work is performed in a professional office environment.

WORKING CONDITIONS:
Work is performed indoors for extended periods of time including up to the entire duration of shift.

REEF Technology is an equal opportunity employer, and we value diversity at our company. REEF does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, national origin, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. REEF complies with all applicable equal employment opportunity legislation in each jurisdiction in which it operates.",11150,Washington
74,Intelligence Research Specialist,"US Treasury, Financial Crimes Enforcement Network","Vienna, VA","$72,750 - $113,362 a year","Duties
Summary
Become part of the team that safeguards the financial system from the abuses of financial crime. At the Financial Crimes Enforcement Network (FinCEN), we are at the forefront in preventing and detecting terrorist financing, money laundering, and other financial crime. Serve at the nation's financial intelligence unit and protect the United States financial system from criminals and terrorist financiers.

Responsibilities
The following are the duties of this position at the GS-13. If you are selected at a lower grade level, you will have the opportunity to learn to perform all these duties, and will receive training to help you grow in this position.

Researching, analyzing, collecting, and producing financial intelligence data and reports, studying trends and patterns, identifying intelligence gaps, and applying a range of qualitative and/or quantitative analytical techniques to predict and assess areas of vulnerability;
Developing and applying new or revised program methods, strategies, procedures, and technologies to carry out program activities;
Conceptualizing, planning, drafting, editing, and presenting analytic products to customers.

Travel Required
Occasional travel - Occasional travel may be required.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13
Job family (Series)
0132 Intelligence
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
The experience may have been gained in either the public, private sector or volunteer service. One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis. To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/day/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week on your resume.

4-Security Clearance: This position has been designated National Security Level IV, Special Sensitive and requires the incumbent to obtain and maintain eligibility for a Top Secret (TS) clearance with Sensitive Compartmented Information (SCI) access. Applicant must meet and continue to adhere to the requirements of a Tier 5 level background investigation. Failure to successfully meet these requirements will be grounds for termination. Continued employment with FinCEN is contingent upon satisfactory completion of the Tier 5 level background investigation, the results of which fully meet the FinCEN's special employment criteria. All employees are subject to satisfactory completion of periodic reinvestigation and a continuing life style in conformity with applicable national and FinCEN directives. Any unfavorable information developed during an investigation or other official inquiry may result in termination of employment in accordance with established security policies and procedures.

Key Requirements:
Please refer to ""Conditions of Employment.""
Click ""Print Preview"" to review the entire announcement before applying.
Must be U.S. Citizen or U.S. National

Qualifications
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement.

Specialized experience for the GS-13: You must have one year of specialized experience at a level of difficulty and responsibility equivalent to the GS-12 grade level in the Federal service which has equipped you with the particular knowledge, skills, and abilities to successfully perform the duties of the position. Specialized experience for this position is defined as experience in ALL of the following:

Designing and executing analytical projects using programing language and/or other advanced data analysis tools to analyze large data sets, such as Bank Secrecy Act (BSA) data, to develop actionable findings; ANDConceptualizing, conducting, and presenting analytical products to consumers; ANDIdentifying and producing written analytical reports on financial crimes or illicit finance, founded on analysis of Bank Secrecy Act data; ANDCommunicating with law enforcement, intelligence, regulatory, and/or financial industry representatives as part of assessing illicit finance trends, patterns, and targets.

Specialized experience for the GS-12: You must have one year of specialized experience at a level of difficulty and responsibility equivalent to the GS-11 grade level in the Federal service which has equipped you with the particular knowledge, skills, and abilities to successfully perform the duties of the position. Specialized experience for this position is defined as experience in ALL of the following:

Applying research methodologies, planning research, and utilizing a variety of analytical tools to analyze large data sets, such as Bank Secrecy Act (BSA) data, to develop actionable findings; ANDIdentifying and producing written analytical reports on financial crimes or illicit finance, founded on analysis of Bank Secrecy Act data; ANDCommunicating with law enforcement, intelligence, regulatory, and/or financial industry representatives as part of assessing illicit finance trends, patterns, and targets.
Education
Additional information
OTHER INFORMATION:

We may select from this announcement or any other source to fill one or more vacancies.
This is a non-bargaining unit position.
Relocation expenses: No
We offer opportunities for telework.
CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT:
A one year probationary period may be required.
Must successfully complete a background investigation.
Complete a Declaration for Federal Employment to determine your suitability for Federal employment, at the time requested by the agency.
Have your salary sent to a financial institution of your choice by Direct Deposit/Electronic Funds Transfer.
If you are a male applicant born after December 31, 1959, certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System or are exempt from having to do so.
Go through a Personal Identity Verification (PIV) process that requires two forms of identification from the Form I-9. Federal law requires verification of the identity and employment eligibility of all new hires in the U.S.
Submit to a drug test prior to your appointment and random drug testing while you occupy the position.

FinCEN offers flexible work schedules, 10 paid holidays, financial subsidies to employees who use public transportation to commute, in-house training, fitness center reimbursement, alternate work schedules (AWS) and telework opportunities, and eligibility for performance awards. FinCEN also offers attractive health, life, and long-term care insurance programs, and the employees' health insurance contributions are out of pre-tax dollars. Newer employees are covered by a three-tier retirement plan that includes a pre-tax retirement contribution program with matching funds or, as applicable, continuance in the Civil Service Retirement System. Learn more about Federal benefits programs at: https://help.usajobs.gov/index.php/Pay_and_Benefits

All candidates will be considered regardless of their race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, sexual orientation, protected genetic information, status of a parent, lawful political affiliation, marital status, physical/mental disability (if not a job factor), membership, non-membership in an employee organization, or any other non-merit factor. To file a complaint of discrimination, contact FinCEN, Office of Equal Opportunity and Diversity on (703) 905-5052 or TDD (703) 905-3838.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Your application includes your résumé, responses to the online questions, and required supporting documents. Please be sure that your résumé includes detailed information to support your qualifications for this position; failure to provide sufficient evidence in your resume may result in a ""not qualified"" determination.
Rating: This announcement is issued under the ""direct-hire"" authority. Consistent with 5 U.S.C. 3304(a)(3) and OPM regulations (5 CFR 337 Subpart B) on direct-hire: All candidates who meet all the qualifications and other eligibility requirements may be referred for consideration. Competitive examining rules providing for rating and ranking and veterans' preference do not apply.
Referral: All qualified & eligible candidates will be referred to the hiring manager for consideration.

If you are a displaced or surplus Federal employee (eligible for the Career Transition Assistance Plan (CTAP)/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Plan (ICTAP)) you must be assigned the middle category or better to be rated as ""well qualified"" to receive special selection priority.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Sensitive Compartmented Information
Drug test required
Yes
Required Documents

Required Documents
A complete application includes 1. A résumé, 2. Vacancy question responses, and 3. Submission of any required documents. Please note that if you do not provide all required information, as specified in this announcement, you may not be considered for this position (or may not receive the special consideration for which you may be eligible).Please ensure all required documents, including any required work samples, narratives, or other materials as stated in this announcement, are attached to your application package. Any required documents should be submitted at the time that you apply as documents will not be accepted after the vacancy closes.

All applicants are required to submit a résumé either by creating one in USAJOBS or uploading one of their own choosing. (Cover letters are optional.) To receive full credit for relevant experience, please list the month/date/year and number of hours worked for experience listed on your résumé. We suggest that you preview the online questions, as you may need to customize your résumé to ensure that it supports your responses to these questions. Please view résumé tips.

CAREER TRANSITION ASSISTANCE PLAN (CTAP) OR INTERAGENCY CAREER TRANSITION ASSISTANCE PLAN (ICTAP) DOCUMENTATION: If you are a displaced or surplus Federal employee, click CTAP/ICTAP for eligibility and a detailed list of required documents you must submit in order to be eligible.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
U.S. citizens or U.S. Nationals; no prior Federal experience is required.",11150,Washington
75,Staff Assistant,Cherokee Nation Businesses,"Washington, DC 20001 (Swampoodle area)",None,"Staff Assistant, Washington, DC
Join the team who values your skills and expertise. Cherokee Nation Systems Solutions (CNSS) helps federal agencies improve productivity and find innovative solutions. Taking a personalized approach, CNSS offers a complete line of innovative services and consulting to government agencies, including call center, application modernization, data utilization, advanced analytics and IT infrastructure. Your valuable skills can help us give customers the support they deserve and the quality they expect from our team – a team of experts, like you.
Cherokee Nation System Solutions is part of Cherokee Federal – a team of tribally owned federal contracting companies focused on building solutions, solving complex challenges, and serving the nation's mission around the globe for more than 60 federal clients. For more information, visit www.cherokee-federal.com.
SUMMARY
The Staff Assistant will serve as office manager supporting the front office of the Special Presidential Envoy for Climate.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Serves as office managers/staff assistants supporting the front office of the Special Presidential Envoy for Climate
Maintain schedule for Chief of Staff and Deputy Chief of Staff
Plans domestic and international travel
Provide support to visitors
Responsible for managing office services by ensuring that office procedures, correspondences are controlled, filing systems are designed, and supplies are up to date.
Perform special projects as assigned
EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE
A high school degree or GED is required
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES
An active TOP SECRET clearance which can be verified in DISS (JPAS) is required.
Experience in fast paced government office.
Ability to solve problems and encourage consistent, solid performance.
English language (written and spoken) communications skills.
Ability to manage multiple tasks, coordinate activities in multiple locations, act decisively in daily work, and work well in a multi-cultural team environment.
Strong organizational, communication, interpersonal, and computer skills.
Ability to work independently to assess priorities and manage daily coordination of details with minimal supervision
Ability to successfully pass a drug screen abd background investigation
WORK ENVIRONMENT
Work is primarily performed in a climate-controlled office environment.
About Cherokee Federal

Cherokee Federal – a division of Cherokee Nation Businesses – is a team of tribally owned federal contracting companies focused on building solutions, solving complex challenges, and serving the nation's mission around the globe for more than 60 federal clients. Our team of companies manages nearly 1,000 projects of all sizes across the construction, consulting, engineering and manufacturing, health, and technology portfolios.
Since 2012, the Cherokee Federal team of companies has won more than $5 billion in government contracts. Our 3,000+ employees work in 26 countries, 50 states and 2 U.S. territories.
Why choose Cherokee Federal? Visit our website and learn about the great reasons to join our team. cherokee-federal.com
Compliance
Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
We are an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, gender identity and sexual orientation. If you'd like more information about your EEO rights as an applicant under the law, please copy and paste the links to the following two sites: EEO Statement | EEO Poster ; https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf and https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/ofccp_eeo_supplement_final_jrf_qa_508c.pdf
If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may e-mail CNB.Compliance@cn-bus.com for assistance. This email address is for accommodation requests only and cannot be used to inquire about the application process or status.
For Pay Transparency Non Discrimination provision, please copy and paste the following link : Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision ; https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/pay-transp_%20English_formattedESQA508c.pdf
We maintain an Affirmative Action Plan for proactively seeking employment and advancement for qualified protected veterans and individuals with disabilities. Upon request, we will schedule time to make our Affirmative Action Plan accessible. If you are interested, please submit a written request with the email subject line: 2021 Request to View Affirmative Action Plan to the Compliance Administrator at ""Compliance@cn-bus.com"" This email box is not for resumes or follow up on job applications. #CNSS
Join the team who values your skills and expertise. Cherokee Nation System Solutions (CNSS) helps federal agencies improve productivity and find innovative solutions. Taking a personalized approach, CNSS offers a complete line of innovative services and consulting to government agencies, including call center, application modernization, data utilization, advanced analytics and IT infrastructure. Your valuable skills can help us give customers the support they deserve and the quality they expect from our team – a team of experts, like you.
Cherokee Nation System Solutions is part of Cherokee Federal – a team of tribally owned federal contracting companies focused on building solutions, solving complex challenges, and serving the nation's mission around the globe for more than 60 federal clients. For more information, visit cherokee-federal.com .
Cherokee Federal is a division of Cherokee Nation Businesses, the economic engine of Cherokee Nation, the largest Native American tribe in the U.S. As a trusted partner, the Cherokee Federal team of companies manages nearly 1,000 projects of all sizes across the construction, consulting, engineering and manufacturing, health, and technology portfolios.
Since 2012, our team of companies has won more than $5 billion in government contracts. Our 3,000+ employees work in 26 countries, 50 states and 2 U.S. territories.
Why Cherokee Federal? Visit cherokee-federal.com to learn why you should join our team! Â
The Staff Assistant will serve as office manager supporting the front office of the Special Presidential Envoy for Climate.",11150,Washington
76,Agile IT Project Manager,Guidehouse,"Washington, DC 20036 (Dupont Circle area)",None,"Overview:

Guidehouse is a leading management consulting firm serving the public and commercial markets. We guide our clients forward towards new futures that build trust in society and your professional skills along the journey. Join us at Guidehouse.
Responsibilities:

The Agile IT Project Manager oversees the Agile development process for a software solution for a State Department client in a fast-paced environment; facilitates all Scrum Events; ensures all Scrum Artifacts are transparent; manages the product roadmap to ensure milestones are achieved; utilizes Azure DevOps and other Agile softwares; manages and grooms backlog of user stories and ensure acceptance criteria are met; identifies and proactively communicates risks, issues, and proposed mitigation strategies; coordinates across a multidisciplinary team of engineers, project managers, IT staff, to accomplish project objectives; liaises directly with product and business owners to gather requirements and provide guidance, advice, and recommendations.
Qualifications:
Experience overseeing the Agile process for complex software development projects
Bachelor’s Degree
Experience monitoring project progress and implementing effective corrective actions if actual progress falls behind plan
Demonstrated ability to use effective facilitation skills and techniques to elicit requirements from a diverse range of stakeholders
Demonstrated ability to offer solutions and articulate the business impact to clients in a clear and concise manner
Demonstrated ability to work collaboratively with others in a team environment
Experience briefing senior-level government leaders
Experience working in a multi-contractor environment
Proactive and comfortable working independently
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Top Secret
Preferred:
Experience working within Department of State and/or the Intelligence Community, or other Federal agencies with international focus.
Certified ScrumMaster (CSM), Agile Certified Practitioner (ACP) or equivalent
TS/SCI eligible Clearance required
Clearance: Active Top Secret, SCI eligible
Additional Requirements:

The successful candidate must not be subject to employment restrictions from a former employer (such as a non-compete) that would prevent the candidate from performing the job responsibilities as described.
Disclaimer:

About Guidehouse
Guidehouse is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law, ordinance, or regulation.
Guidehouse will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law or ordinance including the Fair Chance Ordinance of Los Angeles and San Francisco.
If you have visited our website for information about employment opportunities, or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation, please contact Guidehouse Recruiting at 1-571-633-1711 or via email at RecruitingAccommodation@guidehouse.com. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.
Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of Guidehouse and Guidehouse will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.
Rewards and Benefits
Guidehouse offers a comprehensive, total rewards package that includes competitive compensation and a flexible benefits package that reflects our commitment to creating a diverse and supportive workplace.
Benefits include:
Medical, Rx, Dental & Vision Insurance
Personal and Family Sick Time & Company Paid Holidays
Position may be eligible for a discretionary variable incentive bonus
Parental Leave and Adoption Assistance
401(k) Retirement Plan
Basic Life & Supplemental Life
Health Savings Account, Dental/Vision & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts
Short-Term & Long-Term Disability
Tuition Reimbursement, Personal Development & Learning Opportunities
Skills Development & Certifications
Employee Referral Program
Corporate Sponsored Events & Community Outreach
Emergency Back-Up Childcare Program",11150,Washington
77,"Financial Management Analyst, Junior",Booz Allen Hamilton,"Washington, DC",None,"The Challenge:
The right mixture of great ideas and funding can create powerful change. In a complex organization, allocating funding to where it can be most effective can be a challenge. That’s why we need you, a financial analyst who can easily navigate the requirements, policies, and regulations that govern funding, to ensure our client's resources make the most impact.
As a financial analyst on our team, you’ll create a financial management strategy to help our client succeed. You’ll work with project management, schedulers, and task leads to build an actionable plan for your client to secure the funding needed to achieve their goals. Using your knowledge of laws, regulations, and policies, you’ll help your client to develop well-formed requirements. Once the funding is in place, you’ll make sure the funding is used efficiently through consistent tracking and communication with project management and task leads. This is your chance to work on high-level naval systems while imparting your financial analysis expertise to your team.
Empower change with us.
You Have:1+ years of experience with financial analysisExperience with SQLAbility to create reports that reflect program or project status for cost schedule and performanceAbility to obtain a security clearanceBA or BS degree
Nice If You Have:2+ years of experience with the NavyExperience with Navy enterprise resource planning (ERP) or GFEBSExperience with Procurement Business Intelligence Service (PBIS), Automated Document Management System (AUTODOC), Security Tracking and Authorization Request System (STARS), or Collaborative Battlespace Reasoning Awareness CobraCertified Defense Financial Manager (CDFM) or Defense Acquisition Workforce Improvement Act (DAWIA) Level I Certification in Business or Financial Management
Clearance:
Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
Build Your Career:
When you join Booz Allen, you’ll have the opportunity to connect with other professionals doing similar work across multiple markets. You’ll share best practices and work through challenges as you gain experience and mentoring to develop your career. In addition, you will have access to a wealth of training resources through our Digital University, an online learning portal where you can access more than 5000 tech courses, certifications, and books. Build your technical skills through hands-on training on the latest tools and tech from our in-house experts. Pursuing certifications that directly impact your role? You may be able to take advantage of our tuition assistance, onsite courses, vendor relationships, and a network of experts who can give you helpful tips. We’ll help you develop the career you want as you chart your own course for success.
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",11150,Washington
78,PROJECT MANAGER – IT MODERNIZATION,"RJM Technologies, Inc.","Washington, DC 20004 (Penn Quarter area)","$100,000 - $150,000 a year","Our client, a fast-growing IT consulting firm to government and industry, seeks a hands-on IT Project Manager to support one of our federal civilian clients with a large-scale IT Modernization program.? The Project Manager will oversee workstreams for Cloud, Cybersecurity, Service Management, Capital Planning and others within an Agile methodology. The ideal candidate will be a seasoned entrepreneurial Project Manager with Federal Government experience providing overall program management including client executive relationship management, team member coordination, and technology roadmap planning and implementation.RESPONSIBILITIESCoordinate activities across disparate teams to deliver successful outcomes for stakeholders.Lead the engineering projects and deployment of technical solutions.Develop and maintains relationships and partnerships with stakeholders, peers, vendors and partners.Lead large programs using an Agile management approach.Facilitate stakeholder collaboration across multiple organizations/divisions within the client organization.Provide oversight to ensure the project’s approach and deliverables comply with customer, company, quality, industry, and regulatory requirements.Facilitate regular project reviews with staff and leadership to ensure consistent reporting and visibility of progress.Support staff in resolving or removing roadblocks to programs and projects.Build strategic cross-functional and cross-organizational partnerships and alliances with stakeholders, peers and direct reports to resolve problems, improve processes or achieve goals.Create a culture of continuous improvement by communicating/deploying enterprise best practices and team engagement to improve cost, quality, delivery, job satisfaction and client satisfaction.Create demand for IT modernization efforts through client interactions, prominence, and personal connections.QUALIFICATIONSBachelor’s Degree and 7+ years of experience performing Information Technology-related Program and Project Management within the Federal Government.Experience leading IT modernization workstreams in Cloud migration, Cybersecurity, ITSM in an Agile methodology.Project Management Professional (PMP) certification.Experience as a trusted advisor to stakeholders / customers, including executive-level.Experience developing and maintaining executive relationships and communications.Experience leading organizational change management activities to adopt improved technologies and processes.Experience implementing project management best practices among project team, including project managers, technical leads, and business analysts.Experience leading a team of highly technical engineers, establishing and socializing the technology roadmap throughout the organization.US Citizenship is required.Job Type: Full-timePay: $100,000.00 - $150,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayExperience:IT Modernization Project Management: 7 years (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",11150,Washington
79,Deputy Director- Office of Well Being,Government of the District of Columbia,"Washington, DC 20003 (Navy Yard area)","$132,831 - $185,960 a year","D.C. Child and Family Services Agency (CFSA) is evolving as a national leader in child protection, foster care and adoptive services. This position is located in the Office of the Deputy Director for Well Being (OWB), Office of the Principal Deputy Director (OPDD) of the Child and Family Services Agency (CFSA). The Deputy Director for Well Being supervises managers, technical, and support staff and is responsible for providing agencywide leadership and direction to ensure that the quality of well-being services provided by the CFSA to children and families is consistently exceptional, meets all applicable standards and regulations, and supports the goals and objectives identified of the Agency. The position is critical in ensuring that the work of Agency staff, foster parents, and all contracted providers furthers the agency’s commitment to safety, permanency, and well-being of children and families and ensure compliance with the requirements promulgated by the Federal Court in the Modified Final Order (MFO). The work impacts the systematic changes required by the Amended Implementation Plan and the MFO and supports the agency in meeting its mandates for systemic reform.
Duties and Responsibilities
Oversees, directs, coordinates, and implements the delivery of child welfare support services to children and families of the District of Columbia, including the areas of substance abuse, educational resource, domestic violence, and family conferencing approaches and establishes goals, objectives, short- and long-range plans and projects. The selected candidate will also be responsible for directing core-line planning and management functions, includes, but is not limited to, planning, developing, managing, organizing, staffing, and directing the comprehensive delivery of quality, family-centered, and culturally appropriate services for children whose cases are managed directly and indirectly by CFSA to ensure quality services related to the health, safety, well-being, and permanence.
Develops plan and associated implementation strategies for supporting and ensuring accountability for quality practices. Works closely with the Deputy Directors for Program Operations and Entry Services, CFSA social workers and other CFSA staff, key external stakeholders, and experts to create a culture of integrated care and fosters continual improvement and establishes and monitors effective business and clinical metric; ensures standards and Agency expectations for practice are clear; and that benchmarks are met by all employees and departments. Collaborates with program operations to ensure well-being practices are integrated into case planning activities. The future incumbent will ensure that programs within the business unit meet regulatory standards and are consistent with internal monitoring policies and corrective action plans and identify opportunities for service expansion activities or value-added services to include partnering and collaborating with other CFSA administrations, external agencies, and collateral organizations, to promote the well-being of children, youth, and families in child welfare. This includes building and coordinating education services, supports and advocacy for children and youth involved with CFSA and other similar activities.
Provides direction, accountability, and control measures for the utilization/cost management of health and clinical quality management functions. Facilitates the coordination and delivery of health and mental care services of the children involved in the District of Columbia child welfare system and all agency health care activities. These include but are not limited to Healthy Horizons Clinic and the Nurse Care Management Program, ensuring that the program provides initial, comprehensive, and follow-up medical and behavioral assessments to meet the needs of the Agency foster care program and create and sustain Agency-wide case consultation practices to ensure that workers have access to a broad range of expert support to strengthen case practice. Identifies specific skills or tools needed by staff and develops and implements plans to meet those needs. Coordinates with the Quality Service Review Teams to assess the quality of mental health services to children/youth and families both within the foster care system and those receiving in-home services as well as works with the Office of Planning, Policy and Program Support to inform the Needs Assessment and Resource Development Plan to ensure the mental health needs of children/youth and families are met.
Responsible for budgets, financial planning, and approved grants including the development of appropriate bids and to ensure that delegated budgets are properly managed and monitored as well as develops reporting mechanisms and responds to requests for information from executive and legislative officials, other administrators or management staff. Serves on committees or task forces to provide needs assessments, recommendations, and solutions.
Performs other related duties as assigned.
Qualifications and Education
Master’s degree in Social Work or related discipline is required.
Mastery knowledge of the child welfare programs, current management concepts and best practices and/or the interrelationships among such programs to oversee and direct the analysis in an agency setting by developing and evaluating the effectiveness of new or modified program objectives and operations.
Advanced comprehensive knowledge of and demonstrable understanding of local resources and the most recent innovations in social work nationwide.
Mastery knowledge of social work concepts, theories, and best practices and demonstrable ability to apply and operationalize them in the areas of child welfare.
Advanced comprehensive knowledge of the structure, functions, mission, and objectives related to the program operations of CFSA or other child welfare and human services agencies and the associated Federal and District legislation and regulations that govern and affect child welfare resources.
Demonstrated leadership ability to create effective teams, provide and communicate vision, and effectively manage change.
Superior oral and written communication skills; effective interpersonal communication skills. Proficiency in Microsoft Office.
Licenses and Certifications
Licensed Independent Clinical Social Worker (LICSW) or its equivalent is required.
Other Significant Factors
Tour of Duty: 8:15am - 4:45pm. Qualified individuals must ensure flexibility as it relates to the Tour of Duty.
Pay Plan, Series, and Grade: MSS-0301-16
Collective Bargaining Unit: This position is not covered under the collective bargaining agreement.
Duration of Appointment: Management Supervisory Services (MSS) – Regular
Promotion Potential: No known promotion potential
Position Designation: This position is deemed as “security” sensitive pursuant to DCMR 6B Section 412 and is subject to a criminal background check, traffic records check, and consumer credit check (as applicable), reasonable suspicion drug and alcohol test, and post-accident or incident drug and alcohol test.
Residency Requirement: If the position you are applying for is in the Career, Management Supervisory, or Educational Service at an annual salary of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) or more, you must establish residency in the District of Columbia within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of the appointment and continue to maintain residency within the District of Columbia throughout the duration of the appointment.
EEO Statement: The District of Columbia Government is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified candidates will receive consideration without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, family responsibilities, matriculation, physical handicap, or political affiliation.
Closing Statement: Official Job Offers are made by the D.C. Child and Family Services Agency's Human Resources Only",11150,Washington
80,IT SPECIALIST (PLCYPLN),US Defense Threat Reduction Agency,"Reston, VA","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is part of the Defense Threat Reduction Agency.
Responsibilities
As a IT SPECIALIST (PLCYPLN) at the GS-2210-13/14 some of your typical work assignments may include:

Serves as a senior IT Specialist within the Operations & Integration Directorate, Mission Support Department, Technology Solutions Division (OI-MST) Defense Threat Reduction Agency.
Serves as Direct Operations Manager with responsibility for gathering requirements, facilitating end user process refinement, planning information technology solutions, and overseeing the implementation across the Mission IT functional areas.
Deliver MIT capability briefings to representatives from DoD, the Services, Combatant Commands, Intelligence Community, and government agencies in order to foster relationships and develop cooperative efforts.
Serves as the Subject Matter Expert (SME) of Direct Operations for the Mission Information Technology (Mission IT) within Mission Support Department, Technology Solutions Division.
Provide management and oversight of the Global Enterprise Partners (GEP), Team Phoenix, Team Avengers, Visual Modeling and Simulation (VMS), and Mission Data) Teams.
Serves as Alternate-Technical Point of Contact (ATPOC) for Mission IT (MIT). Ensuring contract compliance and oversight for contractors and conducts deliverable reviews, measure and enforce SLA standards and metrics.
Delivers Mission IT capability briefings to representatives from DOD, the Services, and Combatant Commands, Intelligence Community, and government agencies in order to foster relationships and develop cooperative efforts.
Ensure globally embedded and expeditionary Capabilities and Data Integrator (CDI) positions remain filled while pro-actively avoiding gaps in war-fighter support.
Provide advice and guidance on a wide range and variety of complex IT issues; interpreting IT policies, standards, and guidelines; conducting analyses and recommending resolution of complex issues affecting the specialty area(s); evaluating proposals for the acquisition of IT products or services; preparing and presenting reports; representing the organization in interactions with other organizations; and/or providing technical leadership on group projects.
Employee uses judgment and originality by interpreting data; planning the work; and refining the methods and techniques being used.
Manage requirements and requests for Military Training Teams (MTTs), mission support, inter-agency agreements, and globally dispersed personnel to better support Combatant Commands, Agencies, and other unit in their missions.
Also coordinates with a materiel developer to obtain information technology services; participates in change control (for example, reviewing configuration change requests); ensures appropriate product-related training and documentation are developed and made available to customers.
Reviews, coordinates and negotiates technical requirements across a wide spectrum of proponent, using, planning and implementing organizations.
Applies broad IT knowledge and extensive experience to perform responsibilities to include determining appropriate products or services with clients or customers to define project scope, requirements, and deliverables; develops, modifies, or provides input to project plans; oversees implementation of project plans to meet objectives; monitors project activities and resources to mitigate risk; and manages stakeholder expectations.
Makes improvements, solves problems, or takes corrective action when problems arise; gives presentations or briefings on all aspects of the project; participates in IPRs, design reviews, and final project reviews; identifies project documentation requirements or procedures; and facilitates IT implementation release plan
Serves as a subject matter expert in matters pertaining to information technology requirements gathering, planning, coordination with higher HQ and subordinate commands, and conducts project planning, management and implementation initiatives as assigned.
Identifies customers' information systems requirements; analyzes information systems requirements or environment; conducts analytical studies and cost-benefit analysis; evaluates, monitors, and ensures compliance with laws, regulations, policies, standards, or procedures.
Applies professional skills and knowledge to innovation of IT systems to facilitate and automate enterprise-wide business processes and collaborative capabilities across the command.
Serve as Primary Defense Travel System Action Officer and approving officer for the Technology Solutions Division.
Serve as MST's representative and manager for the Quarterly Training Requirements Board (QTRB), Quarterly Training Gap Analysis (QTGA), and Mission Essential Task List (METL).
Reviews, coordinates and negotiates technical requirements across a wide spectrum of proponent, using, planning and implementing organizations.

Travel Required
Occasional travel - Travel in the performance of temporary assignments is required.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Similar jobs
End-User Support Specialists
Enterprise Data Manager
Information Systems Managers
Information Technology Project Managers
Information Technology Specialist (It Specialist)
Managers, Information Systems
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a U.S. citizen
Males born after 12-31-59 must be registered for Selective Service http://www.sss.gov
Resume and supporting documents (See How To Apply)
Suitable for Federal employment, determined by a background investigation. Must be able to obtain and maintain a TOP SECRET w/SCI security clearance.
May be required to successfully complete a probationary period
Work Schedule: Fulltime
Overtime: May be required to accommodate operational needs of the organization.
Tour of Duty: Flexible
Recruitment Incentives: Not Authorized
Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA): Exempt/Non-Exempt
Financial Disclosure: Required/Not Required
Telework Eligibility: This position is telework eligible
Must consent to and pass pre-employment drug testing and be subject to periodic drug testing thereafter.
Qualifications
You may qualify at the GS-14, if you fulfill the following qualifications:

A. One year of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-13 grade level in the Federal service:
Experience with Project Management principles and practice in order to develop and assess Project Management Action Plans.
Experienced with IT policy, planning, acquisitions and management processes to identify strategic opportunities.
Experienced with employment information technology, including knowledge of computer and communications technologies.
Experienced with Global Enterprise requirements for Capabilities and Data Integrators.
You may qualify at the GS-13 if you fulfill the following qualifications:

A. One year of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-12 grade level in the Federal service:
Experienced with IT policy, planning, acquisitions and management processes to identify strategic opportunities.
Experienced with employment information technology, including knowledge of computer and communications technologies.
Experienced with Global Enterprise requirements for Capabilities and Data Integrators.
Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

In addition to meeting the qualification requirements for this position, all 2210 applicants must demonstrate they have experience in each of the four competencies listed below: Experience must be IT related; the experience may be demonstrated by paid or unpaid experience and/or completion of specific, intensive training (for example, IT certification), as appropriate
Attention to Detail - Is thorough when performing work and conscientious about attending to detail.
Customer Service - Works with clients and customers (that is, any individuals who use or receive the services or products that your work unit produces, including the general public, individuals who work in the agency, other agencies, or organizations outside the Government) to assess their needs, provide information or assistance, resolve their problems, or satisfy their expectations; knows about available products and services; is committed to providing quality products and services.
Oral Communication - Expresses information (for example, ideas or facts) to individuals or groups effectively, taking into account the audience and nature of the information (for example, technical, sensitive, controversial); makes clear and convincing oral presentations; listens to others, attends to nonverbal cues, and responds appropriately.
Problem Solving - Identifies problems; determines accuracy and relevance of information; uses sound judgment to generate and evaluate alternatives, and to make recommendations
Education
Substitution of education may not be used in lieu of specialized experience for this grade level.
Additional information
Re-employed Annuitant: This position does not meet criteria for re-employed annuitant. The DoD criteria for hiring Re-employed Annuitants can be found at: http://www.esd.whs.mil/Portals/54/Documents/DD/issuances/140025/1400.25-V300.pdf


All applicants must meet qualifications and eligibility criteria by the closing date of the announcement.


Interagency Career Transition Assistance Programs: This program applies to employees who have been involuntarily separated from a Federal service position within the competitive service or Federal service employees whose positions have been deemed surplus or no longer needed. To receive selection priority for this position, you must: 1) meet ICTAP eligibility criteria; 2) be rated well-qualified for the position; Well qualified is defined as possessing the type and quality of experience that exceeds the positions minimum qualifications. and 3) submit the appropriate documentation to support your ICTAP eligibility. For more information:
https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/workforce-restructuring/employee-guide-to-career-transition/

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
We will review your resume and supporting documents, to ensure you meet the basic qualification requirements. We will evaluate each applicant who meets the basic qualifications on the information provided and evaluate your relevant work experiences as it relates to fundamental competencies, identified below, required for this position.

Competencies:

Data Management
Information Management
IT Program Management
Technology Awareness

Based on the results of this evaluation, you will be placed in one of the following quality categories:

Best Qualified: This highest category will be used for those candidates who possess the type and quality of experience that substantially exceeds the minimum qualifications of the position, including any selective placement factors and/or appropriate quality ranking factor(s), as determined by the job analysis.
Highly Qualified: This higher category will be used for those candidates who possess the type and quality of experience that exceed the minimum qualifications of the position, including any selective placement factors and/or appropriate quality ranking factor(s) as determined by the job analysis.
Qualified: This lowest category will be used for those candidates that meet the minimum qualifications of the position, including all selective placement factors and appropriate quality ranking factor(s) and are proficient in some, but not all, of the requirements of the position. Candidates may require extensive training and/or orientation in order to satisfactorily perform the duties of the position. https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/hiring-information/competitive-hiring/#url=Category-Rating

Names of the candidates in the Best Qualified category will be sent first to the hiring manager for employment consideration. Applicants in other categories will be referred in accordance with category rating procedures.


Veterans Preference: If you are entitled to veterans preference, you should indicate the type of veterans' preference you are claiming on your resume. Your veterans' preference entitlement will be verified by the employing agency. If you are entitled to veterans' preference and qualified for the position, your name will be placed above non-preference candidates on a list sent to the hiring manager for employment consideration. Qualified veterans' preference eligible with a service-connected disability of 10% or more will be listed at the top of the highest quality category depending on the position and grade level of the job.
For information on entitlement see http://www.fedshirevets.gov/job/vetpref/index.aspx.


Military Spouse Preference: If you are entitled to military spouse preference, in order to receive this preference you must choose the spousal eligibility in your application package referencing MSP Military Spouse Preference. Your preference entitlement will be verified by the employing agency. If you are claiming military spouse preference and qualified for the position, your name will be placed below preference eligible veteran candidates and above non-preference candidates on a list sent to the hiring manager for employment consideration. To claim Military Spouse Preference (MSP) please complete the Military Spouse PPP Self-Certification Checklist, save the document and attach it to your application package.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Sensitive Compartmented Information
Drug test required
Yes
Position sensitivity and risk
Special-Sensitive (SS)/High Risk
Trust determination process
National security
Required Documents

Required Documents
The documents you are required to submit vary based on the authority you are using to apply (i.e., applying as a veteran, applying as a current permanent Federal employee, applying as a reinstatement, etc).
Your complete application includes your COMPLETE resume, your responses to the online questionnaire, and documents which prove your eligibility to apply. If you fail to provide these documents, you will be marked as having an incomplete application package and you will not be considered any further.


The following documents are REQUIRED:
1. Your resume:

Your resume may be submitted on any format. It must include your name and contact information and support the specialized experience described in this announcement.
For qualifications determinations your resume must contain the number of hours worked per week and the dates of employment (i.e., ""HRS per week and month/year to month/year"" or ""HRS per week and month/year to present"").
For additional information see: What to include in your resume


2. Veteran's Documents:

If applying using veteran's preference or under a Veteran's hiring authority you must submit the following documents
DD214 showing character of service, SF-15 Form and VA letter showing final percentage, or certification of expected discharge or release from active duty.
PLEASE REVIEW THE BELOW LINK FOR OTHER SUPPORTING DOCUMENTS needed for proof of eligibility:

https://www.dla.mil/Portals/104/Documents/Careers/downloads/FourthEstateRequiredSupportingDocumentation%2011-16-2020.pdf?ver=Lgkkn1HW9a8is7V2lyCS2Q%3d%3d

If you are claiming Military Spouse Preference, you must submit supporting documents with your application package. These documents must provide acceptable information to verify: you reside within the commuting area of your sponsor's permanent duty station (PDS); proof of marriage to the active duty sponsor, proof of military member's active duty status, and other documentation required by the vacancy announcement to which you are applying; and must meet all pre-employment criteria and be eligible for immediate noncompetitive appointment to a position in the competitive service. Documentation required: Marriage Certificate or License, Signed Self-Certification Checklist, Veterans' Preference documentation (e.g., DD-214, VA Letter, Statement of Service, if applicable), Transcripts (if applicable). Additional documentation required if previously held a federal position: SF-50s (e.g., LWOP, highest grade held, overseas appointments, etc.), SF-75 Information, and documentation of performance rating of record (dated within the last 12 months)

For More Information: https://www.dla.mil/Portals/104/Documents/Careers/downloads/DoDGenAppInfo.pdf
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Military spouses
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
All U.S. Citizens",11150,Washington
81,Program Manager,"Tantus Technologies, Inc","Washington, DC 20005 (Logan Circle area)","$77,826 - $172,574 a year","In anticipation of an award, Tantus Technologies, Inc. Tantus Technologies, Inc. (Tantus) - recognized by the Washington Post as a Top Workplace - is seeking a Program Manager. You will oversee all aspects of the project, leading a team on large projects or a significant segment of large and complex projects. You will analyzes new and complex project-related problems and create innovative solutions , such as schedule, technology, methodology, tools, solution components, and financial management of the project. You will also provide applications systems analysis and long and short-range plans for application selection, systems development, systems maintenance, and production activities for necessary support resources.What You'll DoResponsible for the effective management and administration of work performed under each Call Order, ensuring that all tasks are performed in a timely, efficient and cost-effective manner while maintaining the highest quality of performanceMaintain, assign and manage a qualified, technically proficient, and professionally capable staff throughout the life of the contract. Provide seamless phase-in of Contractor personnel without interruption, minimize personnel turnover, and motivate individuals to achieve excellent performance.Coordinate and communicate with Government staff to provide thorough and timely summary status, risk and issue reporting of open Call Orders.Provide quality deliverables in a timely manner and respond to ad hoc Government inquiries and data calls.Document and maintain a OPMP that identifies project management, application development, delivery, and quality management standards and processes to be used to develop and deliver application solutions. Describe the planned approach for performance measurement and metrics tracking.Provide guidance and oversight to project teams to ensure all contractual requirements are performed in a manner that ensures timely delivery of the required solutions in accordance with contract standards and guidelines, including the development of artifacts related to all SDLC stage gates. Ensure project risks are identified, assessed, mitigated and managed.Participate in meetings in different capacities, as required.Track monthly and cumulative performance metrics as necessary to report risks and issues across open Call orders. Notify government program office regarding significant risks/issues that may negatively affect performance, schedule or cost.Host/support a kick-off meeting to describe its management processes for staffing, communication and reporting, assignment and execution of work as assigned.Support the effective and efficient transitioning to successor Contractors and staff as described in the Transition-out. Facilitate the transfer of all documentation, solution components, source code and other items relating to the development, deployment, operations, and maintenance of solutions.Must HavesMinimum of 7 years of relevant experience or an equivalent combination of education and training that provides the required knowledge, skills and abilities ( managing complex software development or engineering projects)B.A. degree in an associated disciplineNice to HavesPMPWhy Tantus? We Provide: Competitive total compensation package based on the work you do and the contributions you makeAn environment that supports balancing great work with a great lifeA learning organization that invests in you with $3000 annually for professional development opportunitiesExcellent healthcare programs available through United HealthcareCommunity engagement events where you will have ample opportunities to give back by volunteeringDiscretionary quarterly bonuses for above and beyond contributions and outstanding performanceAbout UsTantus is an IT development and management consulting firm helping federal programs become more successful, cost-effective and mission-focused through program management oversight and system development and implementation. Our people are committed to making our world better by delivering solutions to improve the effectiveness of government services and citizen experience. Tantus is Latin for “so great” or “so much” – we strive to put great things into everything we do.Tantus is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), national origin, age (40 or older), disability, military status or any other classification protected by federal, state or local law.Job Type: Full-timePay: $77,826.00 - $172,574.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceFlexible scheduleFlexible spending accountHealth insurancePaid time offProfessional development assistanceReferral programVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",11150,Washington
82,Client Services Administrator - Remote,Nebo Co,"Washington, DC 20016 (Kent area)","$45,000 - $65,000 a year","The Opportunity:
Would you like to be part of a team working in support of the transformation of leaders and organizations? Would you like to have professional experiences that grow YOU while at the same time contributing to the growth of a small professional services firm? If so, read on!
About Nebo:

Join a team of dynamic people who are motivated to create positive change in the world!
The Nebo Company is a virtual innovative coaching and leadership development company. Founded in 2004, Nebo works in partnership with outstanding organizations across many industries and both the public and private sector to develop inspiring, capable leaders. We provide superb leadership coaching and professional development to leaders who want to make a positive difference in the world.
In 2021, we are more passionate than ever about coaching and developing leaders who can bring about important change in the world. Our coaches, facilitators and leadership educators demystify and personalize the practice of leadership. We specialize in guiding leaders to articulate a clear and compelling vision – and then make it real through focused and disciplined execution. Nebo offers a unique and robust perspective that leads to clarity, confidence and effective teamwork.
Our Values

Our values guide and animate our work with each other and our clients. Our five core values are: Resilience, Excellence, Compassion, Impact, Partnership. Learn more about how we define our values and bring them to life at Nebo: (https://nebocompany.com/about/our-values/).
Our Name

The Nebo Company is named after Lake Nebo, a hidden lake in the Adirondack Mountains. In this pristine setting, Founder Katherine Ebner experienced an unforgettable sense of deep connection, creativity and inner peace as a child. Leaving the lake, she wondered how to sustain that feeling of connection and inspiration in everyday life. To us, Nebo is a beautiful metaphor for centered, resilient leadership.
We’ve learned that each person has a “lake within” - a center point from which we can access the resources needed to lead with courage, grace and purpose. Nebo coaches and facilitators guide leaders to navigate their own inner waters to find the source of their highest potential – their nebo. The concept of accessing “your nebo” is at the core of our leadership principles that inform our work with each other and our clients.
Primary Purpose: The Client Services Administrator manages and implements client engagements at Nebo, playing a vital central role in the administration of coaching, leadership development, and organizational consulting services. This position is responsible for entering new client engagements into Nebo’s systems, working closely with Nebo sales teams to ensure a well-orchestrated transition from sales into engagement delivery. The Client Services Administrator works closely with the Director of Coaching Solutions to support coach matching, coordinate administration of 360 and other assessments, coordinate and plan community events, prepare monthly reports and handle the details of other initiatives related to the successful delivery of projects in support of Nebo’s talent pool of coaches and facilitators.


Responsibilities include:

Entering project details into Nebo’s engagement database
Setting up Basecamp site for new engagements
Coordinating the delivery of assessments for projects teams
Managing relationships with vendors who provide assessment instruments to Nebo (DISC, 360 Assessments, Hogan, etc.)
Managing and producing monthly update reports for clients
Coordinating and planning events for Nebo’s Community of Practice, including learning events, training, and special events
Supporting Nebo’s monthly Community of Practice newsletter by organizing topics, gathering information to include, etc.
Managing application process for Continuing Education Credits for training events
Tracking and supporting administration of client feedback surveys for every engagement; summarizing results quarterly for Nebo’s Leadership Team
Coordinating with Nebo’s Business Manager on invoicing details as needed
Participates in designing and implementing processes and systems related to the delivery of client services
Additional responsibilities as needed and assigned


Education/Background:

BA or BS preferred, but not required
3-5 years of experience in detail-focused role in a professional services environment
Project management training and/or experience, preferred but not required
Microsoft Office, Google, Basecamp and other work management software


Skills/Characteristics Required:

Thoughtful and conscientious
Highly organized, efficient and attentive to detail
Balances warm, compassionate people orientation with excellence in handling numerous time sensitive tasks to completion
Professional, outstanding ambassador for Nebo at all times
Excellent verbal and written communication skills; direct, but diplomatic communicator
Consistently meets deadlines
Reliable and hardworking
Self-motivated and able to work well independently and also as a member of a team
Takes initiative to identify and address problems
Analytical, able to synthesize and summarize data and prepare useful, informative reports",11150,Washington
83,Alcohol and Tobacco Regulations Specialist,US Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau,"Washington, DC","$103,690 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
TTB's mission is to collect alcohol, tobacco, firearms and ammunition excise taxes; to ensure that alcohol beverages are labeled, advertised and marketed in accordance with the law; and administer laws and regulations in a manner that protects the revenue, protects the consumer, and promotes voluntary compliance. TTB is one of the Federal government’s best places to work. We ranked in the top 1% of agency subcomponents (tied for #4 of 420) in 2019. See www.bestplacestowork.org.

Responsibilities
The following are the duties of this position at the GS-14 If you are selected at a lower grade level, you will have the opportunity to learn to perform all these duties, and will receive training to help you grow in this position.
Facilitate review and issuance of public guidance.Provide leadership and guidance to Headquarters and Field Operations managers on the development, implementation, and impact of trends, technology, and other matters affecting the assigned program area.Perform complex, in-depth studies and recommend basic changes and/or focus of the regulatory programs and their management.
Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
1801 General Inspection, Investigation, Enforcement, And Compliance Series
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Please refer to ""Conditions of Employment.""
Click ""Print Preview"" to review the entire announcement before applying.
Must be U.S. Citizens or U.S. Nationals.
The experience may have been gained in either the public, private sector or volunteer service. One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis. To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/day/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week on your resume.
Qualifications
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement.

Specialized experience: For the GS-14, you must have one year of specialized experience at a level of difficulty and responsibility equivalent to the GS-13grade level in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position includes:
Functioning as a policy developer and manager for an alcohol, tobacco, or general regulatory program area.
For the GS-13, you must have one year of specialized experience at a level of difficulty and responsibility equivalent to the GS-12grade level in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position includes:
Leading projects and providing guidance and technical advice on matters involving a regulated industry.

In addition to the above requirements, you must meet the following time-in-grade requirement, if applicable:
For the GS-14, you must have been at the GS-13level for 52 weeks.
For the GS-13, you must have been at the GS-12level for 52 weeks.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
We may select from this announcement or any other source to fill one or more vacancies.This is a non-bargaining unit position.We offer opportunities for telework.We offer opportunities for flexible work schedules.

CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT:
A one year probationary period may be required.Must successfully complete a background investigation.Public Trust – Background Investigation will be required.Complete a Declaration for Federal Employment to determine your suitability for Federal employment, at the time requested by the agency.If you are a male applicant born after December 31, 1959, certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System or are exempt from having to do so.Have your salary sent to a financial institution of your choice by Direct Deposit/Electronic Funds Transfer.Go through a Personal Identity Verification (PIV) process that requires two forms of identification from the Form I-9. Federal law requires verification of the identity and employment eligibility of all new hires in the U.S.Undergo an income tax verification.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Your application includes your résumé, responses to the online questions, and required supporting documents. Please be sure that your résumé includes detailed information to support your qualifications for this position; failure to provide sufficient evidence in your résumé may result in a “not qualified” determination.

Rating: Your application will be evaluated in the following areas: Technical, Research and Analysis, and Communication. Your application will be rated and ranked among others, based on your responses to the online questions, regarding your experience, education, training, performance appraisals and awards relevant to the duties of this position. Your rating may be lowered if your responses to the online questions are not supported by the education and/or experience described in your application.

Referral: If you are among the top qualified candidates, your application may be referred to a selecting official for consideration. You may be required to participate in a selection interview.

If you are a displaced or surplus Federal employee (eligible for the Career Transition Assistance Plan (CTAP)/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Plan (ICTAP)) you must receive a score of 92 or better to be rated as “well qualified"" to receive special selection priority.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
A complete application includes 1. A résumé, 2. Vacancy question responses, and 3. Submission of any required documents. Please note that if you do not provide all required information, as specified in this announcement, you may not be considered for this position (or may not receive the special consideration for which you may be eligible).

All applicants are required to submit a résumé either by creating one in USAJOBS or uploading one of their own choosing. (Cover letters are optional.) To receive full credit for relevant experience, please list the month/date/year and number of hours worked for experience listed on your résumé. We suggest that you preview the online questions, as you may need to customize your résumé to ensure that it supports your responses to these questions. Please view résumé tips.

CAREER TRANSITION ASSISTANCE PLAN (CTAP) OR INTERAGENCY CAREER TRANSITION ASSISTANCE PLAN (ICTAP) DOCUMENTATION: If you are a displaced or surplus Federal employee, click CTAP/ICTAP for eligibility and a detailed list of required documents.

CURRENT AND FORMER FEDERAL EMPLOYEES - Documentation Relating to Your Federal Employment:
Submit a copy of your SF-50, Notification of Personnel Action, which shows your current (or most recent) grade and competitive service status. (The “position occupied” block on the SF-50 should show a “1” and your “tenure” block should show a “1” or “2”.)If you are currently on a Veterans Recruitment Appointment (VRA), submit a copy of an SF-50 showing that. Also, you must submit a copy of your DD214 or other documentation showing dates of service and type of discharge and any other applicable documents such as SF-15, VA letters, etc.Indicate on your application the highest permanent grade you have held; if this grade is different from your current grade, submit a copy of an additional SF-50 showing this grade.

If you are applying under a special hiring authority (e.g. Military Spouses, Interchange Agreement, VEOA, VRA, Schedule A Disability, etc.), please see applicant guide for required documentation. In order to be eligible under one of these authorities, you must submit all required documentation as outlined in the applicant guide.

PERFORMANCE APPRAISAL - Submit a copy of your most recent, signed, completed annual performance appraisal which includes the final rating. If it is not dated within the last 18 months or if you have not received a performance appraisal, please explain why in your application.

Recommended Documents: In addition, we recommend that you submit the following:
A list of awards received (if applicable). Please do not send copies of awards.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Our comprehensive benefits are very generous. Our benefits package includes:

Challenging work, opportunities for advancement, competitive salaries, bonuses and incentive awards.Ten paid holidays, 13 days of sick leave, and 13 to 26 days of vacation time each year.Access to insurance programs that may be continued after you retire.A wide choice of health insurance plans, coverage for pre-existing conditions, and no waiting periods. We pay a substantial amount (up to 75%) of the health insurance premiums.A retirement program which includes employer-matching contributions.Learn more about Federal benefits programs at: https://help.usajobs.gov/index.php/Pay_and_Benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Individuals with disabilities
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Family of overseas employees
Family members of a federal employee or uniformed service member who is, or was, working overseas.
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
All candidates who are: Current or former federal employees qualifying as Status Candidates, Federal employees currently serving on a VRA, VEOA eligibles, CTAP/ICTAP eligibles, eligible for special hiring authorities (e.g., the Schedule A appointment for persons with disabilities, or covered by an Interchange Agreement), or Land Management employees eligible under Public Law 114-47.",11150,Washington
84,Associate Account Manager,Amazon Advertising LLC,"Arlington, VA",None,"
Experience with Microsoft Excel
Experience analyzing data and best practices to assess performance drivers

Amazon Advertising is looking for Associate Account Managers to drive the success and continued growth of our business. This role is for persistent candidates who are passionate about making effective and analytically driven marketing decisions. The ideal candidate has a history of accomplishing goals and exceeding deliverables. They are a strong analytical thinker and problem solver who thrives in fast-paced, dynamic environments. They are a communicator, effective listener, and project manager who is able to balance multiple and often conflicting priorities. To be successful you will not only dive deep into data to understand trends, you will clearly communicate the “why” behind results and make actionable recommendations to internal and external partners. This is an exciting opportunity to learn about our advertising solutions and how these drive the overall Amazon business.

Interested in advertising? Interested in advertising at Amazon?

Amazon Advertising is recruiting for their Associate Account Manager program. Through the course of this highly visible six-month program, you will learn about the digital advertising industry and how it relates to a dynamic ecommerce environment. You'll receive training and coaching from some of the most innovative minds in the industry, develop Amazon business acumen, and be responsible for deliverables on your accounts. Upon graduation, you will make an immediate impact through ownership of a book of business within digital advertising at Amazon. This is an exciting professional development opportunity in one of the fastest growing businesses at Amazon.

Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:

Become a knowledgeable partner on Amazon Advertising solutions
Perform data analysis to deliver actionable recommendations that effect short term / long term digital media strategy
Prioritize and deliver timely, high quality work
Ability to deliver the highest level customer service to our clients
Educate advertisers on performance metrics and how to accomplish greater results on Amazon
Develop annual brand, media, and campaign strategies for growth based on overall advertiser goals/objectives
Evaluate KPIs and optimize campaign performance using a data driven approach

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us .


Work, internship or other leadership experience in a professional comparable environment
Excellent oral and written communication skills and an ability to impact others internally and external
An ability to analyze quantitatively, and problem-solve
Demonstrated ability to perform well in a highly dynamic, rapidly changing environment

",11150,Washington
85,Racial Equity Manager,Bread for the City,"Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)","$65,000 - $72,000 a year","Our Mission:
The mission of Bread for the City is to help Washington, DC residents living with low income develop the power to determine the future of their own communities. We provide food, clothing, medical care, and legal and social services to reduce the burden of poverty. We seek justice through community organizing and public advocacy. We work to uproot racism, a major cause of poverty. We are committed to treating our clients with the dignity and respect that all people deserve.
Position Profile:
This person will support Bread for the City’s continued journey toward being an anti-racist institution, helping to guide integration of racial equity principles throughout the organization, including within our programs/departments, and our client leadership. This is a manager-level position within the Advocacy and Organizing Department spanning both the Southeast and Northwest Centers. The salary range for this position is $65 - $72k, commensurate with experience.
Essential Position Responsibilities:
Lead Bread for the City’s Racial Equity Leadership Team.
Guide the development and implementation of Bread for the City’s Racial Equity Action Plan;
Develop meeting agendas and coordinates logistics for the RELT meetings;
Support RELT sub-committees as needed, including helping to facilitate productive discussions that help them move toward identified goals/objectives;
 Consult with members of the Quality Improvement Team in the continued development of metrics, instruments and processes to measure racial equity outcomes at Bread for the City;
Communicate RELT projects, successes and opportunities for engagement to clients, staff and the wider community via blogs and other regular communications.
Drive Bread for the City’s efforts to create, and implement internal policies, as well as advance racial analyses, that shift organizational culture to ensure racial equity.
Help identify and address instances, patterns, practices and policies of systemic/institutional racism;
Promote staff understanding of, and investment in, racial equity principles, including creation and promotion of relevant trainings, tools, etc.; this includes ensuring that all new hires and all client leadership (CAC, COREE) go through racial equity training in their first year at Bread for the City;
Work with the CEO to create opportunities for BFC's Boards to go through racial equity training as part of their Board leadership requirements;
Support departments & programs in setting and implementing annual and long-term racial equity goals;
Continue to learn about best practices to support racially equitable organizational development;
Work to ensure that all people of color and ethnicities present in the Bread for the City community are represented in racial equity work;
Meet regularly with CEO, department, program and other staff and client leaders to ensure a coordinated approach that capitalizes on synergies between current and future projects;
Support Bread for the City Staff in Creating Racially Just Systems Outside of BFC.
Serve as a spokesperson for Bread for the City’s Racial Equity work
Participate in panel discussions, discussions with funders, and other speaking engagements as needed
Work with Advocacy Director to ensure that BFC’s external policy and organizing work is consistently grounded in racial equity principles
Develop a relationship with DD Government's Council Office on Racial Equity.
Qualifications:
Demonstrated experience leading organizations through racial equity processes, including trainings and other activities;
Demonstrated commitment and comprehensive understanding of race, racism, & racial equity work, especially in DC;
Excellent communicator with exceptional listening skills;
Ability to build rapport with a diverse range of clients, colleagues, and community members through effective communication, team building, listening skills, and empathy;
Innovative thinker, with demonstrated ability to convert thought and planning into action;
Expertise in facilitating complex discussions;
Ability to manage multiple projects across different departments, programs and groups;
Creative, innovative and strategic in approaches to overcoming obstacles;
Compassion, trustworthiness, and patience for all people regardless of their background, position;
Practice dealing with adversity and conflict;
Ability to set and measure goals throughout the course of a multifaceted long-term change project;
English fluency required; Bilingual (Spanish) preferred;
Proficiency with tech tools (Microsoft Office programs, Google Docs/Sheets/Slides, etc.);
Demonstrated ability to work as a part of a multidisciplinary team, including the ability to work with volunteers in a professional and collaborative manner;
Willingness to learn and carry out Bread for the City's commitments to social justice and racial equity.
Bread for the City is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, ancestry, age, marital status, sexual orientation, family responsibility, physical or mental disability, medical condition, status as a veteran, or any other category protected by applicable federal, state, or local law, except where a bona fide occupational qualification applies.
To Apply:
You must complete an application through Bread for the City’s ADP portal. Click here to review available openings and click on ""Racial Equity Manager"" position. Then select ""apply"" at the top right hand corner to register for a login and apply for the position. Please upload a resume and cover letter that speaks to your interest and qualifications through this online application process. Your application will not be considered complete unless it includes a cover letter. Only those candidates selected for interviews will be contacted. No phone calls.",11150,Washington
86,Part-time Retail Employee - Early Morning Stock Shifts,The Container Store Inc.,"Reston, VA 20190 (Sunset Hills area)",None,"Overview:

Our part-time early morning stock shifts are involved in unloading a truck and merchandising.
This role will require early morning shifts starting between 5am and 6am.
A $2 per hour differential will be paid for early morning shifts scheduled to begin between 5:00 am - 7:00 am and spent unloading trucks and merchandising the store prior to the store opening.
Additional shifts may be available in order processing, registers and sales and would include daytime, evenings, and weekends.
What We Stand For
Established in 1978, The Container Store has grown to be the leading specialty retailer of storage and organization products in the United States and the only national retailer solely devoted to the category. We provide creative, multifunctional, customizable storage and organization solutions that help our customers save time, save space and improve the quality of their lives.
We foster an employee-first culture built around our Foundation Principles, which define how we approach our relationships with our employees, vendors, customers and communities and influence every aspect of our business.
Responsibilities:

In early morning truck shifts, you are….
Unloading trucks, lifting boxes, merchandising products, climbing ladders, and working at a safe but fast pace
Organizing, cleaning the store, and ensuring we have a well-presented store
Working with a great team, surrounded by lively music, resulting in a huge sense of accomplishment
 Processing Customer Orders, you are…
Pulling product for customers’ orders in a timely manner
Maintaining the stockroom to ensure it is organized to support visual and selling efforts of the store
Communicating and following up with customers on issues regarding their orders, all the way through resolution
Carrying orders to customers cars for contactless pickup
 In registers and sales, you are…
Engaging with customers at the register, offering product information and sharing promotions as a brand ambassador
On the salesfloor engaging in thoughtful conversations with customers while maintaining the visual appearance of the store
Collaborating and communicating with customers to present projects and customized plans in a clear and professional manner
Keeping pace with customers, balancing multiple priorities and using good judgment to manage time
The Benefits of Working Here
Our benefits exemplify our commitment to an employee-first culture, ensuring employees and their families are well taken care of, safe and secure. Some of our benefits include:
Competitive Pay
Medical/Dental/Vision Plans
Discount: 50% on Elfa, 40% on Merchandise and Gift Cards, 25% on Avera and Laren
Paid Time Off plus Holidays
401(k) plan
Ongoing training including our Leadership Development Program and Manager Training Program
Employee First Fund: providing grants to employees experiencing unforeseen emergencies
Qualifications:

What You Bring To Us
You are an early bird and are available for early morning shifts starting between 5 and 6am
You love to engage with people.
You are passionate about connecting with customers and your team to provide clear, concise, compassionate communication.
You love a fast-paced environment and doing a variety of jobs throughout your work day.
You enjoy organizing and helping customers find solutions.
You are always learning! You are eager to learn how technology and selling work together to provide an exceptional customer experience.
You take pride in your work. It’s your store!
You understand retail is an ever-changing industry and remain flexible with your schedule.
You want to delight the people around you and can’t wait to share that at The Container Store!
You are at least 18 years of age.
The Container Store promotes a smoke-free, drug-free environment.
We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and comply with the Americans with Disabilities Act
Stores Physical Requirements
State Specific Notices",11150,Washington
87,Community Engagement Manager,Unite Us,"Reston, VA",None,"Who we are:
As our co-founders transitioned from military to civilian life, they encountered barriers and inefficiencies navigating the most basic health and social services. Together, they set out to improve that experience for others. Recognizing that social care is essential for better health outcomes, they embarked on a mission to connect people to the care they need, when they need it, in communities across the country. Unite Us has developed an intuitive and seamless technology solution that goes beyond the traditional referral method. We work side-by-side with local organizations, and track data and outcomes to build coordinated care networks that support all aspects of community health. Unite Us is boldly changing the nation's care delivery system. If you want to do well and do good, join Unite Us– we can build healthier communities together.

About the Role

As a Community Engagement Manager you are passionate about the community you live in, understand its history, culture, and challenges, and want to make it healthier and more equitable for everyone. You will connect health and social care organizations to build a local network through our platform. As the face of Unite Us y ou will know what our platform can do, train others on how to use it, and answer questions on its effectiveness.

Every day you will work alongside community champions to drive the adoption of Unite Us by conducting outreach and hosting meetings in order to create new partnerships. To thrive in this role you must be a natural connector who is energized by the prospect of building relationships with local community-based organizations, non-profits, government agencies, and clinical providers.

What You'll Do:

Serve as a trusted partner to community based organizations by being an expert resource and an active listener who is continually engaged with user feedback
Utilize our team's best practices and workflows while also bringing innovations and creative process improvements
Demonstrate and communicate how our product is helping communities

You're a Great Fit for this Role If….

You have experience working in the health or human services field
You are a self-starter who is comfortable turning big ideas into actionable processes and project plans
You can read a room and tailor your message to a specific audience
When faced with a mix of fully vetted processes, partially developed ideas, and brand new situations, you'll confront them and thrive

Environmental Job Requirements & Working Conditions:

This position can be based in Alexandria City, Arlington, Fairfax City, Fredericksburg, or Reston
This position includes 30% travel within your assigned region

Unite Us is committed to building a diverse team and fostering an inclusive culture, and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We embrace and encourage our employees' differences in race, religion, color, national origin, gender, family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy, medical conditions, and other characteristics. If you require assistance in applying for open positions due to a disability, please email us at peopleops@uniteus.com to request an accommodation.",11150,Washington
88,IT Manager,Byte Back,"Washington, DC 20002 (Capitol Hill area)","$65,000 - $70,000 a year","Byte Back is seeking an IT Manager to join the growing team of Byte Back a dynamic nonprofit providing innovative tech training that has earned national attention and support.
The IT Manager is a mission-driven, strategic, organized, and experienced IT professional who excels at thinking systematically, enjoys troubleshooting issues large and small, and is excited to help others learn IT. The IT Manager will lead IT for Byte Back, including managing all technology assets, setting the IT strategy, training staff on key hardware and software, and providing staff with IT support. The IT Manager will also serve as lead IT support for Byte Back's students, overseeing our equipment loaner program and designing hands-on instruction opportunities for select Byte Back participants.
About Byte Back
Byte Back provides a pathway of inclusive tech training that leads to living-wage careers. As a leader in digital inclusion since 1997, the nonprofit serves more than 500 adults per year in the Washington, DC area and Baltimore. Byte Back students are predominantly people of color, women, and unemployed or underemployed adults. In 2019, 57 graduates were hired, earning $23,463 more per year than before Byte Back training. Byte Back's innovative approach and leaders have been featured locally and nationally, at SXSW, TEDx, ""The Root 100,"" Washington Business Journal, Voice of America, and NBC Washington.
Byte Back operates sites in Baltimore and Washington, DC, where the organization is headquartered. The IT Manager would oversee approximately 230 users.
Position Responsibilities
Operations Support
Troubleshoot hardware, network, and software issues related to internal IT
Lead large IT projects, including the design and deployment of new IT systems and services, such as virtual machines
Lead IT strategy and processes for the organization, including selecting, procuring, and budgeting for devices
Analyze organizational business requirements and fully administer software platforms, such as Slack, Asana, and Microsoft 365, to maximize efficiency and ease-of-use
Oversee network development for the organization across all sites
Train staff and volunteers to use hardware and software including Windows, Outlook, Office, Teams, OneDrive, SharePoint
Create an IT onboarding process and lead new employees through it
Maintain all IT equipment, including printers and multifunction devices, in the office and classrooms; keep equipment functioning and updated and recommend improvements and budget appropriately for upgrades and replacements
Oversee contracted service providers, to include ISP and phone systems (VOIP)
Budgeting, Procurement, and Asset Management
Work with the Finance Department to develop and maintain the annual budget for equipment, licenses, and services
Coordinate with the staff and Finance Department to procure new services and equipment
Manage support and contract renewals
Maintain equipment inventory, including desktop computers, printers/scanners, laptops, tablets, desk phones, headsets, etc.
Manage, coordinate, and maintain key vendor relationships
Program Support
Manage an IT Specialist, who supports a 1-year grant-funded IT loaner program
Design and lead part-time hands-on learning program for Byte Back students
Provide IT support for student computers/devices, including imaging loaner laptops and computers at Byte Back sites
Improve and implement process for loaning equipment to students
Advise Byte Back program leadership on curriculum and continual development of IT career pathway
Required Qualifications
At least four years experience in IT support and/or management
Project management experience
Strategic thinker, confident in setting IT strategy for the organization
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Preferred Qualifications
Degree or industry-recognized certifications in IT
CompTIA Certification (A+, Net+, Sec+)
Experience leading educational programming and/or internships
Nonprofit experience
Experience managing personnel
Employment Type Full-Time/Exempt
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $65,000 - $70,000 per year
COVID-19 Considerations and Employment Location: Due to COVID-19, most of Byte Back's employees are working remotely. The IT Manager's time will be split between remote and in-person work. It will regularly be necessary for the IT Manager to work at Byte Back's DC and Baltimore sites. This role is primarily in-person and on-site. Expected percentages for on-site at DC (50%), travel to Baltimore site (25%), and remote (25%). These percentages may be flexible and are subject to change based on IT environment needs.
Byte Back provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender or gender identity, sex, pregnancy, age, disability, genetic information, marital status, sexual orientation, veteran status, or any other status protected by applicable federal, state, or local laws. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, work assignments, and training.
Byte Back is led by people of color, women, and members of the LGBTQ community, and our team is diverse. People of all races, colors, sexual orientations, ages, genders, abilities, national origins, and religions are encouraged to apply. We work to cultivate a safe work environment where you are valued as yourself and have equal opportunities to advance.",11150,Washington
89,"Manager, Technical Infrastructure Support",CareFirst BlueCross BlueShield,"Washington, DC 20024 (Southwest Waterfront area)",None,"Resp & Qualifications
PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTABILITIES: Under the general direction of the Director, Infrastructure Strategy and Delivery, the incumbent’s accountabilities include, but are not limited to, the following:
1. Primary responsibility for the organizational structure, processes, and staffing within the section to ensure that each is consistent with corporate initiatives and adequate to meet section goals. The manager evaluates performance of each team member, generates development plans and sets goals within the context of the corporate policy. Must also hire, motivate, coach, counsel and develop team members within the context of the corporate policies and manages the team’s budget. Ensures that staff has appropriate tools and training
2. Manages the leadership and planning to ensure resources are utilized appropriately to meet the Division’s strategic objectives. Assigns responsibility and authority to appropriate staff within the team. Reviews staffing requirements within the team to ensure that each is consistent and adequate to meet department goals. Provides technical leadership and oversight as required to ensure that all software or systems for which they are responsible are monitored and tuned to ensure acceptable levels of performance and resource utilization.

3. Researches technical and theoretical developments in the field to ensure that customers are receiving the most effective support to meet their business objectives. Provides input to the development of corporate IT standards and policies to ensure compatibility and integration throughout the company. Approve/Manage subcontracting and vendor evaluation studies pertaining to the IT organization, IT Infrastructure and Architectures. Stays current in new IT technologies to maintain high level subject matter expertise.
4. Communicates with Directors and other Corporate management to plan and implement Division Strategic Objectives. The manager also communicates with other IT and client personnel as well as vendors, consultants, auditors, and customers to coordinate and implement system projects and enhancements. Attend management sessions to ensure that the team’s operation and long-range goals are coordinated within the larger framework of department, divisional and corporate initiatives.

QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
Required: This position requires a bachelor’s degree and 7-9 years of experience in IT Operations or Systems Support, or total equivalent work experience. Experience in full life cycle project management. Proven ability to organize and manage multiple projects and to deliver projects on time and on budget. Demonstrated success in management and leadership. Prior experience with technologies and systems related to the department’s core activities that include, but are not limited to, Data Base Administration, MQSeries, UNIX, Storage, and WebSphere. Extensive experience with specific functions of area managed.

Abilities/Skills: Ability to teach, develop, and motivate others. Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills. Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Excellent interpersonal skills, including the ability to negotiate and manage customer relationships and expectations. Extensive PC skills including Microsoft office software such as Word, EXCEL, Visio and PowerPoint.


Preferred: Broad knowledge of CareFirst organization and operations. Experience with project management tools such as MS Project. Experience with best industry practices for project management (including resource estimating, tracking, metrics, gap analyses, and project mid-point reviews). Experience with both mainframe and client/server technology. Experience with other tools specific to the area managed. College Degree or MA preferred.
Equal Employment Opportunity
CareFirst BlueCross BlueShield is an Equal Opportunity (EEO) employer. It is the policy of the Company to provide equal employment opportunities to all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran or disabled status, or genetic information.
Hire Range Disclaimer
Actual salary will be based on relevant job experience and work history.
Where To Apply
Please visit our website to apply: www.carefirst.com/careers
Closing Date
Please apply before: 7.13.21
Federal Disc/Physical Demand
Note: The incumbent is required to immediately disclose any debarment, exclusion, or other event that makes him/her ineligible to perform work directly or indirectly on Federal health care programs.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS:
The associate is primarily seated while performing the duties of the position. Occasional walking or standing is required. The hands are regularly used to write, type, key and handle or feel small controls and objects. The associate must frequently talk and hear. Weights up to 25 pounds are occasionally lifted.
Sponsorship in US
Must be eligible to work in the U.S. without Sponsorship",11150,Washington
90,IT Project Manager,E-INFOSOL LLC,"Washington, DC 20004 (Downtown area)",None,"E-INFOSOL is seeking a IT Project Manager to support a contract in the Chantilly, Virginia area.
Job Description
The IT Project Manager will:
Provide technical leadership, demonstrated through leading meetings such as scrums, team meetings, and customer briefs, reporting of team status, identifying risks.
Supports a technology and innovation office, Agency stakeholders and program management
Research and document user profiles, analysis tasks, workflows, and user scenarios.
Collect and document user requirements.
Create user interface design specifications.
Work closely with product designers and process engineers developing applications.
Oversee usability testing.
Design and develop user surveys to obtain user feedback.
Work directly with high level clients requiring
Requirements
ClearanceActive Top-Secret clearance
Minimum Education PreferredBachelor’s degree, or higher, in an IT technical field or business
Minimum Experience Required
5 + years of experience in IT Project Management or Technical Lead position
10+ years of IT related experience
PMP certification highly preferred
Shall have the ability to design desirable user interfaces that meets the users’ needs and taste
Has experience with task management via JIRA and supporting software development efforts.
Excellent Communications Skill
Exceptional Presentation Skills
Understands Cloud Technologies (e.g., AWS, Azure)
About E-INFOSOL:
E-INFOSOL is a Service Disabled and Veteran Owned Small Business (SDVOSB) located in the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area. We are a premiere IT Security, Cloud and Virtualization provider servicing both federal and state government, and private sector customers. Through strategic partnerships with top industry players such as Amazon Web Services (AWS), VMware, Microsoft and Nutanix, we are able to provide an array of IT products and solutions, combining them with our expertise.
Why E-INFOSOL:
E-INFOSOL has 10 years in the digital world expanding with new clientele and jobs rapidly. E-INFOSOL is constantly aware of, technical changes within IT and wants to ensure future candidates can make a difference with contributing their different skills and knowledge. We offer an array of architectural, engineering, and information technological jobs to a diverse group of candidates. Come join the E-INFOSOL family and be a part of the vast growing culture that contributes to the world.",11150,Washington
91,IT Portfolio Manager,Arena Technoloiges,"Chantilly, VA 20151","$120,000 - $140,000 a year","Expertise in Visual Insights for Business Data directly supports National SecurityAbout the PositionFully Funded; Immediately Available; 4 years Remaining on ContractThis is an opportunity to directly support the senior leadership of an Intelligence Community client. This position facilitates consistent guidance, processes, decision-making and associated accountability at all levels of the organization by providing support to business goals. As a member of the Strategy Development and Management team, this role participates in activities to proactively and strategically plan and assess the IT portfolio(s) of the client's organization.Responsibilities- Leverage portfolio tools/information to address formal and ad-hoc finance related data calls from stakeholders (e.g., Tableau, PowerBI or other data visualization tools)- Apply systematic management to large classes of enterprise Information Technology (IT) capabilities to quantify, measure and evaluate IT efforts against strategic goals and objectives;-Establish, manage, and update IT portfolio management processes;-Provide technical assistance to investment and decision support functions, and provide recommendations for resource allocation to improve alignment with strategies and goals;-Conduct performance management analysis and decision support that realizes routine investment performance (e.g., cost, schedule, and performance) against planned accomplishments through coordinated program reviews with program stakeholders;-Draft portfolio-level and program-level planning guidance input, and coordinate input with stakeholders.-Support tasks and projects across the broader contract scope according to their specific, personal expertise and capabilities.About YouYour experience and expertise will provide critical time-sensitive intelligence, surveillance and reconnaissance support to an Intelligence Community agency. Your drive for excellence will make you an essential part of a culture that values and invests in each employee. Your goals of a healthy work-life balance and desire to contribute to building a high-caliber team will be indispensable in our commitment to making an immediate impact on our nation's security.About the RequiredTop Secret security clearance, SCI eligible, with CI Poly or willing to take a polygraphData visualization tools experience (e.g., Tableau)MS/MA degree with 5+ years or BS/BA degree with 8+ years of demonstrated performance related to the tasks aboveExperience supporting multi-agency projects and initiativesAbility to excel as a team member of a collaborative team through open communication, transparency and flexibilityAbility to relate professionally with senior Government customers and colleaguesStrong written and verbal communication skillsAbout the DesiredNRO or IC experienceKnowledge and understanding of Intelligence Community IT Enterprise (IC ITE) service offerings, architectures, and service adoptionBachelor's or Master's degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or MathematicsAbout the PerksArena offers competitive salaries and an excellent benefits package, along with a positive work environment enabling the success of our staff, company, and customers. We know, everyone says that, right? Well, let’s outline some specifics to illustrate our commitment to you:· 401k with company match…no vesting!· Medical, Prescription, Dental, Disability, Life…all available from highly rated carriers· The training and certification opportunities are there for the taking…you make the case for how it will improve your ability to do the job, we cover the cost· Work-Life Balance…15 days of PTO and 10 holidays out of the starting gate· Staying healthy just got fun…and easy. We’ll cover the monthly cost of your health club membership (up to a point, of course…don’t go getting crazy on this one!)· New iPad when on-boarded, and it’s yours to keep after a year of service…we want you to have a fun way to stay connected· To learn more: http://www.arenatechnologies.com/employee-benefits/About UsJoining Arena Technologies puts you in the driver’s seat of your career. We pride ourselves in providing critical and focused business and technology consulting support to the agencies and industry partners of the defense and intelligence communities. Specializing in transformative change on behalf of all of our customers, our Team is full of talented people committed to providing vital support to our nation…if you’re interested in working in a dynamic, collaborative, and supportive environment, Arena Technologies is the place for you!Arena Technologies is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, disability or protected veteran status.About ApplyingGo ahead, apply! You know you want to. There’s excitement in the air and a feeling in your gut that this is going to be a great adventure and you’re looking forward to becoming a part of the committed and distinguished Arena Team!Job Type: Full-timePay: $120,000.00 - $140,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee assistance programEmployee discountFlexible scheduleFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offProfessional development assistanceReferral programRetirement planTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridaySupplemental Pay:Bonus paySecurity Clearance:Top Secret (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",11150,Washington
92,Program Analysis Officer,Government of the District of Columbia,"Washington, DC","$93,776 - $131,286 a year","Duties

Brief Description of Duties:
This position is located in the District of Columbia Health Benefit Exchange (DCHBX) Authority (Authority). The mission of the Authority is to implement a health care exchange program in the District of Columbia in accordance with the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (PPACA) of 2010 and the District of Columbia Health Benefit Exchange Authority Establishment Act of 2011, thereby ensuring access to quality and affordable health care to all District of Columbia residents.
The function of this position is to serve as Program Analysis Officer with responsibility for overseeing, areas of policy research, investigation, analysis and development of new and/or improved processes, procedures, and training materials designed to improve DCHBX program services operations. This includes evaluating policies for the purpose of improving the efficiency and effectiveness of the individual eligibility and enrollment program and the Contact Center; and overseeing staff who will participate in implementing some of these policies and procedures. The work supports the Eligibility and Enrollment Program Manager in the research, evaluation, analysis and development of new and/or improved processes and procedures designed to improve the agency’s administrative, managerial, and operational efficiency. The work, also, supports implementation and operations of the HBX, including eligibility and enrollment and Contact Center functions.
POSITION CONTROLS
The Eligibility and Enrollment Program Manager provides general direction, supervision and guidance on initial assignments in the form of broadly stated policies, objectives, and available resources. The Program Manager relies on the incumbent to exercise considerable independent judgment in planning, organizing and executing assignments, which include determine approach, methods and procedures that will work most effectively and expeditiously to accomplish program goals and objectives. Work is evaluated in terms of judgment exercised in management decisions, attention to details, dependability and overall fulfillment of program objectives. Recommendations for new approaches or policies are often developed collaborative with senior level leaders, and usually reviewed for compatibility with broad HBX program and Agency objectives, impact on the DCHBX and/or improvement in the effectiveness of programs throughout the Marketplace Innovation, Policy, and Operations Division.
Principal guidelines include: established District of Columbia laws, regulations, policies, and procedures, including HBX regulations, policies, and procedures; pertinent federal laws, regulations, policies, and procedures; and specific instructions from the Executive Director and the Director for Program Services. Guidelines, also, include accepted public health and insurance principles and practices and authoritative guidance issued by the Centers for Medicaid and Medicare Services (CMS), particularly the Center for Consumer Information and Insurance Oversight (CCIIO). Incumbent uses sound judgment and ingenuity in interpreting, adapting, and applying the guidelines; and exercises ingenuity when deviating from the traditional methods.
DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Develops and oversees implementation of policies and procedures surrounding DC Health Link individual eligibility and enrollment processes. Develops policies and procedures for DC Health Link Contact Center. Evaluates policies for the purpose of improving the efficiency and effectiveness of the individual eligibility and enrollment program and the Contact Center.
Conducts extensive research and provides oral or written detailed advice to the Program Manager with respect to recommendations, proposed actions, alternative actions, and hypothetical situations. Presents critical observations, findings and recommendations on proposed changes in government policies, operation and legislation.
Researches, investigates, conducts feasibility studies, and recommends new improved business and management practices for application to agency program. Identifies program strengths and deficiencies; and recommends changes or corrective action relative to program design, policies, procedures, and operations.
Manages, monitors and administers project activities. Develops, modifies, or provides input to project plans. Implements plans to meet objectives/timeliness.
Evaluates progress on projects and makes or develops significant adjustments to project plans as required. Identifies problems; determines accuracy and relevance of information, using sound judgment to generate and evaluate alternatives; and makes recommendations.
Oversees staff who works directly with the Contact Center on emergent issues impacting DC Health Link consumers. Supervises, directs and manages staff to accomplish goals that may involve interdivisional work, particularly with the DC Health Link Contact Center. Monitors progress and effectiveness of the assignments and projects.
Provides direction and guidance, and assures that the work is performed in an efficient and effective manner; resolves operational problems with timely and
economical solutions; and evaluates work performance; and approves and disapproves leave.
Provides training and technical assistance to the Exchange Contact Center, including their staff members, regarding changes, updates, or new policy issues.
Represents supervisor at selected meetings and conferences, as required.
Performs other related duties as assigned.
OTHER SIGNIFICANT FACTS
Extensive Knowledge of the Affordable Care Act and interrelationship between programs of the DCHBX and key administrative support functions, including the interrelationship with the Exchange Contact Center and the DC Healthcare Finance Administration and Economic Security Administration. Understanding of the federal oversight and jurisdiction – Internal Revenue Services (IRS), Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS), Office of Personnel Management (OPM), etc.
Ability to conduct research of the feasibility of proposed solutions to agency programs and policy gaps or inconsistencies to positively influence the overall mission of the DCHBX.
Demonstration of superior skills in the application of analytical and evaluative methods, and qualitative and quantitative methods to interpret information and data related to the assessment of complex and/or unyielding problem areas; to recommend improvements in complex programmatic, managerial and administrative processes; and to plan, organize and direct team study work.
Demonstrated knowledge of management concepts, practices and methodologies sufficient to develop and support Division actions. Knowledge of administrative laws, policies, regulations and precedents which govern the agency and its work.
Demonstrated skill and experience in providing leadership in a supervisory capacity, and in providing leadership in a team-based environment.
Superior oral and written communication skill sufficient to advise and consult with a variety of management officials, supervisors and others prepare and present reports. Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with all levels of government as well as external stakeholder organizations and staff.
SPECIAL REQUIREMENT:
Education and Experience:
Education: Bachelor’s degree from an accredited four year-college or university in business and public administration, human resource management (HRM) or related field, plus five (5) years of work related experience; OR an equivalent combination of education and/or experience which exhibits the ability to perform satisfactorily in the position.
Master’s degree and a minimum of three (3) years of demonstrated health policy experience are desirable.
Experience: Experience in implementing private market health insurance reforms and programs which include working with IT vendors on design, Federal experience highly preferred.
The incumbent is designated as an essential employee, and must be willing to work flexible hours including weekends and evenings to support the DHBX operations, particularly during periods of open enrollment.",11150,Washington
93,IT Support Specialist,Allied Telecom,"Arlington, VA 22202 (Aurora Highlands area)","$50,000 - $62,000 a year","The primary responsibility of the IT Support Specialist is to provide IT support services to all end users by effectively gathering, evaluating, and utilizing relevant information to resolve all software and hardware related problems. The IT Support Specialist will communicate effectively with end-users by phone, e-mail, or other electronic communication and in-person to resolve issues and provide training of the IT infrastructure, as necessary. The IT Support Specialist will work closely with their manager and peers to escalate problems in a timely manner to ensure end-user satisfaction.
Key areas of responsibility:

Serve as the primary point of contact for all IT related technical issues and support questions
Perform day-to-day administration of all Allied systems (i.e. Salesforce, Rev.io, Zendesk, Okta, etc.)
Perform day-to-day desktop support functions (Windows, Mac, Linux)
Support ticket management, information gathering, and resolution
Maintain an accurate record of all IT-provided equipment
Assist in the procurement of additional IT-provided equipment as necessary
Provide user-friendly e-mail, phone, and in-person support as necessary
Perform day-to-day support and administration of the Allied phone system
Responsible for moves, adds, and changes as necessary
Perform day-to-day maintenance and support of the printer and copier systems
Perform day-to-day maintenance and support of the company audio-visual equipment
Identify and implement cost-effective solutions meeting end-user requirements
Escalate issues in a timely manner to ensure high-level customer satisfaction
Assist with the development of technical documentation of existing and future systems
Provide training to new and existing users and provide guidance on how to effectively utilize all Allied systems
Develop and create customizations for all Allied Systems based on user request (ie. Reports, Dashboards, etc.)
Lead IT small projects, including the design and deployment of new IT systems and services impacting a subset of users
Keep abreast of new technologies and provide recommendations for system improvements
Willing to work outside of core hours
Other duties as they are assigned


Qualifications

2-3+ years of corporate IT Helpdesk experience
Working knowledge of IT networks, ISP Services, Routing Protocols, VoIP, Network Management, Routers, and Switches
Desire to share expertise and knowledge to improve the technical capabilities of Allied
Thirst for knowledge and desire to stay on the forward edge of evolving technology trends
Excellent organizational, verbal, written communication, and interpersonal skills with a high degree of attention to detail.
Must possess strong interpersonal skills and have the ability to interact with all levels of employees in a professional manner.
As an essential function of this position, the employee must be able to handle high levels of stress satisfactorily and be congenial with other employees and customers at all times.
Standard office/computer equipment with knowledge of various software packages, operating systems, and operational support systems.
CompTIA A+ Certification or equivalent coursework",11150,Washington
94,Human Resources Associate,Hill+Knowlton Strategies,"Washington, DC 20036 (Downtown area)",None,"Hill+Knowlton Strategies is seeking a People + Culture Associate. In this role, you will ensure complete and timely execution of project plans and support the regional People + Culture Managers to coordinate the efforts of these continuous improvement initiatives. Assist with developing and deploying tools and programs, enhancing project management capabilities across the HR function.
Compliance
Assist with preparation of annual compliance reports in the region (AAP, Compensation Survey’s, EEO/Vets, WPP HR Survey, Women Survey, etc.)
Assist with preparing regular reports, i.e. headcount, turnover, hiring statistics, etc.
Maintain and prepare monthly reporting to Finance and Talent Teams
Act as HR record keeper and perform basic analysis in partnership with HR team to provide weekly/monthly/annual reports as needed
Complete Employee verifications
Create employee folders through Microsoft Teams and upload, maintain folders with employee records
Track employee milestone anniversaries and prepare necessary information to send out on their anniversary
Various projects working with the US HR team as specified
Talent Acquisition
Track Temporary employee list and manage contract extensions
Onboarding
Initiate New Hire tickets for creation of laptop and email set up
Coordinate and schedule all new hire onboarding schedules working with both HR and hiring managers
Maintain onboarding paperwork via Jobvite
Handle all new hire tasks including adding to necessary trainings, sending PTO emails out, and travel log
Off-boarding
Create and implement exit interview form for Fellows to complete with separation
Input exit interview data into TalentTree, our HRIS system, to comply with WPP’s global requirements
Initiate termination tickets for leavers for email/overall set up to be turned off
Assist with preparing exit interview summary and analysis
Payroll
Provide HRIS data entry support when needed
About
Hill+Knowlton Strategies is an international public relations company with over 85 offices around the world.

We believe that every corporation, every brand, every client has a public and today’s public is more powerful than ever before. They have the power to topple CEO’s, reshape corporate and brand strategy, kill products and create unicorns. Today’s public demands truth, transparency and the highest behavioral standards.
Our client obsession means constantly evolving new products + services to help brands and the public communicate. Always in beta.
At H+K our belief is that the agency is a canvas for everyone to write their own story. This job description is written at a moment in time; whatever role you take at H+K we expect you to evolve that role; it should be different tomorrow than it is today and set new standards in the industry.
Join our team and harness the power of the public.

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, Hill+Knowlton Strategies does not discriminate against applicants or employees because of their race, creed, color, age, religion, sex, disability, sexual orientation, marital status, military status, national origin, or ancestry.
JT",11150,Washington
95,"Project Manager, Information Technology",Fairfax County Public Schools,"Fairfax County, VA",None,"Description
Plans, manages, and coordinates activities related to divisionwide technology initiatives; serves as a liaison between technology staff and assigned administrative organization representatives to resolve technology issues, meet technology requirements, and provide technology solutions.
Qualifications
Any combination of education and experience equivalent to a bachelor's degree in a field related to information systems, business management, or education, plus six years of progressive work experience in information technology and technical project management, one year of which shall have been in a technology project oversight capacity. Master's degree and/or PM certifications (like PMP, SAFe, Scrum etc.) preferred. Experience with product development or business analyst processes preferred. Can demonstrate knowledge of best practices with respect to customer service and customer-oriented account management; knowledge of business and information technology practices and trends by comparable school systems or businesses; understanding of technology-related issues and how they might impact assigned customers; awareness of appropriate local, state, and federal laws and regulations dealing with technology; ability to implement technology solutions, work with multi-disciplinary teams, and to function as a team leader; and ability to communicate effectively, both orally and in writing. Use of agile project management methodologies and tools in a technology environment preferred.
Job Type
Information Technology
Office
Project Management Services
Contract Length
12 Month
Salary Grade
[Salary Information]
US-Schedule B Grade 008
Pay Frequency
Monthly
Percent Full-Time
Full Time
Open
Until
Filled
Yes
Re-Adv.
Position
Yes",11150,Washington
96,Change Manager,"Spatial Front, Inc.","Washington, DC",None,"About the Company:
Spatial Front, Inc is the fast-growing small company providing IT solutions to federal, state, local governments, and the private sector. SFI is nationally recognized by Inc. Magazine by being awarded the Inc. 5000 Award in 2018 and 2019. We pride ourselves on being one of the premier employers in the VA, MD, DC area.
SFI is an industry leader in delivering cutting-edge technology solutions and mission support services that bring our customer’s businesses to the forefront of the 21st century. Our corporate commitment to excellence in client services and product development means that our people are attentive, hands-on, and bring industry-leading expertise that will meet and exceed your needs in a straightforward, timely, and cost-effective manner.
Every employee at SFI is a leader. We don’t settle. We blaze our own path and inspire those around us into action. We motivate others to reach their full potential. To learn more about us visit: www.spatialfront.com
Project Overview:
ITA has over 3,500 employees and Contractors/Interns located around the world providing services to U.S. companies and their trading partners, U.S. trade policy makers, and U.S. trade representatives. ITA provides services including trade policy development, trade analysis, trade promotion, trade negotiation, and fair-trade enforcement. The ITA’s mission is to create prosperity by strengthening the competitiveness of U.S. industry, promoting U.S. trade and investment, and ensuring fair trade and compliance with trade laws and agreements. The ITA’s TSI office provides Information Technology services to a domestic and international customer-base. The IT services provided by TSI include: network and infrastructure services, enterprise architecture services, application development services, web hosting services, IT acquisition services, IT customer support services, cyber security services, and IT policy and planning services.
Summary of Major Job Functions:
The change manager plays a key role in ensuring projects (change initiatives) meet objectives on time and on budget by increasing employee adoption and usage. This person will focus on the people side of change, including changes to business processes, systems and technology, job roles and organization structures. The primary responsibility will be creating and implementing change management strategies and plans that maximize employee adoption and usage and minimize resistance. The change manager will work to drive faster adoption, higher ultimate utilization of and proficiency with the changes that impact employees. These improvements will increase benefit realization, value creation, ROI and the achievement of results and outcomes. The change manager must have the skills to build strong working relationships across the organization to succeed. The change manager will act as a coach for senior leaders and executives in helping them fulfill the role of change sponsor. The change manager may also provide direct support and coaching to all levels of managers and supervisors as they help their direct reports through transitions. The change manager will also support project teams in integrating change management activities into their project plans.
Primary Responsibilities:
Apply a structured methodology and lead change management activities.
Apply a change management process and tools to create a strategy to support adoption of the changes required by a project or initiative.
Support communication efforts.
Support the design, development, delivery, and management of communications.
Assess the change impact.
Conduct impact analyses, assess change readiness and identify key stakeholders.
Support training efforts.
Provide input, document requirements and support the design and delivery of training programs.
Required Skills & Qualifications:
Complete change management assessments.
Identify, analyze and prepare risk mitigation tactics.
Identify and manage anticipated resistance.
Consult and coach project teams.
Create actionable deliverables for the five change management levers: communications plan, sponsor roadmap, coaching plan, training plan, resistance management plan.
Support and engage senior leaders.
Coach managers and supervisors.
Support organizational design and definition of roles and responsibilities.
Coordinate efforts with other specialists.
Integrate change management activities into project plan.
Evaluate and ensure user readiness.
Manage stakeholders.
Track and report issues.
Define and measure success metrics and monitor change progress.
Support change management at the organizational level.
Manage the change portfolio.
Desired Skills & Qualifications:
A solid understanding of how people go through a change and the change process.
Experience and knowledge of change management principles, methodologies and tools.
Exceptional communication skills, both written and verbal.
Excellent active listening skills.
Ability to clearly articulate messages to a variety of audiences.
Ability to establish and maintain strong relationships.
Ability to influence others and move toward a common vision or goal.
Flexible and adaptable; able to work in ambiguous situations.
Resilient and tenacious with a propensity to persevere.
Forward-looking with a holistic approach.
Organized with a natural inclination for planning strategy and tactics.
Problem-solving and root cause identification skills.
Able to work effectively at all levels in an organization.
Must be a team player and able to work collaboratively with and through others.
Acute business acumen and understanding of organizational issues and challenges.
Familiarity with project management approaches, tools and phases of the project lifecycle.
Experience with large-scale organizational change efforts.
Education/Experience: Bachelors
Certifications (Required):
Change management certification in Prosci’s ADKAR or designation desired.
In order to meet the clearance requirements for this opportunity, candidates must be US citizen and/or Current Green Card Holder. This is a full-time position. Please no agencies, third parties, or corp-to-corp.
All candidates will be subject to a complete background check to include, but not limited to Criminal History, Education Verification, Professional Certification Verification, Verification of Previous Employment, and Credit History.
EOE AA M/F/Vet/Disability
Spatial Front Inc participates in E-Verify.",11150,Washington
97,Project Policy Manager,Aquent,"Washington, DC 20005 (Downtown area)",$48 an hour,"Job Description:
We have an opening for an experienced Project Manager with one of our non-profit Travel, Loyalty & Membership clients in the Washington, DC area!
***Candidates MUST be in the Washington, DC area***
The project manager will support project coordination, stakeholder outreach, product marketing, and research related to this clients Housing Issue Area, the clients Livability Index, and other priorities related to Livable Communities within the clients Public Policy Institute’s Family, Home and Community Team.
Responsible for coordinating team member participation in meetings, maintaining written meeting notes, recording decisions, facilitating communication among staff and contractors, and ensuring on-time execution and follow-up of task assignments by leveraging team project management systems (Confluence, Teams, Github).Perform ad-hoc research on livability indicators, trends, and innovations and work within the client Library on executing literature reviews.Solicit feedback on work products from the clients state and national staff.Coordinate with communications staff and team members to keep website content up-to-date and advise on page design and content to drive engagement.Develop, organize, and maintain a Livable Communities image library, craft social media posts, and evergreen tweets. Develop and execute plan to increase sign-ups of e-alert and newsletter distribution lists.

The ideal candidate is familiar with community livability and city planning spaces, knows where the conversations about neighborhoods, housing, transportation and aging-in-place are taking place, and is able to promote PPI resources to key audiences via multiple channels, including social media, team webpages, blogs, conferences, and podcasts. Strong project management skills , excellent written and oral communication skills required.
Client Description:
Our client is one of the largest non-profits in the US, with a very user-centric vision and a strong social mission. This organization dedicates its efforts on increasing membership with a strong focus digitally, via social media, and digital marketing. The vibe is collaborative, fast-paced, and overall, passionate. The people who work here live and breathe the organization’s mission of enhancing the quality of life, and championing social change.
Work here and:
Help target memberships now and into the future to develop products specifically targeted to those relatively new to the workforce
Have your voice be heard. Our client prides itself on considering the input of all involved in projects
Work with fellow freelancers who know that they’re working on projects designed for the betterment of communities
Work on national campaigns that are targeted by community
Work with others who are interested in outreach and volunteerism
Our client has made customer engagement a priority and is interested in all candidates who are passionate about it as well.
Requirements:
Freelancing long-term with Aquent gets you access to some pretty cool things:
You're paid weeklySubsidized health and dental benefits after your first four weeks of work (averaging at least 20 hrs/wk)Paid Sick Leave for all US and Canada talentAccess to Fidelity 401(k) with company matchAccess to FSA Program (pre-tax payment toward bus or train passes, etc.)Direct deposit for your paycheckAccess to our Talent Rewards Program (we reward for referrals!)Access to free online courses via Aquent's Gymnasium, to help you develop your skills: http://gymnasium.aquent.com/Aquent support: your Aquent Agent checks in with you during the course of your contract to make sure you're happy and progressing according to your expectations (we're also there to be looking for new opportunities for you when you're close to wrapping up)Not the job for you? Tell your friends and reap the Rewards! https://aquent.com/rewards/",11150,Washington
98,QSV Project Manager - Immediate Need,Grindstone,"Washington, DC",None,"We are committed to providing superior support to the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA), assisting in the seamless care for Veterans, including access to a complete electronic health record (EHR) and shared, transparent care pathways with the Department of Defense (DoD) and community providers. Currently, the VA is undertaking an enterprise-wide Electronic Health Record Modernization (EHRM) effort through the procurement of the Cerner commercial electronic health record software, and with our help, this modernization will result in a common, single, lifetime health record that both DoD and VA can access, with anticipated improvements in patient care and safety.
Support the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA) Electronic Health Record Modernization (EHRM) program. In performing day-to-day activities, you will be responsible for the following:
Develop and maintain RASCI including all task order requirements and deliverables for all personnel
Creates QSV playbook articulating engagement throughout all phases of the EHR implementation
Leads QSV meetings and updates stakeholders on key QSV activities
Using Microsoft project manage all OEHRM QSV tasks and deliverables
Manage multidisciplinary teams to ensure team productivity and efficiency
Authors strategic guidelines QSV SOPs
Develop QSV policies
Facilitates deliverable review process
Monitors Project activities, reviews and creates project performance metrics and engages stakeholders to determine if Project work meets acceptable quality standards
Updates the Executive Sponsor on Project status and performance, providing appropriate recommendations as necessary
Represents QSV clients in meetings and conferences when requested
Required Skills and Experience:
Minimum of 5 years of experience is required. An additional 10 years of relevant experience may be substituted for degree requirements
Ability to work independently to design and develop new software products or major enhancements to existing software for a healthcare/ clinical environment
Acts as the highest level technical expert, addressing problems of systems integration, compatibility, healthcare semantics, informatics, and multiple platforms. Responsible for project completion
Performs feasibility analysis on potential future projects to management
Bachelor’s Degree in Healthcare IT, computer science, electronics engineering, engineering or technical related field
Desired Skills and Experience:
Experience in the VA
Experience implementing Electronic Health Records
Clearance: Ability to obtain a Public Trust
Educational Requirement:
Bachelor's degree
Additional qualifications:Experience in the VAExperience implementing Electronic Health RecordsExperience with DoDAFPMP desired
RUantJIFyy",11150,Washington
99,Detailer – Exhibit Design,Gallager & Associates,"Washington, DC",None,"Gallagher & Associates (G&A) is an internationally recognized interdisciplinary design studio with offices in Washington, D.C., New York City, Portland, and Singapore. For over 20 years, we bring transformative experiences to life. We are looking for a highly motivated, skilled detailer to join our team of diverse and dedicated creative professionals. We are seeking exceptional talent that is eager to grow and contribute to an evolving field that encompasses museums, theme based attractions, and interactive installations.

The Detailer will work closely with the Creative Director to design, coordinate and integrate exhibits, graphics and media concepts into the overall physical needs of the space. In addition, the Detailer will play a key role in creating visuals to communicate the design intent of the spaces and visitor experience for the client team, and for producing fabrication-ready construction documentation for bid or direct fabrication.

Major Responsibilities

Works with Creative Director, Exhibit Design Leads, Visual Designers, and IT Hardware Designers
Refine design drawings and CAD files in collaboration with design leads, for purposes of bid documentation and/or fabrication coordination with vendors
Develop details and fabrication drawings based on both 2D and 3D geometry provided by design team
Maintain CAD standards in compliance with G&A and other industry standards
Develop submission drawing packages, including construction drawings with appropriate dimensions and callouts
Create clean 3D geometry files which can be exported/issued-to fabricators and/or architects
Maintain deliverables in accordance with project schedule and internal deadlines
Collaborate with other designers to explore detailing options and variations to ensure design priorities are maintained through detailing process
Create building coordination drawings and packages to be shared with architects and subconsultants, including wall construction, ceiling coordination, finishes, and electrical coordination drawings
Work in a team environment including Gallagher & Associates staff, sub-contractors, and client contacts
Applicant must demonstrate detailing skillset in both 2D and 3D and be able to work from live files at various stages of development
Selected applicant will be required to work within G&A software standards, and will be required to work in Vectorworks program (training will be provided if candidate meets qualifications)

Qualifications

Excellent communication skills verbal, written, and illustrative
A minimum of 3+ years of experience in design studio or fabrication environment
Ability to work in a fast-paced, collaborative environment
Attention to detail, accuracy, and quality
Demonstrated (via Portfolio) knowledge of fabrication techniques, materials, and principles of physical construction
Demonstrated (via Portfolio) ability to generate clearly detailed, dimensioned, and annotated drawings for the purposes of communicating construction, fabrication, and installation specifications.
Highly skilled in one or more of the following CAD programs: Vectorworks, Rhino, AutoCad, Solidworks.
Hand-sketch/quick ideation detailing a plus
B.A. or M.A. in Exhibit Design, Architecture, or Industrial Design, or equivalent on-the-job field experience

OUR VALUES

It is an exciting time to join G&A and we have the core values to prove it — Excellence, Impact, Integrity & Balance shape our future and are designed and defined to help our team understand the link between strategy and relationship building. These values explain how the day-to-day translates into supporting aligned efforts and goals across the board. Join us as we continue to develop our future together, to fit our style and your success!

OUR VISION:

We will synthesize the digital and physical worlds in innovative ways like no one else.

OUR MISSION:

We integrate our diverse capabilities in order to deliver unrivaled experiences.

OUR VALUES & WAYS OF WORKING @ the Jr/Mid/Sr Level:

EXCELLENCE

We are committed to creating our best work:

Build working relationships with team members and cross-functional colleagues to come up with your best work
Seek different perspectives, inputs and feedback when working through hurdles
Get out there and see what’s new in the world of design; request a conference or team field trip for inspiration

We create a culture of curiosity and learning:

Be passionately curious; show eagerness to learn
Challenge assumptions and suggest different approaches
Stay current in our area of expertise; G&A, and our industry
Applaud others for their accomplishments
Share helpful information and best practices with team members

Always be proactive:

Do not over-commit yourself; speak up
Utilize resources (i.e. people, templates, workshop request, supplies) to meet your goals and needs
Be detail-oriented in all that you do (spell check!) to put your best foot forward

We are true ambassadors:

Follow G&A on social media (“like” our photos; make suggestions for improvements)
Give marketing something cool to post about your or your work contributions
Be credible and always put your best foot forward

IMPACT

We are locally and globally conscious:

Say no to plastic and use less paper around the office
Bring a new perspective to our clients—think sustainability where it counts

Inclusion brings us together:

Take ownership of how your work supports the shared objectives of the team
Understand the work of your team and how it contributes to the project/team priorities
Look for opportunities to help your neighbor when in need: printing, guidance, support, get out and go for a walk or take a lunch break together to break up the monotony

INTEGRITY

Trust and respect is a must:

Be intentional and respectful in all conversations
Listen with an open mind to different viewpoints
Be responsive, on time, and on task for your team; work together and be honest with each other when challenges arise

We have open lines of communication:

Stay up-to-date on company news (e.g. newsletter, Instagram—follow @GandA_Design)
Ensure your manager and team members are kept informed of progress or hurdles—they can help!
Listen and ask questions to gather information and understand other viewpoints
Explore new ways to be more efficient

BALANCE

Adaptability is key:

Always think beyond the problem and toward the solution
Be flexible and responsive to changes in priorities
Embrace new ways of doing things

Work-Life blend for success:

Take time to unwind
Take lunch
Participate in a wellness activity or challenge

Please send resume and digital portfolio as a PDF file to hr@gallagherdesign.com",11150,Washington
100,"Manager, Dance Programming",The John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts,"Washington, DC 20566 (Foggy Bottom area)",None,"About The Kennedy Center

“I am certain that after the dust of centuries has passed over our cities, we, too, will be remembered not for victories or defeats in battle or in politics, but for our contribution to the human spirit.” – President John F. Kennedy

The Kennedy Center is the nation’s cultural center and living memorial to President John F. Kennedy. Located on the banks of the Potomac River in Washington, D.C., the Center presents performances across all genres, and is also home to artistic affiliates Washington National Opera and National Symphony Orchestra.

Mission Statement: As the nation's performing arts center, and a living memorial to President John F. Kennedy, we are a leader for the arts across America and around the world, reaching and connecting with artists, inspiring and educating communities. We welcome all to create, experience, learn about, and engage with the arts.

Commitment to Diversity & Inclusion

The Kennedy Center is a welcoming and inclusive culture where everyone benefits - we do it in a way that honors everyone’s humanity. We are able to advance our mission because of committed and passionate employees. We are fortunate to be able to leverage their diverse perspectives, life experiences and skills to inform how our workplace can be a safe, transparent, and replenishing community. Through honest discussion, our focus on DEI, and the creation of a D&I council, we are committed to always being the best versions of ourselves.

Job Description

The Kennedy Center’s Programming Department is a dynamic, creative, and dedicated group of arts administrators. The Dance Programming team is responsible for all performances that fall under the current Dance and Ballet subscription series as well as the Local Dance Commissioning Project, and other dance and movement activations on Millennium Stage and across the Center’s REACH expansion campus.

The Dance Programming Manager works within the Dance Programming department team to manage all logistical planning and necessary communication to ensure the success of the Kennedy Center ballet and dance subscription series and any additional programming.

The Manager must be able to make decisions and exercise discretion in order to prioritize assignments and work under significant pressure, as many projects are time sensitive and involve concurrent deadlines. An eagerness to listen and communicate openly and problem solve in a collaborative environment is essential. An ideal candidate is creative and has familiarity, perspectives, and personal opinions about the global dance field at large.

Duties and Responsibilities

55% Project Management: Oversees staffing, contracting, and logistics for all performances, events, and/or activities for the Kennedy Center’s Dance and Ballet subscription series. Duties include but are not limited to:

Arrange, negotiate, and manage contracts and payments for all necessary hotels and artist transportation as needed.
Manage Department’s visa needs for international companies and artists, in consultation with the Center’s Office of General Counsel.
Hire interpreters, musicians, conductors and performance staff when necessary.
Lead Department’s supernumerary program, arranging and managing auditions, and overseeing Coordinator in collection and processing of necessary paperwork and payment for all performers.
Act as primary liaison between visiting artists and various departments of the Center for a portion of the Center's Ballet and Dance series and provide guidance for Coordinator to do the same.
Maintain contact with production managers, orchestra manager, education staff, press representative, advertising and marketing personnel, special events coordinators, and theater managers in order to ensure the flow of information between these departments and visiting artists. Work with all of these people to develop schedules, establish needs, review promotional materials, and organize events.
Company management including arranging travel, housing, meals, fee payments, playbills, tickets, and matters of hospitality when needed.
Create staffing and show duty schedules for the department throughout each respective department’s performance seasons.
Track payments and maintain budgets, with guidance from Director, to keep Dance Programming department in good financial standing.
Attend performances as a representative of Dance Programming.
Maintain office operations and supervise staff during Director’s absence.

15% Curate and produce, with Director’s input, the annual National Dance Day program and local dance artist series on Millennium Stage and in the REACH. Direct department Coordinator and Intern on the execution of these programs.

10% Together with Director, work on future planning and programming as appropriate internally and with outside partners, as required. Build and maintain budget drafts for future projects, as requested.

10% Attend meetings as a representative of Dance Programming and in Director’s absence, as requested, to ensure that information is shared and action items are advanced.

10% Interview, train and manage department interns.

N/A General correspondence and other duties as assigned; Responds to the needs and requests of Kennedy Center management and staff in a professional and expedient manner; Adheres to all employer policies and procedures.

Key Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in Arts Administration or Business Management or equivalent experience.
Experience in dance touring, presenting and or management required.
3+ years of experience managing and supervising group(s) along with strong leadership skills required.

Skills & Knowledge Qualifications

Ability to create and maintain clear channels of communication with all members and constituents from a wide variety of backgrounds.
Affinity for budgets, long range planning, and problem solving necessary. An ideal candidate is creative and has familiarity, perspectives, and personal opinions about the global dance field at large.

Physical Demands

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Must be able to work odd-hours, including evenings, weekends, holidays, and occasional work beyond 40 hours/week. Occasional travel may be required. Must be on-call during performance weeks and company travel days.

Work Environment

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

The noise level in the work environment is normal office noise. Weekend and evening hours are required, and will be arranged in advance.

Benefits

We offer a comprehensive range of benefits to all full-time employees including: Medical, Dental, Vision, Paid Time Off, Paid Sick Leave, and a 403(b) Retirement Plan",11150,Washington
101,Security Testing IT Project Manager,gTANGIBLE Corporation,"Arlington, VA 22209 (Radnor-Ft Myer Heights area)",None,"gTANGIBLE Corporation (gTC), www.gtangible.com, is a C corporation and a registered Government contractor that provides services and solutions in:
National Security Programs
Professional, Administrative, and Management Support
Mission and Warfighter Support
We are a Service Disabled Veteran Owned Small Business (SDVOSB) and the founder has years of successful experience in the Government contracting arena. Our leadership team is an exceptional group of Government contracting professionals. gTANGIBLE is in the process of identifying candidates for the following position.
Requisition Type: Full Time
Position Status: Contingent
Position Title: Security Testing IT Project Manager
Location: National Capital Region
Security Clearance: Secret

Duties and Responsibilities
The Security Testing Information Technology Project Manager supports this Transportation Security Administration Information Technology (TSA IT) Task Order (TO) by providing support to handle assignment of contractor resources, ensuring progress is being made in support of requests, identifying hurdles or roadblocks, and providing regular reports of actions taken in support of requests and required activities. Manages the Tenable and RedSeal application projects which requires coordination with multiple teams, active participation with requirements generation, data and results analysis, project planning, reporting, and effective communication.
Duties include the following:
Oversees operating system security testing, database security testing, network fabric asset security testing, web application security testing, penetration testing, and wireless communications security testing projects.
Ensure contractor resource assignment, tracking of dates associated with individual activities, consolidation of weekly report listing all task and sub-task activities for entire contract, identification of issues preventing or hindering execution of Information Assurance and Cybersecurity Division (IAD) activities, and submission of deliverables are provided to IAD federal staff on time and in an error-free format.
Report problems, issues, and deviations within their managed projects to IAD federal personnel by no later than the next business day.
Participate in the weekly status meeting that will be arranged by the Program Manager to discuss weekly activities with appropriate IAD branch personnel.
Manage software deployment and coverage expansion projects for IAD enterprise toolsets, or for other toolsets as needed by other IAD branches.
Manage other IT-related projects with which IAD branches may require project management support.
Manage and maintain all project documentation, both for managing the projects themselves, as well as any documentation created in the course of executing the project (for example: build documents, or design decisions).
Manage project resource access requests to ensure that requisite access is granted for all project team members to necessary hardware or software assets. This is typically performed for Security Testing engagements where contractor personnel will require some level of elevated access to assets within TSA’s network. Obtaining elevated user access requires submission of Privileged Access Requests (PAR), and Project Managers will be expected to manage completion, submission, and tracking progress of these PARs to ensure testing engagement remain on-schedule.
Ensure technical correctness of deliverables being provided to IAD. This is expected to include some level of quality assurance for all deliverables.
Support ah-hoc IT Project Management activities of a non-standard nature as they are identified to provide a benefit to IAD’s security requirements.
Knowledge and Qualifications
At least eight (8) years of experience performing project management of IT projects.
At least three (3) years of experience performing project management as a contractor supporting, or employee of, the Federal Government.
At least three (3) years of experience performing an IT related job (not project management) to ensure they have at least a base level of knowledge of IT related concepts and requirements.
Experience with security testing and penetration testing.
Experience in getting multiple individuals/teams to work together towards a common goal.
Experience with the creation and maintenance of project schedules using both Microsoft Project and Excel.
Industry standard IT security certifications or an Information Technology Bachelor’s degree.
Possess industry standard project management certification. The Project Management Professional (PMP) certificate would be desirable.
gTANGIBLE Corporation is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate against any employee or applicant because of race, age, sex, color, physical or mental disability, religion, sexual orientation, marital status, national origin, or political affiliation.",11150,Washington
102,Management and Program Analyst,US Federal Aviation Administration,"Washington, DC","$73,336 - $113,677 a year","Duties
Summary
Due to the Pandemic and individual states with different phases of reopening, the selectee’s report date to the official duty station/facility may be delayed until such time as employees are allowed to report to the workplace. The person selected may telework up to the maximum extent possible, up to and including full time, until it is determined by state and Federal officials that employees are allowed to report to the workplace where this position is located, on a regular basis.

Responsibilities
The PMO provides program and acquisition management for the systems and capabilities that modernize and sustain the National Airspace System (NAS) to advance NAS programs from concept to operation while providing technical support for air traffic control automation and decision support systems. Selectees will be assigned to one of the following organizations within the PMO: Integrated Services and Analysis, AJM-1; Air Traffic Systems, AJM-2; Enterprise Services, AJM-3; and Surveillance Services Directorate, AJM-4.
The incumbent applies quantitative and qualitative analysis to define the utility basic tenets and guidelines for preparing the Master Integrated Program Schedule. He/she uses skill applying fact-finding and investigative techniques to define program requirements and to assist in the development of program briefs for working papers. He/She will assist senior analysts in the development and execution of the Integrated logistics Support Plan (ILSP). Identifies and assists in the implementation of alternative logistics support practices. Performs multiple and varying assignments under the limited direction of a manager, project/program manager, team leader, and/or more experienced professional.
The incumbent supports senior specialists by assembling and reviewing acquisition packages, requests for proposals, bids, or quotations by checking documents for errors and ensuring that standard or special provisions comply with applicable policies and regulations. The incumbent participating on acquisition strategy or source selection panels to determine if a written source selection plan is necessary and to document strategy. He/She will provides market research data to senior management. The incumbent identifies market place requirements to identify supply or service sources. He/She maintaining automated tracking systems, assists with financial analysis and reporting to include analyzing budgets assigned to large-scale technical aviation programs and services to record, reconcile, validate and track data; identify discrepancies and conduct various analytical studies.
Incumbent applies experience using advanced automated tools and financial systems, such as macros, pivot tables, advanced filtering, etc. to create graphics and charts for inclusion in presentations to senior officials. The incumbent participates as an active team member in planning, monitoring, and conducting special projects, studies, and initiatives. The incumbent analyze problems, identifies significant factors, gathers and interprets pertinent data, and applies established rules and procedures in order to recommend effective solutions. Contacts are typically internal and external to the PMO to share information and to explain the applications of policies and procedures. The incumbent may have frequent contact throughout the PMO and other customers on routine matters such as data gathering, explaining processes and project status. The incumbent mentors more junior analysts.
The incumbent uses considerable discretion when selecting approaches, established policies and procedures are available for most assignments. The incumbent resolves most problems and work issues without the assistance of a more experienced professional or manager and refers problems and work issues that require additional attention. The Team Manager periodically reviews work at major milestones and al completion, for policy compliance and alignment with the requirements of projects and/or other work activities.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Travel Required
25% or less - The job may require up to 25% travel.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
NA
Job family (Series)
0343 Management And Program Analysis
Similar jobs
Enterprise Data Manager
Information Systems Managers
Logistics Managers
Managers, Information Systems
Managers, Logistics
Managers, Operations
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
US Citizenship is required.
Selective Service Registration is required for males born after 12/31/1959.
Must submit an SF50 (See Required Documents)
Qualifications
TO QUALIFY AT THE FV-H (GS/FG 12) level Candidates must have one year (52 weeks) of SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE equivalent to at least the next lower grade level (FV-G or FG/GS-11) that is typically related to the line of work of the position to be filled and which has equipped the applicant with the particular knowledge, skills, and abilities to successfully perform the duties of the position. To be creditable, specialized experience must have been at least equivalent to the next lower level in the normal line of progression for the occupation in the organization.
SPECIALIZE EXPERIENCE is defined as:
Experience assembling and reviewing acquisition packages, requests for proposals, bids, or quotations; OR
Experience using advanced automated tools and financial systems, such as macros, pivot tables, advanced filtering, etc. to create graphics and charts for inclusion in presentations to senior officials.
You should include relevant examples of the specialized experience in your work history. Errors or omissions may impact your rating or may result in you not being considered.
Eligible applicants meeting the minimum qualification requirements and/or selective placement factor(s) (SPF) may be further evaluated on the Leadership & Management Dimensions and/or Technical Requirements listed in the announcement. Based on this evaluation, applicants will be placed in one of the following categories: (1) score order; (2) category grouping; or (3) alphabetical; or (4) priority grouping referred to the selecting official for selection consideration.
Answer all questions to the best of your ability. DO NOT ASSUME THAT BECAUSE YOU HOLD, OR HAVE HELD THIS POSITION, YOU WILL AUTOMATICALLY BE FOUND ELIGIBLE. You may be asked to provide evidence or documentation that you have this type of experience later in the selection process. Your responses are subject to verification through job interviews, or any other information obtained during the application process. Any exaggeration of your experience or any attempt to conceal information can result in disqualification.
Applicants who fail to demonstrate possession of any of the above criteria AND who do not provide the required documentation will receive no further consideration for this position.
Applicants may be asked to verify information on your application for employment with the FAA.
All qualification requirements must be met by the closing date of this vacancy announcement.
Education
Education cannot be substituted for experience.
Preview Job Questionnaire
Make sure your resume includes detailed information to support your qualifications and answers to the job questionnaire.
Additional information
We may use this vacancy to fill other similar vacant positions.
Position may be subject to a background investigation.
A one-year probationary period may be required.

The person selected for this position may be required to file a financial disclosure statement within 30 days of entry on duty. FAA policy limits certain outside employment and financial investments in aviation-related companies. www.faa.gov/jobs/working_here/financial_disclosure_requirements

The U.S. Department of Transportation strives to ensure that equity, transparency, accountability, collaboration, and communication permeate all that we do for the betterment of the Department, the traveling public, and our nation. As such, DOT values a highly diverse workforce of persons who promote a culture of belonging by respecting the personal dignity and worth of each individual and fostering a positive environment where all feel safe and welcome. If these commitments coincide with your personal ideals and professional aspirations, please consider joining the DOT family.
NOTES:
As a part of the Federal-Wide Hiring Reform Initiative (streamlining the hiring process), the FAA is committed to eliminating the use of Knowledge, Skills and Ability (KSA) narratives from the initial application in the hiring process for all announcements. Therefore, as an applicant, you are NOT required to provide a narrative response in the text box listed below each KSA.
In lieu of providing a KSA narrative response in the text box listed below each KSA section, in your work history, please include information that provides specific examples of how you meet the response level or answer you chose for each KSA. Your work history examples should be specific and clearly reflect the highest level of ability. Your KSA answers will be evaluated further to validate whether the level that you selected is appropriate based on the work history and experience you provided. Your answers may be adjusted by a human resource specialist as appropriate.
This Level (Low Risk) position requires favorable adjudication of a National Agency Check and Inquiries (NACI) background investigation prior to appointment.
This position is covered by the FAA Core Compensation plan. Additional information about core compensation is available on the following website: http://jobs.faa.gov/FAACoreCompensation.htm.
Some, all, or none of the referred candidates may be interviewed.
This announcement is also being advertised under VA# AWA-AJM-21-0029RJ-72689. Please review both vacancy announcements before making application to determine your eligibility to apply.
This is a bargaining unit position.

Links to Important Information: Locality Pay , COLA

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.


IMPORTANT: Applicants may be rated on the extent and quality of experience, education, and training relevant to the duties of the position(s). All answers provided in the on-line process must be substantiated. Ensure that your application package/resume supports your responses.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
ALL applicants MUST submit the following:

(1) resume with complete work history; and

(2) a copy of your most recent SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action).

For guidance on how to create a Federal resume, visit http://www.archives.gov/careers/jobs/forms/resume-guide.pdf.

Failure to submit all required documents by the closing date will result in a finding of ineligible. We are not responsible for incomplete, illegible or missing documents.

Please DO NOT email your application documents. We cannot accept documents received via the email system. Documents sent via email will NOT receive consideration.

Applicants claiming eligibility for the Expanded Veterans Hiring Opportunity (EVHO), MUST submit a DD Form 214 reflecting character of service to verify eligibility by the closing date of the announcement as requested by the Human Resource Office. Eligibility for EVHO will be considered based on applicable documentation submitted by the closing date.

If you are a current or former Federal employee (including a current FAA employee), you MUST provide a copy of your SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action) containing information in Blocks 15, 17, 18, 19, 22, and 24 so it can be used to verify your position title, series, grade, tenure, and organization of record by the closing date of the announcement. You may fax your SF-50 or upload it into the on-line application. If faxing the SF-50, please ensure you include the vacancy announcement number on the faxed copy.

If you are a current Federal employee and need a current copy of your SF-50, please contact your personnel office. If you are an FAA employee, you can access and print your SF-50 from the eOPF system https://eopf.opm.gov/dot/. If you are a former Federal employee, you can obtain a copy of your SF-50 by writing the National Personnel Records Center Annex, 1411 Boulder Boulevard, Valmeyer, IL 62295. Additional information is available from this link: http://www.archives.gov/st-louis/civilian-personnel/.

Expanded Veterans Hiring Opportunity (EVHO) are those veterans who are honorably discharged from the Armed Forces after completing at least three (3) years of continuous active service. Applicants claiming eligibility for EVHO, MUST submit a DD Form 214 reflecting character of service to verify eligibility by the closing date of the announcement as requested by the Human Resource Office. Eligibility for EVHO will be considered based on applicable documentation submitted by the closing date.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Federal employees - Excepted service
Current excepted service federal employees.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Also open to former permanent excepted service federal employees eligible under an interchange agreement. Current or former permanent federal employees must have met a one year probationary period or trial period in the competitive or excepted service. Applications will also be accepted from preference eligibles and veterans who are honorably discharged from the Armed Forces after completing at least 3 years of continuous active duty service.",11150,Washington
103,Part-time Retail Employee,The Container Store Inc.,"Washington, DC 20016 (American University Park area)",None,"Overview:

Our part-time positions are involved in registers, sales, merchandising and order processing.
Schedules can include daytime, evenings, weekends, and early mornings.
What We Stand For
Established in 1978, The Container Store has grown to be the leading specialty retailer of storage and organization products in the United States and the only national retailer solely devoted to the category. We provide creative, multifunctional, customizable storage and organization solutions that help our customers save time, save space and improve the quality of their lives.
We foster an employee-first culture built around our Foundation Principles, which define how we approach our relationships with our employees, vendors, customers and communities and influence every aspect of our business.
Responsibilities:
In registers and sales, you are….
Engaging with customers at the register, offering product information and sharing promotions as a brand ambassador
On the salesfloor engaging in thoughtful conversations with customers while maintaining the visual appearance of the store
Collaborating and communicating with customers to present projects and customized plans in a clear and professional manner
Keeping pace with customers, balancing multiple priorities and using good judgment to manage time
 In merchandising, you are…
Organizing and ensuring we have a well-presented store
Merchandising products, unloading trucks, lifting boxes, climbing ladders and cleaning the store
Working with a great team, surrounded by lively music, resulting in a huge sense of accomplishment
 Processing Customer Orders, you are…
Pulling product for customers’ orders in a timely manner
Maintaining the stockroom to ensure it is organized to support visual and selling efforts of the store
Communicating and following up with customers on issues regarding their orders, all the way through resolution
Carrying orders to customers cars for contactless pickup
The Benefits of Working Here
Our benefits exemplify our commitment to an employee-first culture, ensuring employees and their families are well taken care of, safe and secure. Some of our benefits include:
Competitive Pay
Medical/Dental/Vision Plans
Discount: 50% on Elfa, 40% on Merchandise and Gift Cards, 25% on Avera and Laren
Paid Time Off plus Holidays
401(k) plan
Ongoing training including our Leadership Development Program and Manager Training Program
Employee First Fund: providing grants to employees experiencing unforeseen emergencies

Qualifications:

What You Bring To Us
You love to engage with people.
You are passionate about connecting with customers and your team to provide clear, concise, compassionate communication.
You love a fast-paced environment and doing a variety of jobs throughout your work day.
You enjoy organizing and helping customers find solutions.
You are always learning! You are eager to learn how technology and selling work together to provide an exceptional customer experience.
You take pride in your work. It’s your store!
You understand retail is an ever-changing industry and remain flexible with your schedule.
You want to delight the people around you and can’t wait to share that at The Container Store!
You are at least 18 years of age.
The Container Store promotes a smoke-free, drug-free environment.
We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and comply with the Americans with Disabilities Act
Stores Physical Requirements
State Specific Notices",11150,Washington
104,"Project Manager, International Affairs",Aquent,"Washington, DC 20005 (Downtown area)",None,"Job Description:
We are looking for highly motivated self starters with a strong orientation to make a difference. Must have strong research, writing, and communication skills.

Seeking sharp self-starter interested in international affairs and with a social impact orientation. This is a fantastic opportunity for a motivated and curious individual who is interested in our social mission to improve the lives of older adults around the world.

Responsible for managing and advancing a few key projects for the Global Thought Leadership (GTL) team, including but not limited to:
Editorial and project management assistance to support all aspects the production of the 2021 edition of our international periodical, The Journal. Responsibilities would include:
o research support to identify potential expert contributors to the Journal and to help build Clients' network of Latin American stakeholders;
o project management to ensure that editorial and production deadlines are met
o helping to build and curate our distribution list for stakeholders around the world
o assist in the developing and conducting social media campaigns for Journal and broader GTL team content
o editing and fact-checking journal article submissions
Project management support for our Living, Learning, and Earning Longer (LLEL) initiative.Assistance creating databases to manage the resources we are accumulating on:Targeted research support related to global aging issues
Position requires strong written and verbal communications skill, including editorial skills. Excel and PowerPoint skills also necessary.
Client Description:
Our client is one of the largest non-profits in the US, with a very user-centric vision and a strong social mission. This organization dedicates its efforts on increasing membership with a strong focus digitally, via social media, and digital marketing. The vibe is collaborative, fast-paced, and overall, passionate. The people who work here live and breathe the organization’s mission of enhancing the quality of life, and championing social change.
Work here and:
Help target memberships now and into the future to develop products specifically targeted to those relatively new to the workforce
Have your voice be heard. Our client prides itself on considering the input of all involved in projects
Work with fellow freelancers who know that they’re working on projects designed for the betterment of communities
Work on national campaigns that are targeted by community
Work with others who are interested in outreach and volunteerism
Our client has made customer engagement a priority and is interested in all candidates who are passionate about it as well.",11150,Washington
105,Data Manager (COVID Reporting),"Potawatomi Training, LLC","Washington, DC",None,"Data Manager (COVID Reporting)
Location: Washington, DC / Rockville, MD area

Employment Status: Full Time Regular

FLSA Classification: Exempt Salaried

Position Summary:
Training, LLC is seeking a qualified candidate with three (3) plus years’ experience as a Data Manager (COVID Reporting) in support of our efforts within the Indian Health Service.
Our Data Manager (COVID Reporting) will provide a complex project research analytical design. Our manager will provide guides to the project team on data collection needs, tools for collection and reporting format, provide final analysis and recommendation for the research project, guidance, and direction to the team through the development and execution of the data analysis plan and provide quality assurance for all metrics and statistical reporting.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities:
Responsible for a clinical data analysis plan
Provides quality assurance for all metrics and statistical reporting.
Experience within the health field and COVID-19 initiatives- preferred.
Process clinical data, including receipt, entry verification or filing information.
Responsible for overseeing data systems to ensure it maintains up-to-date, organized information within specific guidelines and procedures.
Duties include leading a team of data professionals to complete tasks, installing, and updating cybersecurity hardware or software and responding to security breaches to retrieve lost data. a manager:
Review the designated data reporting requirements and evaluate the integrity of the data being submitted by the sites participating in the IHS COVID reporting efforts.
Data evaluation will focus on ensuring the data submitted meets the applicable reporting requirements, contains accurate and meaningful data elements, and complies with applicable reporting format specifications.
Where data is inconsistent, inaccurate, or does not meet requirements, corrective actions shall be identified and coordinated with the appropriate Federal agencies.
Data validation shall be performed among a variety of systems and data sets, with special emphasis on the HL7 v2.5 messaging standard for data exchange in all healthcare environments.
Initial focus is on laboratory and immunization administration data reporting but could include additional COVID-related electronic data reporting.
Systems of record on which data resides include but are not limited to RPMS and COTS EMRs.
Data is transferred via HL7 v2.5 specific messaging standards to an IHS Central Aggregation Server (CAS), where some automated data validation and normalization is performed to prepare and send messages to locations, such as APHL AIMS, CDC, and IHS National Data Warehouse.
Responsive to requests for assistance submitted through the Agency help desk ticketing system.
File tracking errors, rejected files, inconsistencies in dashboard reporting statistics, and related observations.
Analyzing requests- review HL7 content and software configuration.
Resolution and mitigation may require coordination with other contracting companies.
Provide routine statistics and status reports on all user support activities.
Configuration Management and Table Updates
Responsible for maintaining the data sets that support the COVID-19 data reporting processes, which includes adding content to system tables. This includes vaccine lot numbers, unique site identifiers, and file processing and re-submission data.
Identify necessary software and hardware needs.
Developing and implementing the latest security procedures and protocols for data management
Creating protocols for the retrieval and analysis of ongoing data storage
Trouble shooting any data related problems.
Overseeing and managing a team in the day-to-day use of the data systems.
Leading a team of data professionals to complete tasks, installing, and updating hardware or software and responding to security breaches to retrieve lost data.
Common Task Requirements:

Operate office equipment such as fax machines, copiers, phone systems and use computers for spreadsheets, word processing, database management, electronic mail, and other applications.
Prepare reports, memos, letters, forms, briefings, emails, and other documents using Microsoft Office, Word, Excel, and PowerPoint software.
Make changes to Word documents, modify Excel spreadsheets, and PowerPoint presentations to enhance their effectiveness or to repair/correct minor errors.
Compose, type, and distribute notes, routine correspondence and reports in the format established by their assigned organization.
Prepare official document in formats specified.
Accomplish any training necessary to execute tasks.
Provide customer service as needed and respond to information requests.
REQUIREMENTS:

Education:
Bachelor’s degree required; computer-related field, such as information technology or computer science; business administration or health care preferred

Experience:

Three (3) plus years’ experience as a Data Manager (COVID Reporting preferred)
Health care experience preferred
Logic, analytical and problem-solving skills required
Possess strong commitment to team environment dynamics with the ability to contribute expertise and lead a diverse team
Effective communication skills; both orally and written

Other Requirements:

Must be physically able to perform all the technical duties.
Must be able to adapt under a highly stressful multi-task environment for extend periods of time/up to 8 hours.
If prior service, must have received an honorable discharge.
Applicant will be subject to Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
Position upon award of contract

Potawatomi Training, LLC is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action-Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class.",11150,Washington
106,HelpDesk Level I Support Specialist,IRI Washington DC,"Washington, DC",None,"Job Summary
Every employee of IRI is responsible for carrying out the Mission of IRI and demonstrating the core values in their day-to-day operations. The Core Values, which are IRI’s foundational building blocks include:
Excellence- We believe in quality results delivered by investing in people. Freedom- We believe in exploration and experimentation to be agile and responsive. Respect- We believe in trust, empathy and empowering people. Teamwork- We believe in diversity, inclusion and the power of global collaboration. Transparency- We believe in open communication and clear decision-making. Accountability- We believe in personal responsibility as the foundation of success.
The Level I Support Specialist will assist with current projects and the overall mission of the IT department of providing superior IT support to IRI staff in the DC office and offices abroad.
Position Requirements
Must be able to commute within the Washington, DC metropolitan area at least part-time.
Minimum of one (1) year relevant work experience in support services.
Advanced technical support experience including but not limited to the following areas:
Microsoft 365 including Exchange, SharePoint, and Azure Active Directory
On-premises domain environment including Active Directory
Microsoft Office applications (desktop and web) including Microsoft Teams
PC equipment including laptop and desktop hardware
Mobile devices including iPhone and Android
Device management for computers and mobile devices (preferably Intune)
Endpoint security including antivirus, malware, and software firewalls
Basic network configuration including NAT, firewalls, cabling, and wireless (Wi-Fi)
Strong focus on exemplary customer service and user satisfaction.
Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal, for user correspondence and support documentation to be used internally and externally.
Organizational and multitasking abilities for working in a fast-paced, team-driven environment
Critical thinking and adaptability, understanding team dynamics within the department.
Ability to identify the underlying cause or process behind a ticket prior to escalation or resolution.
Primary Functions & Responsibilities
Provides in-person, phone, and email/ticket-based support to 300 end users in headquarters or remote, and 350 end users in 35 international offices.
Acts as initial point of contact for all computer and system-related concerns from end users.
Escalates issues requiring additional access or manager involvement through appropriate support channels when required.
Distributes tickets and divides workload among support staff based on knowledge and availability.
Troubleshooting, triage, and resolution of service requests in-person or virtually, over the phone or via remote access utilities.
Fields, responds to, and documents support cases in the helpdesk ticketing system.
Creates, revises, and updates support documentation and knowledge base articles for internal IT technician use as well as end user reference.
Produces training materials for end users via documentation, screen capture, or video-recorded media.
Responsible for inventory control, procurement, distribution, and tracking of assigned and loaner equipment including computers and phones.
Identifies standards to be implemented in both policy and procedure, as well as equipment and configurations for all IRI-purchased, leased, or otherwise responsible equipment.
Performs basic software installation, updates, and management.
Comprehensive understanding of use and licensing requirements for specialty software installations.
Maintains vendor relationships for purposes of procurement and support.
Other duties as assigned.
Experience
Required
1 - 2 years: Advanced technical support experience including but not limited to the following areas:Microsoft 365 including Exchange, SharePoint, and Azure Active DirectoryOn-premises domain environment including Active DirectoryMicrosoft Office applications (desktop and web) including Microsoft TeamsPC equipment including laptop and desktop hardwareMobile devices including iPhone and AndroidDevice management for computers and mobile devices (preferably Intune).
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",11150,Washington
107,"Chief, Literary Initiatives",US Library of Congress,"Washington, DC","$144,128 - $172,500 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is located in the Literary Initiatives Office, Center for Learning, Literacy and Engagement Directorate, Office of the Librarian.

The position description number for this position is 412321.

The salary range indicated reflects the locality pay adjustments for the Washington, D.C., Metropolitan area.

This is a supervisory, non-bargaining unit position.

Relocation expenses will not be authorized for the person(s) selected under this vacancy announcement.

Responsibilities
The Chief, Literary Initiatives (CLI) is responsible for continuing and building upon the design and production of an imaginative, socially relevant, thought-provoking portfolio of accessible literary programs that engage diverse public audiences in active dialogue, builds a literary community, and cultivates connections between literary programs and the Library’s collections, services and experts of the Library of Congress. The CLI serves as the Library’s literary expert providing guidance and inviting authors for programming to retain and attract new audiences to the Library. In accordance with Library policies, develops strategies for handling complex content, topics, contracts pertaining to the literary programs and projects.

The CLI’s Office works closely with all Library service units/divisions especially offices within the Center for Learning, Literacy and Engagement, the Center for Exhibits and Interpretation, Communications, Multimedia Group, the Library Collections and Services Group, Congressional Relations Office, Development Office, Publishing, Office of the Chief Information Officer, Library Shop to ensure that Literary programming is coordinated with the institution’s strategic goals and operations while being responsive to the interests and expectations of the visiting public and special guests.

Provides administrative and technical supervision relative to the staff supervised. Plans work to be accomplished by subordinates, sets and adjusts short-term priorities, and prepares schedules for completion of work; Assigns work to subordinates based on priorities, selective consideration of the difficulty and requirements of assignments, and the capabilities of employees; Observes workers’ performance; demonstrates and conducts work performance critiques. Establishes guidelines and performance expectations for staff and clearly communicates these through the formal employee performance management system. Provides informal feedback and periodically evaluates employee performance. Resolves informal complaints and grievances.
The incumbent has overall responsibility, as well as delegated authority, for the oversight and administration of the Library of Congress’s Literary Initiatives program, which includes but is not limited to strategic collaborative planning, conceptualization, research, design, direction, assessment and reporting for the Library’s annual literary programming. Collaborates with staff in the Library Collections and Services group to ensure that Literary Initiatives programs are connected with the Library’s vast collections and expertise. Secures a wide range of authors and other related speakers that engage a diversity of audiences for a National Book Festival, and other Library-wide Literary Initiatives.

Uses extensive professional knowledge of the literary programming landscape, including knowledge of literature from all genres, authors, publishers, and book festivals and practice to ensure quality control and program management at the highest standards. Uses many years of experience in the profession to assess effectiveness of and determine needed improvements of complex Library program issues and concerns and known future institutions/organizational goals to create a successful program; determines resource requirements, estimating short- and long-range personnel, budgetary, space, and equipment needs. Identifies, develops and implements strategies for engaging the visiting public and for Congressional, official, professional, and special visitors, including international audiences. Identifies needs for and oversees the growth and development of programs and other services to provide Library audiences with enriching experiences.

Plays a key role in shaping, supporting and implementing the Library’s priorities for outreach in support of national literary programming. Works collaboratively with service unit managers and other Library staff to propose literary partnership and outreach strategies and communicate those priorities effectively inside and outside the Library of Congress.

Able to effectively conduct live or virtual welcome remarks, and/or live interviews, media interviews, etc. Ability to identify potential speakers both from within the Library and externally and assist others in developing their skills in this area. Ability to write proposals, reports, briefs, and other high level synthesized documents.

Directs collaborative efforts with offices Library wide to develop integrated approach to Literary Programming Initiatives. Provides guidance to key managers and stakeholders to develop priorities for developing and using resources. Ensures that all implications are identified, weighed, studied, and discussed. Contacts other agencies and organizations to obtain information and models for managing various issues. Identifies and resolves problems that are barriers to achieving goals.
Supervisory status
Yes
Promotion Potential
15
Job family (Series)
0301 Miscellaneous Administration And Program
Similar jobs
Control Center Officers
Officers, Control Center
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
The Supervisor leads his/her staff toward meeting the Library’s vision, mission, and goals by acting decisively, leveraging diversity and inclusiveness, demonstrating flexibility and resilience, fostering continuous improvement and innovation, and fostering integrity and honesty.

To view the Library’s Supervisory Core Competencies click the following link: http://www.loc.gov/hr/employment/uploads/loc_supervisor_core_competencies.pdf.
Qualifications
Applicants must have had progressively responsible experience and training sufficient in scope and quality to furnish them with an acceptable level of the following knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform the duties of the position without more than normal supervision.

Ability to provide program management, evaluation, and oversight for a literary program.**

Ability to supervise and lead a diverse workforce.**

Ability to develop innovative business strategies and build coalitions.**

Ability to convey analysis and information orally through briefings, consultations, and other presentations.

Ability to communicate in writing.

Ability to exercise judgment and discretion.

Ability to interact collaboratively and serve as a program liaison.

Ability to communicate effectively other than in writing.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
Although it is the Library's policy to afford the maximum pay benefit to employees when setting rates of pay, a new appointee who has had no previous Federal service will generally be paid the minimum step of the grade.

The Library of Congress is an equal opportunity employer. All who meet the eligibility requirements are encouraged to apply.

Applicants must submit a complete application package that is received by the closing date of this announcement.

This agency provides reasonable accommodation to applicants with disabilities. If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application and hiring process, please email ADA@loc.gov. The decision on granting reasonable accommodation will be determined on a case-by-case basis.

Applicants with disabilities may be considered under special hiring procedures and must submit an appropriate certificate of eligibility when applying for this position. The proof or disability/certification may be issued by the State Vocational Rehabilitation Office, Disability Services or Career Services office of the applicant’s college or university, or the Department of Veterans Affairs. The letter must verify that the applicant has a severe disability and must be dated within three years of the date of the application. Certification from health care providers are not accepted. For more information contact the Library's Office of EEO/Diversity Programs at 202-707-6024 or email spp@loc.gov. FAILURE TO SUBMIT YOUR CERTIFICATION WILL CAUSE YOUR APPLICATION TO NOT BE CONSIDERED UNDER THE SELECTIVE PLACEMENT PROGRAM.

The Library of Congress is the national library of the United States and is part of the Legislative Branch of the Federal government. As such, all positions are in the excepted service.

Appointment/retention is subject to a favorable evaluation of an appropriate personnel security/suitability investigation.

The Library reserves the right to fill a lesser or greater number of vacancies indicated during the life of this vacancy announcement.

Initial appointments, permanent or indefinite, to the Library of Congress require completion of a one-year probationary period. In addition, per Library of Congress Regulation 2010-12, an appointee or internal selectee is subject to a one-year supervisory probationary period, if this is his/her first supervisory/managerial position at the Library.

The Library of Congress may offer repayment for all or part of federally insured student loans. However, not all service units within the Library of Congress participates in the repayment of federally insured student loans. Therefore, determination to repay a federally insured student loan is subject to approval by the appropriate service unit.

The selected applicant may be required to file a financial disclosure statement with the House of Representatives, U.S. Congress, in accordance with the provisions of Public Law 95-521, Ethics in Government Act of 1978.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
The Library of Congress evaluates applicants through an applicant questionnaire and a structured interview. Applicants may also be screened for some jobs through licensing, certification, and/or education requirements, a narrative/application review, and/or a preliminary telephone interview.

The knowledge, skills, and abilities (KSAs) that are marked with a double asterisk (**) in the vacancy announcement and the applicant questionnaire are considered the most critical for a position. To be considered for final selection, applicants must demonstrate fully acceptable experience in these designated KSAs in the narrative/application review, preliminary telephone and/or full structured interview.

The various assessment tools listed above are designed to verify or explore applicants' experience, knowledge, and training directly related to the job in order to identify the best qualified applicants for selection.

Are you a veteran? Please indicate the type of veterans' preference you are claiming in your application materials and/or applicant profile and provide the appropriate supporting documentation to validate your claim. Those applying for 5-point preference must submit Member Copy 4 of your DD 214. Those applying for 10-point preference must fill out an SF-15 (click here for the form) and provide the required documentation listed on the back of the form. If required supporting documentation is not attached, Veterans' Preference will not be considered in the application process.

For more information regarding eligibility requirements, please see the Library of Congress Merit Selection Plan, Section X.D, at: http://www.loc.gov/hr/employment/msp010909.pdf.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
Current or former federal employees must submit their most recent Notification of Personnel Action (SF-50 or equivalent).

Applicants with disabilities may be considered under special hiring procedures and must submit an appropriate certificate of eligibility when applying for this position. The proof or disability/certification may be issued by the State Vocational Rehabilitation Office, Disability Services or Career Services office of the applicant’s college or university, or the Department of Veterans Affairs. The letter must verify that the applicant has a severe disability and must be dated within three years of the date of the application. The program does not accept certification from health care providers. For more information contact the Library's Office of Equal Employment Opportunity and Diversity Programs at 202-707-6024 or email spp@loc.gov. FAILURE TO SUBMIT YOUR CERTIFICATION WILL CAUSE YOUR APPLICATION TO NOT BE CONSIDERED UNDER THE SELECTIVE PLACEMENT PROGRAM.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
Anyone may apply - By law, employment at most U.S. Government agencies, including the Library of Congress, is limited to U.S. citizens. However, non-citizens may be hired, provided that other legal requirements are met and the Library determines there are no qualified U.S. citizens available for the position.",11150,Washington
108,Project Manager,Electrosoft Services Inc,"Washington, DC",None,"Project Manager (PM)Serves as the lead and is responsible for the overall direction and management of all activities, ensuring execution is within defined performance, cost, and schedule parameters of a Project(s), Task Order or group of Task Orders.Job Duties and ResponsibilitiesThe PM shall provide the planning, direction, coordination, and control necessary for effective and efficient accomplishment of all requirements of the project(s).The PM will be experienced in personnel scheduling and ensuring support coverage.The PM will have in-depth knowledge/expertise in executing Federal contracts and Federal security policies.The PM will be experiences in developing and providing routine and ad hoc status reporting to key stakeholders, up to and including SES and CIO/Director level customers.The PM will have the ability to explain technology clearly for a non-technical audience, and to synthesize information together from a variety of sources and be knowledgeable on all contract activities and interface directly with leadership.Qualifications and Skills(5) or more years of supervisory experience, in a lead or management role.Ability to lead and manage technical oriented projects and personnel.Demonstrated leadership experience in a DoD or DHS work environment.Required Education & CertificationsBachelor’s degreePMPCISSP preferredClearance: SecretElectrosoft Services, Inc. is a privately held, Information Technology (IT) professional services company with a special focus on cybersecurity. We have been serving Federal government since 2001. We are an 8(a) and EDWOSB firm with ISO 9001 and CMMI Level 3 certifications.¿Individuals seeking employment at Electrosoft Services are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, or sexual orientation. You are being given the opportunity to provide the following information in order to help us comply with federal and state Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action record keeping, reporting, and other legal requirements.Job Type: Full-time",11150,Washington
109,Technical Project Manager,The Mom Project,"Washington, DC",$45.86 an hour,"Our Customer’s mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through their family of apps and services, they are building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together.
We are seeking a Technical Project Manager on a contract basis to help tech-based systems from and how level and how it interacts with other systems. Within this, you can then translate findings and created procedures to make sense to the overall crowd or nontech skilled population.

What You’ll Do:
Interpret business requests into organized requirements

Develop and manage end-to-end project plans and ensure on-time delivery

Provide hands-on program management during analysis, design, development, testing, implementation, and post-implementation phases

Perform risk management and change management on projects

Provide day-to-day coordination and quality assurance for projects and tasks

Drive internal process improvements across multiple teams and functions

Interface with engineering teams and cross-functional partners for project requirements and scope

Motivate and focus a large collaboration to reach challenging goals

Define operational processes of our review systems to maintain a stable, consistent environment.

Act as a trusted advisor to partners in developing and prioritizing comprehensive, data-driven tool improvement requests and raise core problems to Engineering and other cross-functional teams.

Must Haves:
2+ years of experience in project management, operations, consulting, product management, or equivalent field

2+ years experience in one of the following: software engineering, systems engineering, support, solution engineering in addition to project/program management experience with a demonstrated track record of delivering business value using technology solutions in high-tech operations space

Can find the answer to an unknown problem, very resourceful and flexible.

Basic SQL queries and understanding

Can handle a lot of projects and tasks with little to no direction

Demonstrate analytical thinking and problem-solving experience

Experience with process change management or process improvement

Experience liaising between technical and non-technical partners, and effectively collaborating with cross-functional stakeholders

Interpersonal experience, including relationship building and collaboration within a cross-functional team

Analytical and problem-solving experience, and experience working with large-scale software systems

Expertise in multiple requirement analysis techniques/methodologies

Experience leading cross-functional efforts across multiple time zones and functions

Demonstrated ability to quickly adapt, learn new skill sets, and ""roll up the sleeves"" in order to accomplish all necessary tasks

Strong analytical and technical mindset, as well as strong organizational and relationship management skills.

Excellent verbal and written communication, influencing, and problem-solving skills

Resourceful, action-orientated with the ability to get things done independently and overcome obstacles by developing creative solutions to problems

Nice to haves:
Team player and resilient

Great communicator (meeting people on a global basis) can connect easily

Fits the company's culture

Education:
Bachelor’s degree preferred.

Hours & Location:
M-F, 40 hours/week. The expectation is to be onsite at our Customer’s Washington, DC office.

Perks are available through our 3rd Party Employer of Record:
Health Benefits: Medical, Dental, Vision, 401k, FSA, Commuter Benefit Program
Accrued PTO: Up to 15 days per 12 months on assignment
New Child Benefit: Up to $4,000 for the birth or adoption of a child while on assignment (conditions apply)",11150,Washington
110,Property Manager I,Morgan Properties,"Largo, MD 20774",None,"Overview:

Get To Know Us:
Join Morgan Properties, one of the nation’s largest and fastest growing property management companies. Our award-winning employees are dedicated to providing our residents with a quality residential living experience every day. Established in 1985 by Mitchell Morgan, Morgan Properties is a national real estate investment and management company headquartered in King of Prussia, Pennsylvania. Morgan Properties and its affiliates currently own and manage a multifamily portfolio comprised of over 350 apartment communities and over 90,000 units located in 20 states. The Company is the nation’s largest private multifamily owner, with over 2,500 employees. Our company thrives on a culture of creativity, communication and collaboration, where every person is valued. We’re always looking for passionate professionals to join our team. If you meet the requirements listed and are interested, please submit your resume for consideration.
What you will be doing:
We are currently seeking a driven leader with experience in the property management industry to oversee and manage all operational and financial aspects of one of our nationally-recognized properties. As the Property Manager, you’ll be responsible for brand recognition in the area’s marketplace, personnel management, resident services, and compliance with all applicable laws and company policies.
What we’ll expect from you:
Take ownership for the growth and development of the community including capital projects to improve the property to better increase the occupancy levels making it a place people want to live and call home.
Conceive new and innovative marketing strategies to aid in curb-side appeal and attracting new residents.
Continually strive to improve processes better the relations with our residents, vendors, and employees.
Develop and foster a highly dynamic sales team into future leaders of Morgan Properties.
Manage Employees: hire and terminate employees, govern employee relations and employee issues, conduct written evaluations, and mentor, supervise, and develop employees.
Must be available on-call 24 hours a day in case of emergency.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree from four-year College or university strongly preferred.
5+ years related experience required.
Experience managing a 500+ unit multi-family housing community.
Experience supervising a team of 10+ individuals, including maintenance personnel.
Market rate community management experience required.
Qualified individuals will have proven performance in successfully monitoring financial statements, capital enhancement projects, revenue, expenses, net operating income and occupancy goals.
ARM, CAM, CAPS, MPM, RMP is a plus!
May require valid drivers’ license, along with good driving record and auto insurance, if traveling to multiple properties.
The “Benefits” of Employment:
Employee referral payment program
Educational Enhancement Program
Medical, Dental, and Vision benefits
Life/ AD&D Insurance
Long and short term disability
Retirement Plan - 401(k) Plan
Discount on an apartment with any one of our properties
Free access to pool and fitness center
Additional employee discounts available
Responsibilities:

Qualifications:",11150,Washington
111,"Climate, Energy, and Resilience Manager",Deloitte,"Arlington, VA",None,"Deloitte's Enterprise Performance professionals are leaders in optimizing operations that span the entire enterprise of an organization, from strategy to implementation and operation. By joining our team, you can help clients achieve impact and value from their investments in both people and technology that support enterprise-wide operations, as well as solutions for specific functions in the organization, from IT to finance and the supply chain.
Work you'll do

Work with international and domestic government and public sector clients to devise and apply smart solutions to critical climate and energy sector problems
Manage teams identifying and directly supporting energy and electricity sector stakeholders while working with senior government clients and counterparts on macro-economic challenges and policy solutions
Organize and deliver services on a cross-section of complex projects
Actively participate in the development of business and vendor relationships
Participate and lead aspects of the proposal development process
Improve electric utility customer service operations and develop innovative, market-driven solutions for the energy transition
Lead climate, electricity, sustainable mining, renewable energy and/or water infrastructure resiliency in such areas as decarbonization, policy development, regulatory reform, service provision, and improved access to capital
Responsible for project(s) financials including development of financial plans
Manages day-to-day interactions with clients and internal Deloitte team
Displays both breadth and depth of knowledge regarding functional and technical issues
Displays leadership and business judgment in anticipating client/project needs and developing alternative solutions
Provide counseling/coaching, oversight, and support for delivery teams and staff
Actively participate in staff recruitment and retention activities providing input and guidance into the staffing process
Focus on managed revenue targets as well as achieving quarterly or yearly sales objectives for new business
Lead business development initiatives to grow the climate, energy, and resilience team and the Government practice
Manage resources and budget on client projects
The team
Deloitte's Government and Public Services (GPS) practice - our people, ideas, technology and outcomes-is designed for impact. Serving federal, state, & local government clients as well as public higher education institutions, our team of over 15,000+ professionals brings fresh perspective to help clients anticipate disruption, reimagine the possible, and fulfill their mission promise.
he GPS Energy Sector Reform team is part of the broader Supply Chain and Network Operations Portfolio within Deloitte Consulting. The Supply Chain & Network Operations Offering helps clients transform their value chains into a competitive edge. Professionals drive efficiency, improve flexibility, and increase responsiveness by furnishing proactive insights and enhancing decision-making. Teams advise, implement, and operate transformational solutions by providing operational know-how, digital technologies, advanced analytics, and industry-specific hybrid solutions. Teams also optimize operations, product, and material flows, and create greater synergy for the supply network to optimize mission performance.
Qualifications
Required:
Bachelor's degree from an accredited university required
Must be legally authorized to work in the United States without the need for employer sponsorship, now or at any time in the future
Must be able to obtain and maintain the required clearance for this role
Experience in energy economics, renewable energy development, finance and policy, energy sector reform, or climate change policy
Travel up to 25% (While 25% of travel is a requirement of the role, due to COVID-19, non-essential travel has been suspended until further notice)
Preferred:

Advanced degree in engineering, environmental management, business, economics, policy, or other relevant fields
Experience and familiarity with UNFCCC processes and procedures and climate finance
Experience implementing climate change and GHG emissions reduction programs for public and private organizations
Experience in financial modeling, energy, or project finance highly preferred
Experience in power utility operations and utility strengthening, specifically working within power utility companies on commercial and distribution issues
Experience or training in , energy transition minerals (e.g. battery minerals) and rare earths, experience or knowledge of mining and resource extraction
Experience in system planning and power system modeling as well as experience working with electricity markets and independent system operators
Experience mentoring and coaching others
Proven leadership skills demonstrating strong judgment, problem-solving, and decision-making abilities
Experience managing senior-level client relationships
Experience presenting to clients or other decision makers to present and sell ideas to
Proven experience effectively prioritizing own workload and managing teams to deliver service excellence, on time and in scope
Demonstrated ability to write clearly, logically, succinctly, persuasively and in a manner that appeals to a wide audience
Mastery of word processing
How you'll grow
At Deloitte, our professional development plan focuses on helping people at every level of their career to identify and use their strengths to do their best work every day. From entry-level employees to senior leaders, we believe there's always room to learn. We offer opportunities to help sharpen skills in addition to hands-on experience in the global, fast-changing business world. From on-the-job learning experiences to formal development programs, our professionals have a variety of opportunities to continue to grow throughout their career.",11150,Washington
112,Agile IT Project Manager,Guidehouse,"Washington, DC 20036 (Dupont Circle area)",None,"Overview:

Guidehouse is a leading management consulting firm serving the public and commercial markets. We guide our clients forward towards new futures that build trust in society and your professional skills along the journey. Join us at Guidehouse.
Responsibilities:

The Agile IT Project Manager oversees the Agile development process for a software solution for a State Department client in a fast-paced environment; facilitates all Scrum Events; ensures all Scrum Artifacts are transparent; manages the product roadmap to ensure milestones are achieved; utilizes Azure DevOps and other Agile softwares; manages and grooms backlog of user stories and ensure acceptance criteria are met; identifies and proactively communicates risks, issues, and proposed mitigation strategies; coordinates across a multidisciplinary team of engineers, project managers, IT staff, to accomplish project objectives; liaises directly with product and business owners to gather requirements and provide guidance, advice, and recommendations.
Qualifications:
Experience overseeing the Agile process for complex software development projects
Bachelor’s Degree
Experience monitoring project progress and implementing effective corrective actions if actual progress falls behind plan
Demonstrated ability to use effective facilitation skills and techniques to elicit requirements from a diverse range of stakeholders
Demonstrated ability to offer solutions and articulate the business impact to clients in a clear and concise manner
Demonstrated ability to work collaboratively with others in a team environment
Experience briefing senior-level government leaders
Experience working in a multi-contractor environment
Proactive and comfortable working independently
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Top Secret
Preferred:
Experience working within Department of State and/or the Intelligence Community, or other Federal agencies with international focus.
Certified ScrumMaster (CSM), Agile Certified Practitioner (ACP) or equivalent
TS/SCI eligible Clearance required
Clearance: Active Top Secret, SCI eligible
Additional Requirements:

The successful candidate must not be subject to employment restrictions from a former employer (such as a non-compete) that would prevent the candidate from performing the job responsibilities as described.
Disclaimer:

About Guidehouse
Guidehouse is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law, ordinance, or regulation.
Guidehouse will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law or ordinance including the Fair Chance Ordinance of Los Angeles and San Francisco.
If you have visited our website for information about employment opportunities, or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation, please contact Guidehouse Recruiting at 1-571-633-1711 or via email at RecruitingAccommodation@guidehouse.com. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.
Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of Guidehouse and Guidehouse will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.
Rewards and Benefits
Guidehouse offers a comprehensive, total rewards package that includes competitive compensation and a flexible benefits package that reflects our commitment to creating a diverse and supportive workplace.
Benefits include:
Medical, Rx, Dental & Vision Insurance
Personal and Family Sick Time & Company Paid Holidays
Position may be eligible for a discretionary variable incentive bonus
Parental Leave and Adoption Assistance
401(k) Retirement Plan
Basic Life & Supplemental Life
Health Savings Account, Dental/Vision & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts
Short-Term & Long-Term Disability
Tuition Reimbursement, Personal Development & Learning Opportunities
Skills Development & Certifications
Employee Referral Program
Corporate Sponsored Events & Community Outreach
Emergency Back-Up Childcare Program",11150,Washington
113,Tajiki Language Instructor at FSI,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Tajiki Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",11150,Washington
114,Customer Service Supervisor (Contact Center),Enlightened Inc.,"Washington, DC 20036 (Downtown area)",Up to $22 an hour,"We are in search of Customer Service Supervisor (CSS) to become an essential part of our Washington, DC team! The Customer Service Supervisor monitors the daily operations of the Customer Service Representatives (CSRs) to ensure quality, customer experience and performance metrics are met. The Supervisor provides departmental leadership and supervision of contact center employees. The supervisor will be responsible for the productivity, quality and timeliness of work completed for their assigned team members.The supervisor will conduct regular coaching and feedback sessions with the individual agents on his/her assigned team. The supervisor will report to the Customer Service Manager. He/She may also participate in interviewing and hiring recommendations and complete performance evaluations for members of their team.**DC Residents Strongly Encouraged To Apply**Key TasksProvide departmental leadership in assigned functional areaResponsible for supervision of contact center employees to assure productivity, quality, and timeliness of work in the completion of assigned projects and departmental goalsMonitor CSR quality and performance and provide feedback and coaching as appropriate.Monitor staff attendance/schedule adherence and enter exceptions, as necessary, into the workforce management toolManage unplanned shrinkageAssist with or deliver training alerts/critical updates to keep team current on changes that may occur in information or proceduresPerform tasks to assure service level and quality requirements are metParticipate in interviews and recommend hiring of contact center staff, as neededMaintain department records related to CSR coaching and performance improvementComplete employee performance assessment at end of assignmentImmediately report system issues to manager or appropriate parties.Continually look for and suggest process improvements that will benefit our customersMay be required to work weekends, holidays, or off-shift, as necessaryQualifications and SkillsHigh school diploma or GED requiredSix-months supervisory or leadership experience preferredCustomer Service or Contact Center experience (2-3 years) requiredBachelor’s or Associate’s degree preferredSKILLS AND ABILITIESExcellent customer service, leadership and team interaction skills requiredDemonstrated ability to coach team members to higher levels of performanceMust have the ability to organize simultaneous tasks for individual assignments and the workflow of others within the unitProven ability to work as a team member quicklyABOUT ENLIGHTENED:  Enlightened delivers end-to-end IT solutions with a focus on Cybersecurity, Management Consulting, and Software Development and Integration. As part of the Enlightened team, you will contribute in a meaningful way to projects that make a difference in our nation and around the world.As one of the Washington Metropolitan-area’s fastest growing IT companies, we are always looking for creative, passionate and responsible employees. We acknowledge that intelligent, dedicated employees are our greatest asset and are continuously adding to our talented and diverse team. If you feel innovation, integrity and a drive to deliver are key components to success, we invite you to become Enlightened.WHY ENLIGHTENED? We provide a work environment that is positive, challenging, and that supports employees’ commitment to their communities. As an organization, we are dedicated to continual improvement and growth. We empower all employees to apply their unique background and expertise to serve our clients.Enlightened is firmly committed to treating all employees, customers, and partners with fairness, dignity, and equality. This includes providing an equal opportunity work environment. We do not discriminate nor tolerate discrimination in any form to include discrimination or harassment based on age, sex, sexual orientation, ethnicity, culture, religion, disability, or financial status.Job Type: Full-timePay: Up to $22.00 per hourSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayEducation:High school or equivalent (Required)Experience:Supervising experience: 1 year (Required)Customer Service: 2 years (Required)Work Location:One locationThis Job Is:A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to applyA job for which all ages, including older job seekers, are encouraged to applyOpen to applicants who do not have a college diplomaA job for which people with disabilities are encouraged to applyCompany's website:www.enlightened.comBenefit Conditions:Waiting period may applyOnly full-time employees eligibleWork Remotely:YesCOVID-19 Precaution(s):Remote interview processSocial distancing guidelines in placeVirtual meetingsSanitizing, disinfecting, or cleaning procedures in place",11150,Washington
115,Project Manager (Bethesda preferred or 100% Remote in US only!),Radian,"Bethesda, MD 20814","$78,400 - $107,800 a year","This Project Manager (PM) will support the Radian Data and Analytics (RDNA) team. The PM is a core member of a product delivery team. The PM identifies and schedules project deliverables, milestones and required activities and tasks. Provides leadership and motivation to project team members throughout the project life cycle, and confers with project staff to outline work plan. Establishes work plan and staffing for project activities, releases, iterations or phases, works with the Program Director to arrange for recruitment or assignment of project personnel, Implements project communication plan. Performs risk assessment and implements mitigation plans. Monitors project activities, ensuring the currency, quality and integrity of the information. Ensures that project goals are accomplished and in line with business objectives. Works with technical leads to assign duties, responsibilities, and scope of authority to project personnel. Directs and coordinates activities of project personnel to ensure project progresses on schedule and within budget. Creates status reports and distributes them to stakeholders. Utilizes RDNA standards and procedures for project reporting and documentation. Plans, leads, organizes, and motivates one or more cross-functional projects of medium to high complexity consisting of multiple teams and/or requiring integration with other activities outside of the project team's scope. Works across departments in different locations and interacts with all levels of management and staff. Advanced MS Excel, MS Power Point, MS Visio, MS Word, MS Project, and Jira skills required. Advanced experience with implementing SQL, Snowflake, and cloud based projects is required.
Primary Duties and Responsibilities
Identifies and schedules project deliverables, milestones and required activities and tasks. Provides leadership and motivation to project team members throughout the project life cycle, and confers with project staff to outline work plan. Establishes work plan and staffing for project activities, releases, iterations or phases, works with the Program Director to arrange for recruitment or assignment of project personnel, Implements project communication plan
Plans, leads, organizes, and motivates one or more cross-functional projects of medium to high complexity consisting of multiple teams and/or requiring integration with other activities outside of the project team's scope.
Directs and coordinates activities of project personnel to ensure project progresses on schedule and within budget.
Works across departments in different locations and interacts with all levels of management and staff
Creates status reports and distributes them to stakeholders. Acts as a primary contact for questions on current/future/past projects.
Contribute to best practices. Help evolve the team’s tools & techniques in the areas of project reporting and documentation
Job Specifications

Knowledge:
Requires 7 or more years of IT work experience, including a minimum of 5 years of demonstrated competency in a project coordination role and three or more years of business unit (BU) or BU-facing experience.
Requires experience with projects involving one or more technology or functional domain.
Familiar with one or more project management methodologies and tools, resource management practices and change management techniques.
Ability to blend traditional project management principles and practices with an agile development approach.
PMI-ACP, CSM, or equivalent certification preferred. Knowledge of mortgage insurance life cycle is a plus.
Skills and Abilities:
Ability to work independently with minimal direction.
Experience managing Data projects.
Strong analytical and project management skills required.
Skilled at facilitation and engaging stakeholders in face-to-face conversations, regardless of domain
Thinks across organizational boundaries and empathizes with customers, both internal and external
Able to anticipate impacts, both positive and negative, to other areas of the organization
Ability to break a problem down into smaller chunks that can be delivered separately (i.e features and stories)
Comfortable with continuous discovery and analyzing work in increments, rather than all at once up front
Ability to promote process improvement and be an advocate for change
Strong communication skills, both verbal and written
Comfortable operating in an environment with a considerable amount of ambiguity
Effectively manages priorities across multiple concurrent workstreams
Ability to work well in fast-paced, dynamic settings.
Ability to work independently with minimal direction.
Strong analytical and project management skills required, including a thorough understanding of how to support BA with interpreting customer business needs and translating them into application and operational requirements.

Prior Work Experience
Technical: 5 - 8 years
Supervisory: 5 - 8 years
Education and Credentials
Required: Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Business Administration, or other related field.
Other Certifications:: PMI-ACP, CSM
Why Work with Us
Competitive Compensation: anticipated base salary from $78,400 to $107,800 based on skills and experience. This position is eligible to participate in an annual incentive program.
Our Company Makes an Impact. We’ve been recognized by multiple organizations like, being included on Bloomberg’s Gender-Equality Index, being honored as a Tech 100 by HousingWire, pledging to PwC’s CEO Action for Diversity & Inclusion commitment, and receiving the Spirit Award from the MBA’s Open Door’s Foundation.
Rest and Relaxation. Generous time off starting day one, 9 paid holidays + 1 floating holiday in support of our I&D culture.
Health Benefits. Multiple medical plan choices, including HSA and FSA options, dental, and vision.
Prepare for your Future. 401(k) with a top of market company match (did we mention the company match is immediately vested?!)
Paid Parental Leave. An opportunity for all new parents to embrace this exciting change in their lives.
Employee Assistance and Discount Programs. From helping you navigate the healthcare system, to providing resources and assistance to parents and caregivers of children with development disabilities, to scoring discounts with thousands of retailers.
Pet Insurance. To help protect our furry family members.
At this time, Radian is unable to sponsor applicants who require work visas.
EEO Statement
Radian complies with all applicable federal, state, and local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to gender, age, race, color, religious creed, marital status, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.
Equal Opportunity Employer Details
Accommodation
Whether you require an accommodation for the job application or interview process, Radian is dedicated to a barrier-free employment process and encourages a diverse workforce. If you have questions about the accommodation process, please e-mail careers@radian.com.",11150,Washington
116,Project Manager,Syneren Technologies Corporation,"Arlington, VA 22201 (Radnor-Ft Myer Heights area)",None,"Syneren is a place where we value Inclusion, Collaboration and Innovation. If you join our team, you will be part of a vibrant, talented workforce that is actively helping our Federal Government agencies in their modernization and digital transformation efforts. We invite you to apply and explore the opportunity to work together. We are looking forward to hearing from you!
Read more about our culture, mission and values at https://www.syneren.com/careers.html.
Syneren offers an array of flexible, affordable, competitive benefits including Health and Wellness, 401(k) contributions, paid vacation, holidays, sick leave, tuition reimbursement, referrals, performance incentives, short and long term disability benefits and more.

Job Location: Arlington, VA

Job Description

The Project Manager is the single representative responsible for all performance, services and deliverables.

Required Qualifications:

U.S. Citizenship
Bachelors degree in management, information technology or a STEM field
10+ years of experience managing federal Government contracts
Project Management Professional (PMP) Certification
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Veterans encouraged to apply

About Syneren: Syneren is an award winning, CMMI Level 3 certified, high quality provider of technology solutions for the government as well as commercial sectors. Founded in 2003, we have been broadening our services to cover an array of disciplines, including Hardware and Systems Engineering, Software Development and Testing, IT Systems Support, Cyber Security, Independent Testing and Evaluation and Program Support. Notably our innovative and effective solutions are delivered consistently by a highly qualified staff and management team. Syneren is committed to providing exceptional solutions that meet the client mission needs.

Thank you for your interest in Syneren Technologies Corporation. Syneren Technologies Corporation is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. This business uses E-Verify in its hiring practices to achieve a lawful workforce. E-Verify® is a registered trademark of the U.S. Department of Homeland Security. www.dhs.gov/E-Verify #Syneren",11150,Washington
117,Associate IT Support Specialist,"Deltek, Inc.","Herndon, VA 20171",None,"Primary daily responsibilities include managing technical desktop support incidents for both remote and onsite employees, following specific processes and guidelines to ensure that tasks are completed consistently and efficiently.

Receive and respond to user inquiries and requests via case tracking system, telephone, and email, professionally and with speed, accuracy and proficiency
Follow up on open tickets to ensure proper response and satisfactory resolution, keep detail oriented documents regarding problems and solutions, and keep the customer updated of the status and resolution times.

Log all incoming requests in the incident tracking system and document all actions, to include all follow up conversations, troubleshooting steps, and resolution.
Correctly escalate unresolved cases to support technicians and/or groups as needed
Assist with administration of mobile devices
Contribute technical solutions to the IT Knowledge Base
 Participate in projects and initiatives as directed by the Service Desk Manager
Qualifications
1-3 years IT support experience on a corporate Service Desk or in another technical support role with a background in either Customer Service or as an IT Service Desk Analyst
Excellent writing, communication, and interpersonal skills
Strong Analytical, troubleshooting and problem solving skills
Strong troubleshooting skills required
Demonstrated knowledge of PC/Laptop hardware components and basic troubleshooting, Windows networking, LAN/WAN, DNS, TCP/IP, Active Directory system administration tasks, and mobile devices
Proficiency in Microsoft products and operating system, certifications preferred
Familiarity with resolving remote connectivity issues
Ability to deal with multiple priorities in a fast-paced environment a must
A+ and ITIL V.3 certification a plus",11150,Washington
118,"Manager, No Kid Hungry Campaigns and Field Operations",Share Our Strength,"Washington, DC 20005 (Downtown area)",None,"Since 1984, Share Our Strength® has led the fight against hunger and poverty by inspiring and organizing individuals and businesses to share their strengths. Today, through the No Kid Hungry and Cooking Matters campaigns, Share Our Strength is ending childhood hunger in America by ensuring all children get the healthy food they need. No child should go hungry in America – we’re on our way to making that a reality and we want you to join us. We’re bold, creative, always open to new ideas and 100% dedicated to our mission. If that sounds like you, we’d like you to consider becoming part of our team.

The Manager, No Kid Hungry Campaigns and Field Operations is responsible for supporting the No Kid Hungry campaigns planning and processes, managing strategic initiatives and projects, tracking and synthesizing information, and fostering collaboration and connections with internal staff and external organizations as needed. The role reports to the Managing Director, and requires excellent project management capabilities, ease in transitioning between big picture strategy and small detail execution, along with creative problem solving, strong written and verbal communication to diverse internal and external stakeholders, and data analysis and visualization.
This position is preferably based in Washington, DC, but could be fully remote for the right candidate. Range for offers: $61,000 - $68,100.

DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Identify, develop and execute project plans and activities to support the creation of enhanced processes and coordination within the No Kid Hungry Campaigns team and across the broader organization.
Provide strategic support on cross-team coordination to identify areas for process improvement and collaboration.
Identify and create opportunities for knowledge sharing within No Kid Hungry Campaigns team and across the broader organization.
Leverage technology and systems to support team’s information gathering and collaboration.
Work with the No Kid Hungry Campaigns team to synthesize key learnings, opportunities, challenges, and themes from state updates, program communications, and data analysis for further action within and across teams for reflection and forward thinking.
Lead and support team and external trainings as needed, including communicating and coordinating external partner resources, trainings, and convenings in close coordination with the No Kid Hungry Campaigns team and across the broader organization.
Collaborate within the No Kid Hungry team, and with frequent collaborators in the Program and Communications departments, on programmatic communications needs and themes on a weekly, quarterly, and annual basis.
Collaborate with the Communications team on trainings, technology and resources to improve our digital programmatic presence.
Partner with colleagues to support Share Our Strength's work to be a diverse and inclusive organization, and ensuring this value is embedded in the organization and throughout our work.

QUALIFICATIONS

Bachelor’s degree strongly preferred and typically 3-5 years of relevant experience and/or an equivalent combination of education and experience.
Strong project management skills, with complex components, deliverables, and internal coordination points.
Strong ability to organize own work and perform independently and efficiently while closely and appropriately coordinating with team members.
Emotional intelligence and strong orientation toward customer service (internally and externally).
Strong written and verbal communication skills. Ability to digest and synthesize data and make it relevant and actionable to internal teams.
Understanding of digital communications and social media tools and practices to amplify programmatic messages externally.
Interest in leveraging technology and systems to improve processes and systemic efficiencies.
Excellent information management and organizational skills, with great attention to detail.
Ability to develop, manage and execute projects on schedule and to work on tight deadlines as needed.
Interest in anti-hunger and anti-poverty issues.

At Share Our Strength, we value an individual’s diversity of backgrounds, experiences, ideas and perspectives. A hallmark of our history, culture and values has been the organization’s desire to bring together motivated, intelligent, and talented people to work together to find and implement solutions to eliminate childhood hunger. We each come to Share Our Strength with a unique background, but together we form a team that yields amazing results. This shared value of encouraging and embracing diversity in our organization fosters a workplace and culture that is highlighted for its innovation, open expression of ideas, and collaboration. With a strong shared commitment to the organization’s mission, and a unique blend of individual strengths, we are all working toward ensuring that each child in America has food where they Live, Learn, and Play.",11150,Washington
119,IT Project Manager,E-INFOSOL LLC,"Washington, DC 20004 (Downtown area)",None,"E-INFOSOL is seeking a IT Project Manager to support a contract in the Chantilly, Virginia area.
Job Description
The IT Project Manager will:
Provide technical leadership, demonstrated through leading meetings such as scrums, team meetings, and customer briefs, reporting of team status, identifying risks.
Supports a technology and innovation office, Agency stakeholders and program management
Research and document user profiles, analysis tasks, workflows, and user scenarios.
Collect and document user requirements.
Create user interface design specifications.
Work closely with product designers and process engineers developing applications.
Oversee usability testing.
Design and develop user surveys to obtain user feedback.
Work directly with high level clients requiring
Requirements
ClearanceActive Top-Secret clearance
Minimum Education PreferredBachelor’s degree, or higher, in an IT technical field or business
Minimum Experience Required
5 + years of experience in IT Project Management or Technical Lead position
10+ years of IT related experience
PMP certification highly preferred
Shall have the ability to design desirable user interfaces that meets the users’ needs and taste
Has experience with task management via JIRA and supporting software development efforts.
Excellent Communications Skill
Exceptional Presentation Skills
Understands Cloud Technologies (e.g., AWS, Azure)
About E-INFOSOL:
E-INFOSOL is a Service Disabled and Veteran Owned Small Business (SDVOSB) located in the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area. We are a premiere IT Security, Cloud and Virtualization provider servicing both federal and state government, and private sector customers. Through strategic partnerships with top industry players such as Amazon Web Services (AWS), VMware, Microsoft and Nutanix, we are able to provide an array of IT products and solutions, combining them with our expertise.
Why E-INFOSOL:
E-INFOSOL has 10 years in the digital world expanding with new clientele and jobs rapidly. E-INFOSOL is constantly aware of, technical changes within IT and wants to ensure future candidates can make a difference with contributing their different skills and knowledge. We offer an array of architectural, engineering, and information technological jobs to a diverse group of candidates. Come join the E-INFOSOL family and be a part of the vast growing culture that contributes to the world.",11150,Washington
120,"Counter-Terrorism Analyst, Jr",Jacobs,"Reston, VA 20191",None,"Critical Mission Solutions

Your mission is our mission.

We're invested in you and your success. Everything we do - whether Aerospace, Defense, Intelligence, Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Nuclear, Automotive, or Telecommunications - is more than just a project. It's our challenge as human beings, too. That's why we bring a thoughtful and collaborative approach to every one of our partnerships.

It's our promise to challenge the status quo as we redefine how to solve the world's greatest challenges, and transform big ideas into intelligent solutions for a more connected, sustainable world.

Design your career with a company that inspires and empowers you to deliver your best work so you can evolve, grow and succeed –today and into tomorrow.


Your Impact:
 Overview:
Research and produce all-source terrorism national military intelligence studies and products.
Conduct research and analysis of all-source data, populate databases and disseminate a broad array of intelligence products.
Produce intelligence products on terrorist tactics and operational capabilities to include internal security, organizational facilities, and personalities involved in terrorism tactics, techniques, and procedures (TTP) to include threats, intentions, capabilities, modus operandi, and environment to support national-level counterterrorism planning and operational missions.
Responsibilities:
Produces concise tactical and strategic counter-terrorism assessments for key decision-makers using unevaluated intelligence.
Utilizes a variety of analytical principles, concepts and methodologies to produce all-source intelligence products and target development packages
Produces all-source intelligence products on transnational terrorism
Provides analysis and research for industry, infrastructure, technology, country, geographic area, biographic and targeted vulnerability.
Prepares assessments of current events based on the sophisticated collection, research and analysis of classified/unclassified and open-source information.
Develops and maintains analytical procedures to meet changing requirements and ensure maximum operations.
Skill Set:
Ability to conduct strategic research to develop innovative technical and/or analytic solutions to combine political and military trends/ behaviors with other data sources to support National Security interests.
Comfortable briefing senior level managers quickly and thoroughly with minimal preparation and be able to react to a highly fluid environment.
Knowledge of the dynamics of military and regime leadership, national military strategy, terrorism, strategic doctrine, regional relations, internal and regional stability and security.
Analytical experience in the following areas: Strategic Analysis, Network Development Emerging Threats, Chemical, Biological, Radiological, Nuclear (CBRN), Document and Media Exploitation (DOMEX), and Watchlisting.
Working knowledge of MS Office Suite, or experience with standard analytical search engines or public source databases is a plus.
Here’s What You’ll Need:
Required:
Bachelor’s degree or a Master’s Degree and 4 years of experience. Additional years of experience in lieu of degree.
Advanced experience with intelligence tools and databases like CHROME, M3, TIDE, PALANTIR.
US government clearance: Active or Current TS w/ a current SCI with ability to obtain a CI poly.
Excellent writing, verbal, and communication skills.
Essential Functions
Physical Requirements:
Most work will be done at a desk or computer.
Work Environment:
General Office environment. The work environment is fast-paced and sometimes involves extreme deadline pressures. The nature of the work requires a high degree of teamwork and cooperation with other members of the staff as well as individuals across the Company and Customers.
Equipment & Machines:
General office equipment including PC/laptop, Fax, Copiers, Shredder, Printers, Telephone, and other miscellaneous office equipment.
Attendance:
Attendance is critical at all times. Must be able to work a 40-hour workweek, normally Monday through Friday. However, times and days may vary depending on business requirements. Needs to be available to work overtime during critical peaks and be available to meet last minute requests for overtime should the situation occur.
Other Essential Functions:
Must be able to communicate effectively both verbally and in writing
Grooming and dress must be appropriate for the position and must not impose a safety risk/hazard to the employee or others. Must put forward a professional behavior that enhances productivity and promotes teamwork and cooperation.
Must be able to interface with individuals at all levels of the organization both verbally and in writing. Must be well-organized with the ability to coordinate and prioritize multiple tasks simultaneously. Must work well under pressure to meet deadline requirements. Must be willing to travel as needed. Must take and pass a drug test and background check as well as a motor vehicle records check. Must be a US citizen.
Jacobs is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding, or medical conditions related to pregnancy, childbirth, or breastfeeding), age, medical condition, marital or domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression and transgender status, mental disability or physical disability, genetic information, military or veteran status, citizenship, low-income status or any other status or characteristic protected by applicable law. Learn more about your rights under Federal EEO laws and supplemental language.
At Jacobs, we’re challenging today to reinvent tomorrow by solving the world’s most critical problems for thriving cities, resilient environments, mission-critical outcomes, operational advancement, scientific discovery and cutting-edge manufacturing, turning abstract ideas into realities that transform the world for good. With $13 billion in revenue and a talent force of more than 55,000, Jacobs provides a full spectrum of professional services including consulting, technical, scientific and project delivery for the government and private sector.",11150,Washington
121,Management Analyst,US Office of the Chief Human Capital Officer,"Washington, DC","$60,129 - $113,362 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is located in the Department of Housing and Urban Development, Office of the Chief Human Capital Officer.
Responsibilities
The following are the duties of this position at the GS-12. If you are selected at a lower grade level, you will have the opportunity to learn to perform all these duties, and will receive training to help you grow in this position.

As a/an Management Analyst, you will:

Conduct detailed analyses of complex functions and work processes of broad administrative or technical programs and make recommendations for improvement in the effectiveness and efficiency of work operations.
Counsel and advise program managers on methods and procedures, management surveys, management reports, and control techniques.
Plan and provide a wide range of advisory and administrative support services to the management staff on all issues that relate to the effective management of the organization's workforce.
Independently, or as a member of a team, conduct broad or specific studies and assesses results relevant to workforce goals and objectives.

Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
12
Job family (Series)
0343 Management And Program Analysis
Similar jobs
Analysts, Management
Analysts, Program
Management Analysts
Program Analysts
Program Management Analyst
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
The official duty station for this position will be in Washington, District of Columbia. Failure to report to duty at this location may be grounds for a disciplinary action, including removal.
Key Requirements:
Please refer to ""Conditions of Employment.""
Must be U.S. Citizen or U.S. National.

Qualifications
You must meet the following requirements within 30 days of the closing date of this announcement.

Specialized Experience: For the GS-12, you must have one year of specialized experience at a level of difficulty and responsibility equivalent to the GS-11 grade level in the Federal service. Specialized Experience for this position includes:
Reporting findings and making verbal or written recommendations.; ANDConducting projects or studies to evaluate and recommend solutions.

For the GS-11, you must have one year of specialized experience at a level of difficulty and responsibility equivalent to the GS-09 grade level in the Federal service. Specialized Experience for this position includes:
Working on projects or studies.; ANDCreating reports and presenting both verbally and in writing.

For the GS-09, you must have one year of specialized experience at a level of difficulty and responsibility equivalent to the GS-07 grade level in the Federal service. Specialized Experience for this position includes:
Creating reports and presenting both verbally and in writing.

OR Education: You may substitute education for general or specialized experience as follows:

For the GS-11: Ph.D. or equivalent doctoral degree or 3 full years of progressively higher level graduate education leading to such a degree or LL.M., if related.

For the GS-09: Master's or equivalent graduate degree or 2 full years of progressively higher level graduate education leading to such a degree or LL.B. or J.D., if related.

OR Combination: You may qualify by a combination of experience and education. To combine education and experience, the total percentage of experience at the required grade level compared to the specialized experience requirement, as well as the percentage of completed education compared to the education requirement must equal at least 100 percent.

Experience may have been gained in either the public, private sector or volunteer service. One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis. To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/day/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week on your resume.

Time-in-Grade: In addition to the above requirements, you must meet the following time-in-grade requirement, if applicable:
For the GS-12 you must have been at the GS-11 level for 52 weeks.
For the GS-11 you must have been at the GS-09 level for 52 weeks.
For the GS-09 you must have been at the GS-07 level for 52 weeks.

Time After Competitive Appointment: Candidates who are current Federal employees serving on a non-temporary competitive appointment must have served at least three months in that appointment.
Education
The education generally must be from an accredited (or pre-accredited) college or university recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. If you are qualifying based on foreign education, you must submit proof of creditability of education as evaluated by a credentialing agency. Refer to the OPM instructions.
Additional information
OTHER INFORMATION:

We may select from this announcement or any other source to fill one or more vacancies.
Relocation expenses will not be paid.
Recruitment incentive may be offered.
This is a bargaining unit position.
This position is Non-Exempt from the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA).
HUD offers alternative and flexible work schedules.
CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT:
A one year probationary period may be required.
Must successfully complete a background investigation.
Complete a Declaration for Federal Employment to determine your suitability for Federal employment, at the time requested by the agency.
Have your salary sent to a financial institution of your choice by Direct Deposit/Electronic Funds Transfer.
If you are a male applicant born after December 31, 1959, certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System or are exempt from having to do so.
Go through a Personal Identity Verification (PIV) process that requires two forms of identification from the Form i-9. Federal law requires verification of the identity and employment eligibility of all new hires in the U.S.

HUD employees are subject to a number of government-wide and HUD specific ethics laws and regulations, including restrictions on working in a real estate related business, and having Section 8 tenants, along with other prohibited interests and activities. To review applicable ethics rules and HUD specific restrictions, please visit https://portal.hud.gov/hudportal/HUD?src=/program_offices/general_counsel/ethics.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Your application includes your résumé, responses to the online questions, and required supporting documents. Please be sure that your résumé includes detailed information to support your qualifications for this position; failure to provide sufficient evidence in your résumé may result in a ""not qualified"" determination.

Rating: Your application will be evaluated in the following areas: Analytical, Communication, Project Management, and Technical.

Your application will be rated and ranked among others, based on your responses to the online questions, regarding your experience, education, training, performance appraisals and awards relevant to the duties of this position. Your rating may be lowered, if your responses to the online questions are not supported by the education and/or experience described in your application.

Referral: If you are among the top qualified candidates, your application may be referred to a selecting official for consideration. You may be required to participate in a selection interview.

If you are a displaced or surplus Federal employee (eligible for the Career Transition Assistance Plan (CTAP)/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Plan (ICTAP)) you must receive a rating of at least 84 out of 100 to be rated as ""well qualified"" to receive special selection priority.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
A complete application includes 1. A résumé, 2. Vacancy question responses, and 3. Submission of any required documents.

Please note that if you do not provide all required information, as specified in this announcement, you may not be considered for this position (or may not receive the special consideration for which you may be eligible)

All applicants are required to submit a résumé either by creating one in USAJOBS or uploading one of their own choosing. (Cover letters are optional.) To receive full credit for relevant experience, please list the month/date/year and number of hours worked for experience listed on your résumé. We suggest that you preview the online questions, as you may need to customize your résumé to ensure that it supports your responses to these questions. Please view résumé tips.

CURRENT AND FORMER EMPLOYEES - Documentation Relating to Your Federal Employment:-
Submit a copy of your SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action) showing competitive service as Tenure 1 or 2 (Block 24), Position Occupied as 1 - Competitive Service (Block 34), current Grade (Block 18) and Salary (Block 20).
Typically Award SF-50s do not provide the required information.
If the full performance level of your position is different from the grade indicated in Block 18, please provide proof of the full performance level.
If your highest permanent grade is different from your current grade, submit a copy of an additional SF-50 showing that grade.
If you are currently on a Veterans' Recruitment Appointment (VRA), submit a copy of an SF-50 indicating that type of appointment. Also, you must submit a copy of your DD214 or other documentation showing dates of service and type of discharge and any other applicable documents such as SF-15, VA letters, etc.

Performance Appraisal (ALL APPLICANTS): Submit a copy of all pages of your most recent completed annual performance appraisal, dated within the last 12 months, that includes the final rating. In cases where the performance appraisal is more than 12 months old, incomplete or unavailable, you must attach a written explanation of the reasons.

If you are applying under a special hiring authority (e.g. Military Spouses, Interchange Agreement, VEOA, VRA Schedule A Disability, etc.), please see applicant guide for required documentation. In order to be eligible under one of these authorities, you must submit all required documentation as outlined in the applicant guide.

CAREER TRANSITION ASSISTANCE PLAN (CTAP) OR INTERAGENCY CAREER TRANSITION ASSISTANCE PLAN (ICTAP) DOCUMENTATION: If you are a displaced or surplus Federal employee, click CTAP/ICTAP for eligibility and a detailed list of required documents you must submit in order to be eligible.

Land Management Eligibles must provide all required documentation to verify eligibility, prior performance, and qualifications for the target position. You can find information on the Land Management Workforce Flexibility Act and eligibility here.

EDUCATION DOCUMENTATION: For positions with an education requirement, or if you are qualifying for this position by substituting education or training for experience, you MUST submit a copy of your transcripts or equivalent. An official transcript will be required if you are selected. A college or university degree generally must be from an accredited (or pre-accredited) college or university recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. For a list of schools which meet these criteria, please refer to Department of Education Accreditation page. If you are qualifying based on foreign education, you must submit proof of creditability of education as evaluated by a credentialing agency. Refer to the OPM instructions.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Family of overseas employees
Family members of a federal employee or uniformed service member who is, or was, working overseas.
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Individuals with disabilities
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
All candidates who are: Current or former federal employees qualifying as Status Candidates, Federal employees currently serving on a VRA, VEOA eligibles, CTAP/ICTAP eligibles, eligible for special hiring authorities (e.g., the Schedule A appointment for persons with disabilities, or covered by an Interchange Agreement), or VRA eligibles or Land Management employees eligible under Public Law 114-47.",11150,Washington
122,Project Manager - Management Consulting,Jefferson Consulting Group,"Washington, DC 20006 (Downtown area)",None,"Jefferson Solutions, a well-respected government consulting company of the Jefferson Consulting Group, woman-owned small business, is seeking candidates for a Project Manager position to lead a mix of acquisition and management consulting projects. Efforts include a range of traditional management consulting efforts with a specific focus on the federal acquisition/procurement community. Knowledge of management consulting approaches, change management, and the federal acquisition/procurement process are ideal to be successful in the position. May be remote/virtual.
Responsibilities:
Lead client engagements in a combined role as the Project Manager and Subject Matter Expert. Project management duties include:
Prepare project management plans and manage the execution of the plan.
Manage day-to-day communication with clients.
Generate project reports or proposals.
Ensure compliance with Federal and contractual requirements.
Manage team members.
Subject Matter Expert duties include:
Apply management consulting techniques and technical expertise to develop strategies, recommend and implement approaches to improve processes, restructure organizations, facilitate meetings and build consensus, elicit requirements, develop communication products, and create implementation plans.
Will apply change management techniques, including facilitating team building.
Provide advanced acquisition expertise to assist agencies through the acquisition process. This may include developing performance-based acquisitions for program offices, guiding acquisition strategy development with the contracting office, drafting technical evaluation summaries, etc.
Participate in industry associations to demonstrate firm’s thought leadership.
Support proposal and new business efforts.
Supervise team members.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree
Seven or more years of relevant experience, ideally in management consulting with understanding of the federal acquisition support process – cradle to grave
Prior experience facilitating change management functions like, technical training, team building and related
Experience in working with multiple federal agencies, including Civilian and the Department of Defense (DoD); although DoD experience is desirable, it is not required
Advanced knowledge of the federal acquisition process
Experience managing teams to execute projects
Project Management Professional (PMP) certification and/or FAC/DAWIA certifications preferred
Additional Skills:
Ability to handle effectively and concurrently multiple tasks and projects
Excellent anticipatory skills and proactive approach to work
Strong oral, interpersonal, and written communication skills
Strong prioritization and organization skills to meet deadlines
Detail-oriented and interested in producing quality work product
Ability to maintain high level of confidentiality and to handle sensitive information discreetly
Some travel may be required, when conditions permit
 Jefferson Consulting Group is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, national origin, genetic data, veteran status or any category protected by law.",11150,Washington
123,Global Program Development Manager,Relief International,"Washington, DC 20006 (Downtown area)",None,"Title: Global Program Development Manager
Department: Program Development
Location: London or Washington DC or (or remote based in UK or US)
Reporting to: Head of Program Development
Direct reports: 0
Budget responsibility: 0
Safeguarding Classification: This role is classified as requiring advanced pre-employment checks

ABOUT Relief International.

Relief International (RI) is a leading nonprofit organization working in 16 countries to relieve poverty, ensure well-being and advance dignity. We specialize in fragile settings, responding to natural disasters, humanitarian crises and chronic poverty.

Relief International combines humanitarian and development approaches to provide immediate services while laying the groundwork for long-term impact. Our signature approach — which we call the RI Way—emphasizes local participation, an integration of services, strategic partnerships and a focus on civic skills. In this way, we empower communities to find, design and implement the solutions that work best for them.

RI includes the four corporate members of the RI Alliance: RI-US, RI-UK, MRCA/RI-France and RI-Europe. Under our alliance agreement, we operate as a single, shared management structure.

The Program Development Manager (PDM) –is critical in bringing significant impact and opportunity of funding to our country programmes. You will thrive in an entrepreneurial senior team dedicated to building high-impact programming. Your creative and relentless approach to driving results that will fuel RI’s strategy.

The PDM role is to work collaboratively with the Regional Directors and Regional Program Directors, country teams and with a direct senior-level reporting to the Sr. Director of Program Development. Responsible for donor engagement and capture management (approximately 30%) and managing and/or assisting in proposal development (approximately 70%).
As a key member of the global Program Development team is dedicated to building high impact programming by raising income from institutional donors (like the USAID, FCDO, EC, GAC and the UN). The Programme Development team is based across our global support office in Washington and London and supports Country Offices by helping them to design high-quality programmes, and by raising funds from institutional donors needed to implement them. You will thrive in an entrepreneurial senior team dedicated to building high-impact programming

Reporting to the Sr. Programme Development Director, your role will be supporting country teams and will be key in leading in donor liaison and engagement and capture management. A large proportion of your time will be supporting country teams in proposal development.

Travel
This role is expected to travel (at least 40%) to field sites as well as other countries as needed once the organization determines it will be safe to begin regular travel.
Due to COVID 19, RI policy currently limits international travel and it expected this role will be initially based remotely from home. The organization is undertaking regular reviews and risk assessments to review travel restriction on a global and local level.

ESSENTIAL RESPONSIBILITIES AND DUTIES
Engagement and Capture Management (approximately 30%)
In coordination with regional and country teams:
Support development of RI PD strategy in assigned countries and ensure coordination with overall program development strategy;
Maintain regular engagement with donors, international organizations, national governments, foundations, etc., to track donor trends and priorities and inform HQ of upcoming program priorities;
Represent RI to the donor community as needed and inform donors on RI country efforts;
Attend relevant meetings and networking events (e.g., regional and national coordination meetings, relevant RFA/P meetings, donor consultations) as needed for the performance of duties;
Maintain outreach with relevant international and local NGOs as well as private sector firms in order to facilitate partnerships needed for program development opportunities; and,
Develop capture plans and conduct completion analysis on upcoming priority proposals.
Proposal Development (approximately 70%)
Engage in needs assessment for project proposals as necessary;
Contribute to program design, for solicited and unsolicited programs, and for pilot and full-scale programs;
Where proposals are pending with donor agencies, meet with donor officers to ensure program plans represent a good fit with donor objectives;
Participate in the preparation of funding proposals, including leading proposal writing efforts as well as costing efforts;
Track country proposal efforts and report to PD team on status;
Support effective go/no-go decisions and cost share analysis;
Serve as PD focal point for assigned countries that RI works in;
Build the capacity of regional and country teams in program development; and,
Ensure review process and submission is completed, within submission deadlines.
Additional responsibilities, not limited to:
Support 6-8 countries, coverage will be assigned based on workload and pipeline.
Support building the PD Consultant Roster, identifying potential technical and non-technical individuals to be hired on a short-term basis.
Undertake travel as required in the pursuit of the above tasks;
Prepare regular activity reports for HQ;
Undertake other ad hoc tasks, as instructed by HQ; and,
Operate within RI policy, setting an example for other field staff.
Safeguarding
Uphold and promote RI’s commitment to ensuring the safeguarding and safety of the vulnerable communities we serve.
Consistent with RI’s safeguarding and protection policies, ensure all people who come into contact with Relief International are as safe as possible.
Equity and Diversity commitment
Ensure that gender equity is addressed in our staffing and programming
QUALIFICATIONS & SKILLS REQUIREMENTS

This position will require a demonstrated ability to achieve results in a demanding and fast paced environment.

Track record of achievement in a previous, similar role and progressive responsibility.
Demonstrated proficiency with government grants, public/private donors and finance management.
Ability to work under pressure and to meet challenging deadlines.
Ability to work and manage a highly complex security situations within the regional context
Ability to analyze complex organizational challenges and present innovative solutions.
Demonstrated proficiency to write clearly, insightfully and persuasively on tight deadlines.
A strong network of international donor contacts and relationships.
An outstanding ability to track donor trends that contribute to business development outcomes.
Excellent verbal and interpersonal communication skills
A passion and ability to work with field teams for sustained periods.
Master’s degree in international relations, business administration or other relevant field or equivalent work experience
Proven experience INGO context, previous work experience with DFID, EU, ECHO, USAID, PRM required.
Proven success in grant writing, net-working and liaising with field and HQ staff when necessary
Willingness to travel, sometimes at short notice, as required for the successful implementation of the role.
RI Values:
We uphold the Humanitarian Principles: humanity, neutrality, impartiality and operational independence. We affirmatively engage the most vulnerable communities.

We value:
Inclusiveness
Transparency and accountability
Agility and innovation
Collaboration
Sustainability",11150,Washington
124,Project Manager – Mid to Senior (PMP required),"MindPoint Group, LLC","Washington, DC",None,"Company Description
MindPoint Group delivers industry-leading cybersecurity solutions, services, and products. We are the trusted cybersecurity advisors to key government and commercial decision-makers and support security operations for some of the most security-conscious organizations globally. We design and implement innovative security solutions to identify and defend against today’s risks and tomorrow’s attacks.
We believe that helping organizations operate from the best security posture possible requires automation. Empowering our employees to excel and providing them with the means to do so enables us to consistently exceed our clients’ expectations.
Unlike many IT consultancies, we’re not a body shop. Our client engagements are challenging and growth-oriented. Our relationship with you is for the long run because, in this business, your success is our success. That’s why we treat investments in employees as investments in the company itself, which is why we offer fantastic benefits (healthcare, generous PTO, paid maternity and paternity leave, and tuition reimbursement, to name a few).
But you’ll want to work here for reasons that can’t be written into an offer letter—the challenge, growth opportunities, and most important: the culture of a company that cares about you.
We are an established, profitable, and growing company that promises you the following:
A diverse organization.
A safe workplace with zero tolerance for discrimination and harassment of any kind.
A balanced work life. Seriously.
Potential of a flexible schedule, depending on the specific customer.
A leadership team focused on your professional growth and development.

Job Description
This position is contingent upon contract award. MindPoint Group is seeking a Senior-level Project Manager. The PM:Applies knowledge to forecast space requirements and develops space needs based against business and market conditionsDevelops executable plans to support the business needs, corporate objectives and initiativesIdentifies, analyzes and applies related data in regard to the creation and execution of physical or virtual space solutionsProduces visual display of quantitative and qualitative informationIllustrates organizational, operational, and functional relationships that pose physical and spatial impactsGenerates conceptual solutions that respond to client’s spatial requirements, physical planning constraints, and corresponding IT and compliance requirementsDevelops, maintains and provides reports, including agreed upon critical success factors on measures of work environment efficiency, effectiveness and expressionConduct interviews and discussions with the client to gather, coordinate, and synthesize project requirements, functional, and operational issuesDevelops project-level and portfolio-level solutions based on interpretation of the program data and preparation of recommendations. Validates all program dataPrepares migration/origination plans, schematic schedules, stack and block fit plans. Serves as a point of contact throughout the Migration Planning ProcessProvides business case analysis and documentation that meet the Client’s requirements and are consistently in alignment with Client’s goals and objectivesAligns occupancy plans with client and organization strategies

Qualifications

Active Secret clearance required
PMP certification
At least 4+ years (Mid level) or 8+ years (Senior level) managing large and complex technology integration projects
Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines
Equal Opportunity Employer Veterans/Disabled",11150,Washington
125,CPIC Project Manager - Department of Labor,ADVANCED MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES GROUP(AMSG),"Washington, DC",None,"ID: 1246

Location: Washington, DC

Department: N/A

Description
AMSG has a Contingent need for a Capital Planning Investment Control (CPIC) Project Manager
Background
The U.S. Department of Labor (DOL) Office of the Chief Information Officer (OCIO)’s mission is to provide, through a dedicated mindset, information solutions and leadership to advance the DOL mission that is to foster, promote, and develop the welfare of the wage earners, job seekers, and retirees of the United States; improve working conditions; advance opportunities for profitable employment; and assure work-related benefits and rights.
To carry out this mission, DOL leadership identified a Management Goal in the Department’s 2018-2022 Strategic Plan: Optimize the Department of Labor’s Enterprise Services’ Opportunities. A specific focus of the Management Goal was to develop enterprise-wide shared services for human resources (HR), information technology (IT), and procurement services. Personnel security was added to the initiative due to the interrelationship with current HR and procurement practitioners and the operational need to ensure a single authoritative source for all administrative support functions. The purpose of this initiative is to transition these administrative services to their respective central authority to improve the quality, consistency, and customer service delivery, thereby allowing the agencies to focus on mission. At this point, OCIO has therefore inherited nearly all agencies’ IT systems, IT applications, and IT personnel.
OCIO’s vision is to provide premier technology solutions – best in federal service – that empower the DOL mission and serve the American public through collaboration and innovation. In order to achieve this desired position, OCIO has refocused its IT strategy to foster increased transparency and collaboration to support the Department’s enterprise-wide shared services initiative. OCIO is therefore responsible for the technical planning, design, development, integration, testing, staging, delivery, management, and maintenance of all IT solution services supporting various internal agency programs.
Scope
AMSG will provide support services to assist the DOL OCIO with investment management, capital planning including analysis and impacts of changes to the OMB guidance related to the annual and Passback submissions to OMB. AMSG will provide a full complement of monitoring and assisting services for the Major IT Business Case (MITBC), including development, submission, and reporting of actual performance of IT activities, Capital Planning, collecting and maintaining project budgetary documents, preparing artifacts/reports necessary for the annual Budget request, preparing executive level presentations/reports on the data collected, and budget monitoring tasks.
Responsibilities Include:
The Candidate will provide CPIC support services in assisting with activities to confirm management, monitoring, and compliance of MITBC investments. Support Services and assisting activities include the following:
Monitoring investment-level project status and participating in Critical Decision reviews as required. This requires ongoing verification of project data. This includes preparing overarching or detailed reports relative to the assigned investment and performing detailed analysis of project data by comparing planned, projected, and actual performance, including conformance to original expectations on a weekly basis.
Engaging individual team members, PMs, and SMEs to resolve any discrepancies or inadequacies. Prolonged non-compliance, issues, or discrepancies are elevated to the Government team lead as “advance warning indicators” (i.e., risk management mitigation) or potential process improvement activities.
Completing OMB reporting activities to ensure that the most recent project level information is reported to OMB through monthly updates of OMB MITBCD. Based on individual project information, CPIC Analysts also ensures regular MITBC investment level data updates for performance to maintain and adjust artifacts, to plan and complete programs, and to validate MITBC Summary of Funding tables.
Communicating findings and recommendations to affected parties and collaboratively resolving any issues.

The Candidate will provide project management leadership and services in support of the goal and objective of the PWS, as required by the COR, or as specified by an Agency Order. The Project Manager oversees and manages compliance activities of project management teams, daily operations, client/customer relationships, has responsibility for the quality of deliverables, and develops, monitors, and reports on project objectives, budget, and schedule status and performance. The Project Manager is responsible for the technical, contractual, administrative, and financial aspects of the project(s) as assigned by the COR. Responsible for identifying, proposing resolutions, and resolving project management issues in collaboration with applicable federal staff. Responsible for managing one or more projects, and successfully implements project(s) and associated services, in accordance with the Order, federal laws, regulations and procedures.
Qualifications
Must have 5 to 7 years of experience in project management.
In-depth knowledge of and experience with IT Project Management processes including, but not limited to, industry standard Project Management principles and practices such as those defined by the Project Management Institute (PMl) in the Project Management Body of Knowledge (PMBOK), Federal Enterprise Architecture, CPIC, SDLC, IT Security Management, Risk Management.
In-depth knowledge of and experience with federal IT investment laws, regulations and process. Proven ability to review and analyze cost, schedule, and performance requirements for federal lT investments.
Knowledge of 0MB reporting requirements and adapting internal reporting to align with Cloud Based and Shared Service Models.
Ability to apply consistent management approaches to IT Portfolio Management that increases the quality of data through best practices and documentation.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and leadership skills.
PMP certification required.
Prepare and complete OMB Major and Standard Investment Business Cases, develop investment artifacts and data call preparation.
Define and implement best practice governance processes; analyze and document current processes and workflows against target states to develop achievable implementation paths including stakeholders, tasks, and schedules.
Resolve problems, support program audits, identify trends, determine system improvements, recommend, and implement changes.
Provide support for the monthly, quarterly, and annual reporting and data call activity related to Investment Management.
Experience with the development and submission on OMB Major and Standard Investment business cases and cost benefits analysis for federal programs
Ability to support a team and apply advanced, comprehensive knowledge of methodologies, principals, and practices related to logistics, business, or financial management disciplines.
Ability to review complex organizational budget data, plan and forecast requirements; analyze budget variances, recommend, and initiate corrective actions.
Responsible for ensuring compliance with technological standards throughout the project.
Operates with considerable latitude for actions and decisions.
May serve as a prime point of contact with the client. May be called upon to deliver presentations, plan tasks, and coordinate resources and budgets.
Proficient in MS Office Suite of Applications (Word, PowerPoint, Outlook, Excel).
Advanced skills in MS Excel and MS Access such as pivot tables, macros, SQL, formats, filters, connecting to databases, etc.",11150,Washington
126,QSV Project Manager - Immediate Need,Grindstone,"Washington, DC",None,"We are committed to providing superior support to the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA), assisting in the seamless care for Veterans, including access to a complete electronic health record (EHR) and shared, transparent care pathways with the Department of Defense (DoD) and community providers. Currently, the VA is undertaking an enterprise-wide Electronic Health Record Modernization (EHRM) effort through the procurement of the Cerner commercial electronic health record software, and with our help, this modernization will result in a common, single, lifetime health record that both DoD and VA can access, with anticipated improvements in patient care and safety.
Support the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA) Electronic Health Record Modernization (EHRM) program. In performing day-to-day activities, you will be responsible for the following:
Develop and maintain RASCI including all task order requirements and deliverables for all personnel
Creates QSV playbook articulating engagement throughout all phases of the EHR implementation
Leads QSV meetings and updates stakeholders on key QSV activities
Using Microsoft project manage all OEHRM QSV tasks and deliverables
Manage multidisciplinary teams to ensure team productivity and efficiency
Authors strategic guidelines QSV SOPs
Develop QSV policies
Facilitates deliverable review process
Monitors Project activities, reviews and creates project performance metrics and engages stakeholders to determine if Project work meets acceptable quality standards
Updates the Executive Sponsor on Project status and performance, providing appropriate recommendations as necessary
Represents QSV clients in meetings and conferences when requested
Required Skills and Experience:
Minimum of 5 years of experience is required. An additional 10 years of relevant experience may be substituted for degree requirements
Ability to work independently to design and develop new software products or major enhancements to existing software for a healthcare/ clinical environment
Acts as the highest level technical expert, addressing problems of systems integration, compatibility, healthcare semantics, informatics, and multiple platforms. Responsible for project completion
Performs feasibility analysis on potential future projects to management
Bachelor’s Degree in Healthcare IT, computer science, electronics engineering, engineering or technical related field
Desired Skills and Experience:
Experience in the VA
Experience implementing Electronic Health Records
Clearance: Ability to obtain a Public Trust
Educational Requirement:
Bachelor's degree
Additional qualifications:Experience in the VAExperience implementing Electronic Health RecordsExperience with DoDAFPMP desired
RUantJIFyy",11150,Washington
127,Service Desk Specialist (L2),General Dynamics,"Fort Meade, MD",None,"Type of Requisition:
Regular
Clearance Level Must Currently Possess:
Top Secret/SCI
Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain:
Top Secret/SCI
Suitability:
Agency Specific
Public Trust/Other Required:
None
Job Family:
Help Desk
Job Description:
Principal Duties and Responsibilities:
An I2TS 3 Service Desk Specialist:
Provides first contact and incident resolution to customers with hardware, software, and application problems. Includes both customer telephone support as well as electronically submitted requestsProvides polite and friendly customer serviceAttempts to resolve as many incidents during the first contact, or at Tier I. Efficiently escalates incidents to higher Tier II or Tier III when requiredDocuments incident status and solutions in incident database tools.Possesses current working knowledge of computers, printers, laptops, and common windows applicationsWorks through various types Tier II issues with telephone assistProvides answers to Frequently Asked Questions or solutions to common problems as part of a customer self-help capabilityPossesses comprehensive knowledge of the principles, methods, and techniques used in computer troubleshooting and supportPossesses comprehensive knowledge of desktop operating systems and applications

Desirable Skills / Experience:
Perform STIGs & IAVA implementation for system devices, perform imaging of systems, CERP replacement, etc.Interact with customers on a daily basis to provide guidance on procedures concerning account requests, e-mail, home directories, file access/storage, and other local procedures as required to ensure mission success.Perform Level I/II Active Directory functions such as unlocking accounts, creating and issuing accounts, etc.
Education Required:
High School diploma/GED with 8-years of related experience, or Associate's degree with 6-years of experience, or Bachelor's degree with 4-years of experience

Certification(s):
DoD 8570.01-M IAT Level II Computing Environment (CE) Certification as determined by the Program Manager is required prior to support on contractRequired Baseline/Security Environment Certification: CompTIA Security+ CE or equivalentRequired Computing Environment Certification: MTA 98-349, Windows Operating System Fundamentals or equivalent.
Additional:
Candidates must be willing and able to attain a CI Polygraph for certain positions as determined by the contract.Candidates may be required to travel and/or provide support to Aberdeen Proving Ground (APG).Position may require lifting of objects (i.e. IT Hardware), reaching/bending/kneeling (i.e. plug in cables) and other moderately strenuous activity
#I2TS3
#GDITINSCOM
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Travel Required:
Less than 10%
Telecommuting Options:
Telecommuting Not Allowed
Work Location:
USA MD Fort Meade
Additional Work Locations:
USA MD Aberdeen Proving Ground
We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",11150,Washington
128,Foreign Affairs Specialist,US Federal Aviation Administration,"Washington, DC","$83,458 - $129,384 a year","Duties
Summary
Due to the Pandemic and individual states with different phases of reopening, the selectee’s report date to the official duty station/facility may be delayed until such time as employees are allowed to report to the workplace. The person selected may telework up to the maximum extent possible, up to and including full time, until it is determined by state and Federal officials that employees are allowed to report to the workplace where this position is located, on a regular basis.

Responsibilities
The position serves as a Foreign Affairs Specialist in the International Affairs Branch (AIR-042) within the International Office of Aircraft Certification Service (AIR).
The incumbent performs multiple, varying and complex assignments under the minimal direction of a manager, project/program manager or more experienced technical specialist. Acts as principal technical specialist or as a project manager or team leader for large work activities. Accomplishes mission objectives by integrating the work of multiple organizational units, projects, and programs. Promotes agency objectives in a culturally diverse environment based on experience and knowledge of socio-political trends and pressures that influence aviation development.
Applies experience and comprehensive technical knowledge to accomplish assignments, to develop plans and techniques, to improve program and policies, to solve complex problems and to develop improved technical processes or systems. The incumbent is responsible for the evaluation, development, management and coordination of bilateral aviation safety agreements with foreign governments. Provides leadership, direction and management in the implementation, execution, and review of matters pertaining to bilateral aviation safety agreements. Develops and implements a plan for revision and updating of existing bilateral airworthiness agreements. Develops, researches, and drafts factual and analytical materials relating to highly complex international programs. Develops policy and guidance documents that convey government requirements and/or guidance to internal and external stakeholders. Assists in development of performance metrics and analyzes the effectiveness of existing aviation safety policies.
Contacts are internal and external. The incumbent designs and manages bilateral system assessment or technical evaluation programs in collaboration with other Aircraft Certification Service (AIR) offices. Routinely confers with and advises high-level officials of foreign governments and aviation industry regarding FAA certification procedures and policies to facilitate and influence the reciprocal acceptance of aeronautical products.
Represents the agency, Department, or the U.S. Government at international meetings and conferences. Represent the office and/or agency in negotiating new agreements and advancing or defending sensitive agency issues or positions among the Departments of Transportation, State, and other U.S. Government agencies, as appropriate.
Establishes and maintains effective communications with industry and FAA stakeholders, relevant U.S. government agencies, and foreign civil aviation authorities in an effort to further the understanding and coordination of the Service's international objectives. Develops plans, techniques, and policies to address current or anticipated problems and issues. Works with management to solve problems. Work is reviewed rarely, typically through status reports and at project completion, to ensure technical compliance and alignment with the requirements of the project or other work activity. The work activities typically impact directly on the objectives of one or more major subdivisions, the LOB/SOs and may have an impact on the objectives of the FAA.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - The job may require travel from time- to-time, but not on a regular basis. The travel may be for training or other work-related duties.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
NA
Job family (Series)
0130 Foreign Affairs
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
US Citizenship is required.
Selective Service Registration is required for males born after 12/31/1959.
Must submit an SF50 (See Required Documents)
Designated or Random Drug Testing required.
This position has a positive education requirement. Transcript(s) required.
One position will be filled in either of the six duty locations.
Qualifications
BASIC REQUIREMENTS:
Degree: major or equivalent, or a combination of courses totaling at least 24 semester hours, in international law and international relations, political science, economics, history, sociology, geography, social or cultural anthropology, law, statistics, or in the humanities; or 12 semester hours in one of the above disciplines and 12 semester hours in statistics/quantitative methods.
-OR-
Combination of education and experience: courses equivalent to a major, or a combination of related courses totaling at least 24 semester hours, as shown in A above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
-OR-
Experience: four years of appropriate experience in one or more of the fields listed above in work associated with international organizations, problems, or other aspects of foreign affairs.
In addition to the above basic requirements, applicants must demonstrate in their application they possess one year (52 weeks) of specialized equivalent to FV-I, FG/GS-13. Specialized experience is experience that has equipped you with the particular knowledge, skills and abilities to perform successfully the duties of the position. Specialized experience is described as experience developing policy and guidance documents that convey aviation requirements or guidance to internal and external stakeholders.
This vacancy also has a Quality Ranking Factor (QRF); applicants who possess this factor will be placed in a Well Qualified category. The QRF may be found in the Other Factors section of this announcement.
Qualification requirements must be met by the closing date of this vacancy announcement.
Education
This position has a positive education requirement: Applicants must submit a copy of their college or university transcripts(s) and certificates by the closing date of announcement to verify qualifications. If selected, an official transcript will be required prior to appointment. You may upload these documents with your application in USAJOBS or fax it to fax number provided in the announcement (please include announcement number on each page).

Failure to do so will result in loss of consideration.

Schools must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. Accreditation may be verified at the following website: www.ed.gov/admins/finaid/accred/index.html.

Foreign education must be evaluated by a private professional organization specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials or an accredited U.S. educational institution in terms of equivalence to a degree acquired at an American college or university. A copy of the evaluation results must be included, otherwise your foreign education will not be considered.
Foreign Education: For additional information, visit: http://www.ed.gov/about/offices/list/ous/international/usnei/us/edlite-visitus-forrecog.html.
Applicants who are not currently in the 130 occupational series (Foreign Affairs Specialist) in the Federal Government and fail to provide a copy of an unofficial or official transcript will not receive further consideration for this vacancy. Upon selection, if not currently employed in the 130 occupational series, you will be required to submit an official transcript prior to appointment. if you do not have an official transcript (original, with the raised seal), you should contact your school immediately to request.
Preview Job Questionnaire
Make sure your resume includes detailed information to support your qualifications and answers to the job questionnaire.
Additional information
We may use this vacancy to fill other similar vacant positions.
Position may be subject to a background investigation.
A one-year probationary period may be required.

The person selected for this position may be required to file a financial disclosure statement within 30 days of entry on duty. FAA policy limits certain outside employment and financial investments in aviation-related companies. www.faa.gov/jobs/working_here/financial_disclosure_requirements

The U.S. Department of Transportation strives to ensure that equity, transparency, accountability, collaboration, and communication permeate all that we do for the betterment of the Department, the traveling public, and our nation. As such, DOT values a highly diverse workforce of persons who promote a culture of belonging by respecting the personal dignity and worth of each individual and fostering a positive environment where all feel safe and welcome. If these commitments coincide with your personal ideals and professional aspirations, please consider joining the DOT family.

This position is covered by the Department of Transportation's Drug and Alcohol Testing Program. Any applicant tentatively selected for this position will be subject to pre-employment or pre-appointment drug screening. Persons occupying a ""testing designated position (TDP)"" will be subject to random drug and/or alcohol testing.
As a part of the Federal-Wide Hiring Reform Initiative (streamlining the hiring process), the FAA is committed to eliminating the use of the Knowledge, Skills and Ability (KSA) narratives from the initial application in the hiring process for all announcements. Therefore, as an applicant for this announcement, you are NOT required to provide a narrative response in the text box listed below each KSA.

In lieu of providing a KSA narrative response in the text box listed below each KSA, in your work history, please include information that provides specific examples of how you meet the response level or answer you chose for each KSA. Your work history examples should be specific and clearly reflect the highest level of ability. Your KSA answers will be evaluated further to validate whether the level that you selected is appropriate based on the work history and experience you provided. Your answers may be adjusted by a Human Resource Specialist as appropriate.
Please ensure you answer all questions and follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may impact your rating or may result in you not being considered for the job.
Some, all or none of the applicants may be interviewed.
This is not a bargaining unit position.

Links to Important Information: Locality Pay , COLA

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.


IMPORTANT: Applicants may be rated on the extent and quality of experience, education, and training relevant to the duties of the position(s). All answers provided in the on-line process must be substantiated. Ensure that your application package/resume supports your responses.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Secret
Drug test required
Yes
Required Documents

Required Documents
Applicants must submit an electronic application via Aviator and supplemental documents (i.e. SF-50, transcripts, etc.) uploaded to their Aviator application or faxed by the closing date of this announcement. Failure to submit the application and required documentation by the closing date will be deemed ineligible for consideration.

Applicants claiming eligibility for the Expanded Veterans Hiring Opportunity (EVHO), MUST submit a DD Form 214 reflecting character of service to verify eligibility by the closing date of the announcement as requested by the Human Resource Office. Eligibility for EVHO will be considered based on applicable documentation submitted by the closing date.
This position has a positive education requirement; college transcripts are required for ALL candidates newly appointed to the FAA in the 130 series.

College transcripts must be submitted from current FAA employees applying for internal vacancies if they have never held a position in the, 130 series with the FAA.

College transcripts are not required from current FAA employees who are currently occupying a 130 series.

If selected, official transcripts are required prior to employment.

If you are a current or former Federal employee (including a current FAA employee), you MUST provide a copy of your SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action) containing information in Blocks 15, 17, 18, 19, 22, and 24 so it can be used to verify your position title, series, grade, tenure, and organization of record by the closing date of the announcement. You may fax your SF-50 or upload it into the on-line application. If faxing the SF-50, please ensure you include the vacancy announcement number on the faxed copy.

If you are a current Federal employee and need a current copy of your SF-50, please contact your personnel office. If you are an FAA employee, you can access and print your SF-50 from the eOPF system https://eopf.opm.gov/dot/. If you are a former Federal employee, you can obtain a copy of your SF-50 by writing the National Personnel Records Center Annex, 1411 Boulder Boulevard, Valmeyer, IL 62295. Additional information is available from this link: http://www.archives.gov/st-louis/civilian-personnel/.

Expanded Veterans Hiring Opportunity (EVHO) are those veterans who are honorably discharged from the Armed Forces after completing at least three (3) years of continuous active service. Applicants claiming eligibility for EVHO, MUST submit a DD Form 214 reflecting character of service to verify eligibility by the closing date of the announcement as requested by the Human Resource Office. Eligibility for EVHO will be considered based on applicable documentation submitted by the closing date.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Federal employees - Excepted service
Current excepted service federal employees.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Also open to former permanent excepted service federal employees eligible under an interchange agreement. Current or former permanent federal employees must have met a one year probationary period or trial period in the competitive or excepted service. Applications will also be accepted from preference eligibles and veterans who are honorably discharged from the Armed Forces after completing at least 3 years of continuous active duty service.",11150,Washington
129,Chief of Staff,Sorcero,"Washington, DC",None,"Chief of Staff, Office of the CEO
Sorcero, the leader in Language Intelligence, the next-generation of deep learning powered Natural Language Understanding, is immediately hiring a dynamic chief-of-staff to join the executive team. Selected by Business Insider as one of the 81 startups expected to boom in 2021, you will function as an extension of the CEO, playing a key leadership role in shaping and advancing the mission of Sorcero.
Why Join Sorcero?
We are making serious strides towards transforming decision-making for key technical industries, like Life Sciences, Healthcare, Insurance, and Engineering, that power the world and you would be a critical part of our success. We have incredible insights into markets and how to build technology that is powerful and differentiated. All while solving huge challenges in people's lives and health that were previously intractable to prior generations of technology. You will help us move even faster.
You'll join a team of brilliant, passionate people working collaboratively to build a sustainable, scalable organization committed to using understanding to create a better world.
You'll be empowered to innovate and apply your intellectual curiosity to interesting technical & business challenges.
You'll actively work to transform an established approach to work and learning with groundbreaking, bleeding edge technology.
You are in the pursuit of mastery and excellence, and are seeking a space and people who share your obsession
Job Opportunity
The Chief of Staff reports directly to the CEO and will play an integral role on the executive team. You will be a thought partner to the CEO and also serve as the “Chief Execution Officer' ensuring important strategic and operational projects are executed with high fidelity and that all stakeholders are held accountable to their commitments. Our ideal candidate is strategic, analytical, and operational with a bias for action and a keen ability to influence across stakeholders at all levels within an organization. It also doesn't hurt to be a closet trekkie, have always dreamed of your own Hitchhiker's Guide, or making dragons come to life, Sorcero is the place for you.
.
Responsibilities
Contribute to, and run, the annual Sorcero strategic and business planning process on behalf of the team and translate the strategy into action by working with the executive team.
Run the core business cadence, including the development and ongoing measurement of OKRs. Monitor key business metrics and flag areas of concern; ensure action plans are developed and effectively implemented
Manage day-to-day team operations (budget, hiring) across the organization and identify key opportunities for operational improvements through new methodologies, tools, templates, dashboards, and processes.
Ensure the CEO is fully prepared for key meetings & events.
Proactively drive forward and project manage strategic priorities, managing multiple complex projects simultaneously. Identify problems & opportunities across the team; develop & implement solutions, pulling together the right team from across Sorcero.
Ensure efforts are coordinated and aligned across the organization
Drive operational rigor through clear expectations and accountability globally by partnering across teams.
Keep the entire organization informed and empowered by establishing, maintaining and improving regular internal communications vehicles (e.g. internal websites and repositories, weekly emails, monthly town hall presentations)
Serve as a sounding board for the executive team
Requirements & Qualifications
Bachelor's degree
5 years experience in Program Management, Operations
2 years experience working in an early startup business
Excellent written and oral communication skills; ability to communicate effectively with multiple levels including executives, peers, managers and junior staff
Excellent planning, analytical and interpersonal skills
Ability to act as the main execution arm and at times voice by extension the CEO
Preferred Qualifications
Versatile across multiple functions including Engineering, Product, Operations and Commercial
Self-starter with a team-oriented work style
An ability to distill complexity into meaningful insights and a coherent story
Creative and structured problem solver, utilizing internal and external resources to build innovative processes and tools with quantifiable impact
Demonstrated ability to navigate ambiguity / deal with changing priorities
Trustworthy, credible, and non-political; high level of integrity and excellent sense of judgement.
Strong mindset for continuous improvement. Ability to work closely with, and advise the executive team
Benefits
Competitive compensation package, including equity in a fast growing startup
Unlimited PTO policy (that we actually want you to use)
Medical, dental, and vision benefits for you and your family
Company-provided laptop and hardware
Being a part of a brilliant, fun and supportive team
About Sorcero
Understanding is the key to intelligence. With this principle at heart, we leverage Language Intelligence to give our customers fluid and fluent access to and control over the inherent complexities of their businesses. At Sorcero, we believe in augmenting human beings, not replacing them. Our platform gently directs users towards the right answer, and always supports human experts.
Because (human + AI) > human or AI alone
Sorcero is an Equal Opportunity Employer dedicated to the goal of building a culturally diverse environment, and strongly encourages applications from diverse candidates.",11150,Washington
130,USAID Power Africa Program Assistant,ZemiTek LLC,"Washington, DC",None,"Overview:

ZemiTek, LLC is a Woman-Owned, SBA-certified 8(a) Small Disadvantage Business (SDB) based in the Washington, DC metro area. We have a strong record delivering innovative and high-quality solutions. Since 2007, ZemiTek has provided technical assistance, project management, information technology (IT), knowledge management, monitoring and evaluation, training and learning development, and institutional support services.
Power Africa (AFR/AA/PA) is an office within USAID’s Africa Bureau that addresses one of the most pressing challenges to sustainable economic growth and development in sub-Saharan Africa – access to electricity. Two out of three people in sub-Saharan Africa have no access to power affecting their access to health care, education and economic opportunities. And yet, sub-Saharan Africa has significant energy resources that can be developed to meet the continent’s energy needs. Power Africa supports an African driven vision to increase clean and efficient energy generation capacity in sub-Saharan Africa.
Since its launch in 2013, 88 million people in sub-Saharan Africa gained first time electricity access. And yet a staggering 580 still lack access to electricity. There is still much work to be done.
The Program Assistant will support Power Africa in advancing its goals as a critical member of Power Africa’s Washington DC office. The incumbent, under the supervision of the Energy Office Director and Deputy Coordinator (or their designees), will work with office leadership as well as technical staff in DC and overseas as a member of the Energy Office.
The Program Assistant will provide support to Energy Office staff by performing complex analytical work and some routine administrative duties. The more complex analytical tasks include collecting, analyzing and tracking data to inform Power Africa reports, requests for information, and to contribute to programmatic learning. The more administrative tasks might include scheduling meetings and associated logistics, notetaking and maintaining program files.
The Program Assistant will rank tasks in order of importance and impending deadlines, and handle several tasks simultaneously. The individual must develop a working knowledge of USAID policies and guidelines, as well as Zemitek’s corporate practices and procedures.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
Responsibilities:

DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Programmatic Analysis and Reporting 70%
Establishes and maintains understanding of Power Africa’s portfolio and roles and responsibilities of Power Africa staff. Establishes and maintains relationships with USAID staff beyond Power Africa Coordinator’s Office who are engaged in energy programs in Africa.
Responds to requests from Power Africa leadership and immediate supervisor concerning programs under the Power Africa Energy Office. Gains an understanding of Power Africa programs so as to be able to respond to calls for information. Develops knowledge management systems or products drawing upon multiple Power Africa data sources. Communicates with appropriate colleagues within Power Africa Coordinator’s Office and USAID to capture necessary information.
Reads incoming correspondence, publications, regulations, and directives that may affect the organization. Determines the ones that can be acted upon personally and takes necessary action. Obtains clarification of instructions from originating offices or appropriate focal points when needed. Brings significant items in reports, files and correspondence to the supervisor’s attention.
Contributes to USAID reporting and planning processes by collecting, maintaining and analyzing data to complete necessary standard reports, forms or processes.
Contributes to regular Power Africa Coordinator’s office reporting and planning processes by collecting, maintaining and analyzing data to complete necessary standard reports, forms or processes.
Office Activities Coordination 30%
Systematically evaluates and improves office operations. Uses formal procedures to track memos, briefers, and coordinate other work performed in the office.
Attends meetings, takes notes, notes commitments made, informs staff of commitments, and arranges for staff to follow through on implementation.
Maintains subject and project files of correspondence, program documents, and reports. Prepares files for storage or destruction, as appropriate.
Arranges meeting space, speakers, and support details for large conferences.
Establishes control records on incoming correspondence and action documents, following up on work in-progress to ensure timely action.
Qualifications:

QUALIFICATIONS, EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
The position requires a bachelor’s degree and 1 year of relevant experience. Relevant experience might focus on international development, international affairs, or the energy sector.
Requires proficiency in the use of Microsoft Office, Internet, Google Drive and e-mail applications.
Experience in the use of database applications is recommended.
Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for a “Secret” security clearance.
LANGUAGE SKILLS
Oral and written communications skills and the ability to read, analyze, and interpret general business periodicals. Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers, and the general public.
Knowledge of French or Portuguese valued.
REASONING ABILITY
Ability to apply common sense understanding to carry out instructions furnished in written, oral, or diagram form. Ability to prioritize responsibilities based on significance of task and due dates.
CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS
None.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit, stand and walk. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, and ability to adjust focus.
WORK ENVIRONMENT
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Please contact recruitment@zemitek.com for inquiries regarding this position.
ZemiTek is an equal opportunity employer where an applicant’s qualifications are considered for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, gender identity or expression, national origin, genetic information, veteran status, disability or any other basis prohibited by law.
#CB",11150,Washington
131,Chemist,US Department of Energy,"Germantown, MD","$144,128 - $172,500 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is part of the Office of Science, Department Of Energy. As a Chemist, you will provide program management responsibility, coordination, and oversight for the core research program in Physical Biosciences which brings together chemistry, biology and physical sciences to advance energy science.
Responsibilities
As a Chemist, you will:
Serve as a recognized scientific authority and expert in physical biosciences and the study of complex processes that convert and store energy in living systems; and plan, coordinate, implement, and evaluate research programs in this field on a national and international level.
Manage, and coordinate all aspects of the program that includes a diverse range of experimental and theoretical research in biochemical, biological, and biophysical sciences relevant to energy capture, conversion and storage in plants and microbes.
Prepare, justify, and support the portions of the budget relating to the Physical Biosciences program; develop, coordinate, and organize funding allocations for the program.
Consult and negotiate with leading government and scientific personnel both nationally and internationally on sensitive issues and complex areas of importance to all involved parties.
Consult and advise other scientists and senior management; lead committees composed of agency, interagency, and government personnel for the purpose of representing the agency and programmatic interests.

Travel Required
Occasional travel - Occasional travel may be required.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
15
Job family (Series)
1320 Chemistry
Similar jobs
Biological Chemists
Chemists
Chemists, Biological
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a U.S. Citizen or National.
This employer participates in the e-Verify program.
Males born after 12/31/1959 must be registered for Selective Service.
Subject to the appropriate background investigation to determine suitability or fitness for federal employment.
A one year probationary period may be required.
This position is included in a Bargaining Agreement
A Financial Disclosure Statement, OGE-450, Executive Branch Personnel Confidential Financial Disclosure Report upon entering the position and annually (5CFR Part 2634, Subpart I USOGE, 6/08). For more details visit the Office of Government Ethics.
Qualifications
You must meet the Basic Requirements and Specialized Experience to qualify for this position as described below.

Basic Requirements:
A. Degree: physical sciences, life sciences, or engineering that included 30 semester hours in chemistry, supplemented by course work in mathematics through differential and integral calculus, and at least 6 semester hours of physics.
OR
B. Combination of education and experience - course work equivalent to a major as shown in A above, including at least 30 semester hours in chemistry, supplemented by mathematics through differential and integral calculus, and at least 6 semester hours of physics, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS: A qualified candidate's online application and resume must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the next lower grade level GS-14 in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position is defined as managing chemical sciences basic research programs or projects; providing advice and guidance to scientists, managers and engineers; preparing, justifying and supporting portions of a program budget; coordinating meetings involving technical personnel as required or appropriate for a program or project.

""Experience"" refers to paid and unpaid experience. Examples of qualifying unpaid experience may include: volunteer work done through National Service programs (such as Peace Corps and AmeriCorps); as well as work for other community-based philanthropic and social organizations. Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills; and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

You must meet all qualifications and eligibility requirements by the closing date of this announcement.
Education
This position has a positive education requirement. Therefore, you MUST provide documentation supporting any education claims in your application. This documentation can include unofficial/official transcripts or any report listing institution, course title, credits earned and final grade. For specific education requirements, please see the Basic Requirements.

Education must be obtained from an accredited institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. Foreign education must be reviewed by an organization recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. For special instructions pertaining to foreign education and a list of organizations that can evaluate foreign education, see the Department of Education website.

Additional information
The U.S. Department of Energy fosters a diverse and inclusive workplace and is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
This job opportunity announcement may be used to fill additional similar vacancies across DOE.
For general information on government-wide Telework polices visit: www.telework.gov


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.

This position is announced under a government-wide Direct-Hire Authority (DHA) for Chemist positions in the 1320. Under the DHA, applicants who meet the Education and Qualification requirements listed in this announcement will be referred for consideration. Veteran's Preference, category rating, and traditional rating and ranking of applicants does not apply under the DHA process.

Appointments made under the DHA are processed as ""new"" appointments. Current Federal employees may be required to serve a new probationary period (5 CFR 315.802(b).
Successful candidates will possess the following competencies (knowledge, skills, abilities and other characteristics):

Chemistry
Biology
Research
Financial Management
Technical Competence
Negotiation

Career Transition Assistance Programs: If you are eligible for career transition assistance, such as ICTAP or CTAP, you must meet the Education and Qualification requirements to be referred for consideration.

You must meet all qualifications and eligibility requirements by the closing date (06/21/2021) of this announcement.

To preview the Assessment Questionnaire, click https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11129060

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Non-sensitive (NS)/Low Risk
Trust determination process
Suitability/Fitness
Required Documents

Required Documents
To apply for this position, you MUST provide a complete application package which includes:
Your RESUME showing all relevant work experience (paid and unpaid) including: duties performed; full name and address of the each employer; start and end dates (month/day/year); work schedule (part-time, full-time, number of hours if intermittent); salary; and any completed education and training (program title, subject area, number of hours completed, and completion date).
Cover Letter, optional, expressing additional information not covered in your resume.
Transcripts, if specific educational requirements are indicated in this job announcement.Unofficial transcripts or any report listing institution, course title, credits earned (semester or quarter hour) and final grade is acceptable. It is your responsibility to provide adequate proof that you meet the educational requirements.
Career Transition Assistance Program/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program documentation, if applicable(e.g., Certification of Expected Separation, Reduction-In-Force Separation Notice, or Notice of Proposed Removal; SF-50 that documents the RIF separation action; and most recent performance appraisal.) For more information see the OPM Guide to Career Transition.

Failure to submit any of the above mentioned required documents may result in loss of consideration due to an incomplete application package. It is your responsibility to ensure all required documents have been submitted.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Clarification from the agency
This is a Direct Hire Public Notice. Please read this Public Notice in its entirety prior to submitting your application for consideration.",11150,Washington
132,Chemist,US Food and Drug Administration,"White Oak, MD","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
This Direct-Hire position is in the Food and Drug Administration and is located in the Office of Operations,
Office of Information Management and Technology In Silver Spring MD.


.
Responsibilities
Serves, and is recognized as, one of the Agency's primary experts for all automated chemical formation matters, and the Agency's primary chemical and scientific expert for the GSRS.
Responsibilities include lead volunteer and student chemists and other employees that have been assigned to enter and provide chemical structures and chemically-related information into the GSRS.
Ensures that all GSRS Documents, such as GSRS Board Minutes, GSRS Manuals, GSRS Policies and Procedures, and GSRS Configuration Change Board requests are properly written.
Writes, updates, monitors, and documents that all GSRS Project plans are being followed.
Provides critical leadership to quickly arrive at sound scientific decisions and regularly achieve consensus among the GSRS Board, GSRS chemists, and other personnel that are GSRS stakeholders.
Travel Required
25% or less - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
1320 Chemistry
Similar jobs
Biological Chemists
Chemists
Chemists, Biological
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Citizenship Requirement: You must be a U.S. Citizen to be considered for this advertisement unless explicitly stated otherwise.
Direct Deposit: You will be required to have all federal salary payments electronically deposited into a bank account with a financial institution of your choice.
Background Investigation Requirement: All employees must pass a security investigation. Failing to pass the background check may be grounds for removal or legal action. If hired, you may be subject to additional investigations at a later time.
FDA participates in e-Verify: All new hires must complete the I-9 form; this information will be processed through e-Verify to determine your employment eligibility. If a discrepancy arises, you must take affirmative steps to resolve the matter.
Certification of Accuracy: All information concerning eligibility and qualification is subject to investigation and verification. False representation may be grounds for non-consideration, non-selection, or appropriate legal action.
Qualifications
The position of Chemist falls under the 1320 occupational series. To qualify for this position at grade GS-14, you must meet the following:


Basic Requirements

1. Degree: physical sciences, life sciences, or engineering that included 30 semester hours in chemistry, supplemented by course work
in mathematics through differential and integral calculus, and at least 6 semester hours of physics.
OR
2. Combination of education and experience - course work equivalent to a major as shown in A above, including at least 30 semester hours in chemistry, supplemented by mathematics through differential and integral calculus, and at least 6 semester hours of physics, plus appropriate experience or additional education.

AND

Specialized Experience:

Applicant must possess one full year of specialized experience equivalent in complexity to the GS-13 grade level in the Federal service:

Experience using chemical drawing tools and scientific information systems for small molecules and polymers. Knowledge of complex biological substances including cell and gene therapies and both traditional and modern mRNA and vector vaccines. Conversant with modern analytical techniques including HPLC, GC-MS, LC-MS, NMR, FT-IR and X-ray crystallography.



NOTE: Applicants must submit all relevant transcripts that demonstrate you possess the required education to meet the Basic Qualifications.


All qualification requirements must be met by 11:59 pm (Eastern Time) on 06/14/2021. If, after reviewing your resume and/or supporting documentation, a determination is made that you have inflated your responses when compared to your background information, you may be deemed ineligible or your score may be adjusted to more accurately reflect your skills and abilities. You must continue to meet all requirements through the hiring process.

You may be asked to provide additional information at a later time. All interview requests and selection decisions are at the full discretion of the hiring office.

NOTE: It is your responsibility to ensure your responses and appropriate documentation is submitted prior to the closing date . To verify your application is complete, log into your USAJOBS account, https://my.usajobs.gov/Account/Login, select the Application Status link and then select the More Information link for this position. The Details page will display the status of your application, the documentation received and processed, and any correspondence the agency has sent related to this application. Your uploaded documents may take several hours to clear the virus scan process.

IN DESCRIBING YOUR EXPERIENCE, PLEASE BE CLEAR AND SPECIFIC. WE WILL NOT MAKE ASSUMPTIONS REGARDING YOUR EXPERIENCE. Qualifications are based on breadth/level of experience. In addition to describing duties performed, applicants must provide the exact dates of each period of employment (from MM/YY to MM/YY) and the number of hours worked per week if part time. As qualification determinations cannot be made when resumes do not include the required information, failure to provide this information may result in disqualification. Applicants are encouraged to use the USAJOBS Resume Builder to develop their federal resume.

Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.
Education
EDUCATION:

TRANSCRIPTS:
Positions which are scientific or technical in nature often have very specific educational requirements. You must submit an official transcript, unofficial transcript, or a list including courses, grades earned, completion dates, and quarter and semester hours earned. If you are using education completed in foreign colleges or universities, see the Foreign Education section below for additional requirements.


Pay careful attention to the Qualifications and Education sections to identify vacancies where a transcript is required. Even if you hold a similar position or are a current employee, you are not exempt from transcript requirements.


Electronic Transcript Caution: If you have obtained your transcripts electronically, the file might contain security measures that could prevent our application system from reading the file. Therefore, you should consider asking the institution to provide the file in a non-secured electronic format. Alternatively, you could scan or take a photo of the printed copy of the transcript. If your uploaded transcript cannot be read by our system, you may receive consideration and credit for the information we can access.

See the Application Manager Documentation for tips on submitting your paper-based documents.


FOREIGN EDUCATION
Applicants
using part or all of their education completed outside of the U.S. to meet the qualification requirements
, must have their foreign education evaluated by an accredited organization to ensure that the foreign education is comparable to education received in accredited educational institutions in the U.S. We will only accept the completed foreign credential evaluation.

To be acceptable, the foreign credential evaluation must include/describe at a minimum, the following information: (1) The type of education received by the applicant; (2) The level of education in relation to the U.S. education system, and state that its comparability recommendations follow the general guidelines of the International Evaluation Standards Council; (3) The content of the applicant's educational program earned abroad, and the standard obtained; (4) The status of the awarding foreign school's recognition and legitimacy in its home country's education system; and (5) Any other information of interest such as what the evaluation service did to obtain this information, the qualifications of the evaluator, and any indications as to other problems such as forgery.
Note: Some positions require the completion of specific courses or a specified number of credit hours. Therefore, the foreign credential evaluation should provide information similar to that of an official transcript, to include a list of the courses taken, quarter and/or semester hours awarded, the cumulative grade point average (GPA), honors received, if any, date degree awarded.

Applicants can request an evaluation from a member organization of one of the two national associations of credential evaluation services listed below:
National Association of Credential Evaluation Services (NACES)
Association of International Credentials Evaluators
(AICE)

Credential evaluations are not free, and applicants are responsible for the cost of the selected service.
For more information about this requirement, please visit the U.S. Department of Education website for Foreign Education Evaluation
Additional information

For some advertisements, the Food & Drug Administration receives hundreds, even thousands, of applications from job-seekers. Because of this high level of interest in positions with the FDA, the agency reserves the option of setting an application number limit.


When an application limit is set, USAJOBS will close the vacancy at 11:59 pm Eastern Time on either:
(A) the day the limit is reached,
-OR-
(B) the pre-defined closing date of 06/14/2021, whichever comes first.

If the limit is reached before 11:59 pm ET, all applications in excess of the limit will continue to be accepted until 11:59 pm ET.

The application limit, if applicable, for this advertisement is: na

For more information about announcement closing, see: https://www.usajobs.gov/Help/faq/job-announcement/expiration/

Additional Conditions of Employment:
Pre-employment physical required: NO
Drug testing required: NO
License required: NO,
Mobility agreement required: NO
Immunization required: NO
Bargaining Unit Position: YES 3591,
Telework eligible position: Telework is at the discretion of the supervisor.
This position may require financial disclosure reporting and will be subject to FDA's prohibited financial interest regulation. If you are hired, you may be required to divest of certain financial interests. You are advised to seek additional information on this requirement from the hiring official before accepting any job offers. For more information please visit the FDA Ethics web page: https://www.fda.gov/about-fda/jobs-and-training-fda/ethics. Additional Information:
Incentives may be authorized; however, this is contingent upon funds availability. If authorized, certain incentives will require you to sign a service agreement to remain in the Federal government for a period of up to 3 years. Note: This statement does not imply nor guarantee an incentive will be offered and paid. Incentives include the following: moving expenses, recruitment or relocation incentive; student loan repayment, superior qualifications appointment, creditable service for annual leave for prior non-federal work experience or prior uniformed military service, etc.
Additional selections may be made for similar positions across the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) within the local commuting area(s) of the location identified in this announcement. By applying, you agree to have your application shared with interested selecting official(s) at HHS. Clearance of CTAP/ICTAP will be applied for similar positions across HHS.
If you are serving, or have served in the last 5 years (from 06/14/2021) as an Executive Branch political, Schedule C, or Non-career SES appointee, HHS/FDA may be required to obtain approval by the Office of Personnel Management (OPM) prior to beginning employment. You can find out if you have held one of these appointment types by looking at your Standard Form 50s in your Electronic Official Personnel Folder (eOPF), in Section 5 where the legal authorities are listed. If you have served or are currently serving, you must provide a copy of your SF-50, Notification of Personnel Action, documenting this appointment. In addition, you will be required to respond to the question in the assessment and certify your responses to the questionnaire. See Political Appointee FAQ - OPM for more.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
This is a direct hire announcement. Traditional rating and ranking of applications, and veterans' preference does not apply to this vacancy. We will evaluate you against the basic qualifications. Qualified applicants will be referred for consideration in accordance with the Office of Personnel Management direct hire guidelines. Note: Volunteer experience can also be used as qualifying experience.

Once the job opportunity announcement closes (at 11:59 pm Eastern Time on 06/14/2021), a review of your résumé and supporting documentation will be conducted, the information will be compared against your responses to the assessment questionnaire to determine your eligibility for Federal employment, and then whether you are qualified for this particular position. If, after reviewing your resume and/or supporting documentation, a determination is made that you have inflated your responses when compared to your background information, you may be deemed ineligible.

If you are referred to the hiring manager for consideration, you may be further evaluated based on an interview; review of requested work samples, writing samples, most recent performance evaluation(s), or professional references; or results of an oral presentation or work-related test. Failure to comply with any of the additional assessment requirements will result in removal from further consideration. These assessment methods/tools may also be listed under Key Requirements.

Interagency / Career Transition Assistance Program (I/CTAP): Well-Qualified is defined as an applicant who meets the qualification standards and eligibility requirements for the position, including minimum educational and experience requirements; any medical qualifications and suitability; is able to perform the essential duties of the position, with or without reasonable accommodation; meets any applicable selective placement factors for the position (such as the ability to speak a specific language or any other factor required immediately upon hire); and is able to satisfactorily perform the duties of the position upon entry. Learn more on the USAJOBS Career Transition Assistance Site.

Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your eligibility.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Non-sensitive (NS)/Low Risk
Trust determination process
Suitability/Fitness
Required Documents

Required Documents
Resume
Transcript
A document that is required must be submitted by all applicants because the document is needed to verify your qualifications, education, or other eligibility information. Failure to provide one of the documents in the list below may result in your application being considered incomplete.

Cover Letter
DD-214/ Statement of Service
Disability Letter (Schedule A)
Disability Letter (VA)
License
Other supporting documentation not listed above
PCS Orders
Performance Appraisal
Professional Certification
Resume
Separation Notice (RIF)
SF-15
SF-50/ Notification of Personnel Action
Transcript
These documents may be required for some applicants. Applicants relying on education to qualify, those seeking consideration under a special hiring authority, or those who need to verify a license or certification, will need to submit appropriate supporting documentation from this list. RESUME REQUIREMENTS:
The federal government has very specific resume requirements. If you have not written a federal resume before, you should watch this Resume Writing Tutorial video on the USAJOBS YouTube channel, or read through a helpful Resume Writing FAQ on the USAJOBS Help Site to learn what details you should, and should not, include in your resume.
At a minimum your resume should list the position title, employer, start and end dates (including month and year), salary (or grade and step), hours worked per week, and a list of duties performed or accomplishments, for EACH position listed. A CV (curriculum vitae) may not contain enough information to meet these resume requirements.

Displaced employees:
If you are a former Federal employee who was displaced due to a Reduction-in-Force (RIF) or surplused by some other means, please submit a copy of the separation letter or RIF notice from your agency. To be selected under I/CTAP, you must still be found well-qualified for this position. See the How You Will Be Evaluated section for the agency's definition of well-qualified. Learn more on the USAJOBS Career Transition Assistance Site.

Learn more about supporting documents and documentation requirements on USAJOBS:
How to Understand the Required Documents Section
What Types of Documents May I Need?
How to Manage Your Documents on USAJOBS

If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
You must be a U.S. Citizen or U.S. National. Foreign nationals or legal permanent residents are not eligible for consideration. This is a direct hire authority announcement. Traditional federal rules regarding rating, ranking, and veterans' preference do not apply. This vacancy will also be used to clear CTAP/ICTAP.",11150,Washington
133,Nurse Coordinator,Nurse Agency DC,"Washington, DC 20012 (Takoma area)",$36 an hour,"Title: Nurse CoordinatorDuration: Two yearsLocation: Washington, DC; May work remoteEducation: DC Registered NurseClassification: Part-time ContractSalary: $36 hourCompany Confidential is seeking a part time nurse coordinator who will lead a team of nurses in fulfilling the contract needs of our client. This project works with the Office of the State Superintendent of Education in providing RNs and LPNs for one-to-one care during school transport for special education students. The nurse coordinator will be a DC registered nurse and have experience with pediatrics, disability, nurse transport and/or scheduling. The ideal candidate will be expected to match up students to nurses based on skill set and or experience as well as liaise between family and school staff. This position involves record keeping, organizing, problem solving and time management. It also involves interpreting and communicating regulations, medical data and terminology. Interaction with students, parents, staff and other personnel charged with successfully executing this performance contract is required.Experience: · Coordinating nurse schedules for up to 50 nurses· Pediatric care, special education care and/or nurse transport· Record keeping management· Timesheet review and approval· ADP ezLabor knowledge not required but will be seen as a plus.Responsibilities: · Work with minimum supervision and as an effective member of our team.· Present a positive image of the organization to members of the community.· Observe and record information including non-verbal information.· Learn and understand information from procedures including medical terminology.· Demonstrate emotional maturity and a willingness to cooperate at all times· Take ownership of the scheduling matrix and be responsible for foreseeing gaps and other discrepancies· Work with managers from this project, payroll and human resources· Maintain respect for students and adults from various cultures and backgrounds at all times· Remain flexible, patient, and physically and mentally healthy in order to preform the job well and with no outside interferences· Monitor the ongoing health status and needs of enrolled students by ensuring daily health checks are complete and medications are administered per the agency's policy and doctors' orders· Maintain detailed, accurate, up-to-date and confidential records· Develop and submit timely reports as required.· Maintain strict child, family and staff confidentiality at all times· Perform other duties, as requestedRequired: · Must be proficient in Excel· Must have access to the internet (if working remotely) with average to above average computer skills· Strong organizational, problem solving, time management and analytical skills· Excellent Communication Skills verbally and in writing· Regular site visits to each school bus terminal throughout the city· Good personal hygiene· Background check, fingerprinting and drug test preformed· DC Licensed Registered Nurse· Proof of clear TB/HepB Test· Valid CPR cardThe responsibilities listed in this position description are intended to describe the general nature and level of work performed by a person in this position. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all duties that may be performed in such a position.Job Types: Part-time, Travel nursing, ContractPay: $36.00 per hourMedical Specialty:PediatricsPhysical Setting:SchoolSchedule:Monday to FridayLicense/Certification:BLS Certification (Required)DC RN License (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Yes",11150,Washington
134,Policy Manager,Innovations for Poverty,"Washington, DC 20005 (Logan Circle area)",None,"This is an exciting new role to be hired immediately, collaborating closely with the Director of Policy & External Relations and a large research team. The role will work closely with the team that is scaling up a new NORMalising mask-wearing program, based on recent evidence from Bangladesh, throughout South Asia. This project will be the primary focus of this role for at least the first six months and involve daily engagement and coordination with a large multi-organizational collaborative team.
Responsibilities
Manage evidence-to-policy impact in South Asia (75%)
Combine insights from relevant research into policy lessons for decision-makers who want to apply IPA research to their policies and programs.
Support the design and planning of intervention scale-ups, by working closely with the research teams and implementation partners, to ensure they are consistent with the evidence and the particular needs of the context.
Liaise with implementation partners for the smooth planning and execution of implementation activities. This entails developing an execution plan and communicating with implementation partners on a regular basis to ensure activities happen as per the plan. Prepare progress reports, reminders, and follow-up with the implementing partners.
Coordinate with policy partners, and track the progress of implementation activities, and identify and share details of expected issues that need resolving in the partnership.
Coordinate follow ups to meetings with high level decision-makers moving at top speeds in a crisis situation.
Support external engagement and policy communications (25%)
Proactively identify policy fundraising and policy-relevant business development opportunities, and pursue these opportunities in collaboration with global and country office-based staff
Document the key learnings and challenges during the implementation process.
Write and design original blog posts, briefs, website content, and other materials communicating IPA’s policy impact and strategy to internal and external stakeholders.
Create original materials to communicate IPA’s policy lessons to internal and external stakeholders.
Represent IPA in policy conversations and at events.
Coordinate grant reporting and deliverable management for a portfolio of policy grants in South Asia.
Collaborate extensively across programmatic and functional teams at IPA to deliver on our policy strategy and share lessons across teams and contexts.
Collaborate with IPA’s policy team and senior management to shape and reflect on IPA’s unique policy impact strategy.
Other
Perform other duties as assigned by supervisor.
Maintain compliance with all organization policies and procedures.
Qualifications
Master’s degree in economics, development, international relations, public administration, public policy or a closely related field strongly preferred. Will accept additional experience in place of master’s.
5+ years of relevant experience , including at least 1 year of experience working closely with large NGOs or governments, preferably in a developing country context.
Knowledge of and demonstrated interest in the use of rigorous evidence for international development policy required.
Expertise in drawing policy lessons from these and communicating them to various audiences
Excellent communication skills, including clear, precise, non-technical written and presentation skills; requires a strong written “voice” and ability to write in various voices as needed as well as effective spoken communication and presentation style.
Proven ability to multitask and successfully complete projects on tight deadlines with little supervision.
Willingness to work hard, be self-motivated, learn, and adapt quickly will be essential for doing well in this position.
Ability to supervise staff and manage projects independently.
Strong ability to manage up and across.
Experience with IPA and/or partner institutions strongly preferred.
Willingness to travel internationally, once it is safe to do so, up to 25% of time preferred.",11150,Washington
135,Documentation Specialist/Editor - Part Time,Arcetyp LLC,"Fairfax, VA 22032",None,"Arcetyp LLC is a growing small business that provides a broad range of consulting services to US Federal Government, US Military, and Commercial clients. Services include Management & IT Consulting, Program & Project Management, and Professional & Admin Services.

We are recruiting a Documentation Specialist/Editor with Expert Level Microsoft Word Capabilities to join the corporate team and support our clients on a part-time consulting hourly basis. This position works remotely via telework. The editor formats and revises proposal content and technical content for various technical topics and approaches/solutions. Coordinates through our proposal manager with some direct client interaction. Work is by project and hourly and sometimes fixed price.


COMPENSATION. Pay and benefits information for this position will be provided to interested candidates that apply. Arcetyp offers a package of compensation and benefits to full-time salaried employees.

Arcetyp is an Equal Opportunity Employer and we highly value diversity of our workforce. We accept resumes from all interested parties and consider applicants for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, marital status, sexual preference, personal appearance, family responsibility, the presence of a non-job-related medical condition or physical disability, matriculation, political affiliation, veteran status, or any other legally protected status.


In submitting an application for this position via our site you are confirming that Arcetyp can submit your resume to our client(s) for review.",11150,Washington
136,Policy Manager,Innovations for Poverty,"Washington, DC 20005 (Logan Circle area)",None,"This is an exciting new role to be hired immediately, collaborating closely with the Director of Policy & External Relations and a large research team. The role will work closely with the team that is scaling up a new NORMalising mask-wearing program, based on recent evidence from Bangladesh, throughout South Asia. This project will be the primary focus of this role for at least the first six months and involve daily engagement and coordination with a large multi-organizational collaborative team.
Responsibilities
Manage evidence-to-policy impact in South Asia (75%)
Combine insights from relevant research into policy lessons for decision-makers who want to apply IPA research to their policies and programs.
Support the design and planning of intervention scale-ups, by working closely with the research teams and implementation partners, to ensure they are consistent with the evidence and the particular needs of the context.
Liaise with implementation partners for the smooth planning and execution of implementation activities. This entails developing an execution plan and communicating with implementation partners on a regular basis to ensure activities happen as per the plan. Prepare progress reports, reminders, and follow-up with the implementing partners.
Coordinate with policy partners, and track the progress of implementation activities, and identify and share details of expected issues that need resolving in the partnership.
Coordinate follow ups to meetings with high level decision-makers moving at top speeds in a crisis situation.
Support external engagement and policy communications (25%)
Proactively identify policy fundraising and policy-relevant business development opportunities, and pursue these opportunities in collaboration with global and country office-based staff
Document the key learnings and challenges during the implementation process.
Write and design original blog posts, briefs, website content, and other materials communicating IPA’s policy impact and strategy to internal and external stakeholders.
Create original materials to communicate IPA’s policy lessons to internal and external stakeholders.
Represent IPA in policy conversations and at events.
Coordinate grant reporting and deliverable management for a portfolio of policy grants in South Asia.
Collaborate extensively across programmatic and functional teams at IPA to deliver on our policy strategy and share lessons across teams and contexts.
Collaborate with IPA’s policy team and senior management to shape and reflect on IPA’s unique policy impact strategy.
Other
Perform other duties as assigned by supervisor.
Maintain compliance with all organization policies and procedures.
Qualifications
Master’s degree in economics, development, international relations, public administration, public policy or a closely related field strongly preferred. Will accept additional experience in place of master’s.
5+ years of relevant experience , including at least 1 year of experience working closely with large NGOs or governments, preferably in a developing country context.
Knowledge of and demonstrated interest in the use of rigorous evidence for international development policy required.
Expertise in drawing policy lessons from these and communicating them to various audiences
Excellent communication skills, including clear, precise, non-technical written and presentation skills; requires a strong written “voice” and ability to write in various voices as needed as well as effective spoken communication and presentation style.
Proven ability to multitask and successfully complete projects on tight deadlines with little supervision.
Willingness to work hard, be self-motivated, learn, and adapt quickly will be essential for doing well in this position.
Ability to supervise staff and manage projects independently.
Strong ability to manage up and across.
Experience with IPA and/or partner institutions strongly preferred.
Willingness to travel internationally, once it is safe to do so, up to 25% of time preferred.",11150,Washington
137,Data Center Technician,"Amazon Data Services, Inc.","Chantilly, VA 20151",None,"Excellent written and verbal communication skills

An advanced understanding of Computer Hardware, including troubleshooting and repair skills.

Working understanding of Linux Operating Systems.

Working understanding of Computer Networking.

Working understanding of Storage Devices.

Proven experience in problem solving and addressing customer service related issues by working with the customer and other internal teams

This position has a physical component. Candidates should be able to lift up to 50lbs and may need to work in cramped spaces or elevated locations.

Ability to work in an environment that operates 24/7 with an ability to participate in on-call rotation and provide afterhours support as needed

Some travel may be required

We are looking for Data Center Technicians to join our rapidly expanding team. This position involves in-depth hardware and network diagnostics followed by physical repair as well as participating in an on-call rotation.

All candidates should be willing to work both independently and with a team. Work prioritization, organizational skills, effective communication, and the ability to react quickly are critical to being successful. In addition to hardware and network repair candidates will install equipment, create documentation, innovate solutions, participate in site-level project work, and fix complex problems within the Data Center Space.

Hands-on experience with one or more of the following hardware platforms (e.g. Dell, HP) is a plus.
HP, Dell, ZT, Foxconn, Super Micro, SGI, etc referred candidates would have:

Previous Data Center or IT experience

Knowledge of Perl, Python, Bash, or other scripting languages.

An Associate’s or Bachelor’s Degree, or equivalent experience in an IT related field.

Proven experience managing work and priorities through a ticketing system and coordination with manager

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",11150,Washington
138,Please Assist Me - Property Management Board Advisors,G11 Technology Partners,"Washington, DC",None,"Position Snapshot
Position Corporate Board Advisor – Property Management Company Please Assist Me
Compensation 0.1% - 0.25% (2-year vesting, 1-year cliff, quarterly thereafter)
Location Remote (Global, US preferred)
Founder(s) Stephanie Cummings
Website Pleaseassistme.com
Organizational Overview
Please Assist Me (PAM) is an app that helps you manage household chores by connecting you with reliable personal assistants. We partner with the owners of apartment complexes and multi-family units to provide worry-free on-demand home services to their residents. Tenants can use PAM to schedule our trusted assistants directly from their phones. With a few simple clicks, they'll have someone to take care of those important but time-consuming tasks—dry cleaning, dishes, laundry, dusting, vacuuming, and other errands. We can even do the grocery shopping or gift wrapping around the holidays!
Please Assist Me works directly with apartment complexes to increase the value they offer to their tenants. We have an amazing, Rockstar team that is highly trained, highly insured, and highly trustworthy. All of our assistants go through a selective hiring process. Once they pass a background check and are trained, they work in teams of two and wear body cams while working in the property. With the Please Assist Me App, access to a worry-free household help is at our client's fingertips.
Since starting in 2017, we have partnered with residential complexes in Tennessee and Washington, DC. Please Assist Me participated in Cohort 1 of Backstage Accelerator and was the winner of the HERImpact DC Pitch Competition and the Paley Rothman Vinetta Project Venture Challenge.
Board Member's Impact Potential
Please Assist Me has had early success with product-market fit in their existing service areas but to reach our goal of becoming a leading company in the Proptech sector we will need to draw on the expertise of seasoned industry professionals. That is why we are searching for business executives to join our company as corporate board advisors. New team members in this role can expect to be involved with discussing and identifying potential strategies, new markets, possible areas of improvement, and future challenges. As Please Assist Me continues to grow to scale, board advisors should be able to draw on their prior business experience and contacts to solve relevant problems, make valuable connections, and offer guidance to the CEO, and the management team, on important business decisions.
What Can Be Accomplished
As one of two property management board advisors on an advisory board of four board members, you will have the opportunity to participate in a promising start-up during our most pivotal period of growth. You will be able to use your connections and abilities to enable Please Assist Me to expand our reach on the eastern seaboard to large urban areas like New York, Miami, and Atlanta. Through your role, you will be able to work with other top-level advisors to identify how and where Please Assist Me can best focus our time, attention, and resources.
You'll gain experience in corporate governance and teamwork as you and the other board advisors work to shape the future of the company and our employees. It is our goal to improve the current landscape of residential rental properties for both residents and property managers. We aim to do this by taking an experiential approach to amenities and integrated living, and by offering affordable and accessible Proptech.
We don't just plan on growing; we plan on growing fast. As we grow to scale, our corporate advisor will ensure we stay true to our vision by stimulating growth while keeping internal systems robust enough to handle new customers. Advisors will also be looked to for input as we define a uniform company brand and message, grow our reputation with property management companies, and increase our number of permanent contracts.
As Please Assist Me continues our upward trajectory, corporate advisors will have the chance to work together to use their skills to review and analyze customer and industry data to refine our business practices, propose new features, identify high-value market prospects and develop sales strategies.
Who You'll Be Working With
Stephanie Cummings and Rashad Cummings are the founders of Please Assist Me. The founding team has successfully pitched and partnered with apartment complexes in Nashville, TN and Washington, DC to attract and retain tenants by providing their residents with our personal assistant app. They will be working personally with the corporate board advisors to offer more apartment-dwellers a better quality of life by connecting with new property managers and expanding the regional market of Please Assist Me.
What You'll Bring to the CompanyA successful tenure in a VP or higher-level corporate positionFamiliarity with multifamily-class-A projectsExperience in apartment property management or residential building development, or experience as a multi-use commercial developer and/or property manager that collaborates with residential developers or property managers
 Appreciation for working in the fast-moving business landscape of urban real estate Knowledge of trends in resident amenities, integrated living, and Proptech A robust personal network of industry contacts
Prior work history or connections with large, national property management companies such as Lincoln Property Company, GreyStar, Equity Residential, Kettler, Camden Properties Trust, Avalon Bay, and UDR
Hard work, grit, and the determination to see results
Impact Description – Year 1
The below list breaks down the effect that this position will have on the company into a clear set of actionable goals. We recommend that, prior to reaching an agreement, both the board advisor and the CEO review and modify this list, as necessary. The final timeline should guide the advisor's decision-making process throughout their first year and also provide a mutually defined and understandable measure of success for the end of the year.
Within 1 Month, You'll:Meet with the board of advisors
 Work with the CEO and COO to get up to date on PAM's current projects Develop a list of the top ten property management companies for Please Assist Me to work withBecome a member of the Please Assist Me team by getting to know the other team members and getting briefed on the current business structure, strategies, challenges, and goals of the companyAct as an ambassador for the Please Assist Me brand and supporting the company's network through five “warm” introductions to potential clients or employees
Within 3 Months, You'll
 Reevaluate your efforts from the first month to identify and make improvements Identify key metrics (i.e. retention, lease-up rate, occupancy rate) for corporate proposalsProvide guidance on developing a relationship with “warm” introductions Within 6 Months, You'llReview existing pilot-program agreements, permanent agreements, and corporate proposals in preparation for pitching to interested property management companies from the top-ten listProvide guidance on the development of a successful pilot agreement
Within 12 Months, You'llMake intros for additional pilot agreementsGuide Please Assist Me's expansion into new markets as successful pilot agreements are converted into permanent agreementsAssist with the execution of Please Assist Me's first agreement with a nation-wide property management companyWork with other team members to identify future growth goals while maintaining the quality of our services, personnel, and the overall health of the companyReview the success of the prior year's internal and external business relationships and identify areas to improve and grow.
Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion @ Please Assist Me
Our customers come from all walks of life and so do we. We hire great people from a wide variety of backgrounds, not just because it's the right thing to do, but because it makes our company stronger. If you share our values and our enthusiasm for small businesses, you will find a home at Please Assist Me.
Score 3 – Startup Board Initiative
There is a dire need for more diverse viewpoints in the boardrooms of corporate America. At Score 3, we are building on our experience with entrepreneurs in the technology industry to create a fast-moving and innovative solution. Our Startup Board Initiative uncovers diverse board candidates and connects them to our wide-ranging network of tech founders. These experienced corporate leaders' partner with companies by taking on the role of board advisor or board director in exchange for company equity.
Our initiative offers the most logical and effective entry point for diverse corporate executives: acting as board members for early-stage startups with diverse founders whose obstacles, talents, and dilemmas they are best equipped to handle. Board members can provide input on company strategy, acceptable risks, and priorities. They are valuable sources of warm introductions to new investors, potential employees, prospective customers, or future board members. In exchange, board members gain experience in the rewarding environment of high-tech, high-growth startups and equity in the company. As they develop their board-level leadership skills, they are exposed to some of the latest ideas, technologies, and business practices. Together, founders and board members will be able to grow professionally while shepherding the company towards future success.
The Score 3 Startup Board Initiative provides people of color, women, and LGBTQ business leaders a way to bypass workplace bias and unfair stereotypes. Board members receive personalized help to gain skills and create business connections that will enable them to take their careers to the next level. Likewise, founders acquire the critical social capital and additional business expertise that they need to accelerate the growth of their company. The technology industry is known for moving fast and breaking things, and it's time to apply that philosophy to disrupting the homogeneity of the corporate board room.",11150,Washington
139,Field Services Daily Operations Supervisor,Prince William County Service Authority,"Woodbridge, VA 22195",$36.73 - $52.07 an hour,"This position provides leadership, supervision, guidance, training and support to the Meter and Field Services staff. Responsible for ensuring that all staff under their direction follows all policies and procedures, performs all essential job functions related to their positions and maintains a good working relationship with Service Authority internal and external customers. Assigns and reviews daily work performed by the Meter and Field Services Technicians and Assistant Supervisors and assists other divisions/departments/sections with escalated customer concerns. Uses independent judgment and training to take appropriate actions to deal with standard recurring situations. Experienced workers initiate their own daily assignments, follow through on matters, and use independent judgment and training to take appropriate actions to deal with standard recurring situations.Position Responsibilities / Essential Job Functions:Supervises and directs Meter and Field Services staff in all aspects of their job functions. Assigns and reviews work and takes actions to adjust work, staffing and operations to meet requirements.Serves as a leader and mentor to Meter and Field Services staff; assists in their professional development in order to set and meet career and business expectations.Provides courtesy service to customers by investigating leaks, locating their main shut off valves and confirming meter readings.Work with Field Services Manager and Meter Project Technical Supervisor to ensure quality control checks performed on a weekly basis and feedback are is appropriately administered to staff.Recommends selection of new employees, trains and evaluates staff, and takes appropriate actions to improve performance when necessary. Initiates actions regarding hiring, transfer, promotion, payroll, employee leave, performance and other personnel actions.Provides leadership, supervision, guidance, training and support in the installation, maintenance, and repair of small meters (1” and below).Effectively promotes and implements all Service Authority policies and procedures. Works with management to achieve Service Authority and Division goals and initiatives.Ensures all vehicles and equipment issued to the Field Services department are maintained and used in accordance with acceptable practices.Works effectively with internal and external customers to solve meter and customer related issues or problems. Takes lead role in investigating escalated customer complaints and schedules one-on-one meetings with customers.Manages the Service Authority’s meter reading process and works with the Meter Operations Clerk effectively to ensure timely completion of all routes and cycles.Manages the Service Authority’s meter and hydrant meter inspections and testing programs. Assists management in the enforcement of all regulations pertaining to the Hydrant Meter Program.Works with vendors and suppliers to understand, evaluate and order equipment.Assists in compiling information for and writing of Field Services Department training guides; Standard Operation Procedures; job aides and memorandums.Provides backup for the Field Services Manager at the direction of the Division Director or designee.Attends training sessions that further enhance skills and transfer that knowledge to team members.Assists the Field Service Manager in staffing an on-call roster; Assists on-call staff in making complex procedural decisions.As directed by Customer Service, initiates and finalizes meter service to customers, conducts special meter readings, and confirms meter service.Provides on-site meter testing service; Replaces and/or installs meters, registers and MIU’s; Responds to frozen meter calls, thawing out meters and piping as required.Communicates with other Service Authority divisions/departments/sections, providing information about status of service or receiving instructions about restoring or terminating service or confirming meter readings.Operates a Service Authority vehicle.May be deemed essential at any time.Performs other duties as assigned or required.Essential Skills and Experience: Essential Skills and Experience:Knowledge of principles and practices of utility field service operations as it relates to the water and/or sewer industry; read technology, preferable as it relates to the water industry; knowledge of meter reading frequencies, meter specifications; computer equipment and software applications related to assignment and supervision of personnel.Ability to train and direct the work of staff engaged in field service work; motivate, manage and evaluate staff; keep work related records and prepare necessary reports; perform related field service work efficiently; operate a Service Authority vehicle observing legal and defensive driving practices; follow established policy and procedures in the performance of duties; understand and carry out oral and written instructions; operate computer equipment and software applications related to assignment; communicate effectively, both orally and in writing; work cooperatively with others.Working knowledge of all Service Authority’s policies and procedures to include safety procedures and regulations.Knowledge of all Service Authority’s policies and procedures related to the Field Services Department.Extensive knowledge and skills required to repair and/or replace various sizes and types of water meters.At least three years of progressively responsible field experience installing, repairing and calibrating 3” and above water meters including at least one year of lead or supervisory experience.Ability and skill in the use of small hand tools, computer keyboard, calculator and various types of office equipment.Ability to write effective SOP’s, training material and memorandums in English.Ability to attend training seminars, on and off-site, as necessitated by Service Authority management.Experience with Microsoft Office applications.High School diploma or GED.Or combination of education and experience as described above.Preferred Skills and Experience:An Associate Degree in Business, Management or related field.Five or more years progressively responsible field experience installing, repairing and calibrating 3” and above water meters.Three or more years’ experience in the effective management and leadership of personnel.*Special Requirements:Must possess and maintain a valid driver’s license consistent with Service Authority policy requirements.Reporting to this Position:Supervises and directs the work of others.Physical Demands and Work Environment:The physical demands of this position are available upon request. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.The qualifications listed above are intended to represent the minimum skills and experience levels associated with performing the duties and responsibilities contained in this job description. The qualifications do not express absolute employment or promotional standards. They are general guidelines that should be considered along with the job related selection or promotional criteria.Job Type: Full-timePay: $36.73 - $52.07 per hour",11150,Washington
140,Support Operations Project Manager,Splunk,"Washington, DC 20002 (Capitol Hill area)",None,"Join us as we pursue our disruptive new vision to make machine data accessible, usable and valuable to everyone. We are a company filled with people who are passionate about our product and seek to deliver the best experience for our customers. At Splunk, we’re committed to our work, customers, having fun and most importantly to each other’s success. Learn more about Splunk careers and how you can become a part of our journey!
Splunk is the world’s first Data-to-Everything Platform. Now organizations no longer need to worry about where their data is coming from, and they are free to focus on the business outcomes that data can deliver.
Support Project Manager (Tools & Technology)
Role:
The Support Project Manager will work cross-functionally within the Splunk organization to help manage our entire portfolio of tools and platform related projects in Support. This individual will lead projects, but will also be a strategic voice representing the Support Organization in cross functional projects. This role is part of a team of Project Delivery experts who are responsible for leading the discovery, technical requirements gathering and documenting all key areas of a successful MVP. Partnering with Support Operations Business Analysts and Splunk IT Teams, our Support Project Managers (PM) help drive successful program and project implementations by helping IT do identify the right tools and processes for success.
Responsibilities:
Understand the company’s support business and operating model and company objectives and how they translate into efficient and standardized business processes
Collaborate with , Support Operations BAs, Technical Support Managers, and others to understand, document and deliver BRDs that are actionable by Splunk IT Teams.
Anticipate requirements, uncover areas for improvement, and suggest areas of improvement
Use expertise in industry standard methodologies, policies, procedures, and methodologies to establish efficiencies in project workflows
Provide insight and guidance on areas of expertise when gathering project requirements on “to be"" process and work with subject matter authorities to obtain agreement
Drive schedules, meetings and deliverables to meet timelines as required
Successfully manage more than one project
Strong communication skills, written and verbal.
Ability to communicate across all levels of the business
Leads the overall drafting of the business requirements / use cases, test scripts / acceptance criteria, and training materials for various transformation initiatives
Collaborates with the business to ensure business readiness and transfer knowledge for any new process / system
Assist with enterprise-wide program implantation including coordination of tasks, milestones, and deadlines.
Requirements:
Experience with Salesforce required.
Preference for experience with other Support or Customer Success related products/ platforms such as Atlassian (Confluence, JIRA), Scheduling tools, Knowledge Platform technologies, etc.
3+ years of Business Process Improvement and/ or Project management experience
Strong background in establishing current state Customer Support (Technical Support) process models and providing process improvement / redesign
Validated experience in a high growth, highly scaled SaaS environment
Strong organizational and business analysis skills
Familiar with/ able to drive the Agile development and release methodologies, especially for automation of business processes, improvements/ redesigns
Broad expertise in one or more of the following areas (Go to Market (GTM), Technical Support, Customer Service, Customer Success, Renewals Process & Operations)
Ability to work across cross-functional groups and ensure ability to influence and execute across groups
A passion for technology and an ability to identify new opportunities for efficiency and productivity
Consulting or Six Sigma experience preferred
Bachelor’s degree/foreign equivalent in a related discipline or meaningful relevant on the job experience
We value diversity at our company. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics in the location in which the candidate is applying.
For job positions in San Francisco, CA, and other locations where required, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",11150,Washington
141,Launcher (Entry-Level),REEF,"Washington, DC",None,"Launcher

Location: Washington DC

Who You'll Work For
REEF's mission is to connect the world to your block.

We transform underutilized urban spaces into neighborhood hubs that connect people to locally curated goods, services, and experiences.

With an ecosystem of 4,500 locations and a team of 15,000 people, REEF is the largest operator of mobility, logistics hubs, and neighborhood kitchens in North America.

Together we are leveraging the power of proximity to keep our communities moving forward in a sustainable and thoughtful way.

What You'll Do

Schedule and conduct operations site walks to ensure site is qualified for product

Visit city permitting departments to process applications, follow up on requests, and ensure permits are issued in a timely manner

Obtain all required documents to process registration

Ensure documents are stored in correct repositories & circulated to relevant departments

Place PO's for various project mile-stone needs and update Project Management Tool (Asana) daily

Travel within city daily as requested and work out of local office when not in field

Escalate bottlenecks and explore creative/timely solutions with Launcher II and Regional Director

Complete all permitting applications and vessel registration paperwork in an expedited and accurate manner to ensure timely product launches

Ensure clear communication of process changes to Manager and contribute to maintaining process documents (e.g. permitting requirements process)

Manage multiple project milestones in tandem

Follow process to place PO's (e.g. vessels, small ware, etc.); track and update PM tool regularly for visibility

Responsible for estimating key project milestone dates used by cross-functional teams to plan their in-market operation

Responsible for launching set # of vessels in market

What We Want From You:
Great attitude! Ambitious and ready to learn!

Strong project management and organizational skills.

Ability to figure it out on own with limited resources.

Excited to work in the field on the ground level and own project

Availability during nights and weekends (as may be required from time to time)

Flexible to work on special out-of-market engagements

50-60% Travel 2-5 months duration may be required

What We'll Provide
Medical
Dental
Vision
Life and Disability
401K
Paid Time Off (PTO)

PHYSICAL DEMANDS:
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.

Frequently operate small office equipment such as a computer, tablet, and copier/printer, telephone.

Work is performed in a professional office environment.

WORKING CONDITIONS:
Work is performed indoors for extended periods of time including up to the entire duration of shift.

REEF Technology is an equal opportunity employer, and we value diversity at our company. REEF does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, national origin, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. REEF complies with all applicable equal employment opportunity legislation in each jurisdiction in which it operates.",11150,Washington
142,"Manager, Incident Investigation",Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority,"Alexandria, VA",None,"Job Description

The Department of Plant Maintenance is seeking an experienced candidate for the Manager, Incident Investigation position. This critical role will support five maintenance branches within the department. Experience conducting thorough investigations, recommending disciplinary actions, and participating in the grievance process is highly desired. This position will report to Landover, MD (Carmen Turner Facility).
Minimum Qualifications
Education
Bachelor’s Degree in Business Administration, Transportation, Civil, Mechanical Engineering, or related field
In lieu of the bachelor’s degree, a High School Diploma or GED and four (4) years of relevant work experience may be considered
Experience
A minimum of five (5) years of experience in conducting investigations in a highly regulated industrial, manufacturing or public transportation environment
Certification/Licensure
N/A
Preferred
Transit Safety and Security Program (TSSP) Certificate
Roadway Worker Protection (RWP) Level 4 certification
Medical Group
Satisfactorily complete the medical examination for this position, if required. The incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of this position either with or without reasonable accommodations.
Mission Essential Designation:
In accordance with the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority’s Continuity of Operations Plan (COOP) this job has been identified as critical to mission essential functions. Incumbents in this role may be required to report to or continue to work in the event of authorized office closings or service suspensions due to severe weather, natural disaster, fire, operational emergencies or related events.
Job Summary
The Manager, Incident Investigation is responsible for the oversight of incident investigations and completing the administrative portion of investigations in the Safety Management System (SMS) within the respective operational offices (Support Services – SSRV, Rail Services – RAIL, and Bus Services – BUSV). In addition, this position is required to evaluate maintenance operations, programs and procedures. The incumbent performs a variety of complex administrative, operational and analytical duties in support of department or office activities; performs trend analysis to identify incident root causes to identify mitigation strategies to prevent reoccurrences, coordinates project activities with Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA)’s departments, offices and external organizations and coordinates all activities related to personnel action.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS
Interfaces with the Department of Safety & Environmental Management (SAFE), the Office of Labor Relations (LABR) and the Department of Human Resources (HR) when investigating incidents and to determine root causes and the appropriate administrative action to prevent reoccurrence.
Provides regular status reports to the Director, Assistant Director, and Superintendents regarding incident investigations and trend analysis. Represents the Office Director in senior and executive management meetings to brief leadership on incidents and safety programs.
Conducts thorough investigations when incidents occur. Responsible for completing SMS process, researches timekeeping system as needed to determine if fatigue was a contributing factor, recommends and develops corrective action plans, determines and administers appropriate administrative action.
Responsible for recommending disciplinary actions and participates in the grievance process. Ensures effective coordination of activities between branches within the respective office of WMATA.
Participates in and performs special office projects involving incident reduction. Responsible for responding to the scene of incidents on various shifts (24/7) as needed. Responds to and assists during severe weather emergencies.
OTHER FUNCTIONS
Attends and passes the required training classes and continuously learns best practices for working safely and efficiently.
The essential duties listed are not intended to limit specific duties and responsibilities of any particular position. Nor is it intended to limit in any way the right of managers and supervisors to assign, direct and control the work of employees under their supervision.
Evaluation Criteria
Consideration will be given to applicants whose resumes demonstrate the required education and experience. Applicants should include all relevant education and work experience.
Evaluation criteria may include one or more of the following:
Skills and/or behavioral assessment
Personal interview
Verification of education and experience (including certifications and licenses)
Criminal Background Check (a criminal conviction is not an automatic bar to employment)
Medical examination including a drug and alcohol screening (for safety sensitive positions)
Review of a current motor vehicle report
Closing
WMATA is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, status as a protected veteran, or any other status protected by applicable federal law.
This posting is an announcement of a vacant position under recruitment. It is not intended to replace the official job description. Job descriptions are available upon confirmation of an interview.",11150,Washington
143,Operations Manager,Mothership Strategies,"Washington, DC (U Street Corridor area)","From $80,000 a year","Are you interested in managing a team of operations professionals dedicated to supporting staff? Are you someone who is always looking for solutions, a better way to do things, and thrives in fast-paced situations? Do you want to be part of making a real impact in the success of our teams and Democratic clients? If so, the Mothership's operations team might be your calling.

THE COMPANY :
Mothership Strategies is a top-ranking Democratic digital fundraising firm. We are experts in engaging grassroots supporters online through digital fundraising and online advertising. Mothership has raised over $600 million for some of the largest Democratic campaigns and most influential progressive causes. We are a motivated and passionate team that loves taking ownership of tasks, solving problems, and working towards results. When Democratic candidates and organizations need to unite millions of supporters to raise money online, they call us.

THE POSITION:
We're looking for an experienced Manager to expand our Operations team. In this position, you will be delivering solution based support for the client management teams, and lead projects that align with the strategic objectives of Mothership. You will also oversee Team Operations Associates and manage their day-to-day workflow. This position reports to the Director of Operations. Compensation package is commensurate with experience, starting $80,000 annually.

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES:
Lead projects on critical initiatives that directly impact the success and growth of Mothership
Ensure office operations and Team Operations Associates' workflow is efficiently supporting all departments
Find solutions to staff problems and make work life easier.
Have fun developing the operations team, facilitate all staff bonding activities, and actively contribute to a positive workplace energy.

YOU'RE A GOOD FIT IF YOU HAVE:
6-10 years of operations and administrative experience
Strong organizational, time-management, leadership and communication skills.
Positive attitude and enjoyment in a fast-paced work environment.
Initiative and a proven ability to meet deadlines.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Prior roles with knowledge of organizational effectiveness and operations management at small to medium sized companies or organizations
Prior experience directly managing a team and working with department managers on shared priorities
Familiarity with business and financial principles or experience budgeting and forecasting.
Nice to have: prior political industry or campaign experience, understanding of and commitment to progressive causes

TECHNOLOGY WE USE (Experience would be AWESOME, but not required)

MacBook for work purposes
Google Suite for email, calendar, and shared drives
DocuSign for vendor and client contracts
ZenDesk for staff help desk
Slack for communication
Google Sheets/Excel for data and budget tracking
Google Forms & SurveyMonkey for collecting staff data

THE LOCATION

As the safety and wellbeing of our team is of the utmost importance, all Mothership staff members are working remotely until it is safe to resume working in the office.

Mothership Strategies is located at 1328 Florida Avenue NW (near 14th st.), in a residential area of Washington DC, close to Historic U St. We are metro accessible and located in a 2 story, open-concept office.

WHY ELSE SHOULD YOU APPLY?

Competitive Salary
Bonus Program
Excellent Benefits (Including Student Loan Repayment)
Metro/Parking Reimbursement
Cell Phone Reimbursement
LinkedIn Learning
Access to top tier technology (MacBook Environment)

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY POLICY

Mothership Strategies is an equal opportunity employer. As an organization that fights for progressive values nationwide, we're committed to building a community based on diversity and inclusion at all levels. To that end, we strictly prohibit discrimination based on age, race, color, national origin, gender (including pregnancy, childbirth or medical condition related to pregnancy or childbirth), gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, veteran status, military status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. Applicants of all backgrounds who are passionate about progressive politics are able and encouraged to apply!",11150,Washington
144,Custodian,WC Smith,"Washington, DC 20020 (Shipley Terrace area)",None,"CustodianJob Code:2021-WCS-038Actual Job Location:Shipley Park Apartments-2532 Southern Ave SEFT/PT Status:Regular Full TimeOpen Date:6/9/2021POSITION SUMMARY:WC Smith is seeking a Custodian to join our team at Shipley Park Apartments. As a Custodian, you are responsible for cleaning, assisting maintenance, and providing exemplary customer service. Custodians at WC Smith are an essential part of our business, and are critical in maintaining our properties in premium condition!PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES:Maintaining the security of the property by ensuring building and apartment doors are securedMaintaining the required property uniform and assuring the professional appearance and attitude at all times.Being courteous, helpful, and neat when working in occupied apartment units.Assisting in the completion of preventative maintenance schedules of equipment and operating systems.Assisting in maintaining the inventory of tools, equipment, and supplies.Notifying the manager of needed maintenance and repair on the property.Keeping workshops and utility rooms in a clean and orderly condition.Cleaning the dock and common areas when neededUtilizing powered equipment safely to clean the parking areasAware of and operate within OSHA (Occupational Safety & Health Act) standards and WCS safety/material policies at all timesPerforms all other duties as assigned.Requirements: * Must have demonstrated knowledge of basic maintenance and cleaning.Knowledge of cleaning and repair tasksHigh school diploma or equivalent desired.2+ years’ experience in residential property maintenance.Must be able to stand for long periods of time (8 hours or more per day) to perform the following physical activities: bending, climbing step ladders, lifting, carrying, grasping, gripping, turning, reaching above shoulders, pushing and pulling, climbing stairs; stooping and squat kneel.Required education: * High school or equivalent*BENEFITS: *Health InsuranceDental InsuranceVision Insurance401k Plan with company matchNine paid holidaysCommuter BenefitsEmployee Assistance Program*About WC Smith*WC Smith is a leading multidisciplinary real estate company firmly grounded in the District of Columbia. We have provided integrated real estate services to the DC metropolitan area for over 50 years, developing and managing a portfolio in excess of 10,000 units of residential real estate. Founded in 1968, WC Smith has built a reputation as one of the most capable and respected property management and development organizations in the area.What sets WC Smith apart from other firms is our holistic approach to community building. We believe it takes more than attractive housing and office buildings to sustain neighborhoods, and over the past 50 years we have developed a successful model for creating and maintaining healthy communities. Our projects uniquely combine the city’s long-term vision for growth with our residents’ vision for how a community best serves their needs and desires. We are committed to the viability and sustainability of the neighborhoods we create and to the well-being of the people who live there inhabit them.We are looking for self-starters and go-getters who demonstrate the resourcefulness, enthusiasm, and relationship building skills essential to offering the best level of service and communication to clients and team members. Our employees enjoy a friendly work environment in the rapidly developing Capitol Riverfront area, a focus on personal and professional wellness, and opportunities for professional growth.WC Smith is an equal opportunity employer and values a diverse workforce.Title: CustodianLocation: Washington, DCCompany: WC SmithLocation: 2532 Southern Ave SE, Washington, DC 20020Job Type: Full-time",11150,Washington
145,IT Program Manager,Twinn Intelligence Group,"Herndon, VA","$150,000 - $170,000 a year","Twinn is seeking a Fully Cleared PM to help support their Gov't customer.

Mandatory Skills

Demonstrated experience with computer and telecommunications systems

Demonstrated experience using standard office productivity software applications

Demonstrated experience eliciting requirements

Demonstrated experience identifying requirements.

Demonstrated experience drafting requirements

Demonstrated experience reviewing program documentation

Demonstrated experience generating formal review documentation

Demonstrated experience coordinating, supporting, and participating in program meetings and reviews

Demonstrated experience capturing meeting minutes

Demonstrated experience reviewing program plans

Demonstrated experience identifying inconsistencies in program plans

Demonstrated experience with portfolio management

Demonstrated experience supporting division-level budget and plans activities.

Demonstrated experience with project management activities such as planning projects, meeting objectives, developing contingencies, and producing schedules

Demonstrated experience with project management methodologies.

Demonstrated experience with executive report preparation.

Demonstrated experience managing meetings to include organizing, scheduling, and facilitating.

Demonstrated experience resolving complex problems including organizing and structuring solutions.

Optional Skills

Demonstrated experience with social collaborative tools such as wikis, blogs, and chats.

Demonstrated experience coordinating with appropriate task managers for problem resolution and task clarification

Demonstrated experience analyzing the computer and information needs of the organization from an operational and strategic perspective and determining immediate and long range requirements

Demonstrated experience communicating with senior customers, senior management, and implementation partners.

#TwinnIntelligence",11150,Washington
146,"Project Manager, International Affairs",Aquent,"Washington, DC 20005 (Downtown area)",None,"Job Description:
We are looking for highly motivated self starters with a strong orientation to make a difference. Must have strong research, writing, and communication skills.

Seeking sharp self-starter interested in international affairs and with a social impact orientation. This is a fantastic opportunity for a motivated and curious individual who is interested in our social mission to improve the lives of older adults around the world.

Responsible for managing and advancing a few key projects for the Global Thought Leadership (GTL) team, including but not limited to:
Editorial and project management assistance to support all aspects the production of the 2021 edition of our international periodical, The Journal. Responsibilities would include:
o research support to identify potential expert contributors to the Journal and to help build Clients' network of Latin American stakeholders;
o project management to ensure that editorial and production deadlines are met
o helping to build and curate our distribution list for stakeholders around the world
o assist in the developing and conducting social media campaigns for Journal and broader GTL team content
o editing and fact-checking journal article submissions
Project management support for our Living, Learning, and Earning Longer (LLEL) initiative.Assistance creating databases to manage the resources we are accumulating on:Targeted research support related to global aging issues
Position requires strong written and verbal communications skill, including editorial skills. Excel and PowerPoint skills also necessary.
Client Description:
Our client is one of the largest non-profits in the US, with a very user-centric vision and a strong social mission. This organization dedicates its efforts on increasing membership with a strong focus digitally, via social media, and digital marketing. The vibe is collaborative, fast-paced, and overall, passionate. The people who work here live and breathe the organization’s mission of enhancing the quality of life, and championing social change.
Work here and:
Help target memberships now and into the future to develop products specifically targeted to those relatively new to the workforce
Have your voice be heard. Our client prides itself on considering the input of all involved in projects
Work with fellow freelancers who know that they’re working on projects designed for the betterment of communities
Work on national campaigns that are targeted by community
Work with others who are interested in outreach and volunteerism
Our client has made customer engagement a priority and is interested in all candidates who are passionate about it as well.",11150,Washington
147,Director of Operational Excellence,Able Services,"Washington, DC 20431 (Foggy Bottom area)","Up to $165,000 a year","Able Services is the largest family owned provider of engineering, janitorial and facilities management solutions in the U.S. Since 1926, Able has consistently delivered world class service at a competitive value. Working together, we deliver valuAble work-life experiences to over one billion square feet of real estate.Our clients range from large multi-tenant office buildings to single-user mid and high-rise corporate headquarters and administrative office facilities. We also serve corporate and university campuses, data centers, high-tech and bio-tech research, medical, manufacturing and warehousing facilities.Who We AreAble Services is a team of diverse, highly skilled and talented people who lead with integrity and respect, celebrate collaboration and teamwork, provide value to our customers, promote sustainability and personal effectiveness in all we do. We are ‘Service at Work.’Job SummaryThe Director of Operational Excellence is responsible for the delivery of operational excellence, identification of operational continuous improvements, contract and organizational compliance, vendor compliance, the presentation of facilities data and analytics, KPI oversight, strategic planning and direction of all aspects of operations and projects within the organization by improving business processes and culture.Essential FunctionsDevelop an overarching strategy that interprets and incorporates the contract intentions and programs to support effective delivery of services and transform the various processes and initiatives to achieve operational excellence.Lead on all contracting activity as part of key relationship management, performance management and risk management working with the various stakeholders across the account and client.Lead all Able’s contract management services; ensuring Able’s service providers deliver to agreed contracts and to financial, quality and performance requirements.Work collaboratively with all Able and client Leadership and Managers to develop reporting strategies to demonstrate value addition to the client.Direct oversight management and leadership across a range of teams he/she manages.Overall responsibility to identify opportunities for improvements, optimize workflows, and enhance operations.Requirements Master’s degree in Business Administration, Operations Management or related field8+ years progressive operational excellence experience preferredStrong demonstrated leadership, supervisory and interpersonal skills to lead and work collaboratively and effectively with various departments, cross-functional teams, clients, executives and staff at all levels; experience facilitating integration and collaboration.Computer skills and good working knowledge and understanding of CMMS and energy management systemsDemonstrated process improvement experience using Lean Six Sigma methodologiesFamiliar with pertinent facilities, quality management and safety based ISO standards and their applicationExcellent oral and written communication skillsDemonstrated critical thinking and problem-solving skills to manage complex information, assess problems, and develop effective solutionsExcellent customer service skills to understand and articulate diverse clients' needs and objectives; manage expectations and deliver as promised and on timeOrganizational and time management skillsApplies best practices across all service linesAbility to embrace and deliver changeDirects ongoing process improvement as it relates to all lines of serviceStrong data and analytic skills; ability to translate data into actionable intelligenceMaintains a high standard of presentation, personal integrity, and customer supportCapable of translating strategic intent into immediate successful deliveryJob Type:  Full timeLocation:  Washington, DCTo apply: Send resume through Able’s careers page, Able Services - Director of Operational Excellence (lever.co)Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of duties that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice. Able Services offers a comprehensive health and welfare benefits package including health insurance (medical, dental and vision), 401(k) plan with immediate vesting, PTO, paid holidays and more.Able values the rich diversity of its workforce. We strive to foster a work environment of respect and engagement that harnesses our workforce’s diversity to our common goal of providing prompt and superior client service.We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate based on classification protected by law, including race, gender, age, sexual orientation, religion, disability, veteran status, or national origin. We also provide reasonable accommodations to applicants and employees with disabilities.Able Services participates in E-Verify and will provide the federal government with your Form I-9 information to confirm that you are authorized to work in the U.S.Este empleador participa en E-Verify y proporcionará al gobierno federal la información de su Formulario I-9 para confirmar que usted está autorizado para trabajar en los Estados Unidos.Job Type: Full-timePay: Up to $165,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee assistance programFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSupplemental Pay:Bonus payAbility to Commute/Relocate:Washington, DC 20431 (Preferred)Education:Master's (Preferred)Experience:Operational Excellence: 8 years (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",11150,Washington
148,Clinical Operations Manager,Columbus Technologies,"Bethesda, MD 20892",None,"Overview:

Roles and responsibilities
Must be authorized to work in the United States
W2 with full benefits
Some travel may be required
Offer contingent on ability to successfully pass a background check and drug screen
Columbus Technologies and Services Inc. is a strategic supplier and business partner to the federal government and its key suppliers. Through our partnership with the National Institutes of Health, Columbus offers administrative, IT, engineering, scientific, and healthcare professionals the opportunity to work with one of the most prestigious research organizations in the world. We are currently seeking a Clinical Operations Manager to work onsite with the National Institutes of Health in Bethesda, MD.
This is a long-term position which offers:
Competitive salaryTremendous growth opportunityOpportunity to work at NIH, the world's foremost medical research centerLearn more about what Columbus can do for you at www.columbususa.com
Responsibilities:

Job Description:Organize and maintain the credentialing process for NIMH IRP physicians and other licensed professionals; act as point of contact between the NIMH Office of the Clinical Director and the NIH Clinical Center Credentialing Office; communicate with staff to answer questions, provide recommendations and request materials; assemble and review credentialing applications; maintain credentialing files both printed and electronic; work closely with the Clinical Directors to finalize signatures and track the status of all licensed credentialed NIMH staff.Attend NIH Clinical Center Graduate Medical Education Committee (GMEC) monthly meetings and program coordinator meetings; maintain and support the data system to evaluate and document resident, fellow and faculty performance using New Innovations, resident and fellow applications, interviews and travel; prepare resident and fellow initial hiring and appointment actions including creditable service applications (CSAL), documentation of training from previous programs and any visa related tasks; maintain and support renewals of current residents or fellows; coordinate required program meetings; prepare residency materials for annual review by the Designated Institutional Official (DIO) of the GMEC and continuing education about program coordinator roles and responsibilities by attendance at the American Association of Directors of Psychiatry Residency Training (AADPRT); support the Program Directors with the NIMH Outstanding Resident Award Program including website, emails list, applications, selection, program and travel needs; Assist the Program Directors with NIMH Brain Camp.Coordinate meetings, workshops and courses for staff; make logistical arrangements; generate format and agenda; monitor budget and expenditures of the event; organize transportation and travel reimbursement for participants and speakers; prepare FTE and NON FTE personnel and trainee actions; process travel orders and vouchers; arrange for staff member to represent organization at conferences and meetings; process supply orders via POTS with government approval; develop spreadsheets to analyze information; gather and analyze information about processes and programs; prepare reports, letters, and other documents for review and input for programs, policies, and activities; coordinate the printing and conversion of paper documents to electronic files; develop, maintain and utilize various administrative databases; compile data and create and maintain PowerPoint presentations for presentation utilizing computer programs; maintain contacts database; update and maintain calendars and shared calendars for multiple staff members; maintain office records including office procurements and reimbursement procedures; provide support with timekeeping duties; assist with annual reports, PubMed Central submissions and other publication related duties; design and coordinate systems for communications among staff to facilitate the efficient flow of information relating to projects and program activities; maintain branch file systems for correspondence and projects; answer telephone calls, coordinate office supplies, prepare shipments, and obtaining signatures on documents as directed; note commitments made by executive level during meetings and assist with staff implementation; read outgoing correspondence for executive level’s approval and alert writers to any conflict with the file or departure from policies or executive level’s viewpoints; make recommendations to resolve problems that arise; ensure that requests for action or information are relayed to the appropriate staff in the absence of executive level staff and determine when executive level should be notified of important or emergency issues; summarize the content of incoming materials, specially gathered information, or meetings to assist executives, coordinate the new information with background office sources and draw attention to important parts or conflicts; maintain and monitor personal property for assigned areas, maintain records of accountability, maintain property inventory, and assist staff with arranging for disposal of excess property; orient new personnel to the laboratory.
Qualifications:

Required Skills:Bachelor’s degree in a related discipline. Four years of specialized experience plus a High School diploma is equivalent to a BA/BS degree.Minimum of five (5) years of experience in a related field.Expertise in Microsoft Office Suite (MS Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint.Knowledge of NIH procurement, travel and administrative systems.Strong communications skills, both oral and written.Excellent analytical, organizational and time management skills.",11150,Washington
149,"Program Manager II (Evidence Section), Grade 25",Montgomery County Government,"Gaithersburg, MD","$109,761 a year","The Montgomery County Department of Police is recruiting for a Program Manager II in the Evidence Section within the Investigative Services Bureau. This position will be responsible for supporting the Department's mission and values by managing the Evidence unit, including supervising staff, and handling day to day operation and decisions.
Duties include, but are not limited to:
Provide direct oversight to the department's long-term evidence storage. Safeguard and manage evidence in accordance with laws, accreditation, and departmental policy; Assign and evaluate work to include purging, tracking, researching, storing, and maintaining evidence to include planning, organizing, and tracking property for auctions using proper authorization and time frames; and Manage access to the Departments physical evidence system, as well as software permissions.
Handle high value items of evidence to include firearms, weapons, controlled substances, money, and biohazardous materials; Ensure proper handling of currency seized by the department and deposits currently in the department's escrow account when appropriate.
Transport and/or assist in transporting evidence to and from evidence storage locations; Transport and/or assist in transporting high-risk items (firearms, CDS, and money) as needed; and Transport and/or assist in transporting purge items for disposal.
Provide assistance to other County agencies and law enforcement partners as the need arises and completing special projects related to the evidence process.
Testify in court for policies and procedures related to chain-of-custody, storage and security, and the disposition of evidence.
Supervise and/or perform physical inventories of evidence and property at prescribed intervals; Compile periodic statistical reports of section activities and present when requested to do so; Report issues and discrepancies to District/Unit Commanders in policies established for evidentiary procedures at remote locations are not adhered to; and Report annual inspection results to District/Unit Commanders.
Supervise permanent and temporary professional and sworn staff assigned to the Evidence Unit; Implement work schedules, coordiante instruction and attendance, elective training opportunities, evaluate work performance, recommend personnel for awards, and provide counseling/initiating discipline as needed. Coordinate the training of department employees on the proper use of the evidence system, evidence packaging, submission, and procedures and policies to include safe handling of evidence.
Assist in developing protocols to meet accreditation standards for the entire unit.
Update training manuals, directives, and standard operating procedures.
Manage contracts with software vendors and online auction contractors.
Ensure all equipment is properly maintained and functioning.
Forecast future needs for technology, staffing, equipment, and materials.
A successful candidate will be proficient in evidence handling and have considerable experience with Federal, State and local procedures regarding evidence. Candidates must have excellent oral, written, and presentation experience, including the ability to present complex and technical concepts to a general audience, including internal and external agencies. The successful candidate will have experience managing and prioritizing a varied and demanding workload. Experience in the supervision of Unionized employees is a plus.
As a manager/supervisor of unionized employees, this position has a responsibility for fostering a positive labor relations environment based on mutual trust, respect, and cooperation.
Additional Employment Information
OHR reviews the minimum qualifications of all applicants, irrespective of whether the candidate has previously been found to have met the minimum requirements for the job or been temporarily promoted to the same position. This evaluation is based solely on the information contained in the application/resume submitted for this specific position/IRC.
Montgomery County Government is an equal opportunity employer, committed to workforce diversity. Accordingly, as it relates to employment opportunities, the County will provide reasonable accommodations to applicants with disabilities, in accordance with the law. Applicants requiring a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application and hiring process should contact the Office of Human Resources via email to OHR@montgomerycountymd.gov . Individual determinations on requests for reasonable accommodation will be made in accordance with all applicable laws.
Montgomery County Government also provides hiring preference to certain categories of veterans and veterans/persons with a disability. For more information and to claim employment preference, please refer to the Careers webpage on Hiring Preference .
All applicants will respond to a series of questions related to their education, relevant experience, knowledge, skills and abilities required to minimally perform the job. The applicant's responses in conjunction with their resume and all other information provided in the employment application process will be evaluated to determine the minimum qualifications and preferred criteria status. Based on the results, the highest qualified applicants will be placed on an Eligible List and may be considered for an interview. Employees meeting minimum qualifications who are the same grade will be placed on Eligible List as a ""Lateral Transfer"" candidate and may be considered for interview.
If selected for consideration for this position, you may be required to provide evidence that you possess the knowledge, skills, and abilities indicated on your resume.
Minimum Qualifications
Experience: Thorough five (5) years professional experience related to Public Safety/Law Enforcement evidence handling.
Education: Graduating from an accredited college or university with a Bachelor's Degree.
Equivalency: An equivalent combination of education and experience may be substituted.
Preferred Criteria
The applications of those individuals meeting the minimum qualifications will be reviewed to determine the extent, relevancy of training, and experience in the following areas:

Experience supervising professional and/or sworn staff in a union environment.
Experience handling contracts and working with vendors.
Experience handling evidence in a law enforcement agency.
Experience creating and implementing standard operating procedures.
Experience creating inventory reports, inspection reports, statistical reports and presenting findings to various audiences.

Minimum Salary 66164 Maximum Salary 109761 Currency USD",11150,Washington
150,Jr. Project Manager,G2 Global Solutions,"Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)",None,"POSITION: Jr. Project Manager
LOCATION: Washington, D.C.
CLEARANCE: Multiple Positions (Uncleared, Secret, Top Secret)

Overview:
G2 Global Solutions, LLC. is seeking an experienced Jr. Project Manager to support a program with our government customer. The position will be based in Washington, DC. This is a forecasted position and it is contingent upon contract award.
Principle Responsibilities will include, but are not limited to the following:

Assist the Division Director and Deputy Director or their designee(s) in supporting the daily operations of the Division, with an emphasis on: a) meeting project/report deliverable deadlines; b) managing to completion assigned projects; and c) tracking deliverables, action items, and other requests and managing them to close-out
Develop and manage process for providing routine (weekly, monthly, etc.) and ‘one- time’ reports to senior leadership and others
Develop/modify templates
Identify and provide critical target dates to stakeholders
Collect data from multiple sources
Identify and resolve discrepancies between sources and other documents/reports
Prepare draft and final report(s), including formatting and document
Quality/Assurance (QA)/Quality Control (QC) for submission
Organize files, presentations, and other written communications/documents so they are readily accessible to respond to subsequent/future reporting requests
Work daily with Division Director and Deputy Director to identify and respond to requests for new information/reports with rapid turn-around times
Develop and manage tracking sheets for tasks and other activities assigned to the Division Director and Deputy Director, and coordinate completion of the activities
Manage assigned meetings, including drafting agendas, handling logistics (invites, audio/video, etc.), taking meeting notes, and following up on action items to resolution
Review manuscripts, press articles, and other information sources and identify relevant information (generating a technical document/summary from the sources is not required)
Prepare advanced PowerPoint slides for presentations, including generation of figures and tables from data, importing tables, etc.
Utilize advance knowledge of Microsoft PowerPoint and Excel
Knowledge of influenza and/or product development of therapeutics, vaccines or diagnostics would be a plus but is not necessary
Conduct limited domestic travel if necessary
Reviews and analyzes procedures and operating policies to assess their effectiveness
Provides evaluations and written recommendations or effectively manage administrative operations
Study, interpret, develop, and implement new and existing admin directives, write instructions related to personnel matters

Required Skills:
Experience in Project Management
2-4 years work experience as a task leader of project management

Required Education:
Bachelor’s Degree in a relevant field (Management and Business)

About G2 Global Solutions:
G2 Global Solutions, LLC. (G2) is an 8(a) certified Service-Disabled Veteran-Owned, and Economically-Disadvantaged Woman-Owned Small Business. We are an agile and responsive low-risk option for all of our government clients and corporate teaming partners. G2 has a strong reputation of providing highly experienced cleared personnel who support a variety of government agencies within the Intelligence Community (IC). G2 is fully committed, prepared, and ready to provide superior support services designed to consistently outperform and exceed expectations. Some of our services include:

Administrative & Personnel Support
Testing and Evaluating
Strategic Planning
Operational Support
Technology Development
Program and Project Management
Cyber Exploitation
Information Technology
Intelligence & Analysis
Training & Education

G2 Global Solutions, LLC. provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, religious creed, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, pregnancy, childbirth, physical disability, mental disability, age, military status or status as a Vietnam-era or special disabled veteran, marital status, registered domestic partner or civil union status, gender (including sex stereotyping and gender identity or expression), medical condition (including, but not limited to, cancer related or HIV/AIDS related), genetic information, or any other protected classifications in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws. In addition, the Company complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the Company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including, but not limited to, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.",11150,Washington
151,IT Project Manager,ZeniMax Media Inc.,"Rockville, MD 20850",None,"Overview:

ZeniMax Media is seeking an IT Project Manager to join the corporate IT team and help support our global business, including AAA game studios. This role will help manage the workloads of multiple functional teams. The ideal candidate will possess a high level of skill in both communication and planning, coupled with the proven ability to foster cross-team collaboration to establish an environment for the IT team to successfully meet project deadlines.
Responsibilities:
Ensuring customer needs are met in a timely manner, by monitoring tasks, assigning responsibilities, and setting deadlines.
Collaborate with a wide variety of staff to create project schedules, drive milestones, and successfully deploy and operate enterprise IT products.
Develop and refine organization processes to increase production efficiency, work life balance, and quality.
Manage work ingest and planning for IT in partnership with their external stakeholders and customers:
Corporate functions (Finance, Legal, Marketing, Sales etc.)
External software developers
Game Studios
Qualifications:
At least 3 years of project management experience in enterprise IT or live operations.
Passion for an improvement mindset, both at an organization and personal level.
Excellent at receiving and incorporating feedback.
Must thoroughly understand the mechanics behind cross discipline team collaboration and product ownership.
Ability to prioritize development initiatives, balancing both business and qualitative needs.
Ability to create project schedules and milestones, and monitor the progress of department milestones, and individual tasks against those schedules.
Ability to collaboratively create and implement best project management practices and processes regarding the specific needs of the individual teams and projects.
Excellent organizational skills, detail orientated and can multi-task under pressure.
Project management software skills using Jira or other project management software.
Preferred Skills:

Preferred Certifications
Scaled Agile Framework (SAFe)
Agile Alliance
Scrum Alliance
PMP
Applicant Privacy Notice:

CCPA Applicant Privacy Notice",11150,Washington
152,IT Manager,Champions Oncology Inc.,"Rockville, MD 20850",None,"About us
Champions Oncology provides an end-to-end range of oncology research and development solutions and services that improve the productivity of drug development. As a growing Contract Research Organization (CRO), our work environment is fast-paced, challenging and ever adapting to meet the needs and timelines of our pharmaceutical-clients. Our team is passionate and self-motivated working together to accelerate the challenges of oncology drug development and ultimately improve patients’ lives around the world.
Job classification and Location: Full-time (exempt) in Rockville, MD
Job Overview
The IT Manager will work closely with the Engineering Director and other stakeholders to define, develop, and implement practices to drive the adoption of a world-class IT culture at Champions. The IT Manager will also assist with our compliance efforts and be responsible for the day-to-day delivery of IT services at Champions. Additional responsibilities include, but are not limited to;
Oversee day-to-day global IT operations and supervise systems and staff
Work closely with QA to develop IT-related policies and SOPs
Ensure business continuity and security by monitoring systems and services
Lead continuous process improvement
Manage vendor relationships
Provide guidance and training to staff
Qualifications and Skills:
Master’s of Science in Information Technology or related degree desired.
10+ years of IT experience.
3+ years of experience managing IT teams and overseeing IT-related projects
Excellent understanding of IT best practices, computer systems, security, compliance, network and systems administration, data storage systems, and telecommunications
Excellent communication skills
Strong knowledge of project management principles
Experience with SOC 2 or similar compliance
Physical demands and work environment
Must be able to sit and use hands to finger, handle and feel.
Must be able to lift and move packages weighing up to 50 pounds.
Must be able to sit for long periods of time using a computer in a typical office environment in a multi-level facility
Some activities require repetitive motion and reaching, pulling or pushing.
In carrying out the duties of the job there will be frequent exposure to fumes and chemical hazards.
Duties performed routinely require exposure to blood, body fluid and tissue.
This job description may be changed to include new responsibilities and tasks or change existing ones as management deems necessary.
Champions Oncology is an Equal Opportunity/ Affirmative Action Employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",11150,Washington
153,IT Project Manager,Binary Blue,"Rockville, MD",None,"IT Project Manager Share
Job Tracking ID : 513064-760054
Job Level : Management
Level of Education : BA/BS
Job Type : Full-Time/Regular
Date Updated : 02/18/2021
Years of Experience : 5 - 7 Years
Starting Date : 04/01/2021
Job Description

Binary Blue is seeking a Project Manager to support our client’s initiative with Enterprise Permitting Solution, automation, and documentation efforts. Binary Blue team will report directly to the Chief of Information Technology Services.

Responsible for ensuring work performed under Task Order is within scope, consistent with requirements, and delivered on-time and on budget. Identifies critical paths, task, dates, testing and acceptance criteria. Monitor issues and provides resolutions for weekly senior management status reports.

This position also requires the ability to quickly learn new applications, processes, and system-based steps in order to effectively present project dashboards/materials in a clear format according to user role(s). Further, candidate will partner with the Change Manager, Change Management staff and other business partners to develop and facilitate project meetings.

Candidate will be responsible for, but not limited to, the following:

IT Project Management and understanding of business and technical objectives
Manage project scope, creates and implement communication plans
Communicate to client/vendors, stakeholder, system owner and project sponsor
Establishes project plan, creates project charter, work plan, schedule and milestone
You will be working alongside with our client to facilitate knowledge transfer.
Create visually clear and impactful project documentation
Collaborate with functional subject matter experts to design strategic communications, internal marketing, and training materials
Manage stakeholder expectations and encourage positive behaviors in response to operational and organizational change
Manage multiple priorities simultaneously; Deliver high quality, thoughtful Change Management products with little guidance and within short time frames
Assess operational and organizations needs through interviews, surveys, and focus groups to identify gaps and align related strategic initiatives to the County Executives’ objectives and mission
Develop organizational metrics to baseline and measure success over time in conjunction with stakeholders
Establish strong and credible relationship with management and employees to successfully build trust, collaboration and integrity
Demonstrate experience and knowledge of principles, practices, and systems of organizational design, change management, and organizational development
Experience and Skills

At least 5 years of demonstrated project management experience at State or Federal agencies

Ability to work independently and meet deadlines in a fast-paced environment with multiple and changing priorities.
Strong communication skills at all levels of management
Demonstrated consensus/coalition building with stakeholders, management, and employees at all levels in the organization
Experience in developing and designing training curriculum, job aides, training material utilizing multimedia tools such as Adobe Captivate, Camtasia, Word, PowerPoint, and other web-based tools

Additionally, to be successful the candidate(s) will:
Work well in a changing environment and maintain a strong positive perspective
Display a strong organizational commitment and interpersonal skills
Display teamwork within a process driven environment
Back to job search",11150,Washington
154,Project Manager (for Web Development Projects),Taoti,"Washington, DC 20003 (Capitol Hill area)",None,"Taoti Creative is looking for a mid- to senior level, PROJECT MANAGER* to manage web & digital projects.*_(Sorry in advance for the long read. But this is your career we’re talking about here! It’s worth the extra detail, right? The right fit is critical for both of our sakes, so please forgive us in advance for the verbosity.)_*Now, about the job…*Your job, fundamentally, is to be the project leader and use your wits, brains, creativity, innovation, and any resources available to you to produce great projects and happy clients. You’re the project’s champion who makes it happen. Granted, every project has issues. Maybe that new sales guy undersold it. Maybe the dev team spent all their time watching webinars on how to code instead of actually coding. Maybe the client is simply impossible. Whatever the challenges, it’s your job to deal with the curveballs. (Which is not to say that you have to be responsible for fixing all of them. Some things are beyond your control. But as they say: you need the serenity to accept the things you cannot change, the courage to change the things you can, and the wisdom to know the difference.) There is of course all the typical PM stuff… scopes, schedules, budgets, client communications, etc. These are underappreciated, but important parts of the job. But the PM role at Taoti is far more strategic than at most agencies. Our PMs are the project heroes—the people who dig in, call the plays, and then oversee execution. You have a lot of control of the destiny of the project. You have a lot (some would argue too much) autonomy to just figure things out as you see best using our three core principles as your guiding light: Quality, Innovation, Service and Teamwork. You have access to a “QIST Fund” to do stuff that is ‘out of scope’ but helps move the needle for our clients. That is to say, while you do have dedicated designers and strategists on your team, there’s still the smaller, every day decisions that govern how the project go. Those calls are yours to make. And those are critical… like raising a kid, success doesn’t come in big milestone moments with a lot of fanfare. But constant attention, slight corrective actions, and ongoing encouragement—that’s how you succeed.*Note: * this role is for a full time position, but we are happy to consider applicants anywhere in the United States.*The challenges of this role…*Taoti puts out creative work that can go head to head with the biggest and best creative agencies in the world. But we’re doing so with a ~70 person team. So we need to be lean, efficient, and leverage our inner scrappiness to get the job done with fewer resources than what some of the big boys would throw at a project. So that often means wearing multiple hats and pitching in with production resources like UX, creative, IA, devs, etc. We’re not saying you have to be creating designs or banging out code. But you will have a lot of direct exposure to a lot of that stuff, and you’ll learn a lot about those trades—to the point where you can start thinking like some of them. And that’s a good thing.*Is there room for career growth?*That’s one of the best parts about this role, specifically at Taoti. In a larger shop, the project management hierarchy is usually large, layered, and not-so-flexible. Or at a smaller shop, you may have lots of flexibility, but not enough of a team to really benefit from true collaboration. Taoti is the Goldilocks of creative agencies. We have enough structure so that you understand what the team looks like and where you fit in. But we’re small and agile enough to let employees carve out new roles and niches where it makes sense to do so. Our teams and roles are constantly evolving as the team grows, so if you want to grow into a role that doesn’t exist, you can help create it! Our growth rate alone (targeted at 50% this year) means that the team will keep growing, which means we’ll be hiring additional people across all departments. And our hiring philosophy is all about hiring the next wave of employees that best supports the existing team. In other words, we grow the team around what we already have—not according to some org chart or spreadsheet. So career paths are not rigid and finite. We have a history of shaking things up, making rather bold HR moves, and adapting our hiring processes (as well as the roles of our existing employees) in a way that makes strategic sense for the employee and the company. For example, our VP of sales is now in charge of delivery. A previous creative director ended up mostly in sales. And we’ve created all sorts of new roles for new hires for positions that didn’t exist before, in some cases, creating whole new realms within our team structure. The point is that we’re committed to doing whatever makes the most sense and are agile enough to get away with it. So your career trajectory has far more to do with your own aptitude and initiative than it does with an org chart or who’s above you.*Tips for getting onto the short list…*Stand out. When you apply, make an impression.Even though we’re a full service agency, we do more than our fair share of web development. So experience with Drupal and/or Wordpress is a HUGE plus. If you’ve got it, tell us about it!Show—don’t tell—us how great you are.We can tell a lot by the documents someone creates. Doesn’t matter what it is, but we’d love to see some documents you’ve put together.Talk to us about your favorite tools.Give us some insight into your general PM philosophies.Tell us why you want to work at Taoti, specifically. And what was wrong with your last gig that makes you want to leave?Show us your passion and energy. We like passion and energy.First, a quick blurb about Taoti…Established in 1996, Taoti Creative is a boutique, full-service creative agency located on Capitol Hill in Washington, DC. We are privately owned and have no corporate overloads (nothing personal, WPP.) We do stuff like web development, social media management, branding, experiential marketing, video, AR/VR, etc. Our mission is to ‘move the needle’ for our clients. We leverage technology, creativity, and innovation to generate meaningful and measurable results for our clients—that’s what drives us. Speaking of clients, they’re about 60% non-profits, 20% commercial, and 20% federal government. Some of our customers include World Bank, USAID, DC Water, Discovery Education, American Chemical Society, Jane Goodall Foundation, and dozens of ‘National Association of _____________,’ etc. Our full time team of about 75 employees is about 65% in-house and 35% remote. We hail from over 15 countries. And for the last four years in a row, we’ve made the Inc5000 list of fastest growing companies in the United States. There’s of course plenty of additional information on our website. If you’ve not done so already, be sure to check out our culture video: https://vimeo.com/289302105. Or if you’re feeling virtual, here’s guided tour of the office in 360 video! https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=x7KkzdmSGTM (Warning: not suitable for printers.)*What’s the corporate culture like?*“Fun but focused,” as one Taoti put it, is a great way to sum up our culture. We’re a fun and casual shop. The kind of place where you can wear whatever, come and go as you please, and have autonomy over your own day for the most part. But we take the work seriously and believe deep in the mission to make meaningful and measurable impacts for our clients. All the perks and shenanigans and borderline irreverent tone are fun, but to really fit in here, you need to be about the work.We believe in something we call our “QIST Culture.” Quality. Innovation. Service. And Teamwork. We are always striving to improve these four areas (to the extent that we have a fund of a quarter million dollars per year that anyone can spend from in the interest of going above and beyond towards any of these four values.We also believe in total transparency and open communication across teams and across ranks. Instead of chain-of-command, we want everyone to have and share their own voice. Every other Thursday, the CEO holds ‘CafeClutch’ just so he can hear ideas and feedback directly from the team instead of through the filter of management.Want to see what life at Taoti looks like? Check out our Instagram or ‘about us’ video. There’s even a 360 tour of the office.*What about benefits?*(Some of these may vary based on location and working status.)3 weeks PTO for starters. You gain more with tenure. And if you’re really big in to PTO, you can even trade back some salary for more.Telework options (which work like PTO… you accrue days with each paycheck. TELE days increase with tenure as well. By your fourth year, we don’t even count them any more.)100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision insurance. (50% for qualifying dependents.) And we have good insurance.Paid family leave for men and women (including PTO plus short and long term disability options.)3% retirement plan matching (plus access to a financial adviser).Home buyer help (including a $1200 closing credit)Mobile phone reimbursementYou can opt for a company-supplied PC or Mac laptop. Or if you want to use your own, we’ll reimburse you for it.Charitable contribution matchingTax-free metro benefitsA sincere respect for work/life balanceMoney and time off allocated for professional development (also increases with tenure)A diverse team hailing from over 15 countries last time we checkedA very hip/cool/funky/quirky office space on Barracks Row, in the heart of Capitol Hill. Just 2 blocks from the metro! (With the office space doubling in size next year as we build a new building in the parking lot next door to our building.)Fun perks like a roof deck, wine/beer always on tap, regular company boat outings (boat is walking distance from the office), chill work environment, etc.No real dress code (within reason, as long as you can be an adult about getting dressed for work)Annual global retreat (where we bring the whole team together for fun, games, and teamwork)Of course, the above is a quick list. Our handbook covers all the gory details.*Next steps…*If you’re qualified and interested, please apply on our website (https://www.taoti.com/careers.) Please note that these job ads often get placed onto other websites with their own application systems (we’re looking at you Jooble!) and some sites (looking at you Indeed!) have made up random salary ranges. We aren't able to respond to applications that don’t come through our own website (Because we use software to manage our hiring process, and without it, it would be the wild west here. So please be sure you’re applying on our website.)*Equal Opportunity Employer*Great ideas happen when diverse perspectives come together. Those perspectives are Taoti’s secret sauce. So building a diverse team and culture where everyone has a voice and is included in the process is not just the right thing to do. It’s good for business. We’d love your own perspective to add to our mix! We're eager for new, diverse voices to join the team and sincerely hope people from every walk of life will apply!*_Pretty please, no recruiters._*Job Type: Full-time",11150,Washington
155,Project Manager,Barrow Wise Consulting,"Washington, DC 20405 (Downtown area)","$90,000 - $145,000 a year","Barrow Wise Consulting, LLC is a leading management and information technology consulting firm. We provide our clients with innovative solutions to exceed their expectations. We deliver our services with the highest caliber talent the US has to offer. Join Barrow Wise Consulting, LLC, for a rewarding career.
Responsibilities
The Project Manager will support Barrow Wise's GSA Program in the following areas:
Serve as the contractor's single contract manager, and shall be the contractor's authorized interface with the CO and the COR
Responsible for formulating and enforcing work standards, assigning contractor schedules, reviewing work discrepancies, supervising personnel and communicating policies, purposes, and goals of the organization to subordinates
Responsible for the oversight of the entire project interfacing with the customer along with the project manager in some cases
Display knowledge of all aspects of the project, including cloud services and cybersecurity requirements
Develop project from inception to deployment
Provide expertise in the management and control of funds and resources using complex reporting mechanisms, and demonstrated capability in managing multi-task contracts and/or subcontracts of various types and complexity
General experience in information systems design and/or management
Develop and manage the PMP
Manage and motivate the team
Provide necessary approvals
Develop project reports
Enforce Quality Management System and company proprietary methodologies.
Identify efficiencies and innovative approaches
An Ideal Candidate has:
Master's Degree in business or IT related field; PMP Required
20 years of related experience
Ability to present problem-solving strategies
Effective communication skills, customer service skills, and ability to build effective work relationships
Ability to independently perform multiple tasks with dynamic priorities
US Citizen
Job Type: Full-time
Applicants selected for employment will be subject to a Federal background investigation.
Barrow Wise Consulting, LLC offers an ethical, creative, challenging, diverse, and rewarding experience. Join us and become part of an enthusiastic, responsible team that delivers innovative solutions to our clients. We provide competitive compensation packages, attractive benefits, and great careers. Barrow Wise is an equal opportunity, drug-free employer committed to diversity in the workplace. Minority/Female/Disabled/Protected Veteran/LBGT.
Our employees stand behind Barrow Wise's core values of integrity, quality, innovation, and collaboration. We are confident that Barrow Wise's core values, business model, and team focus create positive career paths for our employees. Barrow Wise's will continue to lead the industry in delivering new solutions to clients, and persevere until the client is overjoyed.",11150,Washington
156,IT Cybersecurity Specialist (INFOSEC),US Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agenc...,"Arlington, VA","$103,690 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
This announcement is issued under the Direct Hire Authority (DHA) to recruit for positions for which there is a critical hiring need. Selectee(s) will receive a career or career-conditional appointment in the competitive service and may be required to serve a one year probationary period.

Who May be Considered:

U.S. Citizens
View common definitions of terms found in this announcement.

Responsibilities
Joining CISA means being part of the team focused on securing the Nation's physical and cyber infrastructure against threats to public health and safety, economy, and national security; we Defend Today, Secure Tomorrow. Within CISA, the Cybersecurity Division leads cybersecurity efforts for CISA as the Nation's flagship civilian cyber defense organization. The division collaborates with partners across the government and private sector to enhance the Nation's cybersecurity by sharing information, providing cybersecurity services and technical assistance, as well as education and awareness efforts.

Visit www.cisa.gov to learn more about CISA and how you can be part of the team to Defend Today; Secure Tomorrow.

In this position, you will serve as an IT Cybersecurity Specialist (INFOSEC). Typical work assignments include:

Identify and evaluate threat critical capabilities, requirements, and vulnerabilities.
Produce timely, fused, all-source cyber operations intelligence and/or indications and warnings intelligence products(e.g. threat assessments, briefings, intelligence studies, country studies).
Contribute to crisis action planning for cyber operations with other team members.
Perform complex event correlation using information gathered from a variety of sources within the enterprise to gain situational awareness and determine the effectiveness of an observed attack.

Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel 1-5 nights per quarter for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a U.S. citizen to apply for this position.
You must successfully pass a background investigation.
Selective Service registration required.
You must be able to obtain and hold a Top Secret/ Sensitive Compartmented Information security clearance.
New employees must serve a one year probationary period.
You must submit to a drug test and receive a negative test result prior to appointment to this position. After appointment, you may be subject to periodic random drug testing.
Relocation expenses are not authorized. Other recruitment incentives may be authorized.
This position has been designated excluded from bargaining unit representation under the national security provision of 5 U.S.C. § 7112(B)(6).
All employees are required to participate in Direct Deposit/ Electronic Funds Transfer for salary payments.
Applying to this announcement certifies that you give permission for DHS to share your application with others in DHS for similar positions.
This position may be designated as essential personnel. Essential personnel must be able to serve during continuity of operation events without regard to declarations of liberal leave or government closures due to weather, protests, and acts of terrorism or lack of funding. Failure to report for or remain in this position may result in disciplinary or adverse action in accordance with applicable laws, rules, and regulations (5 U.S.C. § 7501-7533 and 5 CFR Part 752, as applicable).
Any offers of employment made pursuant to this announcement will be consistent with all applicable authorities, including Presidential Memoranda, Executive Orders, interpretive U.S. Office of Management and Budget (OMB) and U.S. Office of Personnel Management (OPM) guidance, and Office of Management and Budget plans and policies concerning hiring. These authorities are subject to change.
More than one selection may be made from this announcement.
Appointments are subject to the availability of funds.

Qualifications
You qualify for the GS-13 grade level (starting salary $103,690.00) if you possess information technology related experience demonstrating each of the four required competencies:
Attention to Detail: Monitoring all phases of IT systems security to ensure compliance of security measures.
Customer Service: Evaluating cybersecurity system requirements to meet stakeholder needs.
Oral Communication: Providing advice to IT stakeholders on IT projects and/or programs.
Problem Solving: Identifying and recommending solutions to fix cybersecurity problem areas.
In addition to the above requirement you must have at least one year of specialized experience at the GS-12 grade level performing the following duties:
Developing and implementing systems security contingency plans to address and minimize information systems vulnerabilities;
Analyzing possible cybersecurity risks in order to recommend solutions and system updates;
Providing technical support to enterprise-wide cyber defense technicians to resolve cyber incidents; and
Collaborating with internal and external analysts to ensure IT systems are in compliance with security policies and directives.
National Service Experience (i.e., volunteer experience): Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

Current or Former Political Appointees: The Office of Personnel Management (OPM) must authorize employment offers made to current or former political appointees. If you are currently, or have been within the last 5 years, a political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee in the Executive Branch, you must disclose this information to the Human Resources Office.

Qualifications Must Be Met

The qualification requirements listed above must be met by the closing date of this announcement.
Education
Not applicable.
Additional information
Any offers of employment made pursuant to this announcement will be consistent with all applicable authorities, including Presidential Memoranda, Executive Orders, interpretive U.S. Office of Management and Budget (OMB) and U.S. Office of Personnel Management (OPM) guidance, and Office of Management and Budget plans and policies concerning hiring. These authorities are subject to change.

More than one selection may be made from this announcement.

Appointments are subject to the availability of funds.
DHS offers competitive salaries and an attractive benefits package, including: health, dental, vision, life, and long-term care insurance; retirement plan; Thrift Savings Plan [similar to a 401(k)]; Flexible Spending Account; Employee Assistance Program; personal leave days; and paid federal holidays. Other benefits may include: flexible work schedules; telework; tuition reimbursement; transportation subsidies; uniform allowance; health and wellness programs; and fitness centers. DHS is committed to employee development and offers a variety of employee training and developmental opportunities. For more information, go to the DHS Careers website and select Benefits. Disabled veteran leave will be available to any Federal employee hired on or after November 5, 2016, who is a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 30 percent or more.

If you receive a conditional offer of employment for this position, you will be required to complete an Optional Form 306, Declaration for Federal Employment, and to sign and certify the accuracy of all information in your application, prior to entry on duty. False statements on any part of the application may result in withdrawal of offer of employment, dismissal after beginning work, fine, or imprisonment.

E-Verify
DHS uses E-Verify, an Internet-based system, to confirm the eligibility of all newly hired employees to work in the United States. Learn more about E-Verify, including your rights and responsibilities.

If you are unable to apply online or need to fax a document you do not have in electronic form, view the following link for information regarding an Alternate Application.

You are encouraged to apply online. If you are unable to apply online, please use the Alternate Application link listed in the Other Information section of this vacancy announcement. Applicants are strongly encouraged to apply online if at all possible. Applying online, through your USAJOBS account, will expedite the application process and allow you to check your application status as well as verify the documentation submitted with your application. If you utilize the Alternate Application method, your USAJOBS account will not display this application and you will not receive status updates.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Under the provisions of the Direct-Hire Authority, veterans' preference does not apply.

We will review your resume and supporting documentation to ensure you meet the minimum qualification requirements. If you meet the minimum qualifications, we will use a job questionnaire to further evaluate your experience, education, and training. The competencies or knowledge, skills, and abilities needed to perform this job are:


If you are determined qualified, you may be referred to the hiring manager for consideration and may be called for an interview. Preview the Assessment Questionnaire, click https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11093429.

Interagency/Career Transition Assistance Program (I/CTAP) Eligibles: If you have never worked for the federal government, you are not I/CTAP eligible. View information about I/CTAP eligibility on OPM's Career Transition Resources website. To be considered well qualified under I/CTAP, you must be rated at a minimum score of 85 for this position. In addition, you must submit the supporting documents listed under the required documents section of this announcement.

Interview Requirement: Interviews may be required for this position. Failure to complete the interview may result in removal from further consideration. The interview process may consist of a in-person or phone panel interview.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Sensitive Compartmented Information
Drug test required
Yes
Position sensitivity and risk
Special-Sensitive (SS)/High Risk
Trust determination process
Credentialing, Suitability/Fitness, National security
Required Documents

Required Documents
To apply for this position, you must submit a complete Application Package which includes:

Your resume showing work schedule, hours worked per week, dates of employment and duties performed
Your responses to the job questionnaire
Other supporting documents:
Cover Letter, optional
Are you claiming special priority selection rights under the Interagency/Career Transition Assistance Program (I/CTAP)? Submit:
a copy of your agency notice,
a copy of your most recent performance rating, and
a copy of your most recent SF-50, Notification of Personnel Action, noting your current position, grade level, and duty location.

Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
All U.S. Citizens",11150,Washington
157,IT Program Manager,QVine Corporation,"Herndon, VA",None,"Perform day-to-day management of the program, and develop long-term and strategic objectives to ensure customer requirements are satisfied. Perform horizontal integration planning, and interface with other functional areas, ensure that technical solutions and schedules are implemented in a timely manner.
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES:
Direct daily operations of department, including analyzing workflows, establishing priorities, developing standards and setting deadlines.
Assign and review the work of all computer-related team members.

Ensure that all tasks are completed on schedule, customer tasking guidance is clear and unambiguous, contract personnel are qualified to perform the tasks, and potential personnel problems are prevented.

Review and approve all systems charts and programs prior to their execution.

Analyze computer and information needs of customer organizations, including operational and strategic perspectives. Define immediate and long-term personnel and equipment requirements.

Coordinate problem resolution with various task managers, coordinate schedules, new resource requirements, training needs, and task clarification.

Develop computer information resources, providing for data security and control, strategic computing, and disaster recovery.

Plan and coordinate activities such as installation and upgrading of hardware and software, programming and systems design, development of computer networks, and implementation of Internet and intranet sites.

Establish and apply streamlined processes and procedures that enable team to rapidly respond to surge requirements for increased contract personnel. Assure SLA requirements are met.

Possess knowledge of business and management principles involved in strategic planning, resource allocation, human resources modeling, leadership technique, production methods, and coordination of people and resources, economic and accounting principles and practices and the financial market.
QVine corporation is an Equal Opportunity Employer— M/R/D/V",11150,Washington
158,IT Project Manager,Chenega Corporation,"Washington, DC 20319 (Southwest Waterfront area)",None,"Overview:

Come join a company that strives for Extraordinary People and Exceptional Performance! Chenega Professional & Technical Services, LLC, a Chenega Professional Services’ company, is seeking an IT Project Manager to support the U.S. Army Center of Military History (CMH) in the areas of Information Technology (IT) and Knowledge Management (KM). The IT Project Manager, under general supervision by the program manager, is responsible for all aspects of the development and implementation of assigned projects and provides a single POC for those projects.
Our company offers employees the opportunity to join a team where there is a robust employee benefits program, management engagement, quality leadership, an atmosphere of teamwork, recognition for performance, and promotion opportunities.
We actively strive to channel our highly engaged employee’s knowledge, critical thinking, and determination to innovate scalable solutions for our clients.
Responsibilities:

What you'll be doing:
Takes projects from original concept through final implementation.
Interfaces with all areas affected by the project including end users, computer services, and client services.
Defines project scope and objectives.
Develops detailed work plans, schedules, project estimates, resource plans, and status reports. Conducts project meetings and is responsible for project tracking and analysis.
Ensures adherence to quality standards and reviews project deliverables.
Manages the integration of vendor tasks and tracks and reviews vendor deliverables.
Provides technical and analytical guidance to project team.
Recommends and takes action to direct the analysis and solutions of problems.
Supports the following projects/initiatives:
Army Historical Resources Online (AHRO) Unclassified; Development of an unclassified historical data repository. This repository shall be an open-source, Apache Lucene/Solaris software search application with a Government furnished user interface product.
Army Historical Resources Online (AHRO) Classified; Maintenance and enhancement of the developed Classified War Repository. This is an open-source, industry standard software search application with a Government-furnished user interface product.
Army.Mil (CMH Public Facing Website) and Social Media Platforms; Document, implement, maintain, and integrate the Government selected/provided test information or content to History.Army.Mil (CMH Public Facing Website) and Social Media Platforms
Army Museum Information Systems (AMIS) / Museum Support; Review of requirements and development of updates and enhancements for the Army Museum Information Systems (AMIS) / Museum Support
CMH Intranet Development (SharePoint); Review of requirements and development of updates and enhancements for the CMH SharePoint Site.
Maintaining of all software to meet accreditation requirements of the RMF IAW DoDI 8510.01.
Automation of the processes of maintaining Army records pertaining to force structure and lineage based on an initial assessment
Qualifications:

What is required:
Possess and maintain an active Project Management Professional (PMP) commercial certification.
Possess one of the following:
Bachelor's Degree or an equivalent combination of education and five years’ experience in IT Project Management, OR
Ten or more years of experience leading and overseeing IT projects or deliverable lifecycles
Have the ability to plan, estimate, propose, execute, staff, budget, and close out IT projects.
Be able to handle multiple tasks and projects concurrently.
Have strong communications skills in oral presentations and written documents.
Have problem solving skills in personal management, project management, and providing deliverables. Good organizational skills.
Possess the ability to work project team member or a project lead as required
Have proficiency in IT project planning and monitoring progress of IT projects.
Have proven ability to meet IT project deadlines and work effectively within time

Have the experience with a variety of writing types: proposals, PowerPoint presentations, manuals, job performance aids, photos, posters, project status report, etc.
Have the experience with graphics programs such as Adobe Photoshop and Illustrator, SnagIt and similar programs.
Be proficient in Microsoft Office and Adobe Acrobat.
Have the ability to design templates and customize styles.
Be familiar with Desktop Publishing and DoD publications, XML, HTML and ArborText.
Have expert knowledge of IT Systems and understanding of Networking and Computer Information Systems.
Demonstrate ability to manage multiple diverse IT projects across multiple IT disciplines as well as IT plans and policy experience. Ability to manage and track IT projects across multiple directorates and organizations is required.
Demonstrate knowledge and experience with IT concepts and Army IT procurement process sufficient to interpret IT-related Enterprise Service Agreements (ESAs), Joint/Enterprise.
License Agreements (J/ELAs), Service Level Agreements (SLAs), Memorandums of Understanding (MOUs), etc. in support of the CMH mission IAW applicable regulations and terms and conditions of agreements.
Prepare, execute and monitor the project within the budget policies and procedures.
Be physically located onsite at Fort McNair.
SECRET clearance.",11150,Washington
159,Treasury Recent Graduates Program (Management Analyst),US Internal Revenue Service,"Washington, DC","$60,129 - $78,167 a year","Duties
Summary
WHAT IS THE OFFICE OF CHIEF COUNSEL, IRS? The mission of the Office of Chief Counsel is to serve America's taxpayers fairly and with integrity by providing correct and impartial interpretation of the internal revenue laws and the highest quality legal advice and representation for the Internal Revenue Service. We are looking for individuals with an interest and education or background in administration to work in a fast-paced, public sector environment.

Responsibilities
WHAT DOES A MANAGMENT ANALYST DO? The Associate Chief Counsel (Finance & Management) supports the administrative, financial, and managerial programs of the Office of Chief Counsel and provides advice to the Chief Counsel and Deputy Chief Counsel on all management matters for the organization nationwide. F&M also has field responsibility for all administrative functions and personnel across the country.As a Management Analyst, you will perform a variety of analytical, advisory, and other administrative functions related to the management of the Office.

WHAT IS THE PATHWAYS PROGRAM? The Treasury's Recent Graduates Program affords developmental experiences in the Federal Government intended to promote possible careers in the civil service to individuals who have recently graduated from qualifying educational institutions or programs. Successful applicants are placed in a dynamic, developmental program with the potential to lead to a civil service career in the Federal Government.

Following the completion of program requirements, selectees may be considered for non-competitive conversion to a career-conditional or term appointment. All conversion requirements will be identified in the Participant Agreement. Program requirements include but are not limited to:

Successful completion of at least 1-year of continuous service;
Completion of at least 40 hours of interactive training;
Demonstration of successful job performance; and
Meet the qualification standards for the position to which the Recent Graduate may be converted.

WHERE CAN I FIND OUT MORE ABOUT THE PATHWAYS PROGRAM?
For additional information regarding the Pathways Program, please refer to the following website: www.usajobs.gov/StudentsAndGrads

A degree in Business Administration, Economics, Management, Public Administration, Public Affairs, Public Policy or related fields is desirable

The following are the duties of this position at the GS-09. You will have the opportunity to learn to perform these duties and will receive training to help you grow in this developmental position.

Participates in the planning and conducting of studies of various aspects of Counsel’s administrative processes and procedures. Reviews and summarizes information from a variety of sources. Identifies and analyzes relevant factsto develop recommendations
Modifies and manages databases containing statistical information and develops spreadsheets and reports.
Assists higher level analysts conducting studies related to Performance Reporting, Statistical Analysis, and Business Process Reengineering.
Works with other management analysts to administer in-house and IRS-wide employee satisfaction surveys. Analyzes data and creates reports related to these surveys.
Gathers data from different sources, analyzes and generates ad hoc and recurring reports. Reviews and analyzes generated reports used to recommend methods to improve the efficiency of administrative work processes and procedures.
Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13
Job family (Series)
0343 Management And Program Analysis
Similar jobs
Analysts, Business Management
Analysts, Management
Analysts, Program
Business Management Analysts
Management Analysts
Program Analysts
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Please refer to ""Conditions of Employment.""
Click ""Print Preview"" to review the entire announcement before applying.
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement.

To be eligible for the Recent Graduates Program, applicants must have, within the previous 2 years*, completed all educational requirements for a qualifying associates, bachelors, masters, professional, doctorate, vocational or technical degree or certificate from a qualifying institution. For more information on education requirements go to Treasury’s Pathways Program.

Veterans who, due to a military service obligation, were precluded from applying to a Recent Graduates Program during any portion of the 2 year eligibility period may have their eligibility period extended so that they receive the full 2 years of eligibility. The remaining 2-year eligibility period will begin upon his or her release or discharge from active duty. The veteran's eligibility period may not extend beyond 6 years from the date of completion of all requirements of an academic course of study.
Qualifications

To qualify for the grade 09 level, you must meet the following requirements:

A. Education: In the Recent Graduates Program you may qualify based solely on education as follows: Master's or equivalent graduate degree or 2 full years of progressively higher level graduate education leading to such a degree or LL.B or J.D., if related. OR

B. Experience: You may qualify with one year of specialized experience at a level of difficulty and responsibility equivalent to the GS-07 level in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position includes: Assisting in research and investigations of new and improved business and management practices; assisting in development of management and program evaluation plans, procedures, and methodology; or assisting in management surveys to determine compliance with regulations, procedures, sound management practices and effective utilization of staff. This level of work typically involves following established methods and procedures or detailed instructions; using some judgment in applying analytical techniques; solving minor problems and making routine decisions. OR

C. You may qualify by a combination of experience and education as long as the computed percentage of the requirements is at least 100%. To compute the percentage of the requirements, divide your total months of experience by 12. Then divide the total number of completed graduate semester hours (or equivalent) beyond the first year (total graduate semester hours minus 18) by 18. Add the two percentages.

The experience may have been gained in either the public or private sector. One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis. To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/day/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week on your résumé.
Education
The education generally must be from an accredited (or pre-accredited) college or university recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Additional information
We may select from this announcement or any other source to fill one or more vacancies.
Relocation expenses will not be paid.
This is a non-bargaining unit position.
Position may be converted to a permanent or term position.
If you are a U.S. National, answer YES to the question, Are you a U.S. Citizen?
We offer opportunities for telework.
We offer opportunities for flexible work schedules.

CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT:

All selectees must sign a Pathways Participant Agreement.
Subject to a 1-year trial period is required (unless already completed).
Must successfully complete a background investigation.
Complete a Declaration for Federal Employment to determine your suitability for Federal employment, at the time requested by the agency
If you are a male applicant born after December 31, 1959, certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System or are exempt from having to do so.
Have your salary sent to a financial institution of your choice by Direct Deposit/Electronic Funds Transfer.
Go through a Personal Identity Verification (PIV) process that requires two forms of identification from the Form I-9. Federal law requires verification of the identity and employment eligibility of all new hires in the U.S.
Undergo an income tax verification.
The employment of any candidate, including a current employee or a new hire, selected for this position may be conditional upon classification and/or audit of federal tax returns. This audit may include up to 2 years of returns.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Your application includes your résumé, responses to the online questions, and required supporting documents. Please be sure that your résumé includes detailed information to support your qualifications for this position; failure to provide sufficient evidence in your resume may result in a “not qualified” determination.

Rating: Your application will be evaluated in the following areas: 1) Knowledge of commercial office software for uses such as presentation, publishing, project management, and research and analysis; 2) Skill in oral and written communication sufficient to present papers and reports, to organize and deliver briefings to managers to encourage understanding and acceptance of findings and recommendations; and 3) Skill in the gathering, assembling and analyzing data and developing recommendations and solutions. Category-like rating (Quality Group) will be used to rank and select eligible candidates. If qualified, you will be assigned to one of three quality level categories, Category A, Category B, Category Cdepending on your responses to the online questions, regarding your experience, education, and training related to this position. Your rating may be lowered if your responses to the online questions are not supported by the education and/or experience described in your application.

Veterans' preference is applied after applicants are assessed. Preference-eligibles will be listed at the top of their assigned category and considered before non-preference-eligibles in that category. Qualified preference-eligibles with a compensable service-connected disability of 10% or more will be listed at the top of the highest category.

Referral: If you are among the top qualified candidates, your application may be referred to a selecting official for consideration.

If you are a displaced or surplus Federal employee (eligible for the Career Transition Assistance Plan (CTAP)/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Plan (ICTAP)), you must be rated as “well qualified"" to receive special selection priority.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
A complete application includes 1. A resume; 2. Vacancy question responses; 3.Transcripts; and 4. Submission of any required documents. Please note that if you do not provide all required information, as specified in this announcement, you may not be considered for this position (or may not receive the special consideration for which you may be eligible).

All applicants are required to submit a resume either by creating one in USAJOBS or uploading one of their own choosing. (Cover letters are optional.) To receive full credit for relevant experience, please list the month/year and number of hours worked for experience listed on your resume. We suggest that you preview the online questions, as you may need to customize your resume to ensure that it supports your responses to these questions. Please view resume tips.

EDUCATION DOCUMENTATION

You must submit dated documentation showing completion of all educational requirements (e.g. letter from the registrar, unofficial transcripts). An official transcript will be required if you are selected.

A college or university degree generally must be from an accredited (or pre-accredited) college or university recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. For a list of schools which meet these criteria, please refer to Department of Education Accreditation page.

If you are qualifying based on foreign education, you must submit proof of creditability of education as evaluated by a credentialing agency. Refer to the OPM instructions.

If you are qualifying based on a certificate program, please refer to the Treasury’s Pathways Program page for more information on qualifying certificate programs.

VETERANS' PREFERENCE DOCUMENTATION

If you are claiming veterans’ preference, you must submit a copy of your DD-214 (Member 4 copy), or other official documentation from a branch of the Armed Forces or the Department of Veterans Affairs showing dates of service and type of discharge. Ten-point preference eligibles must also submit an Application for 10-point Veteran Preference, SF-15, along with the required documentation listed on the back of the SF-15 form. For more information on veterans' preference view FedsHireVets.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Our comprehensive benefits are very generous. Our benefits package includes:

Challenging work, opportunities for advancement, competitive salaries, bonuses, and incentive awards.
For full-time employees - ten paid holidays, 13 days of sick leave, and 13 to 26 days of vacation time each year.
Access to insurance programs that may be continued after you retire.
A wide choice of health insurance plans, coverage for pre-existing conditions, and no waiting periods. We pay a substantial amount (up to 75%) of health insurance premiums.
A retirement program which includes employer-matching contributions.

Learn more about Federal benefits programs at: https://help.usajobs.gov/index.php/Pay_and_Benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Recent graduates
Individuals who have graduated from an accredited educational institute or certificate program within the last 2 years or 6 years for Veterans.
Clarification from the agency
Open to U.S. Citizens or U.S. Nationals who are: 1) Recent Graduates and have completed a degree or certificate from a qualifying education institution within the previous two years. Veterans unable to apply within two years of receiving their degree due to military service obligation have a full two-year eligibility period upon release or discharge from active duty. The eligibility period for veterans must be within six years of degree completion; OR 2) CTAP Eligibles.",11150,Washington
160,IT Strategic Business Partner,PCAOB,"Washington, DC 20006 (Downtown area)",None,"It's rewarding to work for a mission-driven organization! Join us at the forefront of investor protection.PCAOB is seeking a customer-centric, strategic Business Partner within the office of Data, Security and Technology. The individual in this role will work in a collaborative team and report to the Deputy Director, Business Engagement.The IT Business Partner is the voice of the data and the one who connects the dots between business needs and data, security and technology capabilities. In this strategic role, you will create a culture of robust collaboration and innovation as you bring technology groups and business partners into alignment with enterprise business objectives, approaches, and solutions.As a tech-savvy solution advocate, you understand the data of the business and the systems through which the data flows, and you see how new technology can open doors for the business. At the same time, you have a deep business process knowledge that drives an understanding of the business' true needs. You are prepared to provide the right mix of relationship building, informing solution design, and facilitating capability enablement to drive successful operations.The Key building blocks in this role are relationship building, product management, communication, collaboration and portfolio management.Relationship BuildingDevelops and maintains a strong understanding of the overall PCAOB operations and assigned Division’s business;Advocates for useful software solutions & trusted data across PCAOB Offices and Divisions;Identifies opportunities to solve business problems through business process improvements as well as data and technology solutions;Iteratively shapes conversations to disambiguate business challenges and define the scope of engagements between business and technology;Connects the dots between business problem(s), data improvements and technological solutions;Collaborates with the broader ODST project (e.g., Customer Success, PMO, etc.), data, security and technology team(s) to gather information for business engagements and support solution prototyping; andCreates opportunities to engage the business stakeholders’ in the solution discovery and analysis processes.Product Management / Capability EnablementIdentifies opportunities to shape capability roadmap priorities and drives alignment of work product(s) to business’ present and future needs;Knowledgeable and remains aware of ODST’s current capabilities, associated reference architecture of assigned supported domains and technical roadmaps in an effort to align all requests to the current strategic direction, driving towards an approach that supports incremental maturity of solution delivery; andVets vendor products per business requirements.CommunicationFacilitates ongoing communication between the business, data, security and technology teams to groom and prioritize the backlog (i.e., co-owns the portfolio with the business and ensures its interests are represented within data, security and technology);Updates stakeholders as portfolio requests move through the project life cycle; andDevelops and leverages business engagement informational materials to promote and standardize business engagement service offerings.CollaborationCultivates successful relationships between the business and data, security and technology partners to gain strategic and mission alignment between operational and technological goals;Collaborates with other Business Partners to share knowledge, best practices and relevant business activities;Partners with business analysts to define new capabilities; andCoordinates with Agile PMO Teams and participates in agile events - sprint planning, reviews, and retrospectives; to ensure consistent and timely solution delivery.Portfolio Planning / Management Enables the discovery process for business initiatives; i.e. gathers high-level requirements and facilitates large group/cross-functional sessions with partners;Advocates for true business needs; serves a trusted advisor and strategic partner to the Business;Facilitates solution design planning and discussions and ensures vetted reference architecture mapping;Defines, prioritizes, and manages program and project initiatives, based on business partnership and in support of IT governance;Helps develop key metrics to track initiatives and performance assurance;Identifies opportunities for continuous improvement, such as refining Service Level Agreements (SLAs) based on business needs, throughout the project lifecycle; andIncorporates change management activities in business partner discussions, to include providing support to defined activities, for major initiatives.Qualified candidates should have 7 plus years IT and business experience, ideally in a program or product manager role, you are a strong communicator, a strategic and innovative leader and bring experience cultivating relationships and are customer focused. Experience in a business development or client management environment understanding and managing complex and diverse teams is required.Candidates must be eligible to work in the US without sponsorship now or in the future.Job Type: Full-timePay: From $1.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee assistance programFlexible scheduleFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offParental leaveProfessional development assistanceReferral programTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayExperience:program or project management: 7 years (Required)project management: 5 years (Preferred)client driven/consulting environment: 5 years (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",11150,Washington
161,Estimating Manager,Residental and Commerical Contracting Company,"Washington, DC","$50,000 - $100,000 a year","We are seeking the right person to work as an estimator for our exterior contracting company, which has been in business since 1996 located in the Washington D.C. Metro area.Prior experience in home improvement and/or commercial contracting recruiting would be beneficial. However, not required.The position is remote and requires you to use your own computer and phone.It is result oriented with little supervision, no set hours, or days reporting directly to the ownership.You would be assessing upcoming project via visual inspection and through electronic means, web access and drone footage.We look forward to you helping us build our company.Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, ContractPay: $50,000.00 - $100,000.00 per yearBenefits:Flexible scheduleSupplemental Pay:Bonus payCOVID-19 considerations:This job does not require in person meeting and will be allowed to work remotely from your home.Education:High school or equivalent (Preferred)Contract Length:VariesWork Location:Multiple locationsCompany's website:www.americanhome specialists.comWork Remotely:NoCOVID-19 Precaution(s):Remote interview processVirtual meetings",11150,Washington
162,Program Manager,Flatter Inc.,"Washington, DC 20032 (Anacostia area)","$135,000 a year","Project Manager/Senior Acquisition Analyst Flatter is seeking a full-time Program Manager/Systems Acquisition Analyst to provide support in the following functional areas: documentation support, project management support, scheduling, risk management, and budget and lifecycle cost estimation.General Experience:- A minimum of 5 years of experience working in a support role for a Federal Government Agency Acquisition Project Management Office (PMO).- Experience working with Electronic Health Record solutions is preferred.- Experience working with a Shared Service Provider is preferred.- Experience with an IT acquisition program is preferred.- At least 5 years of experience developing and writing system development lifecycle documents including but not limited to Program Management Plan (PMP), Integrated Master Schedules and Lifecycle Cost Estimates (LCCE)- Preferred 5 years of experience developing, maintaining and updating Microsoft Project (or equivalent) schedules.Education:- A minimum of a bachelor’s degree in appropriate business or technical discipline is required.Job Type: Full-timeJob Type: Full-timePay: $135,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee discountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offProfessional development assistanceReferral programRetirement planTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:SELC: 5 years (Preferred)acquisition: 5 years (Preferred)Work Location:One locationCompany's website:www.flatterinc.comWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",11150,Washington
163,IT Support & Project Specialist,Virginia General District Courts,"Fairfax County, VA","$50,022 a year","Under the general supervision of the IT Projects Manager, this position provides IT support at various levels, including front-line technical support of software and hardware; testing, installation and configuration of new and updated software and hardware; maintenance and support of the Fairfax County GDC website; assisting with the planning and implementation of new technology initiatives; and performance of related work as assigned by management.

This position offers a competitive benefits package, which includes vacation and sick leave, 12 paid holidays, health insurance, retirement, life insurance, deferred compensation and short- and long-term disability.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

The IT Support and Project Specialist backs up and assists the IT Projects Manager for a large, high-volume, limited jurisdiction state court. This position assists GDC employees with the routine use of data applications and case management systems; performs password and other various levels of security support on all network systems; troubleshoots network, application and peripheral equipment problems; provides technology support in courtrooms; assists with loading and testing computer software and management of all IT inventory; supports members of the public with certain applications as appropriate; and supports all IT administrative duties of the Fairfax County GDC website. This position also supports the design, development, testing, and implementation of new and upgraded Fairfax County, Commonwealth, and third-party applications which improve automation, digitization, and case management in the court.

Other duties include providing new users with case management and security protocol training; providing help desk support for the court’s users and directing appropriate inquiries to the Fairfax County Court Technology Office; notifying users of unanticipated computer and application down time; checking for computer viruses using appropriate software; and assisting public with applications on the public terminals. This position also assists the IT Project Manager and other supervisors with general court related projects. May be required to work during non-traditional business hours on occasion.

Minimum Qualifications
Any combination of education, experience, and training equivalent to the following: graduation from an accredited two-year college with an associate’s degree in IT or related field (degree preferred, not required) and/or two years of related professional work experience in such areas as business, court, or public administration. Ability to communicate technical ideas clearly and effectively both orally and in writing. Ability to perform personal computer and network troubleshooting, both on software and hardware. Proficiency in the latest Microsoft Windows operating systems and PC applications, such as Word, Outlook, Excel, and PowerPoint required.

Preferred Qualifications

Special Requirements
All employees receive a 15% county salary supplement in addition to the state salary.

Applicants must pass a criminal background check in order to be considered for employment and may be asked to take relevant pre-employment tests.

Special Instructions to Applicants
A resume and cover letter are required. Applicants must apply online; we do not accept documents via mail or email. Only interviewed applicants will be notified of the filling of the position. No phone calls or e-mails regarding application status.

The Virginia Judicial System is an equal opportunity employer, committed to diversity in the workplace. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, age, national origin or disability. Applicants who need accommodations for an interview should request this in advance by emailing humanresources@vacourts.gov. All candidates are subject to a criminal history background check before being offered employment.

Name Jewel Jefferson

Phone NO PHONE CALLS OR E-MAILS REGARDING APPLICATION STATUS.

Fax

Email We do not accept documents via mail or email; you must apply online in order to be considered. jjefferson@vacourts.gov

Address",11150,Washington
164,Roofing Superintendent,Katchmark Construction Inc.,"Chantilly, VA 20151",None,"Katchmark Construction, Inc. is a fast-paced energetic company. A family-owned and operated business for nearly 31 years. We provide excellent employment opportunities for those who are serious about a developing career with growth potential. What makes Katchmark successful is our strong commitment to both our customers, and our employees. Our staff consists of a collaborative team of experienced and hardworking professionals. For the past 12 years Katchmark Construction has been awarded ""Top 100 Roofing Contractors"" in Roofing Contractor Magazine. We maintain an A+ rating with the Better Business Bureau.Katchmark is seeking an experienced Roofing Superintendent. Flat roofing experience, a plus.Our company serves 70% commercial and 30% residential customers. We have long term relationships with property managers and commercial clients, as well as homeowners. All employees participate in ongoing staff development, as we're always striving to improve our practices. We believe a solid team is where it starts, and employee satisfaction is as much a priority as customer satisfaction at Katchmark. We're a profit sharing company, which promotes common goals throughout our organization. We offer a diverse team that welcomes individual expertise, enthusiasm, and effort!Responsibilities and DutiesKatchmark is seeking a Superintendent to lead and manage our jobs and the performance of crews responsible for the installation of roofs, siding, guttering, windows, and doors for both our commercial and residential divisions.Operations Support:Reviews details of all assigned projects with Project Manager, and project team.Supervises and coordinates activities of roofing crews and applicable trade workers.Adapts work schedule as needed and assigns duties to workers.Analyzes and resolves issues, while coordinating with both the Project Manager and Property Manger, where necessary.Examines and inspects work progress, equipment, and work sites to verify safety and ensure that project specifications are met.Estimates material and worker requirements to complete project.CDL Driver Class A and flat roofing experience, a plus, but not required.Job Type: Full-timeBenefits:401(k) MatchingDental InsuranceHealth InsurancePaid Time OffVision InsuranceSchedule:Monday to FridaySupplemental Pay:Bonus payExperience:Supervising roofing crews: 1 year (Preferred)Work Location:Multiple locationsCompany's website:www.katchmark.comWork Remotely:No",11150,Washington
165,"Quality Assurance Supervisor, Lot Release",IDT Biologika,"Rockville, MD 20850",None,"POSITION SUMMARY: The Quality Assurance Supervisor, Lot Release provides support to the Quality Assurance Lot Release Group by performing duties, which assures compliance with FDA/EMA and other applicable GMP regulations and ISO 9001 guidelines. The Quality Assurance Supervisor/Lot Release is responsible to ensure that the manufacture of Phase 1 and Phase 2 Investigational Products (IPs) at IDT Biologika Corporation (IDT) is performed according to the applicable IDT procedures and relevant GMP regulations.ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Apply knowledge of sterile pharmaceutical manufacturing technologies and FDA/EMA and other applicable GMP regulations for Investigational Products.Develop SOPs pertinent to QA GMP Lot Release activities.Supervise the Quality Assurance Lot Release Group by example while ensuring that client projects are tracked and completed in a timely manner.Function as the QA Lot Release Group Supervisor when the QA Manager is off-site.Supervise the Master Product Label Control and Reconciliation Program.Assist with hosting external Client audits and provide support to QA Director and QA Manager during regulatory audits. Issue and track ECARs, generate response letter, track CAPA closures and measure CAPA effectiveness.Conduct GMP and other Quality Management System (QMS) trainings.Review and approve QMS documents related to assigned client projects, such as SOPs, Material and Product Specifications, Master Production Records, Validation Protocols and Reports, etc.Issue Primary and Secondary Product Labels based on the approved Master Product Labels.Supervise QA facility release activities for assigned client projects.Perform on-the-floor QA inspections for critical manufacturing operations.Review and approve executed Batch Production Records and associated Personnel and Environmental Monitoring Records.Supervise Batch-Related Deviation investigations in the NextDocs eQMS, evaluate Root Cause Analysis results and CAPA responses and provide investigation management support to investigators and CAPA owners.Review in-process and lot release test results and manage the release of the assigned client product based on the approved Product Specification (BOT).Prepare the Lot Release Dossier and related documentation and provide it to the QA Director for final disposition.Perform general QA functions by reviewing validation protocols and reports, QC EM and Utility data and temperature charts for compliance with IDT Biologika Corporation requirements.Conduct internal GMP and ISO QMS audits as applicable, issue ICARs, generate reports, track CAPA closures and measure CAPA effectiveness.Support other QMS programs such as Deviations, Complaints and OOS investigations, risk assessments, and change controls.Perform other duties as assigned.QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor of Science degree with 10 plus years of experience in a QA GMP role within a Biologics/Vaccine GMP environment.Hands-on experience in the following areas: Lot/Batch Release, QA on the Floor, Internal/Supplier Audits, Facility Release, Deviation Management.Strong Investigation and Root Cause Analysis skills.Good understanding of FDA & EU regulations (both biologics and drugs).Good understanding of USP, EP, and ICH standards and guidelines.Detail-oriented with strong verbal and written communications skills; demonstrated ability to manage multiple projects/tasks.Experience with reviewing validation records.Ability to analyze data for accuracy and correctly interpret results.Microsoft Office experienceIDT offers a competitive compensation package to include major medical/dental/vision, group life insurance, STD/LTD plans, 401k plan with company match, and paid vacation, sick and holidays.IDT Biologika Corporation is an Equal Opportunity Employer: All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status andwill not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.Job Type: Full-timeBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee assistance programFlexible scheduleFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offParental leaveProfessional development assistanceReferral programTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridaySupplemental Pay:Bonus payEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:QA GMP: 10 years (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",11150,Washington
166,Senior Inspector,"Precision Systems, Inc.","Washington, DC 20003 (Navy Yard area)",$36 - $68 an hour,"Precision Systems, Inc. (PSI) embraces technology in design. PSI is a transportation engineering consulting company that serves public and private organizations in the Washington, DC, Northern Virginia, and Maryland regions, providing services such as roadway and intersection design, construction management and inspection, signal and street lighting design, traffic analysis and reporting, crash analysis and countermeasure design, software development, data management, and more. Using the newest technologies and inhouse software with up-to-the-date data makes PSI engineers are experts in urban environments.PSI is seeking to hire a Senior Inspector with knowledge and experience of DC construction standards and practices. The ideal candidate will have at least 2 years of experience performing construction inspection within the Washington Metropolitan Area. The Senior Inspector will inspect construction as it is performed by the contractor, documenting all work performed and any issues that arise. The Senior Inspector will ensure accountability, accuracy, and compliance during construction.Expected Duties: · Scan and upload inspection reports, photos, and material tickets daily· Maintain inspection records and record pertinent data regarding equipment, material, and labor· Submit Inspector Daily Reports (IDR) daily to Construction Manager for approval and countersignature· Inspect and coordinate all construction activities at the project, resolve field construction problems and provide input for changes· Inspect contractor’s work to assure the work complies with the requirements of the contract for construction and approved project construction contract documents· Monitor all testing and maintain all records of testing, certification, and all other quantity records· Check and verify layout of work site· Observe work and maintain daily reports including a log of visitors and the time and purpose of visits· Complete punch list at closeout of job siteRequired Skills & Experience: · B.S. in Civil Engineering or Construction Management· Certifications for Asphalt Field, Concrete Field, and Soils and Aggregate Compaction from local or national certification programs such as VDOT, ACI, NICET, or MARTCP· 4-7 years of construction experience· Familiarity of DDOT construction standards and procedures· Strong oral and written communication skills· Ability and desire to operate professionally in a team environment· Must be able to commute to office location in DCCheck us out at www.precisionsystems.co!Job Type: Full-timePay: $36.00 - $68.00 per hourBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:Construction inspection: 4 years (Preferred)License/Certification:Asphalt Field and Concrete Field certification (Preferred)Soils and Aggregate Compaction certification (Preferred)Work Location:One locationCompany's website:precisionsystems.coWork Remotely:NoCOVID-19 Precaution(s):Remote interview processPersonal protective equipment provided or requiredTemperature screeningsSocial distancing guidelines in placeVirtual meetingsSanitizing, disinfecting, or cleaning procedures in place",11150,Washington
167,Manager - 100+ Person IT Service Desk / Contact Center,General Dynamics,"Washington, DC",None,"Type of Requisition:
Pipeline
Clearance Level Must Currently Possess:
None
Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain:
None
Suitability:
No Suitability Required
Public Trust/Other Required:
MBI Full 5C (T3)
Job Family:
Help Desk
Job Description:
Service Desk Manager
We are GDIT. We stay at the forefront of innovation to solve complex technical challenges.
GDIT is your place. Make it your own by discovering new ways to securely and expertly apply the latest technology. Own your opportunity at GDIT and you’ll be a meaningful part of improving how agencies operate. Our work depends on a Service Desk Manager joining our team to support an important federal customer’s IT help desk activities.
At GDIT, we foster a people-centric environment. As a Service Desk Manager supporting our client, you will be trusted to manage Help Desk and technical support for all facets of operations for computer, network, communications, and hardware/software infrastructure technologies. In this role, a typical day will include:
Collaborating with the customer, vendors and partners to maintain day to day service desk operations; accountable for overall adherence of defined SLAs and ensure team commitment of outlined key performance indicators (KPIs) and support technology modernization efforts.
Lead, coach and manage teams on a daily basis to improve customer service, efficiency and technical aptitude
Provide team leadership establishing internal procedures, ticketing, and escalation standards to ensure prompt resolution to incidents and service requests
Acts as primary technical customer service point of contact for the government customer, and provides reports and other deliverables or information that facilitates the Government mission
Analyzing call volume supply and staffing demand-forecasting reports to inform business decisions
Your success will be measured through successfully meeting or exceeding customer defined Service Level Agreements against multiple performance metrics, and Demonstrated success improving, optimizing, standardizing, and streamlining customer support processes that have yielded improvements in customer satisfaction and resulted in cost reductions
WHAT YOU’LL NEED:
Bachelor’s degree, preferably in business or related field from an accredited university
5 or more years of recent and related managerial experience in an end-to-end service desk, contact center or other managed service environment
Demonstrated experience providing performance-based customer service support against multiple performance metrics in the Federal Government.
Demonstrated experience with implementing SLAs and performance metrics on a service desk or contact center program of 100 to 500 Agents, within the last 5 years
Knowledge of ITIL v4 and ITIL v3 or v4 certification, Foundations or higher.
Certified ITIL® Intermediate Level Certification (or better).
A PMP or equivalent certification is required.
Help Desk Institute or Service Desk Institute Service Desk Manager Certification.
Familiar with Service Desk and ITSM technologies including:
ServiceNow
Automatic Call Distribution (ACD)/Interactive Voice Response (IVR) solutions, such as NICE InContact
Robotic Process Automation (RPA) tools like UiPath Process Runner, Automation Anywhere, Pega RPA; Blue Prism, or Kryon
AI or Intelligent Virtual Agents (IVA) such Amelia, Resolve (resolve.ai), Avaamo (avaamo.ai)
WHAT GDIT CAN OFFER YOU:
Full-flex work week
401K with company match
Customizable health benefits packages
Collaborative teams of highly motivated critical thinkers and innovators
Internal mobility team dedicated to helping you own your career
Rewards program for high-performing employees
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Travel Required:
25-50%
Telecommuting Options:
Some Telecommuting Allowed
Work Location:
USA DC Washington
Additional Work Locations:
USA LA Bossier City, USA NC Durham, USA NC Raleigh, USA NC Triangle, USA VA Falls Church
We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",11150,Washington
168,Project Manager/Lead Carpenter,Meridian Homes,"Bethesda, MD","$60,000 - $70,000 a year","Project Manager/Lead Carpenter, Meridian HomesThe Project Manager/Lead Carpenter is the onsite representative of Meridian Homes who manages all aspects of the construction portion of renovation and custom home projects. It is his/her primary responsibility to manage the day to day construction activities at the job site to get the project completed with the utmost quality and in a timely manner.Essential Duties and Responsibilities: 1. Direct and manage subcontractors on site2. Complete carpentry work as needed3. Own and maintain appropriate tools to complete the job4. Schedule and oversee building department inspections5. Supervise and manage Meridian employees and subcontractors on a daily basis6. Estimate required material quantities, getting lists to the Production Manager for pricing, oversee efficient use of the material and return of unused materials7. Communicate with and ""manage"" the client on a daily basis. Relay any important information from the client to appropriate Meridian personnel8. Keep informed as to the project’s evolution as a whole including potential modifications to plans and specifications9. Maintain a day-by-day two week into the future schedule of job site events including: committed subcontractors, deliveries, required Assistant Carpenters10. Timely communicate clearly and effectively with appropriate Meridian personnel, subcontractors and clients11. Supervise job site safety, cleanliness, security, and protection from damage during construction12. Keep up to date plans with any changes. Disseminate this information to employees and subcontractors on the job site13. Maintain a job site file folder containing all job related information including: permits, the client contract, project specifications, product cut sheets, plans, change orders, subcontractor contracts, two week schedule and complete project scheduleMeridian Supervisory Responsibilities: Supervise Assistant Carpenters.Schedule: Monday through Friday from 7:00am to 3:30pm. Weekend work is occasionally necessary.Job Type: Full-timePay: $60,000.00 - $70,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Health insurancePaid time offSchedule:Monday to FridayWeekendsEducation:High school or equivalent (Preferred)Experience:Construction Experience: 3 years (Preferred)Project Management: 3 years (Preferred)Language:Spanish (Preferred)Work Location:Multiple locationsTypical start time:7AMTypical end time:4PMThis Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneousPeople-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projectsDetail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger pictureCompany's website:meridianhomesinc.comCompany's Facebook page:https://www.facebook.com/MeridianHomes/Benefit Conditions:Waiting period may applyOnly full-time employees eligibleWork Remotely:NoCOVID-19 Precaution(s):Remote interview processPersonal protective equipment provided or requiredSocial distancing guidelines in placeVirtual meetingsSanitizing, disinfecting, or cleaning procedures in place",11150,Washington
169,IT Project Manager,Intertek,"Rockville, MD 20850",None,"IT Project Manager - (210000KB)
Description
Intertek is a leading Total Quality Assurance provider to industries worldwide. Our network of more than 1,000 laboratories and offices and over 43,000 people in more than 100 countries, delivers innovative and bespoke Assurance, Testing, Inspection and Certification solutions for our customers’ operations and supply chains. Intertek Total Quality Assurance expertise, delivered consistently with precision, pace and passion, enabling our customers to power ahead safely.
The Connected World team focuses on cyber security, software testing, and assurance services for network-enabled devices, such as computers, tablets, mobile devices, apps, software and wireless and connected products. The team provides services to help bring cutting-edge technology to market quickly with assurance of safety/security, quality, and performance.
Acumen Security, an Intertek Company, is a full-service security certification provider offering Consulting, Documentation Development and Laboratory Services designed to assist in certifying commercial products against regulatory cyber security standards. Our goal is to not only assist our clients in certifying their products, but to provide a seamless and cost-effective way while maintaining the integrity of the certification efforts. While adhering to industry standards, Acumen Security works effectively and efficiently to maximize our clients’ Return on Investment.
Acumen Security has an immediate opening for a Project Manager-Cyber Security based in Rockville, MD.
Summary
As a Project Manager, you will be responsible for ensuring that certification projects flow smoothly through completion. This includes, handling project schedules, coordinate with staff to keep schedules up to date, and provide input when issues or delays arise. While daily interaction with the customer will not always be required;
The Project Manager will be responsible for ensuring Acumen employees project status and monitor the status of junior/senior evaluators against the project schedule. This includes verifying project percentage completion vs actual work product completeness and coordinating with senior staff to resolve any issues.

Qualifications
Identify project tracking tool to be used company-wide
Maintaining project schedules and issues status
Ensuring evaluation staff are providing required status updates to project leads
Assisting project leads on collecting weekly status e-mails for clients
Attending weekly project status calls with clients and taking meeting minutes
Identify/track project delays and ensure staff are keeping customers notified of any schedule impacting issues
Requirements:
7+ years’ experience working in a project management role interacting with clients on multiple projects
Experience working with multiple concurrent projects
Ability to document and track project statuses and issues
Strong communication skills to handle daily interactions with team members and weekly status calls/e-mails with multiple clients on concurrent projects
Familiarity with FIPS 140 or Common Criteria preferred
Desired:
PMP certified
Education:
Bachelor of Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Cyber Security, other related field, or equivalent experience.
Master of Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Cyber Security, Networking, Telecommunication, other related field, or equivalent experience.
A career with Intertek means joining a global network of professionals dedicated to bringing quality and safety to life. Our vision is to become the world’s most trusted partner for Quality Assurance and we offer our employees the chance to make an impact with attractive growth opportunities in this industry on a global scale.

We offer a salary and benefit package competitively placed within the local market, including medical, dental, vision, life, disability, 401(k) with company match, tuition reimbursement and more.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veteran status or on the basis of disability. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, or gender identity.

Intertek is a drug-free workplace. As a condition of employment, all hires are required to pass a pre-employment drug test.

#LI-KN1

Primary Location: US-MD-Rockville
Work Locations: Rockville Research Blvd 2400 Research BLvd Suite# 395 Rockville 20850
Job: Client Services
Organization: USA50:Acumen Security LLC
Schedule: Regular
Employee Status: Manager without Direct Reports
 Full-time
Job Level: First Shift
Travel: No
Job Posting: 20.May.2021, 4:20:09 PM",11150,Washington
170,Project Manager - Information Technology (IT),Kikiktagruk Inupiat Corporation,"Washington, DC",None,"Title: Project Manager - Information Technology (IT)
Location: Washington, DC
FLSA Status: Exempt
Position Summary:
The Project Manager will provide Project Management Technical Support Services to the OWCP Division of Administration and Operations Branch of Medical Standards and Rehabilitation (BMSR). The Project Manager provides coordination of projects related to medical claims and claims processing systems.
Duties/Responsibilities:
Provides IT project management (PM) support technical PMO to the DAO Branch of Medical Standards and Operations (BMSO).
Leads assigned BMSO projects, coordinating and overseeing all aspects through completion, including creating technical IT analyses and related documentation, process flows, review of Contractor-submitted technical deliverables, and recommendations to the OWCP PMO regarding solutions to technical issues.
Establishes deadlines for assigned projects, sets tasks, and monitors and summarizes progress through interfacing with all BMSO and PMO resources.
Support the Workers' Compensation Medical Bill Processing (WCMBP) contract Project Manager and BMSO PMO with schedule management, make recommendations and advise the WCMBP Project Manager and BMSO PMO of all management, planning, and technical issues, make recommendations to streamline procedures, and identify potential risks and possible mitigations.
Prepares project status reports for DAO management upon request
Minimum Requirements:
Must have at least 7 years' experience with workers' compensation bill processing or a related field.
BS degree in Information Systems, Engineering, Software Engineering, Computer Science, or similar technical disciplines.
Project management experience of at least 8 years on managing large and complex IT modernization and migration projects, specifically large software/system development.
Working knowledge and/or experience in medical billing work is preferred.
Experience and demonstrated ability of working concurrently with multiple internal and external business and IT stakeholder groups both Government and Contractor
Demonstrated working experience with and of a range of software development life cycles and technologies.
Demonstrated experience successfully managing concurrent priority tasks/projects and have the ability to ""hit the ground running"".
Must be a self-starter with a delivery-focused mentality and strong work ethic.
Demonstrated experience in facilitating business and technical requirements sessions.
Demonstrated experience with analyzing, defining, documenting business and system requirements.
Demonstrated ability to think outside of the box and possesses creative problem solving skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Demonstrated ability to communicate with front line through executives
Well versed in managing large IT projects involving multiple external and internal integration and dependency points.
Apply online at our website: https://kikiktagruk.applicantpool.com/
Disclaimer: This is not to be an exclusive list of all responsibilities', duties, and skills required of the person in this job. KIC is an Equal Opportunity Employer. KIC considers all applicants for employment without regard to race, color, sex, national origin, religion, age, physical or mental disability, family responsibility, marital status, sexual orientation, political affiliation, veteran's status or any other legal protected status. Pursuant to The Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act 43 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq., and federal contractual requirements, Kikiktagruk Inupiat Corporation, may legally grant certain preference in employment opportunities to KIC Shareholders and their Descendants. EOE/AA/M/F/D/V. Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP here. Successful candidate must pass, comply and adhere to KIC's Drug and Alcohol policy/testing requirements and pass a thorough background check including fingerprinting.",11150,Washington
171,Contract Project Manager for Adobe Experience Platform Implementations,Deloitte Consulting LLP,"Arlington, VA",$100 - $135 an hour,"Contract Project Manager for Adobe Experience Platform Implementations.
This opportunity is open only to candidates who can work as Independent Contractors.
Location(s): Remote
Contract Length: 2-3 months
How many hours per week: 25-40 hrs./week
Anticipated Hourly Rate: $100 - $135/hr.
The Work You’ll Do Under the Deloitte Project Team:
Work with customer(s) as well as Adobe Field and Services Sales teams to clearly define and document project scope, requirements and integration points as they relate to solution implementation.
Work with team as functional lead for this project focusing on Adobe/general CDP.Capture and communicate experiences in formal post-mortem - relaying best practices, customer experience and resource feedback to the larger Adobe Consulting Practice.
Assist team on project Delivery process with key contributors to help manage scope and prepare change requests - including tasks, deliverables, milestones, resources, and estimated costs.
Achieve customer satisfaction through successful delivery of defined project scope.
Coordinate/communicate escalations across Adobe – which includes, Services and Product teams.
Manage administrative portions of project delivery from inception to closure.
Collaborate with third-party subcontractors, Vendors and technology Partners as needed.
Coordinate escalations across Adobe including services, and product organizations.

Qualifications:
Minimum 3 – 4 years of prior experience in a client-facing Project Management role, ideally within the Digital Marketing Cloud space required. This includes knowledge of Web Content Management, Rich internet applications, Web & Social Analytics, online Ad Targeting and content Personalization solutions.
5 – 8 years of proven success in a software-based PM role strongly preferred. Prior experience as a Project Manager within a Saas environment is required.Proven ability to understand the impact of technical changes, and, to articulate high level technical solutions to address business problems.Excellent problem-solving skills with a demonstrated ability to identify issues, resolve them quickly and know when to rely on internal resources to assist.An innovative thinker, collaborative business partner, who is well-organized and detailed with strong presentation and reporting skills is recommended.Professional demeanor, ability to interact with and lead diverse teams throughout Adobe, and communicating with client managers, directors, and VPs including CMOs and CXOs.Strong verbal, presentation and written communication skills as well as strong conflict resolution and negotiation skills.Solid understanding of custom software development processes and engagement methodologies. Practical experience in managing agile development projects a plus.Ability to manage in an environment of ambiguity with diverse stakeholders.Ability to build strong relationships and generate opportunities for repeat business.
• • BS/BA Degree or equivalent experience.
Work you'll do
We do not accept agency resumes and are not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.
Candidates interested in applying for this opportunity must be geographically based in the United States and possess the necessary work authorization.
Expected Work Schedule
During team’s core business hours
Approximate hours per week
31 - 40 hours
About Deloitte
Our inclusive culture empowers our people to be who they are, contribute their unique perspectives, and make a difference individually and collectively. It makes Deloitte one of the most rewarding places to work.
As used in this posting, “Deloitte” means Deloitte Consulting LLP, a subsidiary of Deloitte LLP. Please see www.deloitte.com/us/about for a detailed description of the legal structure of Deloitte LLP and its subsidiaries.
Requisition code: 30417",11150,Washington
172,Indoor Rowing Instructor,"The Row House, West End","Washington, DC 20036 (Downtown area)",$15 - $50 an hour,"OPENING SOON IN WASHINGTON D.CRow House Coach Row House is a boutique rowing concept that strives to give people of all different fitness levels an efficient, high-cardio, full-body workout in less than one hour. It distinguishes itself from other group fitness concepts built on insecurity and competition by creating an environment that raises everyone up so they come together, rowing on the same rhythm, with the same flow and energy. Rowing has long been recognized by serious athletes as one of the most effective forms of full-body exercise and Row House's workout stays true to form. Targeting the upper body, lower body, and core all at once, the brand's fitness program offers an energetic, endorphin-boosting workout in a safe, inspiring, and inclusive environment.This is an exciting opportunity for the right person to get in on the ground floor with our team and help us to continue to share the Row House brand and experience to all people, everywhere.The Row House Coach will lead up to 25 participants through the Row House experience.Essential Duties & Responsibilities:· Deliver pre-designed workouts to groups of 25 clients· Energize and motivate clients throughout rowing sessions· Build Row House class attendance and retain current clientele· Teach proper rowing technique to ensure clients have a safe and positive experience· Attend staff meetings and required educational presentations[jw1] , including, but not limited to Row House University or any required continuing education [CS2]· Handle member concerns when applicable· Assist sales associates and General Manager with studio tour and sales as needed[jw3]· Set up rowers and explain class format for prospects and new clients· Maintain strong social media presence to increase class followingQualifications:· Love of boutique fitness is a must – rowing passion is a STRONG plus· Ability to thrive in a fast-paced environment· Ability to create a high energy, positive environment that welcomes all people· Fantastic communication that exudes energy AND empathy· Must love connecting with people and have passion for helping them achieve goals· Passion for having fun daily and making every customer excited to get on the erg!· Must exude charisma & thrive in a group environment· Fitness certification and indoor rowing experience preferred[jw1]Should this reference any ongoing training?[CS2][jw3]Should this also reference greeting and setting up all new rowing clients?Job Type: Part-timePay: $15.00 - $50.00 per hourBenefits:Employee discountEducation:High school or equivalent (Preferred)Work Location:Multiple locationsHours per week:10-19This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneousPeople-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projectsThis Job Is:Open to applicants who do not have a high school diploma/GEDA good fit for applicants with gaps in their resume, or who have been out of the workforce for the past 6 months or moreA good job for someone just entering the workforce or returning to the workforce with limited experience and educationOpen to applicants who do not have a college diplomaCompany's website:www.therowhouse.com/location/west-endCompany's Facebook page:www.facebook.com/rowhousewestendBenefit Conditions:Only full-time employees eligibleWork Remotely:NoCOVID-19 Precaution(s):Remote interview processTemperature screeningsSocial distancing guidelines in placeSanitizing, disinfecting, or cleaning procedures in place",11150,Washington
173,"Human Resources Manager, U.S. Public Health Accompaniment Unit",Partners In Health,"Washington, DC 20009 (U Street Corridor area)",None,"Position Title: Human Resources Manager, U.S. Public Health Accompaniment Unit
Reports to: Director, U.S. Public Health Accompaniment Unit & Chief Human Resources Officer
Location: United States (Remote)
Position Type: Full-time through December 2021 (may include evenings and weekends)
Project Overview
Leveraging PIH’s experience and lessons learned from our COVID contact tracing collaboration with the state of Massachusetts and our 30 years of global work in emergency epidemic response and health systems strengthening, PIH has launched a new team to accompany U.S. states, cities and community partners in rapidly scaling up contact tracing and building more equitable and effective public health responses to COVID-19 in the US.
The U.S. Public Health Accompaniment Unit team works to accompany public sector and community partners on the front-lines of the public health response to COVID-19, to address this acute-on-chronic public health crisis, by providing technical assistance and knowledge sharing platforms to accelerate implementation of effective, equitable COVID-19 responses. Our approach to providing technical assistance to different public sector and community partners in the United States includes providing expertise and advice on design and implementation, incorporating an equity lens into execution, and creating a community of partners across the US to share best practices and challenges in order to fortify efforts amidst the national response to COVID-19.
Position Overview
The Human Resources Manager will join a fast paced and dynamic team navigating the multitude of work-streams that the U.S. Public Health Accompaniment Unit takes on. The Human Resources Manager will be responsible for strategizing and managing a pipeline of temporary staff from recruitment through onboarding to support this emerging work in a virtual environment. In addition to overseeing staffing needs, the Human Resources Manager will develop policies, programs and resources that support the needs and development of USPHAU team members.
Responsibilities
Provide strategic guidance on creating a staffing structure that effectively supports both short- and long-term project needs that are constantly evolving
Develop job descriptions, consult with hiring managers and oversee recruiting cycle for all new USPHAU staff
Anticipate needs and proactively ensure programs are planned and delivered with sufficient attention to change management, including buy-in from key stakeholders and other elements essential to program success
Coach managers and leaders in supporting their direct reports throughout the employee life-cycle including onboarding, performance feedback and goal setting
Develop policies and procedures that meet financial, cultural, staffing and operational needs of U.S. Public Health Accompaniment Unit
Manage HR Coordinator to support with administration and execution of HR processes, including promotions, compensation changes, and timely communication and implementation of offer letters, benefits and services
Monitor and evaluate equity based on organizational values, legal requirements and an ongoing understanding of industry best practices
Evaluate and continuously adjust an onboarding plan that effectively orients new staff to our local and global work through strictly virtual platforms
Design and implement professional development projects to advance the skill sets and engagement of USPHAU members while cultivating a rewarding workplace experience
Provide strategic input and ensure that appropriate leadership and tools are deployed to optimize a safe, supportive and nimble culture that cultivates personal growth and collective innovation
Develop and manage relationships with appropriate partner organizations to ensure that our recruitment pipeline is reflective of our organizational values and the communities we serve
Build deep and trusting relationships with clients, peers, and colleagues
Qualifications
At least four years of experience in HR supporting a diverse employee population
Strategic operational orientation and acumen, and the ability to define and prioritize efforts based on organizational direction and needs
Experience managing employee relations investigations and concerns
Experience coaching managers through performance management processes
Ability to thrive in ambiguous, fast-paced or start-up-like environments
Ability to manage multiple projects and meet deadlines
Experience working for an organization characterized by high service levels, employee engagement, and a culture of purpose, vision, and core values
Forward-thinking, creative, business focused, and a passion for people issues
Strategic orientation and the ability to define and prioritize a team’s efforts based on the direction and needs of the organization and initiative
Verbal and written fluency in English
Ability to handle confidential information with discretion and professionalism
Commitment to social justice
Organizational Profile
Partners In Health (PIH) is an international health organization relentlessly committed to improving the health of the poor and marginalized. PIH partners with local governments to build local capacity and works closely with impoverished communities to deliver high-quality health care, address the root causes of illness, train providers, advance research, and advocate for global policy change.
PIH currently has implementation programs in Haiti, Rwanda, Lesotho, Liberia, Kazakhstan, Malawi, Peru, Mexico, Sierra Leone and Navajo Nation. Through our partnership with Harvard Medical School and the Brigham and Women’s Hospital, we support a wide range of programs in dozens of other countries around the world.
Partners In Health (PIH) is committed to the fundamental principle of equal opportunity and equal treatment for every prospective and current employee. It is the policy of PIH not to discriminate on the basis of race, color, national or ethnic origin, ancestry, age, religion, creed, disability, sex and gender, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, military or veteran status, or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal, state or local law. PIH works in and with a number of governments in and outside the U.S., and to the extent applicable, this statement is intended to incorporate the prohibition of any unlawful discrimination covered by applicable laws in such countries, states and municipalities.",11150,Washington
174,"Assistant Manager, International Government Relations",General Motors,"Washington, DC",None,"About GM
There’s never been a more exciting time to work for General Motors.

To achieve our vision of a world with Zero Crashes, Zero Emissions and Zero Congestion, we need people to join us who are passionate about creating safer, better and more sustainable ways for people to get around. This bold vision won’t happen overnight, but just as we transformed how the world moved in the last century, we are committed to transforming how we move today and in the future.
Why Work for Us
Our culture is focused on building inclusive teams, where differences and unique perspectives are embraced so you can contribute to your fullest potential as you pursue your career. Our locations feature a variety of work environments, including open work spaces and virtual connection platforms to inspire productivity and flexible collaboration. And we are proud to support our employees volunteer interests, and make it a priority to join together in efforts that give back to our communities.
Job Description
Job Summary:
General Motors’ Global Public Policy team supports the company’s growth goals and strategies by proactively addressing global policies and government affairs matters impacting the business. GM’s Global Public Policy team works to educate key government stakeholders and organizations on GM’s global activities and further the company’s business directives. Since GM’s operations encompass diverse markets with varying consumer needs, it is vital for the company to have a diverse and adept Global Public Policy team that can fully understand the international, comprehensive approach needed to engage the company’s key audiences.
Job Details:
The Assistant Manager International Government Relations reports to the Manager for International Government Relations. The person will be a key member of GM’s Global Public Policy team responsible for supporting the broad policy agenda of the company and the team’s efforts in addressing global and domestic policies and government affairs matters impacting the company. The Assistant Manager will support the globally dispersed International Government Relations team and international-focused segments of the U.S Federal Affairs team on a wide range of issues. This role requires a highly organized individual with well-developed communication skills that will be part of a dynamic team developing advocacy approaches for GM’s business interests and helping to implement key strategies to achieve company goals. The responsibilities of the Assistant Manager include, but are not limited to, the following:
Contributes to development of global public policy and government relations strategy;
Supports GM’s outreach with key U.S. and international government agencies and officials who focus on international trade, economic and commercial policies and regulations;
Develops written briefing materials for GPP leaders that concisely summarize issues and prepares leaders for meetings with key internal and external stakeholders.
Conducts analysis and prepares insightful reports on important political and regulatory topics for GPP and other senior GM leadership.
Supports international and trade-focused Congressional engagement and strategy development.
Coordinates reporting requirements across the GPP International organization to support broader GPP information flow to GPP Leadership and GM Senior Leadership Teams;
Facilitates GM sponsorship of and coordinates GM participation in brand-enhancing events.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Highly developed verbal, written and interpersonal communication skills
Demonstrated expertise working with both U.S. and foreign executive branch government officials working across cultures and time zones mandatory; experience working with federal government including an understanding of Congressional processes a plus.
High level of enthusiasm, persistence, initiative, and experienced judgment to identify priorities, initiate projects, and complete activities with a strong sense of urgency
Knowledge and understanding of key policy issues of interest to the auto industry (e.g., economic competitiveness, trade policy impact, environmental issues, overall regulatory issues, vehicle safety issues)
Demonstrated ability to build relationships across diverse organizations and work with cross-functional teams to achieve results.
Ability to successfully perform in fast paced work environments
Clear reputation for ethical conduct; integrity; diversity, equity and inclusion goals; and confidentiality
Keen attention to detail, results driven, proactive, ability to develop new and creative ideas
Ability to think strategically and quickly analyze situations and implement an appropriate course of action
Proven work experience as a project manager with a successful project delivery record
Bachelor’s Degree required, with proven experience in government, public affairs, communications, or a related field
7+ years of relevant experience
Benefits Overview
The goal of the General Motors total rewards program is to support the health and well-being of you and your family. Our comprehensive compensation plan incudes, the following benefits, in addition to many others:
Paid time off including vacation days, holidays, and parental leave for mothers, fathers and adoptive parents;Healthcare (including a triple tax advantaged health savings account and wellness incentive), dental, vision and life insurance plans to cover you and your family;Company and matching contributions to 401K savings plan to help you save for retirement;Global recognition program for peers and leaders to recognize and be recognized for results and behaviors that reflect our company values;
Tuition assistance and student loan refinancing;Discount on GM vehicles for you, your family and friends.
Diversity Information
General Motors is committed to being a workplace that is not only free of discrimination, but one that genuinely fosters inclusion and belonging. We strongly believe that workforce diversity creates an environment in which our employees can thrive and develop better products for our customers. We understand and embrace the variety through which people gain experiences whether through professional, personal, educational, or volunteer opportunities. GM is proud to be an equal opportunity employer.
We encourage interested candidates to review the key responsibilities and qualifications and apply for any positions that match your skills and capabilities.
Equal Employment Opportunity Statements
The policy of General Motors is to extend opportunities to qualified applicants and employees on an equal basis regardless of an individual's age, race, color, sex, religion, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression or veteran status. Additionally, General Motors is committed to being an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) Employer and offers opportunities to all job seekers including individuals with disabilities. If you need a reasonable accommodation to assist with your job search or application for employment, email us at Careers.Accommodations@GM.com . In your email, please include a description of the specific accommodation you are requesting as well as the job title and requisition number of the position for which you are applying.",11150,Washington
175,Geospatial Project Manager - Federal,"Geographic Information Services, Inc.","Washington, DC",None,"We know organizations struggle with geospatial technology. At GISinc, we believe GIS should be simple and accessible to all. We are a committed team of experts that serve our clients with an inspired experience that transforms organizations. If you have exceptional talent and interpersonal skills and meet the following description, please submit your resume using the link below.

Role: Geospatial Project Manager

Candidates must be eligible for federal security clearance (Secret/T3) and proof of U.S. Citizenship is required.

Role Summary: The Project Manager leads GIS projects, supported by a technical lead to support Federal Clients. The role is responsible for the following:


Performs integration planning and interfaces to other functional groups
Develops, maintains & supports project plans, schedules & budgets
Reviews applicable policy and applies to project/program
Designs project management methodologies and supports project profitability analyses
Ensures successful completion of all project task and deliverables with technical team support
Leads overall communication with clients and stakeholders
Responsible for monitoring customer experience and support
Acts as internal liaison for sales team/Account Executives
May act as supervisor

Essential Functions:

Project Lead for large federal client
Responsible for overall Customer Experience/Satisfaction
Establish and manages client and team expectations
Coordinate internal and stakeholder meetings
Ensure Quality of Delivery
Foster perpetual sales through successful project management and customer satisfaction
Act as Customer Liaison and foster customer relationship
Manage Forecasting/Billing
Manage Resourcing/Staffing
Scope Management
Provide accurate and timely estimates/Level of Effort (LOE)

Competencies and Skills:

Ability to work on multiple projects simultaneously
Ability to work in fast paced environment
Excellent organization skills and time management
Excellent communication skills
Self-motivated and proactive
Strong team skills and ability to work independently
Demonstrated ability to work productively with wide range of people

Experience Required:

Minimum of BA/BS degree in Business, GIS, Engineering or related *
5+ years of experience or equivalent and a demonstrated ability in IT/GIS Project Management
Experience with Unanet ERP or similar product with resource-planning capabilities
Demonstrated capability implementing project plans and using tools to develop project schedules, work breakdown structures, and milestone driven Gantt charts
Proficient in MS Office 365 suite
Existing DoD Clearance (Secret) (highly preferred)
Additional experience can be substituted for education

Experience Preferred:

Knowledge or experience in geospatial or technology-related industry
Experience in the Utilities or Energy industry
Skilled in business development activities
Security + preferred
PMP Certification

Work Environment:

Location: Washington DC and surrounding area. Onsite preferred. Minimum 2-3 days onsite required.
Travel up to < 30% of the time.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity in our company. We do not discriminate based on race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",11150,Washington
176,Technical Project Manager,The Mom Project,"Washington, DC",$45.86 an hour,"Our Customer’s mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through their family of apps and services, they are building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together.
We are seeking a Technical Project Manager on a contract basis to help tech-based systems from and how level and how it interacts with other systems. Within this, you can then translate findings and created procedures to make sense to the overall crowd or nontech skilled population.

What You’ll Do:
Interpret business requests into organized requirements

Develop and manage end-to-end project plans and ensure on-time delivery

Provide hands-on program management during analysis, design, development, testing, implementation, and post-implementation phases

Perform risk management and change management on projects

Provide day-to-day coordination and quality assurance for projects and tasks

Drive internal process improvements across multiple teams and functions

Interface with engineering teams and cross-functional partners for project requirements and scope

Motivate and focus a large collaboration to reach challenging goals

Define operational processes of our review systems to maintain a stable, consistent environment.

Act as a trusted advisor to partners in developing and prioritizing comprehensive, data-driven tool improvement requests and raise core problems to Engineering and other cross-functional teams.

Must Haves:
2+ years of experience in project management, operations, consulting, product management, or equivalent field

2+ years experience in one of the following: software engineering, systems engineering, support, solution engineering in addition to project/program management experience with a demonstrated track record of delivering business value using technology solutions in high-tech operations space

Can find the answer to an unknown problem, very resourceful and flexible.

Basic SQL queries and understanding

Can handle a lot of projects and tasks with little to no direction

Demonstrate analytical thinking and problem-solving experience

Experience with process change management or process improvement

Experience liaising between technical and non-technical partners, and effectively collaborating with cross-functional stakeholders

Interpersonal experience, including relationship building and collaboration within a cross-functional team

Analytical and problem-solving experience, and experience working with large-scale software systems

Expertise in multiple requirement analysis techniques/methodologies

Experience leading cross-functional efforts across multiple time zones and functions

Demonstrated ability to quickly adapt, learn new skill sets, and ""roll up the sleeves"" in order to accomplish all necessary tasks

Strong analytical and technical mindset, as well as strong organizational and relationship management skills.

Excellent verbal and written communication, influencing, and problem-solving skills

Resourceful, action-orientated with the ability to get things done independently and overcome obstacles by developing creative solutions to problems

Nice to haves:
Team player and resilient

Great communicator (meeting people on a global basis) can connect easily

Fits the company's culture

Education:
Bachelor’s degree preferred.

Hours & Location:
M-F, 40 hours/week. The expectation is to be onsite at our Customer’s Washington, DC office.

Perks are available through our 3rd Party Employer of Record:
Health Benefits: Medical, Dental, Vision, 401k, FSA, Commuter Benefit Program
Accrued PTO: Up to 15 days per 12 months on assignment
New Child Benefit: Up to $4,000 for the birth or adoption of a child while on assignment (conditions apply)",11150,Washington
177,"Systems Engineering and Technical Assistance (SETA) – Portfolio, Program and Project Manager",G2 Global Solutions,"Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)",None,"POSITION: Systems Engineering and Technical Assistance (SETA) – Portfolio, Program and Project Manager
LOCATION: Washington, D.C.
CLEARANCE: Multiple Positions (Uncleared, Secret, Top Secret)

Overview:
G2 Global Solutions, LLC. is seeking an experienced Systems Engineering and Technical Assistance (SETA)- Portfolio, Program and Project Manager to support a program with our government customer. The position will be based in Washington, D.C. This is a forecasted position and it is contingent upon contract award.
Principle Responsibilities will include, but are not limited to the following:
Provides subject matter expertise in the fields of science, engineering, and technical assistance with specialty in portfolio, program and project management of SETA efforts

Required Skills:
3-5 years of relevant experience

Required Education:
Bachelor’s Degree and fifteen (15) years or more of related experience
Master’s degree and thirteen (13) years or more experience
PhD or JD and four (4) years or more experience
A total of twelve (12) years may be substituted

About G2 Global Solutions:
G2 Global Solutions, LLC. (G2) is an 8(a) certified Service-Disabled Veteran-Owned, and Economically-Disadvantaged Woman-Owned Small Business. We are an agile and responsive low-risk option for all of our government clients and corporate teaming partners. G2 has a strong reputation of providing highly experienced cleared personnel who support a variety of government agencies within the Intelligence Community (IC). G2 is fully committed, prepared, and ready to provide superior support services designed to consistently outperform and exceed expectations. Some of our services include:
Administrative & Personnel Support
Testing and Evaluating
Strategic Planning
Operational Support
Technology Development
Program and Project Management
Cyber Exploitation
Information Technology
Intelligence & Analysis
Training & Education
G2 Global Solutions, LLC. provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, religious creed, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, pregnancy, childbirth, physical disability, mental disability, age, military status or status as a Vietnam-era or special disabled veteran, marital status, registered domestic partner or civil union status, gender (including sex stereotyping and gender identity or expression), medical condition (including, but not limited to, cancer related or HIV/AIDS related), genetic information, or any other protected classifications in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws. In addition, the Company complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the Company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including, but not limited to, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.",11150,Washington
178,Editorial Assistant,The National Academies,"Washington, DC",None,"Job Description Summary:
**Cover letter required


Job Description Summary:


PNAS, one of the world's most-cited multidisciplinary scientific journals, is seeking an Editorial Assistant to join our Editorial team. The Editorial Assistant provides administrative support for the processing and peer review of standard manuscript submissions. Handles routine phone and email inquiries from authors and reviewers. Works closely with the journal’s editorial board to facilitate the peer review process for articles submitted to PNAS. Reports to the Assistant Managing Editor or Senior Editorial Coordinator and keeps them informed about problem papers.
Job Description:
ESSENTIAL JOB DUTIES:
Responsible for overseeing all aspects of peer review coordination from submission to transmittal for research articles (Direct Submission and Brief Reports)
Complete quality control checks for incoming research articles
Correspond with authors, editors, and reviewers about needed items, deadline extensions, pending submissions, and status inquiries
Notify authors of manuscript decisions
Screen revisions for plagiarism and escalate to editorial ethics manager as needed
Monitor updates to the online submission systems and ensure requisite changes are made to the Information for Authors
Merge or update reviewer records with current information to maintain an up-to-date database/reviewer pool
Transmits manuscripts to production vendor
Act as the point of contact for production queries received from the production vendor
Contribute input for enhancements to the submission system
Perform a variety of clerical and administrative tasks such as answering general queries sent to the editorial inbox and answering the telephone
Special projects and additional tasks as assigned
Non-essential duties may include special projects and additional tasks as assigned.
Minimum Education/Training Requirements: High School Diploma, GED, or equivalent knowledge.
Minimum Experience: Two years of related experience.
Preferred Qualifications as follows:
Excellent written communication skills
Highly organized and detail-oriented
Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite, especially Excel
Proven ability to be a collegial and effective member of a team
Ability to read and comprehend complex material
Ability to solve intellectual problems using established rules, procedures, and precedents
Ability to handle sensitive material with discretion
Ability to work at a computer for extended periods of time
Applicants should include a cover letter describing their qualifications and interest in the position
Any qualification to be considered equivalent, in lieu of stated minimum, requires the prior approval of the Office of Human Resources.

Any qualification to be considered equivalent, in lieu of stated minimum, requires the prior approval of the Office of Human Resources.
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work performed by employees assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified. Some functions in this description may be specific to a particular unit of the National Academies and not applicable to other units.
Equal Opportunity Employer:
It is the policy of the National Academies to recruit, hire, transfer, compensate, and promote people in all job categories and to administer all other personnel actions, terms and conditions of employment in a manner that is consistent with equal employment, and does not discriminate on the basis of race, creed, ethnicity, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, religion, disability, medical condition for which a person has been rehabilitated or cured, marital status, family responsibilities, genetic information, political affiliation, personal appearance, matriculation, unemployment status, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws. It is also the institution's policy to recruit, hire, promote, and provide reasonable accommodation to qualified individuals with disabilities and covered veterans who are otherwise qualified.
Employee Type:
Employee
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
37.5
City/State:
Washington, District of Columbia",11150,Washington
179,"Integration Project Manager, Senior",Booz Allen Hamilton,"Washington, DC",None,"Key Role:
Support the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA) Office of Electronic Health Record Modernization (OEHRM) as an Integration Project Manager, Senior. Support implementation and testing in back-to-back Go-Live events. Complete Port Protocol and Service Management (PSSM) documentation and connectivity tests according to an established schedule. Create, track, and troubleshoot network and firewall change requests. Coordinate and facilitate engineering connectivity events between multiple technical stakeholders. Track, document, and run to closure firewall tickets and document processes, procedures, and troubleshooting event logs.
Basic Qualifications:
15+ years of experience with working in a professional environment
Experience in introducing new hardware or software into a new or existing environment while minimizing disruption and mitigating risks
Ability to create strategies and plans for integration of multiple IT systems and subsystems into an operational unit, ensuring full functional and performance capabilities are retained
Ability to coordinate with development and user teams to assess risks, goals and needs and ensure that all are adequately addressed
Ability to be cost conscience as well addressing goals
BA or BS degree in Math, Science, Engineering, CS, or Information Systems or 23+ years of experience with working in a professional environment in lieu of a degree
Additional Qualifications:
Experience in the Ports, Protocols and Service Management (PPSM) process
Experience in networking, protocols, and how technologies interact
Experience in troubleshooting network connectivity issues
Experience in the VA
Experience with implementing EHR
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",11150,Washington
180,SCC Project Manager,Yakshna Solutions,"Herndon, VA 20170","$112,000 a year","-
ID Job Title Job Description

5866605 SCC Project Manager
Our Virginia local state client is looking for an SCC - Project Manager 5 in Richmond, VA for full time, long term engagement. If interested, please submit your resume ASAP
SCC seeks a Senior Project Manager for implementation phase of the Virginia Health Benefit Exchange (Exchange Project).
Local candidates are HIGHLY preferred.
Depending on what Covid restrictions are in place when this person will start, they will likely sit remote until it is safe to return to the office. After that, this position is 100% onsite.
SCC seeks a Senior Project Manager for implementation phase of the Virginia Health Benefit Exchange (Exchange Project). The Exchange Project is to transition Virginia from a Federally Facilitated State Exchange to a State-Based Exchange on the Federal Platform (SBE-FP) meeting all transitional, legal, technological, and operational requirements by open enrollment on November 1, 2020. A team of around 25 are performing the necessary transition activities within 16 defined work streams.
Job responsibilities include coordination of the project workstreams through completion, ensuring that requirements are managed and met, maintenance of project objectives and timeline, tracking progress and setting parameters around deadlines, and logistical support of the teams.
The PM will keep leadership informed of key issues that may impact completion and be responsible for developing resolutions.
Skills required:
Risk and Issue Management – 5 years
Scope Management -5 years
Stakeholder Identification and Management -5 years
Schedule Management (including precedents and dependencies)- 5 years
Status Reporting -5 years
Budget Management – 5 years
Experience and certifications:
5 Years of experience in leading large, high-profile projects
PMP certification required
Bachelor’s degree in applicable discipline, or the equivalent is required.
Experience working in a structured Project Management Office
Experience in the entire project management lifecycle, from Initiation to Close-Out
Experience working in Government, Health Care or Insurance preferred
Location: 1300 E Broad Street, Richmond VA 23219
Annual Salary: $112K, plus Benefits
YSI is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.

Please e-mail your profile / referrals to resumes@yakshna.com",11150,Washington
181,Biological Scientist,DecisionPoint | Cortek,"Washington, DC 20520 (Foggy Bottom area)",None,"Overview:

DecisionPoint is a Biological Scientist to join our team supporting DHS CWMD requirements generation. This position requires an Active Secret clearance and the ability to obtain DHS Suitability. The position is located in Washington, DC.
With the threat of transnational terrorism and ongoing development of weapons of mass destruction (WMD) by nations potentially hostile to the U.S., DHS has taken steps to integrate the full range of its radiological, nuclear, chemical, and biological capabilities to enhance the nation’s abilities to prevent terrorists and other threat actors from using WMD, and support operational partners in closing capability gaps along adversary pathways. As the focal point for this effort, DHS Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction (CWMD) Operations Support Directorate (OSD) requires advisory and assistance services to effectively operationalize CWMD by developing and enhancing the capabilities of the DHS Components as well as federal, state, local, territorial and tribal (FSLTT) partners. LMI provides advisory and assistance services (program support, training and exercise, medical operations, information integration, requirements generation, and operational coordination) to CWMD Operations Support Directorate (OSD).
Duties & Responsibilities:
Work with other CWMD Directorates, DHS Components and interagency teams to identify gaps and develop documents for materiel and non-materiel solutions to address detection and interdiction of disease-causing organisms.
Interpret microbiological research as it pertains to developing requirements detection solutions and be able to explain biological processes to non-experts.
Work with Project/Program Managers to develop requirements generation documents, including Request for Requirements.
Prepare mission area and program status reports, briefing charts, and related materials as required.
Attend program reviews, technical meetings, workshops, conferences, site visits and field tests, and support studies and analysis as directed.
Support identification of capability gaps and shortfalls and preliminary recommendations for closure in terms of DOTMLPF+R/G/S.
Support development of requirements generation products (Capability Analysis Study Plan, Capability Analysis Report, Non-Material Change Recommendation, Mission Need Statement, Concept of Operations, Operational Requirements Document and Request for Requirements)
Support requirements generation in accordance with the DHS Joint Requirements Integration and Management System (JRIMS) process.

Qualifications:
Required Qualifications:
MS degree in Biology, Microbiology or related biological science.
Minimum of 8 years of experience working in Biology, Microbiology, or related field.
Active Secret clearance and the ability to obtain DHS Suitability.
Our Equal Employment Opportunity Policy:
The company is an equal opportunity employer. The company shall not discriminate against any employee or applicant because of race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender or gender identity (except where gender is a bona fide occupational qualification), national origin, age, disability, military/veteran status, marital status, genetic information or any other factor protected by law. We are committed to equal employment opportunity in all decisions related to employment, promotion, wages, benefits and all other privileges, terms, and conditions of employment.",11150,Washington
182,Customer Service/Sales,Home Depot,"Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)",None,"Job Description
Position Purpose:
Customer Service/Sales associates provide fast, friendly service by actively seeking out customers to assess their needs and provide assistance. These associates learn about products using our tools, and provide information to customers in order to sell an entire project. Associates in this position will learn how to greet, qualify, recommend and close every customer in their department, and know how to handle basics in adjacent departments. Customer Service/Sales associates maintain the in-stock condition of assigned areas, and ensure it is clean, shop-able, and safe. Each associate has the responsibility of providing a safe working and shopping environment by following all safety policies & standards, completing specified safety training, immediately correcting hazards & unsafe conditions or reporting conditions to the Manager on Duty, and working safely as not to endanger themselves, co-workers, vendors, or customers. These associates work in cooperation with their Department Supervisor and other associates in their department as well as other departments. Specific store departments may include Building Materials, Décor, Electrical, Flooring, Garden, Hardware, Kitchen & Bath, Lumber, Millwork, Paint, Plumbing and Tool Rental. The Customer Service/Sales position types may include Department Sales, Lead Generator, Pro Account Sales, Sales Specialist, Special Services, and Customer Order Specialist.",11150,Washington
183,IT Recruiter - Remote,ICF,"Fairfax, VA 22031",None,"Recruit for ICF | Find the work you believe in
ICF (NASDAQ: ICFI) is a $1.5 billion global consulting and digital services provider that operates with a nonprofit soul. With 7k+ people in 70 countries, we were just named one of Forbes’ 2020 Best America’s Best Management Consulting Firms for the sixth consecutive year and are named one of Forbes’ best Midsize employers.
We’re growing rapidly. And recruiting is at the core. We have a 50+ year legacy of world-changing work, doubling in size + revenue every five years on average for the last two decades. We’re seeking an experienced Technical Recruiter to support our IT Modernization division.
We work with purpose
At ICF, when it comes to tackling some of the world’s most complex problems, we’re right in the thick of it all.
Partnering with both government and commercial clients, our IT modernization team makes an impact: creating the systems that combat human trafficking, contributing our IT expertise to COVID-19 prevention, creating a data driven approach for smoking cessation efforts – and more.
Our philosophy is simple. IT Transformation is about more than codes and computers. It’s about building a future where technology paves the way for a better world.
Talent acquisition is in demand, and we know you can work anywhere. So, here’s more about our team to pique your interest:
Diversity & Inclusion is simply who we are and what we do.
We believe our role in educating others on the importance of building teams where everyone doesn’t look or think the same is one of the most important things we do.
We meet often to discuss our understanding of real topics like objectivity, bias, and how we can evolve our understanding.
We advise leaders on market data, talent supply, and slate representation.
We help our hiring teams prepare to answer the tough questions and help them position our company legacy of impacting our communities as the reason to choose us.
We believe in specialization and proactive recruiting.
We use Beamery CRM to build and keep in touch with our pipelines so we’re not starting over each and every time we get a new search.
We have Centers of Expertise to support data analytics, compliance, sourcing, recruitment marketing, and interview scheduling so you’re not in it alone!
What you will do:
Serve as SME for the full life cycle recruitment of technical and digital talent.
Responsible for full life-cycle recruitment process across a variety of levels and roles, to include Full Stack Developers/Engineers, Software Developers, Platform Architects, Business Analysts, Project Managers, Software Testers, Cloud Engineers, and more. Technologies include ServiceNow, Appian, AWS, etc.
Partner closely with hiring managers, as a trusted partner and valued advisor, building a deep understanding of their business, role requirements and desired candidate profiles while delivering outstanding client service.
Identify high quality candidates through the proactive sourcing of active and passive candidates via direct channels, job postings, social media, web sourcing, talent mapping, vendors and networking.
Be creative; leverage internal talent sources to drive mobility, employee referrals and alumni engagement nationwide.
Establish creative sourcing strategies to locate and secure candidates with hard-to-find technical skills sets across multiple geographies and often with time-sensitive deadlines.
Promote ICF career opportunities to the professional community via networking, conference attendance, social media and career events.
Update and maintain Workday Applicant Tracking System, while ensuring hiring processes adhere to EEO and OFCCP guidelines and other government compliance requirements.
Develop and define competitive intelligence by key market, functional area and skill set to support talent pipeline initiatives.
What you will need :
5+ years of IT Recruitment experience
Proven track record and ability to find, recruit, vet, and hire top talent with demonstrated expertise in hiring IT talent
Advanced skills in web search/sourcing, networking and direct sourcing
Working knowledge of OFCCP guidelines
What we would like:
Bachelor's degree or additional years of related experience
Experience with Management consulting
Experience with ServiceNow or Appian preferred
Hands on experience recruiting for talent in the federal/civilian agencies
Professional skills and experience:
Excellent verbal, interpersonal and written communication skills
Ability to be a consultant to the business-advising and guiding on best practices and ways to innovate
Strong analytical, problem-solving and decision-making capabilities
Team player with the ability to work in a fast-paced environment
Solid Microsoft Office Skills
#LI-CC1
#Indeed
#ICFRecruiter.21
Working at ICF
Working at ICF means applying a passion for meaningful work with intellectual rigor to help solve the leading issues of our day. Smart, compassionate, innovative, committed, ICF employees tackle unprecedented challenges to benefit people, businesses, and governments around the globe. We believe in collaboration, mutual respect, open communication, and opportunity for growth. If you’re seeking to make a difference in the world, visit www.icf.com/careers to find your next career. ICF—together for tomorrow.
ICF is an equal opportunity employer that values diversity at all levels. (EOE – Minorities/Females/ Protected Veterans Status/Disability Status/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity). For more information, please read our EEO & AA policy .
Reasonable Accommodations are available for disabled veterans and applicants with disabilities in all phases of the application and employment process. To request an accommodation please email icfcareercenter@icf.com and we will be happy to assist. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodations. Read more about non-discrimination: EEO is the law and Pay Transparency Statement .
Fairfax, VA (VA01)",11150,Washington
184,Recruiter,Uber,"Washington, DC 20020 (Fairlawn area)",None,"Talent Acquisition partners with Uber's businesses to understand their talent needs and find, engage, and guide candidates through the hiring process. We hire the right people for every job and help them find a team where they can make the biggest impact.
About the Role
In this role, you are the go-to person who will advise hiring teams and own the recruitment strategy to deliver an outstanding recruitment experience.
We are looking for a Recruiter to support multiple business lines and scale Global Marketing & Performance Marketing, Policy, and Comms hiring across US/Canada. You will partner with sourcing and hiring managers to build teams across our dynamic region, and inform on hiring strategy to hire the right people for every job where they can make the biggest impact. You may also have the opportunity to work on strategic projects to improve and innovate how we attract and recruit the best talent because we know that there's always a better way!
What You'll Do
Guides the stakeholder through unique situations, sensitivities, and competing priorities using thoughtful business-backed and empathetic solutions
Regularly assesses data to ensure reliability via established dashboards and reports
Communicates complex data into comprehensive narratives
Uses market knowledge to advise Hiring Managers on potential bottlenecks and develops a strategy to influence the candidates' decision to join
Understands interdependencies between functions (e.g. Mobility, Comp, Immigration, etc.) and adjusts recruiting strategy to align
Continuously reviews the assessment process and proactively realigns with Hiring Managers when faced with bottlenecks
Solid understanding of talent distribution via talent mapping, and uses this knowledge to develop and tailor effective pipeline strategies
Basic Qualifications
Minimum of 3 years of professional experience
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Business, HR, Communications or similar preferred
5+ years of experience in recruiting
Experience with ICIMS or other ATS
Experience in full-cycle recruiting in a fast-paced environment
Previous corporate recruiting experience is a plus
Experience interpreting data and using it to guide hiring decisions
Has partnered with a wide variety of clients, including senior level business leaders and seasoned professional candidates
Has experience hiring in an organization focused on culture
At Uber, we ignite opportunity by setting the world in motion. We take on big problems to help drivers, riders, delivery partners, and eaters get moving in more than 10,000 cities around the world.
We welcome people from all backgrounds who seek the opportunity to help build a future where everyone and everything can move independently. If you have the curiosity, passion, and collaborative spirit, work with us, and let's move the world forward, together.
Uber is proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know by completing the form.",11150,Washington
185,IT Support Specialist,Allied Telecom,"Arlington, VA 22202 (Aurora Highlands area)","$50,000 - $62,000 a year","The primary responsibility of the IT Support Specialist is to provide IT support services to all end users by effectively gathering, evaluating, and utilizing relevant information to resolve all software and hardware related problems. The IT Support Specialist will communicate effectively with end-users by phone, e-mail, or other electronic communication and in-person to resolve issues and provide training of the IT infrastructure, as necessary. The IT Support Specialist will work closely with their manager and peers to escalate problems in a timely manner to ensure end-user satisfaction.
Key areas of responsibility:

Serve as the primary point of contact for all IT related technical issues and support questions
Perform day-to-day administration of all Allied systems (i.e. Salesforce, Rev.io, Zendesk, Okta, etc.)
Perform day-to-day desktop support functions (Windows, Mac, Linux)
Support ticket management, information gathering, and resolution
Maintain an accurate record of all IT-provided equipment
Assist in the procurement of additional IT-provided equipment as necessary
Provide user-friendly e-mail, phone, and in-person support as necessary
Perform day-to-day support and administration of the Allied phone system
Responsible for moves, adds, and changes as necessary
Perform day-to-day maintenance and support of the printer and copier systems
Perform day-to-day maintenance and support of the company audio-visual equipment
Identify and implement cost-effective solutions meeting end-user requirements
Escalate issues in a timely manner to ensure high-level customer satisfaction
Assist with the development of technical documentation of existing and future systems
Provide training to new and existing users and provide guidance on how to effectively utilize all Allied systems
Develop and create customizations for all Allied Systems based on user request (ie. Reports, Dashboards, etc.)
Lead IT small projects, including the design and deployment of new IT systems and services impacting a subset of users
Keep abreast of new technologies and provide recommendations for system improvements
Willing to work outside of core hours
Other duties as they are assigned


Qualifications

2-3+ years of corporate IT Helpdesk experience
Working knowledge of IT networks, ISP Services, Routing Protocols, VoIP, Network Management, Routers, and Switches
Desire to share expertise and knowledge to improve the technical capabilities of Allied
Thirst for knowledge and desire to stay on the forward edge of evolving technology trends
Excellent organizational, verbal, written communication, and interpersonal skills with a high degree of attention to detail.
Must possess strong interpersonal skills and have the ability to interact with all levels of employees in a professional manner.
As an essential function of this position, the employee must be able to handle high levels of stress satisfactorily and be congenial with other employees and customers at all times.
Standard office/computer equipment with knowledge of various software packages, operating systems, and operational support systems.
CompTIA A+ Certification or equivalent coursework",11150,Washington
186,Project Assistant,Enovational,"Washington, DC 20005 (Downtown area)",None,"Enovational Corp is a fast growing technology startup building web and mobile applications. We specialize in delivering award-winning user experiences paired with solid technology, as both client solutions and our own consumer products. We believe our successes come from our teamwork and mutual respect for each other’s talents and unique perspectives.
So when we say we are looking for an Project Assistant, yes, we do need someone who can provide support for one or more of our Product Managers, but what we’re looking for is another team member who is versatile enough to help with—and grow in—a number of different professional disciplines and will do what it takes to help us shape amazing products.
What you might do on any given day:
Learn to assist the Product Managers in translating ideas and requirements into user stories that will guide our development team in not only what to build, but also provide context as to who will be using the various features and why
Assist in the creation and maintenance of deliverables for internal technical teams and clients, such as user stories, product roadmaps, and training documentation
Interface with clients and end-users to support the Product Managers in identifying challenges and opportunities for improvement in existing processes and solutions
Review and analyze documents from clients to produce findings and present to the team
Collaborate with Product Managers by monitoring communications and emails from internal and external personnel
Participate in testing efforts by experiencing the product the way a user would and providing feedback and communicating errors to the technical team
Manage necessary logistics for conference calls, meetings, and/or demos, including coordinating complex meeting schedules and reserving conference rooms
Record and log meeting minutes from internal and external project meetings

We’re a small team so there will be a lot of getting-it-done without worrying about who is “supposed” to do it. So in addition to being the glue that helps bind our office together, you will also get on-the-job training from senior team members so you can help with other types of work, such as:

Business Analysis - Collaborating with stakeholders to translate client and users needs into product requirements, use cases, and agile user stories
Project Management - Creating status reports that keep our clients informed about our team’s performance and progress
Quality Assurance - Testing products, assessing quality factors affecting functionality and design specifications, and documenting problems and defects
Training & Support - Assisting users in troubleshooting, collecting feedback, and educating our customers on how to get the most out of our products
Training & Support - Collecting feedback on our solutions and assisting users by troubleshooting and educating them on how to get the most out of our products
We think you’ll enjoy working with our team if you:
Love interacting and communicating with people; You’re not only a great listener, but you also know how to share and present to others
Are eager to learn more about the different roles, types of work, and skill sets it takes to build web and mobile applications
Don’t get overwhelmed or flustered easily. You’re able to keep track of multiple tasks at once, manage your time efficiently, and appropriately prioritize your work
Take initiative, aren’t afraid to fail, ask thoughtful questions, and constantly seek better ways of working and communicating
Have a positive yet practical attitude; You are willing to take on any task that might help take one of our products, or our company, a little further
This position might not be for you if you:
Have a hard time multitasking and prefer to focus on a single duty at a time
Aren't comfortable working directly with clients and users, and not willing to travel to Maryland or D.C. to meet with them in person
Work better in structured environments or have trouble with ambiguity and uncertainty
If you’re interested in applying:
Our ideal candidate is going to hold an associate's or bachelor's degree, and we’d love to hear the story of how your degree in Journalism, Marketing, Psychology, Business, or anything else is going to help you add to our team. Previous work experience is a plus, but what we really need is an individual with the passion to learn new skills and do what it takes to help our team be successful. We’re a growing company and care very much about creating an amazing work environment with great growth opportunities, and hope that you’ll join us early on and help shape a bright and exciting future for our ambitious company.
To apply, fill out the form below and submit:

Your resume
A cover letter telling us about a feat of organization or multi-tasking you’ve accomplished in the past or simply a description why you want this job.

If you have any additional questions, please contact careers@enovational.com",11150,Washington
187,"Surge Project Manager, Global Health Technical Assistance and Mission Support",Dexis Consulting Group,"Washington, DC",None,"About Us:
Dexis is a professional services firm that solves the most pressing social challenges in complex environments, paving the way for a more secure and prosperous world.
Dexis embraces diversity, equity, and inclusion and strives to build and maintain a safe environment where we celebrate diverse backgrounds, treat everyone with respect, and value the unique lived experiences each person brings based on their race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, disability, military or veteran status, national origin, age, marital status or family status and related conditions.
At Dexis, you will experience a corporate culture of inclusiveness, fairness, and trust. You will be given the means and mentorship needed to succeed, and your creativity will be rewarded.
About the Position:

Dexis is seeking a Project Manager to work with the Global Health Technical Assistance and Mission Support (GH-TAMS) project team in Washington, DC. GH-TAMS, a five-year contract funded by the United States Agency for International Development (USAID), provides USAID operating units working on health-related activities in headquarters and the field with access to high-quality technical, management, and USAID expertise to support health programs. GH-TAMS assists GH and missions with this expertise through short- and medium-term consultant services, supporting USAID’s global health strategic priorities: 1) Preventing child and maternal deaths; 2) Controlling the HIV/AIDS epidemic; and 3) Combating infectious diseases.
This is a surge support position and is intended to provide coverage for planned leave for five to six months.

Responsibilities:

The Project Manager will manage logistics and assignment procedures for GH-TAMS assignments. Specifically, the Project Manager will be responsible for the following tasks and activities:
Manage the assignment planning process, including refining scopes of work (SOWs) and cost estimates, developing implementation timelines, etc.
Responsible for all logistical support for consultants and GH-TAMS teams both in the United States and overseas.
Provide technical input for select contract deliverables including ensuring quality control and oversight for assignment report content, preparation, and production.
Ensure necessary USAID approvals are obtained in a timely manner by preparing official letters and notifications to USAID clients other key stakeholders.
Participate and/or chair team-wide meetings and initiatives.
Promote integration and cross-fertilization of ideas and information across assignments.
Other duties as assigned.

Qualifications:
Minimum Requirements:
MPA, MPH, MA or similar degree in international development and/or health preferred.
At least two years of work experience in managing international health programs or projects.
Knowledge of international public health and development issues.
Must be a team player and work well in groups.
Outstanding written and oral communication skills.
Must work well with minimum supervision and flexibility.
Proactive in anticipating work requirements and problem solving.
Oral and written fluency in English required. Fluency in another language highly desired.
Preferred Requirements:
Experience and/or familiarity with international development preferred, with 1-2 years of overseas experience.
Oral and written fluency in another language desired.
Strict attention to detail.
Superior organizational and time management skills.
Excellent skills in teamwork and interpersonal communication.
Dexis is on a mission to help solve today’s most pressing global political, social, and economic challenges and create a world where all people are safe and prosperous. As a Dexis employee, you will be challenged, empowered, and mentored. Our motto is “find a way or make a way” — that’s how Dexis goes “all in.” How will you?
If you are passionate about this opportunity, apply now!
Only those applicants who meet the above criteria will be contacted for interview.
Dexis is an Equal Opportunity Employer, and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, sex, national origin, religion, pregnancy, disability, age, genetic information, military service, veteran status, ethnicity, citizenship, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, childbirth and related medical conditions, including lactation, or any other protected class under applicable law.",11150,Washington
188,Executive Secretary I (Part-time),"Tuvli, LLC","Washington, DC",None,"Tuvli, an Akima Company, is dedicated to providing our customers with superior, integrated technology and program support services and solutions. Our systems engineering, information technology, information assurance, program support and project management staff work closely with customers to ensure that our solutions are directly aligned with their business processes and desired program outcomes. We emphasize affordability, and delivering the best value for technology investments. Our personnel enjoy competitive benefits packages and challenging roles in work environments committed to innovation, diversity and opportunity for career growth. As an Alaska Native Corporation (ANC), 100% of our company’s profits go back to our 14,300 Iñupiat shareholders that have resided near and above the Arctic Circle for more than 10,000 years. Our business helps support their way of life and contributes to the survival of a culture that has thrived in a challenging environment.

Responsibilities:
Reads and analyzes incoming memos, submissions, and reports in order to determine their significance and plan their distribution;
Opens, sorts and distributes incoming correspondence, including faxes and email;
Prepares responses to correspondences containing routine inquiries;
Files and retrieves documents, records, and reports;
Greets all personnel entering CA/FO and escorts personnel as required;
Makes travel arrangements for FO management, utilizing E2;
Submits Time and Attendance reporting for FO personnel and maintain all T&A supporting documents for FO personnel;
Assists with coordinating meetings, scheduling conference rooms, ordering supplies, and other administrative duties;  Works with CA’s Staff Assistants and Executive Assistants to monitor internal tasks, deadlines, and deliverables;
Receives and screens telephone calls and visitors; follows up to ensure necessary action is initiated, and subsequently works to assure that such action is completed as quickly as possible, as applicable and appropriate;
Enters all forms of correspondence in final form including cables, memorandums, letters, briefing papers, etc.;
Maintains the calendar for office management by arranging and scheduling appointments, handling all meeting requests and providing calendar information to management on a daily basis;
Prepares meeting briefs to managers indicating appointment purpose and providing any relevant background data;
Records minutes from meetings;
Performs other appropriate administrative assignments such as document replication, ordering office supplies, inventorying office supplies, and other administrative duties as assigned;
Maintains work area in a professional manner at all times (work area must be clean, presentable, and organized, per COR guidance);
Ensures automation equipment is operational (paper in the copier/fax machine, changes out printer ink cartridges, calls in work orders);
Assists with setting up conference calls, coordinating with IT personal to setup conferences requiring IT support; and
Assists with prepping conference rooms before and after social events and official events during the work day.
Qualifications
Minimum Qualifications:
2+ years of related experience
Active Secret Clearance
Shall work three (3) 8HR work days per week for a total of 24 HRs a week.
Knowledge of Microsoft Office software (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Access, etc.);
Excellent organizational, communication and writing skills;
Excellent customer service skills, including customer needs assessments, meeting quality standards for services, and evaluation of customer satisfaction; and
Ability to interact effectively with others in particular, colleagues and personnel at various Department levels.
The duties and responsibilities listed in this job description generally cover the nature and level of work being performed by individuals assigned to this position. This is not intended to be a complete list of all duties, responsibilities, and skills required. Subject to the terms of an applicable collective bargaining agreement, the company management reserves the right to modify, add, or remove duties and to assign other duties as may be necessary. We wish to thank all applicants for their interest and effort in applying for the position; however, only candidates selected for interviews will be contacted.
We are an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will receive consideration for employment, without regard to race, color, religion, creed, national origin, gender or gender-identity, age, marital status, sexual orientation, veteran status, disability, pregnancy or parental status, or any other basis prohibited by law.

We are committed to Equal Employment Opportunity and providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with physical and/or mental disabilities. If you have a physical and/or mental disability and are interested in applying for employment and need special accommodations to use our website to apply for a position please contact, Recruiting Services at job-assist@akima.com or 571-353-7053. Reasonable accommodation requests are considered on a case-by-case basis.

The dedicated email and telephonic options above are reserved only for individuals with disabilities needing accessibility assistance to apply to an open position using our website.

Please do not use the dedicated email or phone number above to inquire on the status of your job application.

In order for our company to stay compliant with government regulations, please apply on line. Please DO NOT email resumes or call in lieu of applying online unless you have a physical and/or mental disability and need assistance with the online application.


Shift: Day Job
Primary Location: US-DC-Washington
Organization: Tuvli, LLC
Job: Office & Administrative Support
Closing Date (Period for Applying) - External: Ongoing
Travel: Yes, 25 % of the Time
Clearance Level: SECRET",11150,Washington
189,Environmental Protection Specialist,US Department of Energy,"Washington, DC 20004 (Downtown area)","$103,690 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is part of the Loan Programs Office, Department Of Energy. As an Environmental Protection Specialist, you will serve as an expert advisor and provides leadership for broad Department of Energy (DOE) environmental management/protection efforts. Formulate overall environmental strategy for assigned program or projects and provides leadership for broad and complex DOE environmental programs.
Responsibilities
As a Environmental Protection Specialist, you will:
Serve as an expert advisor and provides leadership for broad environmental management/protection efforts.
Advise the Director of Environmental Compliance for the Loan Programs Office (LPO) on National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA)-related matters
Formulate environmental compliance strategies for programs and/or projects to facilitate efficiency and efficacy of the environmental review processes
Assist in the development, implementation, and revision of Environmental compliance polices and procedures.
Pursue outreach opportunities to identify prospective applicants and projects for possible loan and loan guarantee underwriting.
Develops, interprets, and provides guidance documents to address complex environmental approaches, projects, and programs designed to solve novel and challenging environmental management problems.

Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
0028 Environmental Protection Specialist
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a United States Citizen.
This employer participates in the e-Verify program.
Males must abide by Selective Service registration requirements.
Subject to satisfactory security and suitability requirements
You will be required to submit a Financial Disclosure Statement, OGE-450, Executive Branch Personnel Confidential Financial Disclosure Report upon entering the position and annually (5CFR Part 2634, Subpart I USOGE, 6/08).
A one year probationary period may be required.
This position is included in a Bargaining Agreement.
Qualifications
GS-13:

SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS: A qualified candidate's online application and resume must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the next lower grade level in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position is defined as:
1) Oversight of environmental compliance documentation efforts for NEPA, National Historic Preservation Act, Endangered Species Act, Clean Water Act, Clean Air Act and related regulations;
2) Evaluate environmental statutes, regulations and policies to determine the impact on and requirements for existing and proposed projects; and
3) Advise potential applicants on environmental compliance requirements for proposed projects.GS-14:
SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS: A qualified candidate's online application and resume must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the next lower grade level in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position is defined as:
1)Formulating environmental compliance strategies for programs and/or projects to facilitate efficiency and efficacy of the environmental review processes;
2) Developing policies and procedures for comprehensive environmental reviews of projects and programs;
3) Serving as technical expert providing information to leadership on environmental laws, regulations, and related implementation guidance; to ensure environmental compliance; and
4) Prepare documents for internal and external stakeholders to provide key environmental information on compliance programs.

The OPM Group Qualification Standard for this position is: https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/classification-qualifications/general-schedule-qualification-standards/#url=GS-ADMIN

Your application and resume should demonstrate that you possess the following competencies. Do not provide a separate narrative written statement. Rather, you must describe in your resume how your past work experience demonstrates that you possess the competencies identified below. Use specific examples of employment or experience contained in your resume and describe how this experience has prepared you to successfully perform the duties of this position.

Legal, Government and Jurisprudence
Manages and Organizes Information
Planning and Evaluating
Technical Competence

""Experience"" refers to paid and unpaid experience. Examples of qualifying unpaid experience may include: volunteer work done through National Service programs (such as Peace Corps and AmeriCorps); as well as work for other community-based philanthropic and social organizations. Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills; and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience. Time-in-Grade: Current Federal employees must meet time-in-grade requirements by the closing date of this announcement to receive consideration. CTAP/ICTAP candidates: To be considered ""well qualified"" you must meet all of the requirements as described in this section. You must meet all qualifications and eligibility requirements by the closing date of this announcement.
Education
Some federal jobs allow you to substitute your education for the required experience in order to qualify. For this job, you must meet the qualification requirement using experience alone-no substitution of education for experience is permitted.
Additional information
The U.S. Department of Energy fosters a diverse and inclusive workplace and is an Equal Opportunity Employer.

New employees to the Department of Energy will be required to successfully pass the E-Verify employment verification check. To learn about E-Verify, including your rights and responsibilities, visit www.dhs.gov/E-Verify.
Veterans and persons with disabilities are encouraged to apply. For more information, please visit the links at the bottom of this page or visit the FedsHireVets website.
If you believe that you are eligible for the Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP), please visit the OPM ICTAP/CTAP website for more information. In order to be considered under the ICTAP program, your application must score within the pre-established ""well qualified"" category as stated in the Qualifications section.
More than one selection may be made from this vacancy announcement.
Some positions may require completion of a probationary period of up to 1 (one) year.
Many positions require successful completion of a background investigation.
Application, resume, and assessment questionnaire must be completed online.
Your performance appraisal and incentive awards will be given due consideration in the selection process based on their relation to the duties of the position and the consistency with which they may be considered in evaluating you against other candidates.

Hiring incentives may be authorized in accordance with agency policy and if funding is available.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the eligibility and qualification requirements above. Once the announcement closes, we will conduct a review of your application package to verify your eligibility and qualifications. If you are found qualified, your application will move forward to additional phases of the review process.

Merit Promotion & VEOA Procedures: If you are minimally qualified for this job, your responses to the self-assessment questions (True/False, Yes/ No, Multiple Choice questions) will be evaluated to determine if you are a best qualified candidate. If you rate yourself higher than is supported by your application materials, your responses may be adjusted and/or you may be excluded from consideration for this job. Due weight will also be given to federal employees, when applicable, for performance appraisals and awards in accordance with 5 CFR § 335.103(b)(3). Federal employees must meet time-in-grade requirements and current employees must have at least a fully successful or equivalent performance rating to receive consideration.

Your qualifications will be evaluated on the following competencies (knowledge, skills, abilities, and other characteristics):
Legal, Government and Jurisprudence
Manages and Organizes Information
Planning and Evaluating
Technical Competence

Non-competitive Procedures: If you are applying under a non-competitive or special hiring authority, you will still be required to answer the assessment questions. However, you will not be evaluated against the rating and ranking criteria.
Your resume and supporting documentation will be used to determine if you are minimally qualified for this job. Veterans' Preference will be applied when required by the hiring authority (e.g., VRA, Schedule A).

All qualified Non-competitive applicants and the best qualified Merit Promotion and VEOA applicants will be referred to the hiring manager for consideration.

Career Transition Assistance Programs: To receive selection priority for this position, you must: 1) meet the eligibility criteria; and 2) be rated ""well-qualified"", which is defined as having a score of 85 or better.

You must meet all qualifications and eligibility requirements by the closing date ( 06/16/2021) of this announcement.

To preview the Assessment Questionnaire, click https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11133755.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Non-sensitive (NS)/Low Risk
Trust determination process
Credentialing, Suitability/Fitness
Required Documents

Required Documents
To apply for this position, you MUST provide a complete application package which includes:

Your RESUMEshowing all relevant work experience (paid and unpaid) including: duties performed; full name and address of the each employer; start and end dates (month/day/year); work schedule (part-time, full-time, number of hours if intermittent); salary; and any completed education and training (program title, subject area, number of hours completed, and completion date).
Cover Letter, optional, expressing additional information not covered in your resume.
Transcripts, if specific educational requirements are indicated in this job announcement. Unofficial transcripts or any report listing institution, course title, credits earned (semester or quarter hour) and final grade is acceptable. It is your responsibility to provide adequate proof that you meet the educational requirements.
Submit one or more of the following to support your eligibility(s) to apply to this job announcement:
SF-50, ""Notification of Personnel Action"" (current/former federal employees): Most recent Promotion, Within Rate Increase (WRI/WGI), or Appointment/Conversion SF-50 or Notification of Personnel Action showing you are/were in the competitive service and the highest grade or promotion potential held.
Veterans: DD-214 Member Copy 4 showing type of discharge/character of service; current active duty members- certification of expected discharge or release from active duty under honorable conditions dated within 120 days; SF-15 Form and related documentation; VA letter. For more information visit the USAJOBS Help Center & OPM CHCOC website for VOW information.
Individuals with Disabilities: Schedule A letter from a physician, local, state or federal rehabilitation office citing your eligibility under 5 CFR 213.3102 (u). For more information visit the USAJOBS Help Center.
Certain Military Spouses: Permanent Change of Station (PCS) orders authorizing you to accompany the Military member to the new duty permanent station; OR verification of the member's 100% disability (VA Letter); and/or verification of the member's death while on active duty (DD-1300 and Death Certificate) AND verification of the marriage to the service member (i.e., a marriage license or other legal documentation verifying marriage). For more information visit the USAJOBS Help Center.
Other non-competitive or special appointing authorities: provide documentation which supports your eligibility.
Career Transition Assistance Program/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program documentation, if applicable(e.g., Certification of Expected Separation, Reduction-In-Force Separation Notice, or Notice of Proposed Removal; SF-50 that documents the RIF separation action; and most recent performance appraisal.) For more information see the OPM Guide to Career Transition.
Failure to submit any of the above mentioned required documents may result in loss of consideration due to an incomplete application package. It is your responsibility to ensure all required documents have been submitted.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Federal employees - Excepted service
Current excepted service federal employees.
Individuals with disabilities
Military spouses
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Status Candidates (Merit Promotion and VEOA Eligible): Applications will be accepted from current and former competitive service Federal employees, and people eligible under special hiring authorities such as the Veterans Employment Opportunity Act (VEOA), Disabilities Program, etc.",11150,Washington
190,General Manager,Alamo Drafthouse Cinema,"Washington, DC 20002 (Capitol Hill area)",None,"Alamo Drafthouse Cinema is looking for an experienced General Manager for our flagship Washington, DC location who wants to join us in our Mission; To Ensure EVERY Guest Has An AWESOME Experience And Is EXCITED To Come Back. Alamo Drafthouse Cinema is an industry leader in the Dine-In Theater space. We are a place for movies, special presentations & programs, creative and delicious food (made from our scratch kitchen), and beverages of all sorts, all under one roof!The General Manager is a champion of their people and a brand representative who aligns with and reinforces the company values, goals and mission statement while ensuring Alamo Drafthouse Cinemas’ standards of quality and service are achieved consistently. They are also responsible for developing their people to achieve the efficient and profitable execution of operations within the venue, while creating an AWESOME WORK EXPERIENCE for their teams.OUR CORE VALUESDO THE RIGHT THINGWe strive to be a force of good in our company, in our industry and in the world. We stand up for our beliefs even when it is hard. We start from a place of kindness.FOSTER COMMUNITYWe value what is unique about each other and celebrate our differences. We treat each other with respect, support each other’s passions, and help each other grow. We welcome healthy debate but don’t tolerate intolerance. We take this commitment outside our 4 walls, creating neighborhood theaters that are deeply tied to the local community.BOLDLY GOLike the crew of the Starship Enterprise™, we seek out new experiences and pursue innovation in all of our work. We take risks and chart new territory. We learn from our mistakes and continuously improve.GIVE A SH!TWe are passionate about creating awesome experiences. We obsess over every detail and take pride in our work because we know it makes all the difference to our guests and our teammates. Our pursuit of excellence drives us to do our best.CORE ROLE RESPONSIBILITIES❏ Uphold standards of behavior as defined by the company Core Values, Code of Conduct and Operational Guidelines❏ Oversee effective communication standards within the venue, including but not limited to: weekly operation leader meetings, quarterly All-Staff meetings, daily information sharing with teams, etc.❏ Consult and execute on elements of local marketing❏ Develop team to build bench and execute L&D as a means of improving retention❏ Uphold standards of facility and equipment within venue❏ Manages all COGs for the building - acts as final approver for normal purchases and expenditures❏ Demonstrates and shares knowledge of competitors and market for better positioning and sales❏ Thought partner to Senior Operations Leadership for improving processes and/or programs❏ Capitalizes on opportunities to enhance and expand audience and experiences❏ Provides financial analysis of venue performance monthly for Area Director and Senior Leadership❏ Understands, analyzes and speaks to P&L and GL each period and identifies areas of opportunity❏ Continuously develops the salaried managers in their venue❏ Delivers performance/goal reviews of salaried team on a quarterly basisQUALIFICATIONS❏ Proven leadership and motivational skills along with displaying a professional appearance and being a positive role model. Must hold self and others accountable to consistently maintain high performance and behavior standards❏ High School Diploma/GED or equivalent combination of education and experience❏ 3 to 5 years as a high-volume (7-10 million annual revenue) General Manager with extensive knowledge of total operations in a restaurant setting (previous dine-in theater management is beneficial)❏ Basic computer knowledge (Microsoft Office and/or G-Suite) and office skills required❏ Possesses strong skills in problem solving, guest relations, verbal and written communication, along with the ability to multitask projects simultaneously.BENEFITS:-Competitive bi-weekly salary-Strong medical benefits plan health, dental and vision with a 50% company contribution-401k opportunity (coming soon 2022)-Flexible Spending Account opportunity (coming soon 2021)-Emergency assistance program-Quarterly bonus plan with profit sharing available to all salaried managers-Vacation/PTO· 2 weeks accrued per year (able to use 1 week after 6 months in year 1)· 3 weeks accrued per year after 4 years employment-Manager comp card-· General Managers and Chefs $300 per month for movies, food and beverage.· Assistant Managers and Sous Chefs $150 per month for movies, food and beverage.-Daily shift meals-Team member referral program-$1000 for a salaried manager referral after 90 days of employment-Annual holiday party and other staff engagement events-Quarterly Team building events-Flexible scheduling-Comp days for approved holidays- July 4th, Thanksgiving, Christmas-Company sponsored contests with rewards for winners-Continuous training through Alamo University to ensure growth-By movie lovers and for movie lovers, Alamo offers a high energy work environment with bad ass films + awesome food and drinks-Two new venues under construction creating additional growth opportunitiesJob Type: Full-timeBenefits:Dental insuranceEmployee assistance programEmployee discountFlexible scheduleHealth insurancePaid time offReferral programVision insuranceSchedule:10 hour shiftDay shiftHolidaysMonday to FridayNight shiftWeekend availabilitySupplemental Pay:Bonus payEducation:High school or equivalent (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",11150,Washington
191,IT Project Manager,Leidos,"Reston, VA 20190 (Sunset Hills area)",None,"Description
Job Description:
The Rosy Boa contract has an immediate opening for an IT Project Manager to work in Herndon, Virginia. This is an opportunity to use your combined technical expertise, financial management and project oversight to manage a portfolio of high profile agile software development projects.
Duties include but not are not limited to performing timeline analysis, requirements allocation and interface definition, technical management, integration, agile implementation and running daily scrums.
Primary Responsibilities:
The successful candidate will have demonstrated experience interacting with project customers to communicate milestones, progress, barriers, risks, and updates, demonstrated experience identifying and implementing process efficiencies, demonstrated experience solving complex problems or issues with new solutions and have the ability to lead teams to accomplish varying objectives by prioritizing tasks and resolving risks and barriers.
Responsibilities include but are not limited:Technical oversight of a portfolio of projects involving varying technologies to include JAVA, Javascript, Node, Angular and ServiceNow and Financial management of the project portfolio – projects have individual budgets that require management at an SLA level. This includes resource allocation, milestones and work breakdown structures.Project planning and time management for the portfolio of projects.
Agile implementation on a two week sprint & daily scrum schedule
Basic Qualifications:
Requires a BA degree and at least 8 years of prior relevant experience or Masters with 6 years of prior relevant experience.Requires a TS/SCI with Polygraph to be consideredDemonstrated experience interacting with project customers to communicate milestones, progress, barriers, risks, and updates.Demonstrated experience identifying and implementing process efficiencies.Demonstrated experience solving complex problems or issues with new solutions.Ability to lead teams to accomplish varying objectives by prioritizing tasks and resolving risks and barriers.Demonstrated experience in developing program plans, resource requirements and schedules to achieve project goals and financial management of software development projects.Demonstrated experience implementing streamlined processes and procedures for established programs.Demonstrated experience with project management to include project management processes and project management life cycle/control gates.Demonstrated experience with technical integration projects requiring technical depth and skills.
Preferred Qualifications:
Demonstrated experience with oral and written communication skills – the ability to communicate information and ideas in a manner that is understandable, responsive, and customer-focused.Demonstrated experience identifying the strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions or approaches to problems.Demonstrated experience identifying complex problems and reviewing related information to develop and evaluate options and implement solutions.Demonstrated experience in providing customer service.Demonstrated experience in planning and scheduling, to include experience in developing program plans, resource requirements, and schedules to achieve Program goals.Demonstrated experience working with Microsoft Office to include PowerPoint, Excel, Word, and Outlook.Project Manager Professional (PMP) Certification
External Referral Bonus:
Eligible
External Referral Bonus $:
5000.00
Potential for Telework:
No
Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph
Travel:
Yes, 10% of the time
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Shift:
Day
Requisition Category:
Professional
Job Family:
Proj and Prog Management
Pay Range:",11150,Washington
192,Customer Success Manager,CoSo Cloud LLC,"Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)",None,"About CoSo Cloud LLC:
CoSo Cloud is a trusted, private cloud-managed services provider for businesses and government agencies that need the highest reliability and security for their virtual training and web conferencing. The CoSo Cloud platform meets or exceeds most security and regulatory compliance requirements for SOC 2, HIPAA, HITRUST and FedRAMP. As an authorized Adobe Connect® Gold partner, CoSo offers professional services for planning, designing, implementing, securing and managing complex, mission-critical networks and systems. This includes developing customized use cases and integrations for Adobe Connect and Zoom.
Global enterprises and government agency customers rely upon CoSo to complete their solutions when security, compliance, and reliability requirements demand more from virtual meetings and learning management systems. CoSo Cloud is an Adobe Connect and Captivate Prime partner based in Oakland, CA with an office in Washington D.C. and employees in North America and Europe.
Primary Responsibilities:

Nurture client relationships with key customer stakeholders and executive sponsors through account management to ensure the optimal customer experience
Coordinate internal teams as the customer advocate for superior service, collaboration and delivery that exceeds expectations
Manage customer relationship-building through product knowledge, proactive planning, and follow through execution
Drive adoption of services and identify upsell opportunities as a solutions consultant based upon the customer’s business use case
Regularly analyze key account performance metrics and make recommendations
Ensure the customer’s contract commitments are being met internally by all service organizations
Coordinate the renewal process, ensuring accurate price quotations, managing the communications and negotiations with purchasing agents to ensure agreements are closed timely
Collaborate with cross-functional business and technical teams to ensure the customer’s contract commitments are being met internally by all service organizations
Maintain a deep understanding of our products and solutions – along with customer use requirements vis-à-vis any competitive offerings

Required Skills and Experience:

Direct experience managing customer experiences with technology services- selling and servicing enterprise accounts
Understanding complex partner relationships and knowledge of navigating business relationships
Experience in client facing roles where responsive communications skills are paramount
Managing client expectations around changing priorities and communicating potential risks
Working knowledge of project life cycle and managing multiple projects simultaneously
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Ability to learn new technologies and product features
A relentless self-learner and starter who thrives in a highly dynamic environment

Company Perks:

Healthcare Insurance
Paid Time Off
401(k) with company matching
Flexible Schedule

It is the policy of CoSo Cloud LLC to provide equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, status as a disabled veteran, recently separated or other covered veteran, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. In addition, CoSo Cloud will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. Qualified applicants with criminal histories will be considered for the position in a manner consistent with the Fair Chance Ordinance.
This is a remote position.",11150,Washington
193,Project Manager - IT Services,NeoSystems,"Tysons Corner, VA",None,"Job purpose

The NeoSystems IT Services Project Management Office (PMO) manages projects and activities for all IT Services organizations. As such, the PMO has an opportunity for a Technical Project Manager that will become part of an integrated team of professionals supporting our customers embarking on technology implementations focused on security technologies, cyber security, and compliance in an agile and adaptive methodology.


Duties and responsibilities

Management and delivery of cybersecurity solutions.
Develop detailed and integrated project plans including dependencies, risks and resources
Establish and review project budgets
Lead project planning sessions
Coordinating staff and internal resources
Project status reporting and performance monitoring
Ensuring project success by monitoring deadlines, budgets, resourcing and deliverables
Escalate issues and mitigate risks to ensure project success
Managing relationships with clients and stakeholders
Review statements of work for accuracy and clarification of work efforts
Review of deliverables and work product to ensure quality assurance
Assisting in defining clear deliverables, roles and responsibilities on assigned projects
Coordinate governance and process plans with clients and internal teams:
Risk Migration
Communication
Success Criteria
Project Closure
Status reporting to internal executive sponsors and stakeholders
Support process management and documentation activities


Qualifications

Qualifications include:

Experience in cybersecurity solutions, CMMC and other complex compliance projects
5-10 active project management experience
BA/BS in appropriate field or equivalent work experience
Proven work experience in project management and enterprise level engagements in fields of technology implementations
Use of Project Management software such as Microsoft Project, Smartsheets, Wrike, etc.
Strong working knowledge and use of Microsoft Office tools
Excellent client-facing and internal communication skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Solid organizational, detailed and multitasking skills
Project Management Professional (PMP), Agile certifications (Scrum) or equivalent experience
Ability to manage multiple project engagements simultaneously (10-15)


Working conditions

As part of the Project Management team, Project Managers work normal business hours, however, from time to time may be required to alter schedules and activities based on support of client activities and engagements where clients may be in other time zones or even countries that are not US based. Allow this is a remote position, it may require the candidate to travel to client meetings when necessary. It is expected that travel will be less than 25% for this role.

EOE M/F/D/V",11150,Washington
194,Lead IT Software Project Manager,The American College of Radiology,"Reston, VA",None,"American College of Radiology (ACR) is a progressive membership organization representing over 40,000 medical specialists in radiological care. As a member of our team, you will join a world leader in patient-centered care advocacy, policy and clinical research, quality, and safety. Our culture encourages innovation, diversity, integrity, and leadership. A nonprofit 501(c)(3), ACR has over 500 purpose-driven employees in the Greater Washington, DC and Philadelphia region.The Lead IT Software Project Manager will oversee the project management life-cycle; designing, and driving project plans; maintaining project schedules; managing tasks, issues and risks; facilitating meetings; communicating updates; and managing project budgets for a variety of projects that involve innovative new trends in the medical world, such as Machine Learning, Artificial Intelligence, etc.What the job entails: Manages a portfolio of projects according to the Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) within ACR’s Clinical Research organization according to budget, timelines, milestones, and work products.Utilizes Agile project management techniques to efficiently deliver projects within budget with all requisite features and functionality on schedule.Directs a multi-disciplinary team of technical staff and researchers within a matrix organization, monitoring and ensuring functional organizations complete milestones according to budgets and schedules.Provides regular communication to project teammates, executives, and senior management regarding project status, budget, risks, decisions, delivery quality, and resource-related issues using appropriate monitoring tools and techniques.Translates business requirements to technical requirements and vice versa.Translates business strategy into technology strategy in consultation with other departments in the technology group such as: Engineering, Compliance/QA, Security, Data Engineering, Cloud, etc.Participates in change control (for example, reviewing configuration change requests).　Establishes, maintains, and nurtures a collaborative working relationship with various stakeholders.Understands and adheres to the SDLC and ACR PMO guidance.Skillsets we are looking for: 10+ years of experience managing projects using the software development lifecycle (SDLC), Agile/Scrum development methodology, and project management lifecycle required. Previous experience in multiple roles, such as business analyst, programmer, process analyst, project manager, and business consultant requiredProject Management Professional (PMP) certification preferredExperience with Atlassian tools like JIRA and Confluence. Platforms such as Salesforce, Boomi, etc.Experience in a regulated GxP/HIPAA/HITRUST environment preferredBachelor's degree in a technical or business field preferredKeeps up with latest trends in technology: AI, ML, Cloud TechnologiesProven ability to multitask and complete projects according to outlined scope, budget, and timelineExcellent written and verbal communication skills; able to quickly produce clearly written, well-organized documentation; excellent presentation and meeting facilitation skills.If you share our core values of: Leadership  * Integrity  * Quality  * Innovation and our operating principles of: We are one team, We are Curious, We Listen, We Care and We are Thoughtful, we want you on our team!To learn more about ACR’s rewarding employee experience, culture, and benefits, visit:https://www.acr.org/About-ACR/Work-With-UsACR offers a rewarding employee experience: innovative culture, professional growth potential, competitive compensation and an exceptional benefits package, including a defined contribution pension plan, 403(b); generous paid time off package; insurance plans with the leading providers; flexible spending; tuition reimbursement; training opportunities; and wellness reimbursement.Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.Job Type: Full-timeBenefits:Dental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee assistance programEmployee discountFlexible scheduleFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offParental leaveProfessional development assistanceReferral programRetirement planTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayWork Location:Fully RemoteCompany's website:www.acr.orgWork Remotely:YesCOVID-19 Precaution(s):Remote interview processVirtual meetings",11150,Washington
195,IT Strategic Business Partner,PCAOB,"Washington, DC 20006 (Downtown area)",None,"It's rewarding to work for a mission-driven organization! Join us at the forefront of investor protection.PCAOB is seeking a customer-centric, strategic Business Partner within the office of Data, Security and Technology. The individual in this role will work in a collaborative team and report to the Deputy Director, Business Engagement.The IT Business Partner is the voice of the data and the one who connects the dots between business needs and data, security and technology capabilities. In this strategic role, you will create a culture of robust collaboration and innovation as you bring technology groups and business partners into alignment with enterprise business objectives, approaches, and solutions.As a tech-savvy solution advocate, you understand the data of the business and the systems through which the data flows, and you see how new technology can open doors for the business. At the same time, you have a deep business process knowledge that drives an understanding of the business' true needs. You are prepared to provide the right mix of relationship building, informing solution design, and facilitating capability enablement to drive successful operations.The Key building blocks in this role are relationship building, product management, communication, collaboration and portfolio management.Relationship BuildingDevelops and maintains a strong understanding of the overall PCAOB operations and assigned Division’s business;Advocates for useful software solutions & trusted data across PCAOB Offices and Divisions;Identifies opportunities to solve business problems through business process improvements as well as data and technology solutions;Iteratively shapes conversations to disambiguate business challenges and define the scope of engagements between business and technology;Connects the dots between business problem(s), data improvements and technological solutions;Collaborates with the broader ODST project (e.g., Customer Success, PMO, etc.), data, security and technology team(s) to gather information for business engagements and support solution prototyping; andCreates opportunities to engage the business stakeholders’ in the solution discovery and analysis processes.Product Management / Capability EnablementIdentifies opportunities to shape capability roadmap priorities and drives alignment of work product(s) to business’ present and future needs;Knowledgeable and remains aware of ODST’s current capabilities, associated reference architecture of assigned supported domains and technical roadmaps in an effort to align all requests to the current strategic direction, driving towards an approach that supports incremental maturity of solution delivery; andVets vendor products per business requirements.CommunicationFacilitates ongoing communication between the business, data, security and technology teams to groom and prioritize the backlog (i.e., co-owns the portfolio with the business and ensures its interests are represented within data, security and technology);Updates stakeholders as portfolio requests move through the project life cycle; andDevelops and leverages business engagement informational materials to promote and standardize business engagement service offerings.CollaborationCultivates successful relationships between the business and data, security and technology partners to gain strategic and mission alignment between operational and technological goals;Collaborates with other Business Partners to share knowledge, best practices and relevant business activities;Partners with business analysts to define new capabilities; andCoordinates with Agile PMO Teams and participates in agile events - sprint planning, reviews, and retrospectives; to ensure consistent and timely solution delivery.Portfolio Planning / Management Enables the discovery process for business initiatives; i.e. gathers high-level requirements and facilitates large group/cross-functional sessions with partners;Advocates for true business needs; serves a trusted advisor and strategic partner to the Business;Facilitates solution design planning and discussions and ensures vetted reference architecture mapping;Defines, prioritizes, and manages program and project initiatives, based on business partnership and in support of IT governance;Helps develop key metrics to track initiatives and performance assurance;Identifies opportunities for continuous improvement, such as refining Service Level Agreements (SLAs) based on business needs, throughout the project lifecycle; andIncorporates change management activities in business partner discussions, to include providing support to defined activities, for major initiatives.Qualified candidates should have 7 plus years IT and business experience, ideally in a program or product manager role, you are a strong communicator, a strategic and innovative leader and bring experience cultivating relationships and are customer focused. Experience in a business development or client management environment understanding and managing complex and diverse teams is required.Candidates must be eligible to work in the US without sponsorship now or in the future.Job Type: Full-timePay: From $1.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee assistance programFlexible scheduleFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offParental leaveProfessional development assistanceReferral programTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayExperience:program or project management: 7 years (Required)project management: 5 years (Preferred)client driven/consulting environment: 5 years (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",11150,Washington
196,Program Manager,Flatter Inc.,"Washington, DC 20032 (Anacostia area)","$135,000 a year","Project Manager/Senior Acquisition Analyst Flatter is seeking a full-time Program Manager/Systems Acquisition Analyst to provide support in the following functional areas: documentation support, project management support, scheduling, risk management, and budget and lifecycle cost estimation.General Experience:- A minimum of 5 years of experience working in a support role for a Federal Government Agency Acquisition Project Management Office (PMO).- Experience working with Electronic Health Record solutions is preferred.- Experience working with a Shared Service Provider is preferred.- Experience with an IT acquisition program is preferred.- At least 5 years of experience developing and writing system development lifecycle documents including but not limited to Program Management Plan (PMP), Integrated Master Schedules and Lifecycle Cost Estimates (LCCE)- Preferred 5 years of experience developing, maintaining and updating Microsoft Project (or equivalent) schedules.Education:- A minimum of a bachelor’s degree in appropriate business or technical discipline is required.Job Type: Full-timeJob Type: Full-timePay: $135,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee discountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offProfessional development assistanceReferral programRetirement planTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:SELC: 5 years (Preferred)acquisition: 5 years (Preferred)Work Location:One locationCompany's website:www.flatterinc.comWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",11150,Washington
197,Estimating Manager,Residental and Commerical Contracting Company,"Washington, DC","$50,000 - $100,000 a year","We are seeking the right person to work as an estimator for our exterior contracting company, which has been in business since 1996 located in the Washington D.C. Metro area.Prior experience in home improvement and/or commercial contracting recruiting would be beneficial. However, not required.The position is remote and requires you to use your own computer and phone.It is result oriented with little supervision, no set hours, or days reporting directly to the ownership.You would be assessing upcoming project via visual inspection and through electronic means, web access and drone footage.We look forward to you helping us build our company.Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, ContractPay: $50,000.00 - $100,000.00 per yearBenefits:Flexible scheduleSupplemental Pay:Bonus payCOVID-19 considerations:This job does not require in person meeting and will be allowed to work remotely from your home.Education:High school or equivalent (Preferred)Contract Length:VariesWork Location:Multiple locationsCompany's website:www.americanhome specialists.comWork Remotely:NoCOVID-19 Precaution(s):Remote interview processVirtual meetings",11150,Washington
198,Manager - 100+ Person IT Service Desk / Contact Center,General Dynamics,"Washington, DC",None,"Type of Requisition:
Pipeline
Clearance Level Must Currently Possess:
None
Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain:
None
Suitability:
No Suitability Required
Public Trust/Other Required:
MBI Full 5C (T3)
Job Family:
Help Desk
Job Description:
Service Desk Manager
We are GDIT. We stay at the forefront of innovation to solve complex technical challenges.
GDIT is your place. Make it your own by discovering new ways to securely and expertly apply the latest technology. Own your opportunity at GDIT and you’ll be a meaningful part of improving how agencies operate. Our work depends on a Service Desk Manager joining our team to support an important federal customer’s IT help desk activities.
At GDIT, we foster a people-centric environment. As a Service Desk Manager supporting our client, you will be trusted to manage Help Desk and technical support for all facets of operations for computer, network, communications, and hardware/software infrastructure technologies. In this role, a typical day will include:
Collaborating with the customer, vendors and partners to maintain day to day service desk operations; accountable for overall adherence of defined SLAs and ensure team commitment of outlined key performance indicators (KPIs) and support technology modernization efforts.
Lead, coach and manage teams on a daily basis to improve customer service, efficiency and technical aptitude
Provide team leadership establishing internal procedures, ticketing, and escalation standards to ensure prompt resolution to incidents and service requests
Acts as primary technical customer service point of contact for the government customer, and provides reports and other deliverables or information that facilitates the Government mission
Analyzing call volume supply and staffing demand-forecasting reports to inform business decisions
Your success will be measured through successfully meeting or exceeding customer defined Service Level Agreements against multiple performance metrics, and Demonstrated success improving, optimizing, standardizing, and streamlining customer support processes that have yielded improvements in customer satisfaction and resulted in cost reductions
WHAT YOU’LL NEED:
Bachelor’s degree, preferably in business or related field from an accredited university
5 or more years of recent and related managerial experience in an end-to-end service desk, contact center or other managed service environment
Demonstrated experience providing performance-based customer service support against multiple performance metrics in the Federal Government.
Demonstrated experience with implementing SLAs and performance metrics on a service desk or contact center program of 100 to 500 Agents, within the last 5 years
Knowledge of ITIL v4 and ITIL v3 or v4 certification, Foundations or higher.
Certified ITIL® Intermediate Level Certification (or better).
A PMP or equivalent certification is required.
Help Desk Institute or Service Desk Institute Service Desk Manager Certification.
Familiar with Service Desk and ITSM technologies including:
ServiceNow
Automatic Call Distribution (ACD)/Interactive Voice Response (IVR) solutions, such as NICE InContact
Robotic Process Automation (RPA) tools like UiPath Process Runner, Automation Anywhere, Pega RPA; Blue Prism, or Kryon
AI or Intelligent Virtual Agents (IVA) such Amelia, Resolve (resolve.ai), Avaamo (avaamo.ai)
WHAT GDIT CAN OFFER YOU:
Full-flex work week
401K with company match
Customizable health benefits packages
Collaborative teams of highly motivated critical thinkers and innovators
Internal mobility team dedicated to helping you own your career
Rewards program for high-performing employees
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Travel Required:
25-50%
Telecommuting Options:
Some Telecommuting Allowed
Work Location:
USA DC Washington
Additional Work Locations:
USA LA Bossier City, USA NC Durham, USA NC Raleigh, USA NC Triangle, USA VA Falls Church
We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",11150,Washington
199,IT Support & Project Specialist,Virginia General District Courts,"Fairfax County, VA","$50,022 a year","Under the general supervision of the IT Projects Manager, this position provides IT support at various levels, including front-line technical support of software and hardware; testing, installation and configuration of new and updated software and hardware; maintenance and support of the Fairfax County GDC website; assisting with the planning and implementation of new technology initiatives; and performance of related work as assigned by management.

This position offers a competitive benefits package, which includes vacation and sick leave, 12 paid holidays, health insurance, retirement, life insurance, deferred compensation and short- and long-term disability.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

The IT Support and Project Specialist backs up and assists the IT Projects Manager for a large, high-volume, limited jurisdiction state court. This position assists GDC employees with the routine use of data applications and case management systems; performs password and other various levels of security support on all network systems; troubleshoots network, application and peripheral equipment problems; provides technology support in courtrooms; assists with loading and testing computer software and management of all IT inventory; supports members of the public with certain applications as appropriate; and supports all IT administrative duties of the Fairfax County GDC website. This position also supports the design, development, testing, and implementation of new and upgraded Fairfax County, Commonwealth, and third-party applications which improve automation, digitization, and case management in the court.

Other duties include providing new users with case management and security protocol training; providing help desk support for the court’s users and directing appropriate inquiries to the Fairfax County Court Technology Office; notifying users of unanticipated computer and application down time; checking for computer viruses using appropriate software; and assisting public with applications on the public terminals. This position also assists the IT Project Manager and other supervisors with general court related projects. May be required to work during non-traditional business hours on occasion.

Minimum Qualifications
Any combination of education, experience, and training equivalent to the following: graduation from an accredited two-year college with an associate’s degree in IT or related field (degree preferred, not required) and/or two years of related professional work experience in such areas as business, court, or public administration. Ability to communicate technical ideas clearly and effectively both orally and in writing. Ability to perform personal computer and network troubleshooting, both on software and hardware. Proficiency in the latest Microsoft Windows operating systems and PC applications, such as Word, Outlook, Excel, and PowerPoint required.

Preferred Qualifications

Special Requirements
All employees receive a 15% county salary supplement in addition to the state salary.

Applicants must pass a criminal background check in order to be considered for employment and may be asked to take relevant pre-employment tests.

Special Instructions to Applicants
A resume and cover letter are required. Applicants must apply online; we do not accept documents via mail or email. Only interviewed applicants will be notified of the filling of the position. No phone calls or e-mails regarding application status.

The Virginia Judicial System is an equal opportunity employer, committed to diversity in the workplace. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, age, national origin or disability. Applicants who need accommodations for an interview should request this in advance by emailing humanresources@vacourts.gov. All candidates are subject to a criminal history background check before being offered employment.

Name Jewel Jefferson

Phone NO PHONE CALLS OR E-MAILS REGARDING APPLICATION STATUS.

Fax

Email We do not accept documents via mail or email; you must apply online in order to be considered. jjefferson@vacourts.gov

Address",11150,Washington
200,Project Manager/Lead Carpenter,Meridian Homes,"Bethesda, MD","$60,000 - $70,000 a year","Project Manager/Lead Carpenter, Meridian HomesThe Project Manager/Lead Carpenter is the onsite representative of Meridian Homes who manages all aspects of the construction portion of renovation and custom home projects. It is his/her primary responsibility to manage the day to day construction activities at the job site to get the project completed with the utmost quality and in a timely manner.Essential Duties and Responsibilities: 1. Direct and manage subcontractors on site2. Complete carpentry work as needed3. Own and maintain appropriate tools to complete the job4. Schedule and oversee building department inspections5. Supervise and manage Meridian employees and subcontractors on a daily basis6. Estimate required material quantities, getting lists to the Production Manager for pricing, oversee efficient use of the material and return of unused materials7. Communicate with and ""manage"" the client on a daily basis. Relay any important information from the client to appropriate Meridian personnel8. Keep informed as to the project’s evolution as a whole including potential modifications to plans and specifications9. Maintain a day-by-day two week into the future schedule of job site events including: committed subcontractors, deliveries, required Assistant Carpenters10. Timely communicate clearly and effectively with appropriate Meridian personnel, subcontractors and clients11. Supervise job site safety, cleanliness, security, and protection from damage during construction12. Keep up to date plans with any changes. Disseminate this information to employees and subcontractors on the job site13. Maintain a job site file folder containing all job related information including: permits, the client contract, project specifications, product cut sheets, plans, change orders, subcontractor contracts, two week schedule and complete project scheduleMeridian Supervisory Responsibilities: Supervise Assistant Carpenters.Schedule: Monday through Friday from 7:00am to 3:30pm. Weekend work is occasionally necessary.Job Type: Full-timePay: $60,000.00 - $70,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Health insurancePaid time offSchedule:Monday to FridayWeekendsEducation:High school or equivalent (Preferred)Experience:Construction Experience: 3 years (Preferred)Project Management: 3 years (Preferred)Language:Spanish (Preferred)Work Location:Multiple locationsTypical start time:7AMTypical end time:4PMThis Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneousPeople-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projectsDetail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger pictureCompany's website:meridianhomesinc.comCompany's Facebook page:https://www.facebook.com/MeridianHomes/Benefit Conditions:Waiting period may applyOnly full-time employees eligibleWork Remotely:NoCOVID-19 Precaution(s):Remote interview processPersonal protective equipment provided or requiredSocial distancing guidelines in placeVirtual meetingsSanitizing, disinfecting, or cleaning procedures in place",11150,Washington
201,Senior Architectural Project Manager,The Onyx Group,"Alexandria, VA 22314 (Old Town North area)","$86,000 - $120,000 a year","Senior Architect / Project Manager Senior Architect / Project ManagerAbout UsThe Onyx Group is an architectural, planning, and interiors firm locally based in Old Town Alexandria, Virginia. We have 35 years of experience serving a savvy client base of primarily federal projects and some state and commercial clients. With our large federal contracts, we are well insulated from economic recessions, which is a very attractive aspect to our staff. This is a great opportunity for a senior-level architect to work with a team in a studio environment that fosters continuous learning, effective problem-solving, professional development, and client satisfaction. We are looking for someone at an Architect III level (per AIA definition) who can work on a project team to solve design issues, provide concept design, design production, and construction administration services as well as provide facility condition assessments. We offer a very competitive salary and full benefits, including health, dental, vision, 401-K Plan, PTO, and reimbursement of professional development expenses.REQUIREMENTSProfessional degree (B.A. or M.A.) in ArchitectureLicensure in at least one jurisdiction with reciprocity via NCARB for licensure in other jurisdictions.Ten or more years of experience, licensed architect who plans and develops medium-to large-scope projects with many complexities, executes and coordinates projects, and may oversee a large staff of architects and technicians with minimal supervision.Ability to write proposals, derive fees, and write contracts for sub-consultants.Ability to develop a Project Budget based on Scope of Services, project fees, project schedule, and team structure.Evaluate a project's financial performance based on time expended relative to completion of project.Working knowledge in REVIT and AutoCADStrong architectural design skillsStrong technical skillsCurrent active security clearance or eligibility to obtain oneAbility and passion to mentor young staffAbility to travel for as long as 1 week at a timePREFERENCESAdditionally, for the design work, the ideal candidate would:have a minimum of 3 years of work experience on renovation projects. Experience in government projects is a plus.have good multi-tasking skills - be an ambitious self-starter.have federal government design experience.Be proficient in MS Word and Excel. (Experience with collaboration worksite, such as SharePoint is a plus)have working knowledge of SharePoint.IT skills a plusLEED Accredited ProfessionalJob Type: Full-timePay: $86,000.00 - $120,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceFlexible scheduleFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offParental leaveProfessional development assistanceVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayCOVID-19 considerations:We require that all staff wear masks when occupying commonly shared areas like the office kitchen, corridors, lobby, and typically, open workstations (except when all staff in that workstation area are fully vaccinated.)Application Question(s):Are you able to travel within the continental United States for up to 3 business days at a time up to 15% of the time?Education:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:architectural work: 10 years (Preferred)government work: 2 years (Preferred)License/Certification:licensure as a Registered Architect in Md, Va, or D.C? (Required)active record with NCARB or reciprocity for licensure? (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",11150,Washington
202,Polling & Analytics Manager,The Hub Project,"Washington, DC 20036 (Downtown area)","$60,000 - $68,000 a year","Reports to:  Associate Director of Data & AnalyticsLocation:  Washington, DCStatus:  Full-time; ExemptSalary: $60,000 to $68,000Launched in 2016, The Hub Project is a growing team of communicators, researchers, and organizers with experience in campaign strategy, digital, and polling and analytics. We believe in a country where everyone has the opportunity to succeed in our economy and participate in our democracy, and we make that vision a reality by partnering with advocacy groups to build creative and effective campaigns.Position SummaryWe’re looking for a Manager of Polling & Analytics to support a robust public opinion research and analytics pipeline managed here by The Hub Project.Our team develops and executes measurement plans through polling and analytics to strategically inform progressive campaigns across the entire organization, all of which are dedicated to producing a more just and inclusive economy and society. We develop products that range from internal analyses to products for public release. The Polling & Analytics Manager manages the day-to-day execution of all public opinion research and analytics projects, including instrument development, data analysis, identifying key findings and strategic recommendations for reporting in memos or presentations, and communicating them internally and externally.The ideal candidate is someone who is intimately versed on broader trends in public opinion, and has experience managing all aspects of the research lifecycle on quantitative and qualitative public opinion research projects, with a heavy focus on overseeing Navigator Research. This position is also responsible for coordinating day-to-day relationships with external consultants and assisting with data and information sharing with key partners that we frequently work with.As Manager, Polling & Analytics, you will: Work with external consultants to oversee all components of multiple, simultaneous quantitative and qualitative research lifecycles, including questionnaire design, discussion guides, sample design, field management, data analysis, and both written and graphical reporting for both Navigator Research products and other public opinion research projects that inform our campaigns.Serve as the primary point of contact with polling and analytics vendors.Present and communicate results from polling, data, and analytics projects both internally to strategically inform and advance The Hub Project’s issue advocacy campaigns, as well as to external stakeholders across the progressive community, elected officials, and the press.Maintain awareness of key public opinion trends and communicate them to internal teams both to inform campaign strategies and to help determine plans of action for future research.Provide support to the Director, Associate Director, and/or external consultants for drafting requests for proposals, discussion guides, survey instruments, data analysis, and written or graphical reports.Collaborate with our communications team to review documents (e.g., press releases, media advisories, op-eds, etc.) related to Navigator Research releases or other publicly-released research.Work with the Director and Associate Director to continue expansion of The Hub Project’s capacity for advanced quantitative assessment.Perform other duties as assignedAbout You: You’re committed to a just and inclusive economy that delivers opportunity and dignity to all Americans and passionate about preserving and strengthening our democracy.You have at least two years/cycles experience working in survey research, data science, and/or analytics (such as with a research supplier, market research organization, or media outlet).You have previous project and people management experience.You’ve provided support to all parts of the research lifecycle for survey research projects.You’re extremely organized and detail-oriented.You’re familiar and comfortable adapting data into key findings and strategic recommendations.In addition, it would be a bonus if: You have experience with statistical software packages, such as SPSS, STATA, or R.You have experience working with voter files, particularly TargetSmart or Catalist.You have experience with querying tools (e.g., SQL) or modeling development.How to ApplyThis announcement will remain posted until the position is filled. Please note that only those individuals whose qualifications match the current needs of this position will be considered applicants and will receive responses from The Hub Project. Thank you for your interest.BenefitsComprehensive benefits package that includes employer-paid health, dental, and vision insurance, 3% employer match on 401k contributions, pre-tax transportation benefits, and paid holidays, vacation, sick, and volunteer time off.New Venture Fund CareersThe Hub is a project of the New Venture Fund, a 501(c)(3) public charity that incubates new and innovative public-interest projects and grant-making programs. The New Venture Fund is committed to attracting, developing and retaining exceptional people, and to creating a work environment that is dynamic, rewarding and enables each of us to realize our potential. The New Venture Fund’s work environment is safe and open to all employees and partners, respecting the full spectrum of race, color, religious creed, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, political affiliation, ancestry, age, disability, genetic information, veteran status, and all other classifications protected by law in the locality and/or state in which you are working.Job Type: Full-timePay: $60,000.00 - $68,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountPaid time offParental leaveProfessional development assistanceRetirement planVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayWork Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",11150,Washington
203,Jr Web Developer (Entry Level),Planned Systems International,"Washington, DC",None,"Essential Functions and Job Responsibilities:
Successful candidate will provide website design, development, testing, management and support of the hardware/software infrastructure for a web-based portal for our Government client. Essential functions will include, but not be limited to:

Performing all aspects of the development tasks, including front-end, back-end, and database development
Managing resources to ensure timely and successful deliveries
Working with clients and review panels to identify recommendations for the appropriate technical, business and human factors solutions
Commitment to clear and quality communications between team and client product managers
Commitment to promoting a collaborative work environment with team members and customers
Develop and maintain web-enabled capabilities and custom applications
Lead staff in defining and tracking project requirements, plans, and schedules
Commitment to delivery of quality products

Minimum Requirements:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or closely related field (May 2021 and Dec 2021 grads welcomed!)
Strong understanding of user interface design principles, with proven track record of creative web site development in accordance with the design specifications, user interface style guides and established usability standards
Must have strong experience working with a variety of technology and the ability to multi-task between different projects and workflow stages
Must have experience communicating directly with end users and the ability to gather requirements
Experience analyzing business product needs, recommending, then possibly implementing, effective software solutions in a timely manner
Experience analyzing core standards for software development, and maintaining an effective process for support
Experience providing guidance and leadership to other developers and development teams
U.S. Citizenship is required. Candidates selected must be able to successfully pass a client background investigation.

Planned Systems International provides our customers with value-added management consulting and information technology services that consistently deliver success, and we are recognized as a world-class provider of innovative solutions that benefit mankind. From Systems Lifecycle Support and Healthcare IT Solutions to Network and Desktop Solutions and e-Business, PSI is focused on making our clients’ businesses run smoother and better. With a highly trained technical staff, we apply state-of-the-art information technologies, the industry's most advanced methodologies, and broad-based support services to clients in U.S. Government agencies and the commercial sector.

PSI is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply, including:
Minorities, Women, Individuals with Disabilities, and Protected Veterans.
NOTE TO JOB SERVICE: VEVRAA Federal Contractor requesting priority referrals of Protected Veterans.",11150,Washington
204,Program Assistant,Population Services International,"Washington, DC 20036 (Downtown area)",None,":

Job Title: Program Assistant
Department: Sexual and Reproductive Health
Based in Washington, DC
Up to 5% international travel
Reports to: Program Manager
Who we are
Population Services International (PSI) is the world’s leading non-profit social marketing organization. We are a diverse group of over 5,000 entrepreneurial development professionals located in over 40 countries committed to making it easier for all people to lead healthier lives and plan the families they desire. PSI is using it’s global presence and 50+ years of experience to help reimagine healthcare. We are working to shape market systems, shift policy and funding, and strengthen global capacity to better support consumer empowered healthcare.
Join us!
PSI’s seeks a Program Assistant (PA) to support our operational excellence and execution of quality and standards by providing wide-ranging administrative and operational support to the Sexual and Reproductive Health (SRH) Department. The PA will liaise with global technical and service departments and network members/country project teams to support routine administrative needs and daily activities and contribute to successful delivery of SRH projects and department-level initiatives. This position will support the Women’s Health Project (WHP), A360 Amplify Project, and the SRH Quality of Care teams, with some administrative support to the broader SRH department. You help keep these teams organized, energized, and ready to tackle any challenge that come our way.
The Women’s Health Project core team leads a large and dynamic safe abortion project, implemented in 15 countries around the world.
The Quality of Care team provides vision and support to PSI’s global, regional, and bilateral SRH programs to create and maintain Quality of Care systems that always place the client at the center.
A360 Amplify works across four countries to adapt and integrate aspirational ASRH programming into government health systems. You help keep these teams organized, energized, and ready to tackle any challenge that come our way.
The ideal candidate is someone who will proactively meet administrative and project needs, can juggle multiple, competing priorities, and will enthusiastically ensure smooth and timely flow of work. This position is based in Washington, D.C.
 :

Your contribution
Provides routine administrative support for daily operations, project management, and general functioning of assigned portfolio.
Provides basic financial management support, including assisting with basic team budget management, procurement and payment of consultants, vendors, subrecipients and other services, and management and reconciliation of purchasing card.
Provides support for knowledge management activities, including the design of tools and systems for knowledge management and information tracking, creation and maintenance of internal filing systems, maintenance of online communications site(s), and development of communications materials.
 :

What are we looking for?
The basics:
Associate's degree (or international equivalent) in a related field.
Bachelor's Degree (or international equivalent) in a related field preferred.
Some work experience.
Demonstrated interest in international health and development issues.
Commitment to safe abortion.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Strong computer skills in MS Office applications.
Excellent organizational and administrative skills with special attention to detail and timeliness.
A multi-tasking machine.
A team player and self-starter who can work gracefully under pressure.
You stay positive when things are difficult, manage your time effectively, and communicate with your team efficiently about your workload.
References will be required. The successful candidate will be required to pass a background check.
Must be authorized to work in the United States. N.B. PSI will not consider work visa sponsorship for this position.
What would get us excited?
French language skills.
Previous experience working on safe abortion and/or sexual and reproductive health projects.
Knowledge of graphic design and data visualization, with an eye for creativity.
The candidate we hire will embody PSI’s corporate values:
Measurement: You use hard evidence to make decisions and guide your work. You set clear goalposts in advance and explain clearly if you need to move them.
Pragmatism: You’ll strive to deliver the best possible result with the resources available. You won’t be paralyzed by a need to make things perfect.
Honesty: You own your mistakes and are open about your shortcomings – it’s the only way you’ll learn and improve.
Collaboration: You’ll quickly establish a mental map of whom you can rely on for what, on your team, at headquarters, and in our country offices – if you try to do it all yourself, you won’t succeed.
Trust: You accept limits to your sphere of control and give colleagues the benefit of the doubt.
Commitment: You are in it for the long-haul and want to grow with the organization, just like PSI serves its consumers and partners with host-country governments through thick and thin.
STATUS
Non- ExemptDue to high volume of applications, only finalists will be contacted. Curious about your status? Please log into your iCIMS account to find out.
PSI is an Equal Opportunity Employer and encourages applications from qualified individuals regardless of actual or perceived race, religion, color, sex, age, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, marital status, personal appearance, matriculation, political affiliation, family status or responsibilities, gender identity or expression, pregnancy, childbirth, related medical conditions or breastfeeding, genetic information, amnesty, veteran, special disabled veteran or uniform service member status or employment status.
ACCESSIBILITY NOTICE: If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process due to a physical or mental disability, please send an email to: newhiresupport@psi.org or call (202)785-0072.",11150,Washington
205,Business Development Manager,Action Squared,"Washington, DC 20036 (Downtown area)","$90,000 - $105,000 a year","Action Network Business Development Manager


We make Action Network and Action Builder, utilizing a unique cooperative development model to produce technology for the progressive movement. We are mission-driven and not-for-profit, creating technology that organizations large and small use to build progressive power. Fast Company called our platform “the backbone of the anti-Trump opposition,” and we support a wide array of organizations seeking impact, including the Democratic National Committee, Black Lives Matter, Common Cause, United We Dream, AFL-CIO, Movement for Black Lives, and hundreds of other progressive organizations in the US and around the world. Our platform creates new possibilities for mobilization and organizing that are meeting a real need for the progressive movement. You can read more about us and our tools here.
We are an organization founded on progressive values, and seek to carry them forward in all we do. We don’t just believe in this movement, we try to live it, from our excellent benefits and organizational culture to our union-made technology. To us, focusing on our mission to make the progressive movement stronger and making sure we are a strong business so we are here for the long term are one and the same thing.
We are looking for a Business Development Manager to build major partnerships with the progressive organizations and companies, which will strengthen our organization and recruit new users to our technology. This person will be the face of our tools and our mission-driven approach to building technology at conferences and other places where progressives gather.
What You’ll Be Doing

We are looking for someone with deep knowledge of the ways progressives build power, a deep passion for using technology to affect social change, and a proactive approach to making connections and building alliances. Reporting directly to the President of Action Network, you’ll own a portfolio of new and growing partnerships which require gaining a depth of knowledge of our tools and the partners’ needs and values.

Build partnerships with other institutions in the progressive movement – such as foundations, major national advocacy organizations, training institutions and more - from initiation through to completion of a contract and then providing ongoing strategic support.
Lead our efforts to recruit large organizations to use and support our tools, gain thorough understanding of their unique needs and explore enterprise and custom solutions.
Ensure a regular pipeline of potential clients.
Work to meet client project needs through convening and strategic planning with our president and other senior staff in business development work, such as fundraising, partnership building, and recruiting new users
Coordinate sales, software and data development needs with other colleagues to ensure timely delivery of resources.
Represent us and our tools at conferences, meetings, and other gatherings, to potential partners of all sizes.
Maintain relationships with current Action Network and Action Builder users to make sure that they have the resources they need to be successful.


What You’ll Bring
Project management or leadership expertise, including at least 2 years experience within the progressive movement, including work at the national level.

Partner or client development, sales, and/or fundraising experience in a professional setting.
Demonstrated understanding of the use of technology to drive progressive change, with direct professional experience of the use and application of digital campaigns strongly preferred.
Comfort learning new tools and technical details quickly, and an ability to communicate those details accurately to a variety of audiences.
Strong organizational skills and project management skills.
Ability to work in teams and collaborate with others in a diverse, respectful, and supportive environment.
Very strong writing skills and a strong ability to speak in public.
Comfort communicating via phone, videoconference, emails, and in person.


Salary and Benefits

This position has a salary range of $90,000-$105,000 commensurate with your experience. The employee will report directly to the president. The job is within the Nonprofit Professional Employees Union structure.

Working remotely with a great team of like-minded progressives
100% paid medical, dental, and vision for family
Unlimited vacation time
401k
Technology allowance
Health and wellness allowance
Professional development benefits
The satisfaction of supporting so many progressives in creating real change

Location: Strong preference for DC or the DC to NYC corridor, but open to remote consideration
What We Believe In

Action Network is committed to cultivating a culture of inclusion and connectedness. We are able to grow and learn better together with a diverse team of employees. The collective sum of the individual differences, life experiences, knowledge, innovation, self-expression, and talent that our employees invest in their work represents not only part of our culture, but our reputation. In recruiting for our team, we welcome the unique contributions that you can bring in terms of your education, opinions, culture, ethnicity, race, sex, gender identity and expression, nation of origin, age, languages spoken, veteran’s status, color, religion, disability, sexual orientation and beliefs.

People of color, people with disabilities, veterans and LGBTQ candidates are strongly encouraged to apply. Action Squared is an Equal Opportunity employer committed to diversity in the workplace.",11150,Washington
206,Inside Account Executive,"Amazon Web Services, Inc.","Arlington, VA",None,"
3+ years minimum technical sales experience in B2B environments, in a solution-sales / technology-related environment
BA/BS degree or relevant experience

Would you like to be part of a team focused on delighting customers of all sizes, across a number of industries? Do you have the sales acumen and technical aptitude to drive adoption of cloud services? Amazon Web Services provides companies of all sizes with an infrastructure platform in the cloud. We are growing our Sales team to help more companies make the move to AWS, and achieve their business outcomes. If you are passionate about the cloud and have the skills, the ISR role provides the opportunity to introduce the most relevant cloud solutions from the leading cloud company, to new and existing customers.

A day in the life
The ISR is responsible for growing consumption of current and new AWS services, within any number of company segments. The ideal candidate will apply their sales and technical experience to proactively engage with customers to harness the power of cloud technology to meet the customer's business objectives. A successful candidate will generate and maintain active engagements with customers and prospects, as well as consistently meet and exceed sales quotas.

A single ISR might own one or more territories in conjunction with one or more account managers. By working together on behalf of our customers, we are building the future one innovative product, service, and idea at a time. Are you ready to embrace the challenge? Come build the future with us.

About the hiring group
Inclusive Team Culture
Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have twelve employee-led affinity groups, reaching 40,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and we host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 14 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.
Work/Life Balance
Our team also puts a high value on work-life balance. Striking a healthy balance between your personal and professional life is crucial to your happiness and success here, which is why we aren’t focused on how many hours you spend at work or online. Instead, we’re happy to offer a flexible schedule so you can have a more productive and well-balanced life—both in and outside of work.
Mentorship & Career Growth
Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded professional and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.

Job responsibilities

Ability to prospect, identify, pursue, and close new revenue opportunities Strong technical, sales, and listening skills
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Ability to think and act independently within a fast-paced multi-task driven environment
Knowledge and understanding of existing and developing technologies as it relates to cloud computing; understand and identify opportunities for customers
Track record of managing time efficiently, meeting personal goals, and working effectively with internal, partner, and customer teams
Experience with CRM (Salesforce.com preferred), and web-based meeting applications (e.g. Chime)
AWS Cloud Practitioner Certification or AWS Solutions Architect - Associate Certification, preferred but not required

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.


Ability to prospect, identify, pursue, and close new revenue opportunities Strong technical, sales, and listening skills
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Ability to think and act independently within a fast-paced multi-task driven environment
Knowledge and understanding of existing and developing technologies as it relates to cloud computing; understand and identify opportunities for customers
Track record of managing time efficiently, meeting personal goals, and working effectively with internal, partner, and customer teams
Experience with CRM (Salesforce.com preferred), and web-based meeting applications (e.g. Chime)
AWS Cloud Practitioner Certification or AWS Solutions Architect - Associate Certification, preferred but not required

",11150,Washington
207,General Manager - Fine Art Handling Company,US Art Company,"Landover, MD 20785","$70,000 - $90,000 a year","U.S.Art Company, Inc. is the nation’s largest transporter of fine art and antiques. Founded in 1983, we currently have nine offices located across the country. We offer a complete array of services including transportation, storage, crating, installation, and international import and export.We seek that professional looking for a place to hang their hat and make their mark. Growth potential in this market is excellent and the right candidate will flourish.Responsibilities include:Customer Service* Quality customer service is one of the things that U.S.Art is known for. This is our lifeline to the art community and it must be maintained at the highest possible levels at all times.* Responsiveness to client needs and requests in both positive and negative circumstances is the key to a proper and fair resolution. Consistent monitoring is necessary to make sure we always speak with a unified voice.Sales* Knowledge of your local market and institutions.* Open communication with local institutions to establish clear line of access to our resources.* Generate marketing ideas and programs in local market that tie into U.S.Art corporate culture and resources.* Involvement with local Art community functions and events to establish U.S.Art as part of the local community.* Full knowledge of our complete range of services provided locally, nationwide and internationally.* Up to date knowledge of our pricing and project bidding structure. Ability to produce proper estimate and bid proposals.Staffing* Day to day overview management of all staff from operations managers, customer service, crating managers, their staff and art handler/drivers. This includes hiring, reviewing and firing.* Monitoring of day to day performance of staff, their communication with co-workers and customers as well as the management of their time.* Participation in the training for all staffing levels to ensure consistency with interaction with clients and other staff personnel.* 4. Proper establishment and assignment of individual responsibilities within your office to various staff members and monitoring of same for proper performance and adherence to established rules and standards.Communication* Availability to local clients, local staff, and corporate staff to discuss issues and programs that involves your office, facility, clients and services.* Communication with corporate on status of your facility and market.* Proper and timely reporting of local trucking, packing, and crating schedules.* Proper and timely reporting of project status.* Proper and timely reporting of problems and issues.Accounting / Financial* Responsible for the maintenance of complete and detailed petty cash logs* Responsible for proper and detailed communication and cooperation with corporate accounting.Facilities* Monitor security and associated systems for performance and consistency. This includes knowledge of and communication with local service providers if needed.* Monitor building support systems including heating, cooling, humidification, dehumidification and other plant or facility systems to ensure smooth operations for clients and staff.Equipment and Supplies* Monitor overall supplies for office operations* Monitor overall supplies for wrapping/packing/crating operations* Monitor overall supplies for facility maintenanceRequirementsBachelor’s Degree5 years of experience in the museum or art transportation world at a minimumBenefits· Health benefits· 401k with 10% company match· Profit sharing· Vacation· Sick time· Personal daysJob Type: Full-timePay: $70,000.00 - $90,000.00 per yearJob Type: Full-timePay: $70,000.00 - $90,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingHealth insurancePaid time offSchedule:Monday to FridayEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:museum or art transportation: 5 years (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",11150,Washington
208,Team Supervisor,Bonobos,"Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)",$17 - $20 an hour,"Team Leader/Supervisor Bonobos is seeking Lead Stylists (we call them Lead Guides) who can provide the best in-person shopping experience to our awesome clientele in the DC/MD/VA region. Are you up for the challenge?What’s the opportunity? Bonobos is looking for a great full-time or part-time Lead Guide - our spin on a Keyholder.Hmm…sounds interesting. What’s a Guide, exactly? A Guide is what we call a fashion-conscious, service-oriented, incentive-driven, sales powerhouse. Guides bring their knowledge of our product and brand to the forefront and complete the package deal with their love for style, passion for quality and insistence on top-tier service. They fully understand and appreciate the importance of our customer's happiness and are willing to get innovative to ensure our customer has the best shopping experience possible. Our one-on-one, appointment based experience offers customers both an alternative and complementary service to our web-driven model. Don't think traditional retail; what we're building you haven't seen before. Check it out in more detail here.What's exciting about this opportunity? As a Lead Guide, you are a critical team member of our Bonobos Guideshop Field team. You will act as a leader and will be responsible for “holding down the fort” when the Guideshop Manager (or Assistant Guideshop Manager) is not available. You will be an expert in delivering exceptional customer experiences through balancing your leadership responsibilities, the daily coaching of Guides, and managing your own individual sales results. You will partner with the Guideshop Manager to ensure effective communication and contribute to a positive atmosphere that is fun, professional, productive and team oriented.Okay, now I’m intrigued. Who are you looking for?You…Have 2-5 years of sales experience in traditional retail or relevant sales experienceLead by example and model behavior that reflects the CompanyHave strong time management and organizational skillsAre able to work as a team and effectively communicateUnderstand the power of generating leads and can manage a team with agility, change direction, and continuously improve based on key lessons learnedLove making people happy and want to help everyone look and feel greatTell strangers on the street that their tag is showingAre self motivated and confident in your ability to networkKnow or want to learn as much as possible about men’s fashion, fabrics, styles, fit, and moreWe…Value self-awareness, intellectual honesty, judgment, empathy and positive energy - often over career experienceWork hard because we love what we’re doing, but also believe in balanceWill back up our talk with competitive compensation, challenging projects, random acts of team-wide fun, awesome coworkers and the rare tribal atmosphere that also values individualityAre committed to building a unique, fun and successful shopping experience through our Guide teamAre excited to hear from youJob Type: Full-timePay: $17.00 - $20.00 per hourBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceEmployee discountFlexible scheduleHealth insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:Day shiftHolidaysWeekendsSupplemental Pay:Bonus payEducation:High school or equivalent (Preferred)Experience:Supervising Experience: 1 year (Preferred)Customer Service: 1 year (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",11150,Washington
209,Technical Project Manager - Department of Labor,AMSG,"Washington, DC",None,"AMSG has a Contingent need for a Technical Program Manager to support an opportunity with the Department of Labor

Background

The U.S. Department of Labor (DOL) Office of the Chief Information Officer (OCIO)'s mission is to provide, through a dedicated mindset, information solutions and leadership to advance the DOL mission that is to foster, promote, and develop the welfare of the wage earners, job seekers, and retirees of the United States; improve working conditions; advance opportunities for profitable employment; and assure work-related benefits and rights.

To carry out this mission, DOL leadership identified a Management Goal in the Department's 2018-2022 Strategic Plan: Optimize the Department of Labor's Enterprise Services' Opportunities. A specific focus of the Management Goal was to develop enterprise-wide shared services for human resources (HR), information technology (IT), and procurement services. Personnel security was added to the initiative due to the interrelationship with current HR and procurement practitioners and the operational need to ensure a single authoritative source for all administrative support functions. The purpose of this initiative is to transition these administrative services to their respective central authority to improve the quality, consistency, and customer service delivery, thereby allowing the agencies to focus on mission. At this point, OCIO has therefore inherited nearly all agencies' IT systems, IT applications, and IT personnel.

OCIO's vision is to provide premier technology solutions – best in federal service – that empower the DOL mission and serve the American public through collaboration and innovation. In order to achieve this desired position, OCIO has refocused its IT strategy to foster increased transparency and collaboration to support the Department's enterprise-wide shared services initiative. OCIO is therefore responsible for the technical planning, design, development, integration, testing, staging, delivery, management, and maintenance of all IT solution services supporting various internal agency programs.

Scope

The candidate will provide program management leadership and services in support of the goal and objective of the DOL OCIO. The Program Manager oversees and manages program and project management teams, daily operations, client/customer relationships has ultimate responsibility for the quality of deliverables, and develops, monitors, and reports on program objectives, budget, and schedule status and performance. The Program Manager is responsible for the technical, contractual, administrative, and financial aspects of the program(s) as assigned by the COR, or as specified by an Agency Order. Responsible for identifying, proposing resolutions, and resolving program management issues in collaboration with applicable federal staff. Responsible for managing one or more programs and/or projects, and successfully implements program(s)/project(s) and associated services, in accordance with Agency Orders, federal laws, regulations and procedures. The Program Manager shall serve as a CIO advisory consultant with experience providing management consulting services to OCIO organizational management in managing federal IT investments frameworks, enterprise projects, and solving complex IT Project Management issues in accordance with federal laws, regulations and procedures.

Qualifications


10 to 15 years of hands-on technical experience providing program management services and support to public sector organizations.
In-depth knowledge of and experience with IT Project Management processes including, but not limited to, industry standard Business Analyst and Project Management principles and practices such as those defined by the Project Management Institute (PMI) in the Project Management Body of Knowledge (PMBOK), Federal Enterprise Architecture CPIC, SDLC, IT Security Management, and Risk Management.
Expert knowledge of and experience with federal IT Investment laws, regulations and process including, but not limited, to the Clinger-Cohen Act of 1996, Title Ill of the E-Government Act of 2002, and Federal Enterprise Architecture Framework. Familiarity with the federal IT Investment laws, regulations and circulars listed in subsequent parts of this PWS.
Proven expertise in IT portfolio management, to include the ability to apply consistent management approaches to IT Portfolio Management that increases the quality of data through best practices and documentation.
Knowledge of OMB reporting requirements and adapting internal reporting to align with Cloud Based and Shared Service Models
Experience in responding to internal and external government audits.
Proven ability as demonstrated in their resume to review and analyze cost, schedule, and performance requirements for complex IT programs.

Excellent verbal and written communication skills and leadership skills.


PMP certification required.
Resolve problems, support program audits, identify trends, determine system improvements, recommend, and implement changes.
Experience with the development and submission on OMB Major and Standard Investment business cases and cost benefits analysis for federal programs
Ability to support a team and apply advanced, comprehensive knowledge of methodologies, principals, and practices related to logistics, business, or financial management disciplines.
Ability to review complex organizational budget data, plan and forecast requirements; analyze budget variances, recommend, and initiate corrective actions.
Responsible for ensuring compliance with technological standards throughout the project.
Operates with considerable latitude for actions and decisions.
Proficient in MS Office Suite of Applications (Word, PowerPoint, Outlook, Excel).

",11150,Washington
210,"Manager, MROC",Hilton Corporate,"McLean, VA",None,"Job Description
The Recruitment Operations Center (ROC) leads the recruitment efforts across its portfolio of properties in full-service hotels across North America. The function is responsible for the end-to-end recruitment cycle of all non-exempt roles. The Recruitment Operations Center delivers best-in-class recruitment practices, compliance and is the frontline of our employee brand. We strive to constantly build a pipeline of top talent, working within the community to establish contacts and connections to feed the talent pool.
What will I be doing?
The Manager of the Recruitment Operations Center will oversee the recruitment operations for the recruitment of exempt positions to ensure the most highly qualified candidates are recruited to fill open positions at Hilton-managed Hotels throughout North America. Additionally, the Manager will ensure the positions are filled in a timely and efficient manner that is in full compliance with all federal, state, and company guidelines.
Strategy – Be aligned with the Americas Recruitment/HR Operations function while supporting superior recruitment results.
Leadership – Mentor, Train, and Lead a team of professional recruiters to deliver a Talent Advisor approach to recruitment.
Culture – Ensure a best-in-class workplace that delivers on Hilton’s values, mission, and purpose.
Talent - Hire, engage and develop the world’s best hospitality team members
Recruitment Operations Excellence - Embrace and lead the implementation of all Americas Recruitment Operations initiatives and objectives with a consistent commitment to excellence in execution, comprehensiveness, and timeliness.

More specifically, you will:
Manage a remote team of recruiters, both contract and full-time status, ensuring process, metrics, and compliance are achieved to Hilton’s set standards.
Recruit, hire, and train a team of recruitment professionals, assessing skill gaps and determining skills within the team to maximize productivity and service.
Present and communicate effectively to Regional Leadership Teams, Property Executive Committee Members and Hiring Managers on recruitment updates, market conditions, and recruitment strategy as it relates to established lines of business and market conditions
Work collaboratively with ROC leadership to build and implement new procedures, policies, and projects.
Utilize an applicant tracking system such as Taleo to review, analyze and evaluate the information provided by applicants in response to job postings. Conduct screening interviews and forward qualified candidates to hiring managers.
Ensure that minimum qualification standards are established before posting positions. Post positions internally, externally, and with commercial job sites.
Administer all pre-approved selection tests and pre-employment processes, including, but not limited to, background checks, drug testing, and employment authorization verification. Once a candidate is selected, extend job offers and closes out positions in the applicant tracking system upon completion of all required notes and final dispositions.
Build and maintain a continually stocked pipeline of quality talent through various methods, including, but not limited to, networking within the hospitality community, building and maintaining relationships with schools/professional organizations, sourcing/cold calling outreach, attending job fairs, and fostering continued contact with quality candidates who may qualify for future positions with Hilton.
Train, develop, and foster professional relationships with hiring managers at Hotels and Business Leaders within the organization to ensure recruitment needs are adequately and accurately assessed and met in a timely and efficient manner.

What are we looking for?
We believe the success in this role will demonstrate itself through the following attributes and skills:
Outstanding communication skills, both verbal and written
Ability to exercise patience, tact, and diplomacy in difficult situations
Can work under deadlines and in a fast-paced environment
Ability to work independently
Successfully manage teams, assess workflow and align objectives and daily activity to business goals.

To fulfill this role successfully, you should demonstrate the following minimum qualifications:
High School Degree/GED
Five (5) years of recruiting experience
One (1) year in a recruitment leadership role (training, mentoring, etc.)

It would be useful in this position for you to demonstrate the following capabilities and distinctions:
BA/BS Bachelor’s Degree
One (1) year working with applicant tracking systems
One (1) year of hospitality experience
Experience in program/project development and oversight
Experience working with EEOC, ADA, and employment laws

This role will be Virtual, except for within the state of Colorado.
What is it like working for Hilton?
Hilton is the world’s leading global hospitality company, spanning the lodging sector from luxurious full-service hotels and resorts to extended-stay suites and mid-priced hotels. For over a century, Hilton has offered business and leisure travelers the finest in accommodations, service, amenities, and value. Hilton is dedicated to continuing its tradition of providing exceptional guest experiences across its global brands. Our vision to fill the earth with the light and warmth of hospitality unites us as a team to create remarkable hospitality experiences around the world every day. And, our amazing Team Members are at the heart of it all!
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We will ensure that qualified individuals with protected disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions of his or her role, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation.",11150,Washington
211,Broadcast Systems Engineer,Discovery,"Sterling, VA 20166",None,"Discovery hires the very best and brightest talent who are enthusiastic and passionate to fulfill the company’s mission of empowering people to explore their world and satisfy their curiosity.
In exchange for their talent and drive, employees are provided with an engaging, diverse workplace and the resources they need to learn, thrive and grow in their careers.
Job Summary
This position is responsible for the installation, maintenance and operation of all broadcast-related equipment. This role will also provide technical support ensuring the quality production and transmission of both audio and video.
Responsibilities
1. Respond to calls from the operations group to resolve technical issues as they arise in the master control, encode, duplication, and related areas.
2. Ability to understand origination signal flow and quickly resolve on-air issues.
3. Prioritize tasks and issues that arise while on duty.
4. Execution and design of projects under guidance of engineering supervisors and managers.
5. Via physical checks and monitoring applications, complete shift check routines that ensure healthy status of origination facility equipment.
6. Conduct preventative maintenance on equipment as assigned.
7. Compilation of standard operating procedures and documentation in support of equipment.
8. Engage and assist in all learning opportunities. Continued development and constant collaboration is key to our team?s success.
RequirementsA minimum of five years experience maintaining broadcast television or production equipment.Strong understanding of IT technologies. Experience in AWS, Solarwinds, Cisco, Isilon, HP, Windows OS, VM?s and SQL a plus. A+ and N+ certifications are also a plus.Demonstrated knowledge of serial digital broadcast equipment including video servers, switchers, routers, and signal processing and measurement equipment.Knowledge of broadcast automation systems. iTX, Mediator and Pharos a plus.Ability to understand system drawings and signal flows. AutoCAD skills a plus.Demonstrated capability to patch around signal problems and take other emergency corrective actions rapidly, to maintain on-air status of television networks.Excellent problem-solving skills and ability to effectively communicate, written and verbally.Ability to lift heavy equipment as needed (50 lbs.).Ability to work any shift schedule.This position is considered an essential position. This means that during times of inclement weather, emergencies, or when access to the workplace may be impeded, that employees in this position are expected to report to work to support business continuance, unless otherwise instructed by his/her direct manager.Must have the legal right to work in the US
Discovery Communications, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. Discovery is committed to being an employer of choice, not just a good place to work, but a great and inclusive place to work. To that end, we strive to recruit and maintain a workforce that meaningfully represents the diverse and culturally rich communities that we serve. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or disabled status or, genetic information.
We will consider for employment all qualified applicants, including those with criminal histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local laws, including but not limited to all local Fair Chance Ordinances.
EEO is the Law
Pay Transparency Policy Statement
California Job Applicant Privacy Policy
If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application process, please send an email request to HR@discovery.com.",11150,Washington
212,Education Manager,DC History Center,"Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)","$50,000 - $60,000 a year","About the DC History Center

Established in 1894 and located at the Carnegie Library in Downtown, the DC History Center is a community-supported nonprofit organization, which deepens understanding of our city’s past to connect, empower, and inspire. It collects, interprets, and shares the history of our nation's capital through research and scholarship, adult programs, youth education, and exhibits. We seek to do this work as a welcoming and inclusive community that fosters curiosity and nurtures civic engagement to strengthen the District for all. For more information visit dchistory.org.
Position Summary
This newly created position is responsible for planning, designing, and executing K-12 education programs, reporting to the deputy director. This role works in close collaboration with the research services librarian and the adult programs manager, who also report to the deputy director. The DC History Center is operated by a small full-time staff of 7, who collaborate with the Board of Trustees, students, and volunteers.
This position provides educator and student audiences with high-quality opportunities that deepen understanding of our city’s past, foster curiosity and lifelong learning, and encourage civic participation. The education manager develops and delivers in-person and virtual educational programs that appeal to students, support teachers, and connect with diverse communities in all eight wards.
Primary Responsibilities
Youth Education Programs (65%)

Leverage the DC History Center’s exhibits, archival collections, library, and Washington History journal to create and execute high-quality, engaging, and scalable programs and educational activities online and in-person. Use lessons learned to continue to build out the K-12 programs and set annual strategy for K-12 youth education programs, reflecting DEIA principles.

Support 3rd and 12th grade teachers in developing lesson plans related to neighborhood history and Home Rule and DC Statehood respectively. In addition, align educational programs with Common Core and DC education standards to encourage teachers to incorporate local history in all grades.

Develop long-term relationships with the DC Public School system; public, charter, and private schools; and teachers to support achieving program goals.

Convene, lead, and engage the DC History Center’s Teacher Advisory Group.

Manage all in-person and virtual program logistics (including the online platform used to deliver content for virtual events), and day-of details for youth education programs.

In collaboration with research & scholarship team, manage all communication with K-12 teachers seeking DC History Center resources, including Kiplinger Research Library class visit requests.

Represent DC History Center in educational partnerships including the DC Declaration of Learning professional development program, the DC Arts & Humanities Education Collaborative, National History Day, and teacher learning events held by community partners, such as Teaching for Change.

Assess programmatic outcomes and utilize lessons learned to improve programs.

Shape education budget and support fundraising.

DC History Conference (15%)

Identify achievable and impactful opportunities for K-12 educators and students to participate in the DC History Conference.

Lead effort to communicate with and engage K-12 educators and students as attendees at the DC History Conference.

Attend DC History Conference planning committee meetings and community committee meetings, working with committee members to achieve goals.

Community Outreach (10%)

In support of youth education and the DC History Conference, seek active short-term and long-term partnerships with community-based organizations in all eight Wards.

Collaborate with all DC History Center team members to identify priority partners and strengthen these relationships.

Engage with the DC History Center’s advisory groups, including the Community Council, to seek resources and partnerships that support programmatic goals.

General (10%)

Assist with “all hands” events, such as DC History Center fundraising events.

Occasionally support the program manager and research services librarian with programming if needed.

Attend staff meetings.

Other duties as assigned.
Qualifications
The education manager will be an outstanding communicator, a detail-oriented and highly organized professional, and a flexible, collaborative team player. They will demonstrate initiative and a high level of self-direction in ensuring seamless student-and-teacher programming from start to finish. Familiarity with, and enthusiasm for sharing the culture, history, and diversity of our city will be a strong plus.

Bachelor’s degree with experience in either youth education, museums, archives, libraries, or a related humanities field with one or more of the following:

2+ years of experience coordinating educational programs in museums, archives, libraries, or a related humanities field, including experience aligning content to standards and best practices in social studies education

2+ years of experience with K-12 education, including curriculum development and lesson planning using object-based learning; DC schools preferred.

Master’s degree in education, history, museum studies, library science or related field with practical experience in K-12 education

Experience, skills, or aptitude with digital education, virtual engagement platforms, and/or multi-modal and digital storytelling, such as video, photography, audio, and text

Strong interest in public history, with focus on local DC history

Outstanding written communication and verbal communication skills.

Track record of successful project management.

Adept at handling multiple priorities and maintaining high productivity with accuracy and attention to detail.

Availability for some evening and weekend work required.
Compensation & Benefits
Starting salary $50,000 - $60,000 depending on experience. Comprehensive benefits package includes health, dental, and vision; life and disability insurance; and 403(b) plan with employer match. Central downtown location easily accessible from all Metro lines.",11150,Washington
213,Supervisory Human Resources Specialist (Labor Management and Employee Relations),US Department of Defense Education Activity,"Alexandria, VA","$144,128 - $172,500 a year","Duties
Summary
About the Position:

This position is in the Human Resource division Labor Management & Employee Relations Branch. In this position you will implement the total range of labor relations, employee relations and employee benefits responsibilities and act with full authority over the work of the Labor Management/Employee Relations (LMER) Division at DoDEA-HQ, and three globally distributed Labor and Employee Relations (LER) teams.

A recruitment incentive may be authorized.
Responsibilities
Establish and issue policies, procedures, and guidance on controversial and highly complex issues pertaining to labor relations, employee relations, and benefits.
Review program actions for conformance with law, Government-wide regulations, labor agreements and overall DoD and DoDEA policy.
Supervise LMER actions, such as: contract negotiations, arbitration, complaints investigation, incentive and performance awards, adverse actions, discipline, performance management, employee assistance program, and leave/benefits administration.
Provide expert advice and guidance to managers on dealing with employees in performance and productivity program areas as well as labor relations, and employee benefits programs.
Appear before various third parties, such as, arbitrators, agents of Equal Employment Opportunity Commission (EEOC), Merit Systems Protection Board (MSPB) etc.
Utilize broad employee relations concepts, principles, and practices to serve as the DoDEA senior LMER Officer.
Perform a full range of first-level and second level supervisory responsibilities. Plans work to be accomplished by subordinates, sets and adjusts short-term priorities, and prepares schedules for completion of work.
Develop and implement a strategic plan for the Labor Management and Employee Relations Branch.
Lead the development and manage the implementation of DoDEA?s strategic approaches in labor management and employee relations.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - Up to 10% Business Travel required.
Supervisory status
Yes
Promotion Potential
15
Job family (Series)
0201 Human Resources Management
Similar jobs
Human Resources Specialists
Specialists, Human Resources
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Male applicants born after December 31, 1959, must complete a Pre-Employment Certification Statement for Selective Service Requirement.
Proof of U.S. Citizenship required.
Direct deposit of pay is required.
Two year probationary period may be required.
Appointment subject to a suitability/fitness determination, as determined by a background investigation.
One year supervisory probation period may be required.
This position requires you to submit a Public Financial Disclosure Report (OGE 278) or a Confidential Financial Disclosure Report (OGE450) upon entry, and annually thereafter.
You may be required to sign a transportation agreement.
Qualifications
Who May Apply: Only applicants who meet one of the employment authority categories below are eligible to apply for this job. You will be asked to identify which category or categories you meet, and to provide documents which prove you meet the category or categories you selected. See Proof of Eligibility for an extensive list of document requirements for all employment authorities.

30 Percent or More Disabled Veterans
Current Competitive Service Department of Defense Education Activity (DoDEA) Civilian Employee
Current Permanent Department of Defense (DoD) Civilian Employee
Domestic Defense Industrial Base/Major Range and Test Facilities Base Civilian Personnel Workforce
Interagency Career Transition Assistance Plan
Land Management Workforce Flexibility Act
Non-Competitive (Reassignment, CLG, Re-Promotion)
Non-Department of Defense (DoD) Transfer
People with Disabilities, Schedule A
Priority Placement Program, DoD Military Spouse Preference (MSP) Eligible
Transfer - Non-Competitive
Veterans Employment Opportunity Act (VEOA) of 1998

In order to qualify, you must meet the experience requirements described below. Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community; student; social). You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience. Your resume must clearly describe your relevant experience; if qualifying based on education, your transcripts will be required as part of your application.

Specialized Experience: One year of specialized experience which includes providing guidance on Labor Management and Employee Relation (LMER) issues; reviewing legislation, regulations and/or directives for impact on LMER programs; representing management in third party procedures; developing policy and/or operating guidance for a LMER program; reviewing performance standards and/or appraisals to ensure compliance with performance management program guidelines; determining workload projects and/or competency gaps to align human capital with organizational goals; and performing supervisory responsibilities. This definition of specialized experience is typical of work performed at the next lower grade/level position in the federal service (GS-14).

Some federal jobs allow you to substitute your education for the required experience in order to qualify. For this job, you must meet the qualification requirement using experience alone-no substitution of education for experience is permitted.

You will be evaluated on the basis of your level of competency in the following areas:
Employee Relations
Labor Relations
Managing Human Resources
Strategic Thinking
Technical Competence

Time in Grade Requirement: Applicants who have held a General Schedule (GS) position within the last 52 weeks must have 52 weeks of Federal service at the next lower grade or equivalent (GS-14).

Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
Selection is subject to restrictions resulting from Department of Defense referral system for displaced employees.
Salary includes applicable locality pay or Local Market Supplement.
Multiple positions may be filled from this announcement.
Be advised that effective Jan. 1 2018, under the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, most civilian employee relocation allowances became taxable. The Relocation Income Tax Allowance (RITA) reimburses eligible employees for the additional Federal, State, and local income taxes incurred as a result of receiving taxable travel income. RITA does not apply to new government employees or employees returning from an overseas assignment for the purpose of separation from Government service. For more information, visit https://www.dfas.mil/civilianemployees/civrelo/Civilian-Moving-Expenses-Tax-Deduction.html.
If you are unable to apply online or need to fax a document you do not have in electronic form, view the following link for information regarding an Alternate Application.
The selecting official has requested a competitive and noncompetitive candidate list for this vacancy. If you are eligible for the noncompetitive list, you will be evaluated on basic and/or minimum qualifications, as applicable. While required to answer the assessment questions, non-competitive candidates will not be evaluated against the competitive rating & ranking criteria. The selecting official may select from any of the candidate lists.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Once the announcement has closed, a review of your application package (resume, supporting documents, and responses to the questionnaire) will be used to determine whether you meet the qualification requirements listed on this announcement. If you are minimally qualified, your résumé and supporting documentation will be compared against your responses to the assessment questionnaire to determine your level of experience. If, after reviewing your résumé and/or supporting documentation, a determination is made that you have inflated your qualifications and/or experience, you may lose consideration for this position. Please follow all instructions carefully when applying, errors or omissions may affect your eligibility.

Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP). If you are a Federal employee in the competitive service and your agency has notified you in writing that you are a displaced employee eligible for ICTAP consideration, you may receive selection priority for this position. To receive selection priority, you must: (1) meet ICTAP eligibility criteria (2) be rated well-qualified for the position and; (3) submit the appropriate documentation to support your ICTAP eligibility. To be considered well-qualified and receive selection priority applicants must satisfy all qualification requirements for the position and receive a score of 90 or above. Additional information about the program is on OPM's Career Transition Resources website. Additional information about the program is on OPM's Career Transition Resources website.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Secret
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Noncritical-Sensitive (NCS)/Moderate Risk
Trust determination process
Suitability/Fitness
Required Documents

Required Documents
The documents you are required to submit vary based on the authority you are using to apply (e.g. applying as a veteran, applying as a current permanent Federal employee, applying as a reinstatement). Please review the following link to see which documents you need to provide to prove your eligibility to apply: Proof of Eligibility.

As described above, your complete application includes your resume, your responses to the online questionnaire, and documents which prove your eligibility to apply. If you fail to provide these documents, you will be marked as having an incomplete application package and you will not be considered any further.

1. Your resume:

Your resume may be submitted in any format and must support the specialized experience described in this announcement.
If your resume includes a photograph or other inappropriate material or content, it will not be used to make eligibility and qualification determinations and you may not be considered for this vacancy.
For qualifications determinations your resume must contain hours worked per week and the dates of employment (i.e., HRS per week and month/year to month/year or month/year to present). If your resume does not contain this information, your application will be marked as incomplete and you will not receive consideration for this position.
You should list any relevant performance appraisals and incentive awards in your resume as that information may be taken into consideration during the selection process. If selected, you may be required to provide supporting documentation.
For additional information see: What to include in your resume.
2. Other supporting documents:
Cover Letter, optional
Most recent Performance Appraisal, if applicable
Time-in-grade documentation: If you are applying for a higher grade and your SF-50 has an effective date within the past year, it may not clearly demonstrate you meet the one year time-in-grade requirement so you will need to provide an SF-50 which clearly demonstrates you meet the time-in-grade requirements (examples of appropriate SF-50s include Promotions, Within-grade Grade/Range Increases, and SF-50s with an effective date more than one year old).
NOTE: Documents submitted as part of the application package, to include supplemental documents, may be shared beyond the Human Resources Office. Some supplemental documents such as military orders and marriage certificates may contain personal information for someone other than you. You may sanitize these documents to remove another person's personal information before you submit your application. You may be asked to provide an un-sanitized version of the documents if you are selected to confirm your eligibility.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Veterans
Individuals with disabilities
Clarification from the agency
See ""Who May Apply"" in the ""Qualifications"" section for more information on who is eligible to apply for this position.",11150,Washington
214,Office Manager (US),Pharmerit International,"Bethesda, MD",None,"OPEN Health brings together deep scientific knowledge, global understanding, and broad specialist expertise to support our clients in improving health outcomes and patient wellbeing.We are united as one flexible organization, harnessing the power of the collective to solve complex challenges. Being built from cohesive partnerships across a range of specialist sectors gives us the ability to approach opportunities from fresh perspectives, creating solutions and innovations for market access and medical communications that are informed by the experience and knowledge of the many.Our global team of experts — many with PhD and PharmD degrees — work strategically alongside our client partners in Medical Affairs, Health Economics and Outcomes Research (HEOR), Market Access, and Commercial teams across a wide range of therapy areas.OPEN Health: Established as many. United as one.OPEN Health ValuesWe uniteWe embrace and respect our different perspective and strengthsWe nurture an open, caring and collaborative communityWe support, encourage and empower the team and the individualWe exiteWe love what we do, because it really mattersWe inspire our clients and one another with our passion and proficiencyWe do things the right way, with pride and integrityWe igniteWe drive innovation through curiousity and resourcefulnessWe constantly endeavor to find opportunities to excelWe learn from experience and strive for brilliance in everything we doYou will love this role if you:Have a people first, can do attitudeDerive a sense of accomplishment in keeping things on track and believe the details do matterThrive in a multifaceted roleYou will be a succes if you:Have managed a growing and evolving officeHave successfully created a warm and welcoming work environment for colleagues and visitorsHave balanced shifting demands and competing prioritiesThe Office Manager is an essential partner for our Bethesda based colleagues. As the Office Manager, you will have oversight of a range of responsibilities including:Office ManagementSupport the day-to-day office maintenance by serving as point of contact and liaising with building facilitiesMaintain office space including kitchen, conference rooms and common areas as a professional, safe, and welcoming environmentPartner with e Global Facilities Director and team with any office moves/relocations and ad-hoc support as requestedSupport the Global Marketing Lead with conference and travel arrangementsSupport the global Health & Safety team with ongoing initiatives and serve as the Bethesda representativeProvide ad hoc support for the finance team on such as: logging invoices, filing, and raising POsSupport the Sr. Human Resources Business Partner in updating and maintaining office policies, compliance postings, onboarding/offboarding office arrangements and general office related inquiresPlan and coordinate company celebrations and assist with travel arrangementsReceptionFirst point of contact for answering all general incoming callsManage office to ensure COVID complianceManage mail and package/express services as needed to support office operationsManage food, coffee, and food services to support office operations.FacilitiesManage any contractor as needed for office renovations including oversight of bidding and award process to ensure effective use of project budget.Respond appropriately to emergencies or urgent issues and work through to resolutionMonitor office access through appropriate systemsWhat you’ll bring: 2+ years’ experience in an office management or related rolePrevious experience managing office operations including serving as point of contact for facilities and other vendorsAbility to maintain a welcoming, safe, and professional work environmentMeticulous orientation with a “details’ matter philosophyPrevious success in accomplishing responsibilities accurately and responsiblyAble to prioritize and multitask in a fast-paced environmentAble to exercise discretion in confidential matters or informationAble to support the evolving needs of the office staff and facilitiesRecommend efficiencies to office operationsStrong communication skillsetReasons to join OPEN HealthPeople are at the heart of our business. Without our incredibly talented people we couldn’t offer our clients the world-class service they have come to expect. We know how important it is to support, develop, reward and encourage.See more reasons to join us »To Apply: Send your resume and cover letter to careerseanda@openhealthgroup.com with the position title “Office Manager” in the subject line. OPEN Health provides equal employment to all participants and employees without regard to race, national origin, color, religion, gender, age, disability, sexual orientation, or veteran or marital status.Job Type: Full-time",11150,Washington
215,Administrative Assistant,Gallaudet University Hearing and Speech Clinic,"Washington, DC",None,"SUMMARY:

Reporting to the Executive Director of Campus Design and Facilities, the Administrative Assistant oversees all aspects of operations for Campus Design and Facilities department. The Administrative Assistant provides high-level administrative and specialized technical support to the Office of Campus Design and Facilities; performs administrative duties requiring a thorough knowledge of Gallaudet policies and procedures as well as the Department; provides office management and administrative support services requiring a high degree of judgment, analytical thinking, problem solving along with interpersonal skills interacting with project managers, staff, faculty and students; provides active participation and administrative support for all campus improvements projects and facilities maintenance operations and related outreach and community activities.

PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTABILITIES:
Coordinates office and project meetings for Campus Design and Facilities (CFD) staff; provides logistical support including note taking, preparing agendas, interpreter requests, meeting locations, and invitations; and coordinates the meeting materials and ensures that these materials are provided to the interpreters, participants, and other staff, if applicable.
Maintains the CDF’s staff calendar; reviews, evaluates, and prioritizes requests for appointments with the staff; and provides logistical support accordingly.
Serves as the Office Manager for the CDF’s office; develops and maintains paper and electronic filing systems; and inventories and coordinates the maintenance of equipment and supplies.
Provides technical support in setting up conference calls and meetings (ZOOM, Go-To-Meeting, WebEx, videoconferencing, etc.).
Monitors and coordinates the processing of all personnel actions; advises Director whether personnel actions are consistent with procedural guidelines; and interacts with department heads to ensure quality control of personnel action paperwork, and to ensure compliance with administrative deadlines.
Reviews all financial and personnel documents submitted to the CDF staff for approval and or/signature; proofreads incoming documents for procedural accuracy, sorts and submits documents for signature; and forwards documents to the appropriate offices for processing.
Supervises the processing of internal financial and personnel documents for the department, including check requests, purchase requisitions, interdepartmental invoices, budget revisions, personnel actions forms, payroll worksheets and verifications, and other documents, as needed.
Maintains all documents, drawings, specifications, models, material samples and correspondence in electronic and paper format.
Creates, maintains, and updates master templates for a variety of letters, memoranda, and forms.
Handles and properly routes scheduling and information requests; works with department heads on evaluating personnel; communicates deadlines and sends the forms for non-exempt and exempt performance evaluation; and tracks evaluation activities to ensure compliance to the A&O Manual and other university policies.
Hires, trains, and supervises employees, including student interns, for the CDF’s office.
Serves as a mandatory Title IX reporter; and takes annual Title IX training as part of the compliance effort.
Performs other related duties, as assigned.
SPECIFICATIONS:
Required Minimum Qualifications (When the candidate’s resume meets these qualifications, it will be screened in.
High school diploma or GED.
A minimum six years of professional experience in office administration (Bachelor’s degree and a minimum two years of professional experience in office administration will be considered).
Fluency in American Sign Language.
Preferred Qualifications (While not required, it is an advantage for what the position needs.)
Bachelor’s degree.
Experience working in a higher education setting.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities (Qualities that will help the incumbent be more successful in the position.)
Knowledge of professional protocol within a high-level university office.
Ability to use a variety of computer software applications (e.g., Microsoft Word, Microsoft Excel, Microsoft PowerPoint).
Excellent writing, editing, proofreading and scheduling skills.
Demonstrated ability to work independently, show initiative as well as high degree of problem solving.
Ability to work and represent the Campus Design and Planning’s Office and the University effectively with individuals and groups.
Attention to detail with high level of accuracy for data entry.
Demonstrated ability to work with and across University departments, outside constituents and groups.
Demonstrated commitment to valuing diversity and contributing to an inclusive working and learning environment.
COMPENSATION:
Level: 7
Salary: Commensurate with experience and qualifications.
FLSA: Non-exempt

The successful candidate must have a valid authorization to work in the United States.

The successful candidate will undergo a background check that must be cleared prior to working at Gallaudet University.
Gallaudet University is an equal opportunity employer/educational institution and does not discriminate on the basis of race, sex, national origin, religion, age, hearing status, disability, genetic information, covered veteran status, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, family responsibilities, matriculation, political affiliation, source of income, place of business or residence, pregnancy, childbirth, or any other unlawful basis. This policy is in compliance with Title VII of the Civil Rights Act, the Americans with Disabilities Act, the Rehabilitation Act, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act, the District of Columbia Human Rights Act, and other applicable laws and applies to all procedures affecting applicants and employees including, but not necessarily limited to: recruitment, hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, reassignment, reappointment, tenure, demotion, selection for training, layoff, furlough, and termination, compensation, and all other conditions or privileges of employment.",11150,Washington
216,Project Director,CAMRIS,"Washington, DC 20004 (Penn Quarter area)",None,"Overview:

CAMRIS International is a development and research firm that realizes innovative solutions to health and development challenges through high-quality, cost-effective program and research management services. With experience working in more than 80 countries, we combine our proven systems with today’s most effective, evidence-based best practices to improve the lives of people around the world. We apply a customized, customer-centric, cost-effective business approach to offer greater value to our clients and challenge the way things have always been done in our field.
CAMRIS is seeking a Program Director (PD) who can work independently to provide leadership and oversight of to lead a health evaluation program for USAID. S/he will manage a portfolio of assignments and a cadre of health consultants. Also S/he will be responsible for all aspects of an assignment including assignment planning, design, recruitment, budget management, implementation, and close-out.
The project provides the U.S. Agency for International Development (USAID) Bureau for Global Health, regional bureaus, and missions with ready access to high-quality, external technical expertise to design, support, and evaluate health programs contributing to the achievement of U.S. Government (USG) objectives. The contract is comprised of five components:
 1. Program and project evaluation
 2. Technical assistance
 3. Health program and research management
 4. Mission support and
 5. Logistical support for meetings/conferences.
This is a forecasted position and it is contingent upon contract award.
Responsibilities:

The Project Director will be responsible for the overall management of the contract. In addition, s/he will be responsible for the technical supervision of all aspects of contract work,
including consultant identification and management, dissemination of information, and submission of reports and other contract deliverables. The Project Director is expected to take an
active role in organizing consultancies to ensure that the interests of USAID are best served at the lowest possible price. The Project Director will collaborate with the COR and Contracting
Officer in carrying out the project activities.
Duties and composition of portfolio will vary based on the Program Manager’s interests and project needs, but may include the following types of activities:
Assignment Planning and Logistics Preparation
Manage the assignment planning process, including coordinating with the USAID client to refine scopes of work and cost estimates, develop implementation timelines, etc.
Recruit short- and medium-term consultants
Arrange all logistical support for Global Health evaluation consultants both in the United States and overseas
Organize and support Team Planning Meetings
Work with Global Health evaluation consultants to ensure completion of financial forms and other paperwork
Implementation
Collect and distribute activity background materials for team members
Monitor and track assignment progress
Provide initial review of consultant forms and invoices
Maintain communication with consultants and clients to ensure that consultants are supported throughout the course of their assignments and to ensure smooth implementation
Close-out
Implement clerical close-out of assignment files
Support timely and orderly assignment-related closeout, including ensuring satisfactory completion of the activity and completion of performance evaluation forms from both clients and employees
Ensure completion of activity and consultant performance evaluation forms
Ensure necessary client approvals are obtained in a timely manner by preparing requests and memos to client Contracting Officers and Contracting Officer Representatives, on behalf of the Project Director and/or corporate entities, following up, and providing additional justification as required
Provide logistical support for workshops, meetings, trainings, and client-sponsored conferences and other events
Participate in team-wide meetings and initiatives
Promote integration and cross fertilization of ideas and information across and among global health assignments
Respond to other requests as directed by the Project Director or Deputy Directors
Qualifications:
Advanced degree (MPH, PhD, or other advanced degree related to health)
A minimum of 10 years of demonstrated experience in international development. (At least 3 of the 10 years is in-country developing country experience)
Extensive knowledge of USAID Health and Evaluation Research
Demonstrated knowledge of U.S. Government or international development organization policies and procedures as they relate to international development Demonstrated broad knowledge of current developing country health programs
A minimum of 5 years of demonstrated successful experience as a senior manager of complex program(s) providing technical assistance in health, nutrition, or population in a developing country;
Demonstrated experience designing and/or evaluating international public health programs
Demonstrated experience coordinating activities with a variety of organizations, including universities, development institutions, international organizations, and other
donor and contract groups.",11150,Washington
217,Property Manager I,Morgan Properties,"Largo, MD 20774",None,"Overview:

Get To Know Us:
Join Morgan Properties, one of the nation’s largest and fastest growing property management companies. Our award-winning employees are dedicated to providing our residents with a quality residential living experience every day. Established in 1985 by Mitchell Morgan, Morgan Properties is a national real estate investment and management company headquartered in King of Prussia, Pennsylvania. Morgan Properties and its affiliates currently own and manage a multifamily portfolio comprised of over 350 apartment communities and over 90,000 units located in 20 states. The Company is the nation’s largest private multifamily owner, with over 2,500 employees. Our company thrives on a culture of creativity, communication and collaboration, where every person is valued. We’re always looking for passionate professionals to join our team. If you meet the requirements listed and are interested, please submit your resume for consideration.
What you will be doing:
We are currently seeking a driven leader with experience in the property management industry to oversee and manage all operational and financial aspects of one of our nationally-recognized properties. As the Property Manager, you’ll be responsible for brand recognition in the area’s marketplace, personnel management, resident services, and compliance with all applicable laws and company policies.
What we’ll expect from you:
Take ownership for the growth and development of the community including capital projects to improve the property to better increase the occupancy levels making it a place people want to live and call home.
Conceive new and innovative marketing strategies to aid in curb-side appeal and attracting new residents.
Continually strive to improve processes better the relations with our residents, vendors, and employees.
Develop and foster a highly dynamic sales team into future leaders of Morgan Properties.
Manage Employees: hire and terminate employees, govern employee relations and employee issues, conduct written evaluations, and mentor, supervise, and develop employees.
Must be available on-call 24 hours a day in case of emergency.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree from four-year College or university strongly preferred.
5+ years related experience required.
Experience managing a 500+ unit multi-family housing community.
Experience supervising a team of 10+ individuals, including maintenance personnel.
Market rate community management experience required.
Qualified individuals will have proven performance in successfully monitoring financial statements, capital enhancement projects, revenue, expenses, net operating income and occupancy goals.
ARM, CAM, CAPS, MPM, RMP is a plus!
May require valid drivers’ license, along with good driving record and auto insurance, if traveling to multiple properties.
The “Benefits” of Employment:
Employee referral payment program
Educational Enhancement Program
Medical, Dental, and Vision benefits
Life/ AD&D Insurance
Long and short term disability
Retirement Plan - 401(k) Plan
Discount on an apartment with any one of our properties
Free access to pool and fitness center
Additional employee discounts available
Responsibilities:

Qualifications:",11150,Washington
218,Administrative Assistant,Gallaudet University Hearing and Speech Clinic,"Washington, DC",None,"SUMMARY:

Reporting to the Executive Director of Campus Design and Facilities, the Administrative Assistant oversees all aspects of operations for Campus Design and Facilities department. The Administrative Assistant provides high-level administrative and specialized technical support to the Office of Campus Design and Facilities; performs administrative duties requiring a thorough knowledge of Gallaudet policies and procedures as well as the Department; provides office management and administrative support services requiring a high degree of judgment, analytical thinking, problem solving along with interpersonal skills interacting with project managers, staff, faculty and students; provides active participation and administrative support for all campus improvements projects and facilities maintenance operations and related outreach and community activities.

PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTABILITIES:
Coordinates office and project meetings for Campus Design and Facilities (CFD) staff; provides logistical support including note taking, preparing agendas, interpreter requests, meeting locations, and invitations; and coordinates the meeting materials and ensures that these materials are provided to the interpreters, participants, and other staff, if applicable.
Maintains the CDF’s staff calendar; reviews, evaluates, and prioritizes requests for appointments with the staff; and provides logistical support accordingly.
Serves as the Office Manager for the CDF’s office; develops and maintains paper and electronic filing systems; and inventories and coordinates the maintenance of equipment and supplies.
Provides technical support in setting up conference calls and meetings (ZOOM, Go-To-Meeting, WebEx, videoconferencing, etc.).
Monitors and coordinates the processing of all personnel actions; advises Director whether personnel actions are consistent with procedural guidelines; and interacts with department heads to ensure quality control of personnel action paperwork, and to ensure compliance with administrative deadlines.
Reviews all financial and personnel documents submitted to the CDF staff for approval and or/signature; proofreads incoming documents for procedural accuracy, sorts and submits documents for signature; and forwards documents to the appropriate offices for processing.
Supervises the processing of internal financial and personnel documents for the department, including check requests, purchase requisitions, interdepartmental invoices, budget revisions, personnel actions forms, payroll worksheets and verifications, and other documents, as needed.
Maintains all documents, drawings, specifications, models, material samples and correspondence in electronic and paper format.
Creates, maintains, and updates master templates for a variety of letters, memoranda, and forms.
Handles and properly routes scheduling and information requests; works with department heads on evaluating personnel; communicates deadlines and sends the forms for non-exempt and exempt performance evaluation; and tracks evaluation activities to ensure compliance to the A&O Manual and other university policies.
Hires, trains, and supervises employees, including student interns, for the CDF’s office.
Serves as a mandatory Title IX reporter; and takes annual Title IX training as part of the compliance effort.
Performs other related duties, as assigned.
SPECIFICATIONS:
Required Minimum Qualifications (When the candidate’s resume meets these qualifications, it will be screened in.
High school diploma or GED.
A minimum six years of professional experience in office administration (Bachelor’s degree and a minimum two years of professional experience in office administration will be considered).
Fluency in American Sign Language.
Preferred Qualifications (While not required, it is an advantage for what the position needs.)
Bachelor’s degree.
Experience working in a higher education setting.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities (Qualities that will help the incumbent be more successful in the position.)
Knowledge of professional protocol within a high-level university office.
Ability to use a variety of computer software applications (e.g., Microsoft Word, Microsoft Excel, Microsoft PowerPoint).
Excellent writing, editing, proofreading and scheduling skills.
Demonstrated ability to work independently, show initiative as well as high degree of problem solving.
Ability to work and represent the Campus Design and Planning’s Office and the University effectively with individuals and groups.
Attention to detail with high level of accuracy for data entry.
Demonstrated ability to work with and across University departments, outside constituents and groups.
Demonstrated commitment to valuing diversity and contributing to an inclusive working and learning environment.
COMPENSATION:
Level: 7
Salary: Commensurate with experience and qualifications.
FLSA: Non-exempt

The successful candidate must have a valid authorization to work in the United States.

The successful candidate will undergo a background check that must be cleared prior to working at Gallaudet University.
Gallaudet University is an equal opportunity employer/educational institution and does not discriminate on the basis of race, sex, national origin, religion, age, hearing status, disability, genetic information, covered veteran status, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, family responsibilities, matriculation, political affiliation, source of income, place of business or residence, pregnancy, childbirth, or any other unlawful basis. This policy is in compliance with Title VII of the Civil Rights Act, the Americans with Disabilities Act, the Rehabilitation Act, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act, the District of Columbia Human Rights Act, and other applicable laws and applies to all procedures affecting applicants and employees including, but not necessarily limited to: recruitment, hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, reassignment, reappointment, tenure, demotion, selection for training, layoff, furlough, and termination, compensation, and all other conditions or privileges of employment.",11150,Washington
219,Project Manager,IB Abel Inc,"Washington, DC 20004 (Downtown area)",None,"If you need any assistance with the application process, please notify IB Abel’s Human Resources Department.
Objective:

To work as a team member for a leading electrical contractor as a Project Manager who will be held accountable for adherence to the Project Delivery process.
Key Accountabilities:

Leadership, Management, Accountability
SQP
Project Delivery Adherence
Project cost and billing


Essential Functions/Duties:

Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Conduct weekly crew observations.
Review RFP, proposal, estimate, schedule and all contract documents to become familiar with project requirements and obligations of the contract.
Prepare subcontracts and contracts for signature by divisional VP.
Ensure personnel and equipment are assigned to projects.
Arrange meetings to discuss and finalize schedules, permits, and job layout with the project team. PM shall also communicate such information to the Safety and Quality department.
Procure material to meet specifications and arrange delivery with vendors.
Arrange and facilitate all pre and post construction meetings. To prepare and maintain all agendas.
Accountable for the development of the Site-Specific Safety Plans (SSSP).
Coordinate the scheduling of subcontractors, manpower, tools, equipment, and material deliveries.
Establish construction schedules and monitor to adjust activities as necessary, to ensure milestone dates are met.
Review and maintain three-week look ahead, with foremen and verify it is consistent with the overall project targets each week.
Service the client in a timely and respectful manner; meeting or exceeding their expectations.
Work with owners, engineers and/or subcontractors to promptly resolve project problems.
Monitor daily, weekly and monthly project costs.
Coordinate with customers, engineers, vendors, subcontractors, foremen and accounting timely for successful completion of projects.
Assist Accounting with billing and collection needs.
Purchase materials, services, and subcontracts in accordance with the purchasing policy.
Review/approve and/or forward submittals for shop drawings and samples for materials.
Prepare and lead WIP and Focus Job Meetings each month.
Prepare, submit, and manage all project change orders.


Core Competencies:

Excellent oral and written English language expression and interpersonal skills.
Proficient in the use of Microsoft Word, Excel, Projects, and/or SharePoint.
Strong knowledge of the electrical services industry [utility, commercial, industrial, communications] and/or other related service-oriented organizations.
Able to communicate effectively with IBEW field employees.
Strong communication, organizational, analytical, leadership, relationship, and time management skills.
Ability to handle multiple tasks and work in a fast-paced business environment.
Self-starter; able to work with minimal supervision.
Knowledge of manpower loading.


Education, Skills, Experience:

Required:

Minimum of 3 years’ experience in Electrical Project Management.

Other:

Valid Driver’s License or equivalent.
Must be able to present acceptable documents evidencing identity and employment authorizations per the Federal I-9 requirement.

Desired:

Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering, Construction Management, Accounting, Finance, or other related business / mathematical discipline focused degree program from a four-year college or technical school, or a comparable equivalent of education and work experience.
PMP, FMI, or Primavera certifications.


Base Location/Travel Requirements:

Office assignment: South Region (DC/MD/VA). Flexibility to work from office and from home when appropriate.
Travel as necessary to other offices, projects, trainings, and offsite meetings.
Additional customer related travel may also be required at customer facilities.


Safety/Work Environment:

Perform all work in accordance with IB Abel’s safety policies.
The work is performed in an office environment with minimal noise, depending upon the operation of various office equipment; this will include phones, scanners, copiers, etc.
Physical demands include walking, sitting, bending, stooping, vision – close and distant with or without corrective lenses, lifting – 25 pounds minimum.
Capable of operating various types of office equipment including but not limited to computers, copiers, and scanners.


It is the policy of I.B. Abel Inc. to provide equal employment opportunities without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, marital status, veteran status, sexual orientation, genetic information or any other protected characteristic under applicable law. This policy relates to all phases of employment, including, but not limited to, recruiting, employment, placement, promotion, transfer, demotion, reduction of workforce and termination, rates of pay or other forms of compensation, selection for training, the use of all facilities, and participation in all company-sponsored employee activities.",11150,Washington
220,IT Project Manager,ASRC Federal Holding Company,"Arlington, VA 22202 (Aurora Highlands area)",None,"Summary: Artic Slope Mission Services is seeking an IT Project Manager for both Hardware and Software Applications. Must have experience managing large scale, multi-dependent project plans with resource leveling. This is a direct hire opportunity, strong base salary, excellent benefits, dynamic work environment.
The PM must:
Manage delivery of enterprise software, hardware, and network IT projectsManage and coordinate the full SDLC lifecycle to include planning, designing, implementing, integrating, testing, deploying, and maintaining enterprise in-house web-based applicationsUnderstand middleware and Custom Off The Shelf (COTS) product and its role in developing enterprise applicationsAnalyze and understand change requests to be able to integrate into existing applicationUnderstand and be able to integrate into a master schedule the upgrades to hardware, operating systems, and COTS software as well as integration of new hardware as it pertains to the operation of the enterprise applicationsResponsible for managing and supervising multiple IT projectsResponsible for resource scheduling and able to properly assign tasks to the proper teamResponsible for managing project schedules and proactively oversee project activitiesResponsible for managing risk and communicating project issues and its impact to schedulesResponsible for managing stakeholder expectationsMaintain positive and effective working relationships with senior management
Maintain a positive working environment for all team members by effectively leading, mentoring, coaching, and constantly looking to improve the working environment.Experiences in Waterfall, Agile, and DevSecOps a plus.
Arctic Slope Mission Services are Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employers. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, gender, color, age, sexual orientation, gender identification, national origin, religion, marital status, ancestry, citizenship, disability, protected veteran status, or any other factor prohibited by applicable law.
Candidate must have a four-year college degree and five (5) years of management experience in at least one of the following areas - information technology project management, development, assessment, and implementation of projects, including web-based systems, customer service operations, or administrative support personnel functions.
Management and managing large scale, multi-dependent project plans, with resource leveling. He/she shall also have demonstrated the required experience in contracts of similar scope, and the ability to effectively communicate both orally and in writing.

The PM must:
Manage delivery of enterprise software, hardware, and network IT projectsManage and coordinate the full SDLC lifecycle to include planning, designing, implementing, integrating, testing, deploying, and maintaining enterprise in-house web-based applicationsUnderstand middleware and Custom Off The Shelf (COTS) product and its role in developing enterprise applicationsAnalyze and understand change requests to be able to integrate into existing applicationUnderstand and be able to integrate into a master schedule the upgrades to hardware, operating systems, and COTS software as well as integration of new hardware as it pertains to the operation of the enterprise applicationsResponsible for managing and supervising multiple IT projectsResponsible for resource scheduling and able to properly assign tasks to the proper teamResponsible for managing project schedules and proactively oversee project activitiesResponsible for managing risk and communicating project issues and its impact to schedulesResponsible for managing stakeholder expectationsMaintain positive and effective working relationships with senior management
Maintain a positive working environment for all team members by effectively leading, mentoring, coaching, and constantly looking to improve the working environment.Experiences in Waterfall, Agile, and DevSecOps a plus.

Needs excellent verbal and written communication skills. Must be able to handle complex problems under difficult situations.",11150,Washington
221,Facilities Specialist ProjM0 (Government),AT&T,"Columbia, MD",None,"AT&T Global Public Sector is a trusted provider of secure, IP enabled, cloud-based, network solutions and professional services to the Department of Defense. We are dedicated to recruiting, developing and empowering a diverse, high-performing workforce that is passionate about what they do, committed to our shared values and dedicated to our customers’ mission.
RIS I is the delivery of regional IT services to the end user. We offer support of end user devices including desktop, workplace peripherals, and voice and video devices. We support local and campus area networks, including wireless and cable plant.
AT&T has an opening for a Facilities Specialist to support the team by assisting in the management of the design, planning, construction and maintenance of equipment, machinery, buildings and other facilities.
Description of Job Duties/Responsibilities:
The position plans and schedules facility modifications, including estimates on equipment, labor materials and other related costs.
Will assist in the coordination of building space allocation and layout, communication services, and facility expansion.
Inspects construction and installation progress.
Initiates planned maintenance programs for a variety of office equipment.
Manages the receiving function.
Manages preventive maintenance of facility equipment, including HVAC and office equipment.
Manages the telecommunication function.
Oversees the parking program.
Oversees the cleaning and maintenance of facility.

Required Clearance: Able to obtain/maintain a TS/SCI with polygraph. (#clearable)
Required Qualifications: The Project Manager shall have a Bachelor’s Degree in a Computer, Business or Math related field and two (2) years’ experience in two of the following system categories: acquisition, processing, analysis and reporting. Shall be knowledgeable of the guidelines provided by the Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR) and Defense Federal Acquisition Regulation (DFAR), DoD 5000 series, and Intelligence Community Directive (ICD) 801 policies. An Associate’s Degree and an additional seven (7) years may be substituted for the Bachelor’s Degree.
Ready to join our team? Apply today!",11150,Washington
222,Project Coordinator,Marcum LLP,"Washington, DC 20036 (Downtown area)",None,"Job Summary:
The Project Coordinator position supports the Nonprofit Search, Transition & Planning practice (65-70%) and Managed Human Resources practice (30-35%). The Coordinator will perform various administrative functions to support administrative tasks, business development, and client engagements for both practices.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Business Development & Administration


Supports all aspects of business development for the practices:
CRM:
Maintains current, accurate entries in the CRM to track the practices' business development. Enters new client data and updates with the information for engagements (i.e., committee chair, new executive and hire date, etc.).
Provides weekly update to Partners.
Proposals & Engagement Letters:
Coordinates and maintains current proposal templates (scope of services, relevant background information, team bios, references, etc.).
Drafts proposals and other materials for prospective clients.
Manages proposal process for the practices, ensuring timely submission of materials in response to RFPs.
Drafts engagement letters and addendums & processes through DocuSign platform.
Supports Partners in setting up new clients/engagements, initiating new client internal activities, sending conflict checks, etc.
Responsible for clarity, accuracy, and excellence in all final proposals/engagement letters.
Business Development:
Coordinates initial prospective client calls and follow-up meetings/presentations to Boards/CEOs/committees.
Coordinates with Marcum's DC Marketing/Business Development team to ensure collaterals align with DC office advancements.
Corresponds via email with prospective clients as requested.
Greets prospective client visitors & escorts to conference/huddle rooms; prepares materials to support meetings as directed.
Administration
Coordinates team meetings (video-conference and/or in-person); prepares agendas, facilities, and technology. Records/transcribes minutes of meetings when necessary.
Supports Partner's calendar, schedules appointments, and manages travel arrangements
Serves as receptionist as part of rotation with other administrators, includes opening mail, answering phones, providing support for 8th floor reception area. Provides back-up support to administrative staff as needed.
Utilizes a variety of office equipment, including a computer copiers, scanners and fax machines. Makes copies, scans and sends faxes, mail, and e-mail as required; arranges for courier and overnight services. Supports video-conferencing (Zoom) platform.

Client Engagements


Initial engagement support:
Works with engagement lead to support document request and organization of client information.
Drafts engagement support documents (engagement timeline, agendas, etc.)
Maintains engagement information file in Pulse.
Schedules regular calls with engagement committees as directed by leader
Supports team members on engagements:
Assembles packets/materials to support engagements (PowerPoints, candidate presentation/interview packets, etc.)
Proofs/edits client deliverables, including assisting with drafting certain deliverables.
Posting positions on targeted job boards.
Compiles and types reports.
Schedules meetings, candidate interviews, committee check-ins, etc. .
Supports engagement work through MindScope, LinkedIn Recruiter, GuideStar, etc.
Uses DocuSign to send offer letters and other new hire documents.
Constructs and tracks client surveys in SurveyMonkey.
Formats and reviews compensation studies, employee handbooks and other client deliverables.
Generates documents for clients, including questionnaires and employee action forms.
Supports client meetings (on- and off-site)
Coordinates meetings using supportive technology
Arranges for catering
Records/transcribes minutes of meetings
Supports colleagues on client engagements whenever helpful.

Minimum Qualifications (Education, experience, certifications):


Provides outstanding customer service to all customers (external and internal); Capably supports multiple team members; Manages difficult or emotional customer situations calmly and professionally
Strong verbal and written communication skills. Well-developed interpersonal skills to handle sensitive and confidential situations, and difficult clients/customers.
Demonstrates interpersonal skills through maintaining confidentiality, communicating professionally and actively listening to others;
Strong organizational and data management skills.
Continual attention to detail in composing, typing, and proofing materials. Must have business writing and proofreading skills, and internet research skills
Ability to establish priorities and meet deadlines; desire and ability to work in a very fast-paced environment.
Some analytical ability is required in order to gather and summarize data for reports, should find solutions to administrative problems
Familiar with the use of various computer software programs including Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook), Adobe Acrobat, CRM, Pulse or data management system, Zoom or other video-conferencing technology; other technology platforms a plus.
Outlook/calendar scheduling experience and ability to manage calendar/appointments.
Bachelor's degree

Additional Skills and Abilities:

Familiarity with non-profits & their organization structures preferred.
2+ years' relevant experience preferred. Relevant volunteer and/or intern experience acceptable. Must be fluent with computer technology, office equipment, and office technology platforms.
High interest in working in a fast-paced, dynamic environment that values excellence and team work.
Ability to listen effectively and to gain the trust and confidence of management and staff; Ability to maintain confidentiality.
Ability to support a team and prioritize effectively.
Ability to be flexible and multitask
Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from the team.
Ability to define problems, gather data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions.
Ability to learn new systems as required.

Work Environment:
Work is performed in a business office environment with exposure to general office environment noise from others within the office. Local travel to our subsidiary office is required on occasion. Work beyond standard business hours may be required to complete work and meet deadlines. Reasonable accommodations will be made under the guidelines of the Americans With Disabilities Act.

Disclaimer:
The information contained in this job description has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by an employee within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and skills required of employee to successfully perform this job. Employees are expected to follow their manager/supervisor's instructions and to perform the tasks requested by their manager/supervisor. No employee should ever be asked to perform duties outside legal boundaries. Should questions arise in this regard, contact Human Resources immediately.",11150,Washington
223,Senior IT Manager,Unity Health Care.,"Washington, DC 20003 (Capitol Hill area)","$137,500 a year","INTRODUCTION
Under the supervision of the Vice President of Information Systems, the Senior Information Technology Manager’s (Senior IT Manager) role is to ensure the streamlined operation of the IT Department is in alignment with the business objectives of the Unity Health Care (Unity). This individual will plan, coordinate, direct, and design the IT-related activities of Unity, as well as provide administrative direction and support for daily operational activities of the IT department. The Senior IT Manager will work closely with decision makers in other departments to identify, recommend, develop, implement, and support cost-effective technology solutions for all aspects of the organization. This person will also define and implement IT policies, procedures, and best practices.
MAJOR DUTIES/ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS
Essential and other important responsibilities and duties may include, but are not limited to the following:
Strategy & Planning
Lead IT Department operational and strategic planning, including fostering innovation, planning projects, and organizing and negotiating the allocation of resources.
Acquisition & Deployment
Benchmark, analyze, report on, and make recommendations for the improvement and growth of IT infrastructure and IT systems.
Manage financial aspects of the IT Department, including purchasing, budgeting, and budget review.
Develop business case justifications and cost/benefit analyses for IT spending and initiatives.
Develop and implement all IT policies and procedures, including those for architecture, security, disaster recovery, standards, purchasing, and service provision.
Develop requests for proposal.
Negotiate and administer vendor, outsourcer, and consultant contracts and service agreements.
Operational Management
Manage the deployment, monitoring, maintenance, development, upgrade, support and security of all IT systems, including servers, PCs, operating systems, hardware, software, and peripherals.
Oversee provision of end-user services, including help desk and technical support services.
Work with stakeholders to define business and systems requirements for new technology implementations.
Direct research on potential technology solutions in support of procurement efforts.
Keep current with the latest technologies.
Approve and oversee projects and project portfolio.
Practice asset management for IT hardware, software, and equipment.
Manage IT staffing, including recruitment, supervision, scheduling, development, evaluation, and disciplinary actions.
Other duties as assigned.
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS
BA/BS degree with a technical major such as computer science, information technology or engineering or related field.
Five years of related work experience.
Two (2) years of experience in a health care institution preferred.
Microsoft certification or other IT certifications preferred.
REQUIRED KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES
Experience deploying and supporting Microsoft servers, Active Directory, Windows workstations, O365, VMWare, SharePoint, AWS and cloud infrastructure.
Understanding of firewalls, network routing, VPN communications and VoIP communications.
Experience with eClinicalWorks and/or GE Healthcare products (Logician, Centricity) is strongly desired.
Proven experience in IT infrastructure planning and development.
In-depth knowledge of applicable data privacy practices and laws.
Strong understanding of human resource management principles, practices, and procedures.
Strong understanding of project management principles.
The ability to effectively communicate with a variety of technical and non-technical audiences, problem solve collaboratively, and build consensus across teams.
Excellent written and oral communication skills.
Ability to conduct and direct research into IT issues and products as required.
Ability to perform general mathematical calculations for the purpose of creating business cases, budgets, and so on.
Highly self-motivated and directed.
Keen attention to detail.
Proven analytical, evaluative, and problem-solving abilities.
Ability to effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure environment.
Exceptional customer service orientation.
Extensive experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment.
SUPERVISORY CONTROLS
The position reports to the Vice President of Information Systems. Direct reports to the position include the IT Infrastructure and Security Manager, Senior IT Technician and the Telecommunications Manager.
GUIDELINES
The position abides by all rules and regulations set forth by applicable licensing and regulatory bodies, as well as UHC policies and procedures.
PERSONAL CONTACTS
The position requires contact with staff at all levels throughout the organization. There are also external organization relationships that may be a part of the work of this individual.
PHYSICAL EFFORT AND WORK ENVIRONMENT
The position will have to do some lifting of computer equipment, supplies and materials from time to time.
Refer to the attached ADA Physical Efforts Checklist.
OTHER SIGNIFICANT FACTS
Although the position is assigned a specific shift, this position may be assigned alternate shifts to address the needs of Unity Health Care.
RISKS
The position involves everyday risk and discomforts, which require normal safety precautions typical of such places as offices, meetings, training rooms, and other UHC health Care Sites. The work area is adequately lit, heated, and ventilated. All medical services shall be provided according to medically accepted community standards of care. The employee shall provide evidence of a recent (within the past twelve (12) months) health assessment that includes a PPD and/or chest x-ray results.
The statements contained herein describe the scope of the responsibility and essential functions of this position, but should not be considered to be an all-inclusive listing of work requirements. Individuals may perform other duties as assigned including work in other areas to cover absences or relief to equalize peak work periods or otherwise balance the workload.",11150,Washington
224,IT Director/Manager,Caelum Research Corporation,"Rockville, MD 20850",None,"POSITION TITLE: IT Director/Manager in the Corporate Office (Rockville, MD)

POSITION SUMMARY:

Lead or support Caelum’s IT development and identify potential business initiatives in federal agencies that provide for the expansion of Caelum’s IT and related capabilities and revenues. Develop or provide input for proposals as part of business development activities.

RESPONSIBILITIES:

Works with Senior leadership to develop short- and long-range goals/objectives for the IT and related technologies business development functions.
Develops and recommends strategies for taking advantage of the Company’s technological strengths and for developing new capabilities.
Lead or champion IT initiatives in new business capture and pursue activities; assist multi-discipline and/or cross-functional teams in proposal preparation activities.
Monitors company IT performance against contract requirements, compliance and maintains customer contact on issues, to ensure customer satisfaction. Encourages and supports a “team” mindset within the company.
Assist managing and reporting activity, pipeline development, and revenue forecasting through developed organizational processes.

REPORTING/INTERFACE RELATIONSHIPS:

Reports to Caelum’s Sr. Vice President.
Interfaces externally with government personnel, vendors, and teaming or joint venture partners.
Participate in monthly manager and weekly BD meeting, and internally interface with other executives, program or project managers, HR, and support group members as needed.

EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE REQUIRED:

B.S. in Computer Science, Engineering, Science, or related field.
Advanced study or related professional training and certification are desirable.
At least 5 years demonstrated previous successful relevant work and management experience.
Knowledge of the Fed Government contracting acquisition processes.

COMPENSATION AND OTHER FINANCIAL CONSIDERATIONS AT HIRE:

Base salary open, the title of the position is depending upon background and experience of successful candidate.
This position is an incentive-oriented position; in addition to base salary and comprehensive fringe benefits, the successful candidate will be eligible for additional incentive compensation, which is directly related to work performance.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT:

The essentially functions of this position are in the office environment and using computers, and occasionally out-of-town travels. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Caelum is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE).

Point of Contact:

Please submit your resume to Careers-hq@caelum.com.

DISCLAIMER:

The preceding job description has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.",11150,Washington
225,Information Tech and Finance All Levels (SR),"Davis Unlimited Information Technologies, Inc. (DU...","Fort George G Meade, MD",None,"Full-time

Are you tired of the red tape? Do you want to work in a limitless environment where you matter, great work is recognized, and have opportunities for advancement? Davis Unlimited Information Technologies, Inc (DUIT) wants you! Davis Unlimited Information Technologies, Inc (DUIT) has immediate openings for stellar professional(s).

We are looking for the best and brightest in the following: Acquisition Professionals, Business & Financial Analysts, Configuration Managers, Cyber Security Professionals, *Database Management Specialist (hottest job), Help Desk Personnel, Information Security Officers/Engineers, Intel Analysts (various types), Master Schedulers, Process Engineers/Managers, Project/ Program Managers, *Software Engineers/Developers (hottest jobs), System Administrators, System Analysts, System Engineers, Technical writers, Test Engineers, Web Developers, and many more IT positions of various experience levels in Maryland areas [(Fort Meade, Laurel, Annapolis Junction, Columbia, and other MD locations) to join our winning and innovative information technology team!

Why wait?...apply and submit your resume today!

Davis Unlimited Information Technologies, Inc. (DUIT) is a woman owned, minority owned small business information technology consulting company. We have opportunities for advancement and our salaries and benefits are competitive. Check us out on the web at http://duit.us. We do things differently at DUIT! Contact us to find out how. Together, we can DUIT!

All Applicants must have the following: an active high-level security clearance that required an investigative screening exam and meet the minimum job requirements specified for applying position. Currently, we are not seeking clearable applicants. All information provided is subject to verification. A security background check is required, and if you have already completed a background check/clearance, then that is a plus!",11150,Washington
226,"Manager, IT Operations",MacroGenics,"Rockville, MD 20850",None,"MacroGenics is a leader in the discovery and development of innovative medicines that utilize our next generation antibody-based technologies. Our team of 300+ dedicated individuals is advancing a pipeline of product candidates to treat patients with cancer as well as various autoimmune disorders and infectious diseases. Our products and platforms have attracted multiple partnerships with leading pharmaceutical companies around the globe.
The Company considers its employees to be its most valuable asset and we are committed to providing opportunities for individuals to learn and grow as a means to further their professional development. MacroGenics' corporate culture promotes an atmosphere of innovation, open communication and teamwork where employees can see firsthand how they contribute to the success of the organization.
Summary of Position
The Manager, IT Operations plays a critical role in the Information Technology organization. This IT Manager role is responsible for overseeing the day-to-day activities and operations of the Operations team (Help Desk, Desktop Support, and User Access Management) to ensure end-users and business teams receive the support they require. In addition to managing an IT support team, this role also monitors operations to make sure tickets are addressed in a timely manner, as well as serving as the IT liaison to major business-impacting initiatives. A key focus area is on delivering the best IT customer support experience to the organization.
Responsibilities
Leads and manages the Operations team (Help Desk, Desktop Support, and User Access Management) ensuring quality customer service and accurate incident ticket resolution that drives customer satisfaction.
Oversees the management of service requests, incident reports, and problems from a variety of internal and external sources. Manages and coordinates urgent and complicated support issues. Acts as escalation point for all requests and incidents. Develops and matures phone/ticket escalation processes to ensure free flowing escalation and information within the organization. Determines root cause of issues and communicates appropriately to internal and external customers.
Oversees all staff activities to ensure quality and timely responses. Builds/obtains (from other departments) a variety of training material for service desk support staff to facilitate greater efficiency and effectiveness. As needed, schedules employees working times and provide backup support. Interacts with internal and external customers.
Performs all people management responsibilities including recruiting and selection of new hires, and training, coaching, mentoring and performance managing Service Desk Specialists.
Manages both the strategic vision for the service desk and the ability to set the long-term direction of the team, while balancing short-term actions to maintain and improve service delivery.
Provides data and reporting of KPI’s and trends to IT department and others in ad-hoc, weekly, monthly, and as needed. Drives Ticket Deep Dive and develops strategies for improvement. Works to make Service Desk the single source of truth and service delivery channel for IT.
Manages process for User Access Management, ensuring proper access requests and verification, providing access rights, monitoring identity status, ensuring logging and tracking of access, and removing or restricting access rights.
Oversees Knowledge Base Solutions respository and ensures top quality solutions are available to the staff. Develops service and business level agreements to set expectations and measure performance for internal and external clients. Develops an effective and workable framework for managing and improving customer IT support in the organization. Advises management on situations that may require additional client support or escalation.
Manages process for communicating outage/emergency activities to the organization.
Conducts regular satisfaction survey through our ticketing system. Reviews survey feedback to improve services, tools and support experience.
Drives strategic assessments of external resources, service providers and systems including vendor selections; oversees vendor work quality and productivity while managing vendor relationships and contracting. Manages vendor relationships as it depends on daily operational needs. Conducts PO review and has approval/budgeting responsibility.
Performs other related duties as assigned.
Minimum Qualifications
Education & Other Credentials
A Bachelor's degree in Management Information Systems or a related field.
Experience
Minimum of 5 years of experience in Information Technology with extensive day-to-day IT operations experience
At least one year of supervisory experience
Professional experience serving in a management and leadership role within an information technology service function or as a business process consultant
Demonstrable experience overseeing planning, delivery, and maintenance of a portfolio of business-critical computerized solutions on time and on budget
Vendor management experience including vendor due diligence, contracting, and performance management
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities
Intermediate technical knowledge and troubleshooting of computer servers and workstations, printers, fax and copy machines, and VOIP telephones
Fosters partnerships and contracts which result in competitive investment for MacroGenics and maximizes the efficiency of vendor performance.
Working knowledge of the system design lifecycle, IT project management and development of validation/qualification documentation within a regulated environment, including financial management for projects and operations.
Strong leadership skills in the areas of professional customer service, computer, networking, and application troubleshooting.
Strong interfacing and collaboration skills with both technical and non-technical colleagues including IT contractors/developers, business stakeholders and customers, vendors/suppliers, at all levels including senior management and Board of Director members.
Strong interpersonal, communication skills, to ensure excellent customer service
Proven people skills in managing large IT staff in a matrixed environment with shifting priorities.
Ability to handle a dynamic environment, be self-motivated and proactive
Intermediate knowledge of the Microsoft Office 365 Suite
Intermediate knowledge of SharePoint and intranet site support and technologies
Supervisory Responsibilities
Deskside Support I and II
Access Management
Preferred Qualifications
Prior experience in this role in a similar industry.
Statement
MacroGenics is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. Employment selection and related decisions are made without regard to race, color, national origin, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, religion, age, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. We are committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to individuals with disabilities. If, because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please email info@macrogenics.com or call (301) 354-3566 and/or 711 for TTD/TTY service.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled
We do not accept non-solicited resumes or candidate submittals from search/recruiting agencies.",11150,Washington
227,IT Software Project Manager,Jacobs,"Herndon, VA 20171",None,"Critical Mission Solutions

Your mission is our mission.

We're invested in you and your success. Everything we do - whether Aerospace, Defense, Intelligence, Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Nuclear, Automotive, or Telecommunications - is more than just a project. It's our challenge as human beings, too. That's why we bring a thoughtful and collaborative approach to every one of our partnerships.

It's our promise to challenge the status quo as we redefine how to solve the world's greatest challenges, and transform big ideas into intelligent solutions for a more connected, sustainable world.

Design your career with a company that inspires and empowers you to deliver your best work so you can evolve, grow and succeed –today and into tomorrow.


Your Impact:
Jacobs is currently seeking an IT Software Porject Manager in Herndon, VA! Responsibilities may include:
Serves at the point of contact for the requirements of the software team.
Burns software to media and uploads software to repository for future use.
Ensures that personnel tasks are completed within established deadlines, tasking guidance from the Government is clear and unambiguous, and potential problems are pre-empted.
Consults and coordinates with the appropriate customer for problem resolution, task scheduling, and new resource requirements and task clarification.
Provides management of contract personnel and ensures high quality and acceptable task completion and deliverables within their contract in compliance with the Statement of Work (SOW). Provides frequent periodic reports on the status of contractor staffing.
Candidate must be able to monitor, troubleshoot and identify challenges for both non-technical and technical issues throughout the entire project and if necessary implement appropriate technical modifications to ensure delivery of products/services to customers and/or stakeholders.
Establishes and implements streamlined processes and procedures enabling the Contractor to rapidly respond to requirements of the customer.
Consults with users, management, vendors, and technicians to assess computing needs and system requirements.
Makes decisions that deal with the daily schedule and work to be accomplished with management oversight.
PMs make decisions that deal with the daily schedule and work to be accomplished
Stays abreast of various software that is being requested
Other duties as assigned
Here’s What You’ll Need:

Must be able to interface with individuals at all levels of the organization both verbally and in writing.
Proficiency in the use of MS Office product suite (PowerPoint, Excel, Word, SharePoint).
Some PC repair/troubleshooting skills may be required.
Effective time management skills.
Some basic knowledge of Software Project Management procedures and policies specific to the area of assignment.
Ability to work ticket queues
Some basic knowledge of various Project Management databases and applications.
Oral and written communication skills sufficient to compose and deliver responses to routine questions in a clear and concise manner.
Ability to develop an internal network of professional working relationships within the work unit and with service partners’ counterparts in other offices.
Effectively resolves routine problems
Ability to adapt to changing work requirements and priorities.
Ability to use good judgment and personal initiative in recognizing appropriate action to be taken for completion of tasks.
Ability to demonstrate a high level of service delivery.
Ability to interact with people who have different values, cultures, or backgrounds.
Must be a team player.
Must take and pass a drug test and background check
Must be able to maintain regular, reliable attendance and ensure on time daily arrival.
Must be willing to travel as needed.
Must be a U.S. citizen
Desired Requirements (nice to have but not required):
Bachelors’ Degree
Project Management Professional (PMP) Certificate
#ourmission
Essential Functions
An Information Technology Generalist proficient in many facets of information technology requirements. The candidate should possess general business knowledge and soft-skills allowing them to be adaptable in a wide array of work environments. The candidate should have the willingness to participate in these type of activities when called upon to do so.
Physical Requirements:
Work is primarily performed in an office environment. Typically employees sit comfortably to do their work, interspersed by brief periods of standing, walking, bending, carrying papers and books, and extensive periods requiring the use of computer terminals to accomplish work objectives.
Work Environment:
General Office environment. The work environment is fast-paced and sometimes involves extreme deadline pressures. The nature of the work requires a high degree of teamwork and cooperation with other members of the staff as well as individuals across the Company and Customers.
Equipment & Machines:
General office equipment including PC/laptop, Fax, Copiers, Shredder, Printers, Telephone, and other miscellaneous office equipment.
Attendance:
Attendance is critical at all times. Must be able to work a 40-hour workweek, normally Monday through Friday; however, times and days may vary depending on business requirements. Needs to be available to work overtime during critical peaks and be available to meet last minute requests for overtime should the situation occur.
Other Essential Functions:
Grooming and dress must be appropriate for the position and must not impose a safety risk/hazard to the employee or others. Must put forward a professional behavior that enhances productivity and promotes teamwork and cooperation. Must be well-organized with the ability to coordinate and prioritize multiple tasks simultaneously. Must work well under pressure to meet deadline requirements.
Critical Thinking — Using logic and reasoning to identify the strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions or approaches to problems.
Customer and Personal Service — Knowledge of principles and processes for providing customer and personal services. This includes customer needs assessment, meeting quality standards for services, and evaluation of customer satisfaction.
Administration and Management — Knowledge of business and management principles involved in strategic planning, resource allocation, human resources modeling, leadership technique, production methods, and coordination of people and resources.
Judgment and Decision Making — Considering the relative costs and benefits of potential actions to
choose the most appropriate one.
Coordination — Possess the ability to quickly and strategically adjust project activities in relation to internal/external team actions.
Monitoring — Monitoring/Assessing performance of yourself, other individuals, or organizations to make improvements or take corrective action.
Jacobs is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding, or medical conditions related to pregnancy, childbirth, or breastfeeding), age, medical condition, marital or domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression and transgender status, mental disability or physical disability, genetic information, military or veteran status, citizenship, low-income status or any other status or characteristic protected by applicable law. Learn more about your rights under Federal EEO laws and supplemental language.
At Jacobs, we’re challenging today to reinvent tomorrow by solving the world’s most critical problems for thriving cities, resilient environments, mission-critical outcomes, operational advancement, scientific discovery and cutting-edge manufacturing, turning abstract ideas into realities that transform the world for good. With $13 billion in revenue and a talent force of more than 55,000, Jacobs provides a full spectrum of professional services including consulting, technical, scientific and project delivery for the government and private sector.",11150,Washington
228,PROGRAM ANALYST,US Air National Guard,"Andrews AFB, MD","$103,690 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
Click on """" button below to view Eligibilities being considered and other IMPORTANT information.

The primary purpose of this position is to serve as a command headquarters level senior program analyst, planning, organizing, and determining necessary policies, regulations, directives, programs, doctrine, and procedures for the establishment and maintenance of assigned major command level programs related to ANG Readiness Training.

Responsibilities
Leads, directs or participates on teams designed to develop specific combat readiness improvement; delegates and coordinates the efforts of the group through appropriate staffing.
Senior analyst using a mastery of command and control, logistics, or personnel experience, performs or oversees a broad range of highly complex qualitative and quantitative analyses of programs, policies, and issues.
Serves as point-of-contact for assigned current and projected workload and manages projects, coordinating, planning and scheduling use of resources.
Participates in strategic planning to improve organizational direction and focus using strategic planning tools and techniques.
Reviews and ensures proper documentation of ANG unit readiness assessments.
Develops complex queries and analyzes trends by Service Core Function (SCF) to assist in planning and programming decisions to improve ANG support to Air Force, gaining MAJCOM and Combatant Command requirements.
Readiness Branch, prepares/delivers high-level oral presentations, briefings, trainings, and strategy sessions with staff functions/activities to secure cooperation, resolve matters, convey info relative to readiness reporting of ANG units.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13
Job family (Series)
0343 Management And Program Analysis
Similar jobs
Analysts, Logistics
Analysts, Program
Logistics Analysts
Program Analysts
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
U.S. Citizenship Required
Males must be registered for Selective Service, see www.sss.gov
Must be able to obtain and maintain a Top Secret clearance
Centrally managed; PCS expenses WILL BE paid IAW JTR and Air Force Regulations
Recruitment incentives may/may not be authorized
This posn is subject to provisions of the DoD Priority Placement Program
Designated a drug testing position; incumbent will be subject to random drug testing
May travel by military or commercial air to conferences, meetings, or other functions away from the duty site
Command and Control/Logistics/Personnel experience is critical to the successful completion of the work
The incumbent is subject to short or no-notice recall to duty for emergency situations or exercise
Disclosure of Political Appointments
The employee may be required to work other than normal duty hours, which may include evenings, weekends, and/or holidays
Employee may be required to work overtime
Position may perform other related duties as assigned
Qualifications
In order to qualify, you must meet the specialized experience requirements described in the Office of Personnel Management (OPM) Qualification Standards for General Schedule Positions, Administrative and Management Positions.

SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE: Applicants must have at least one (1) year of specialized experience at the next lower grade GS-12, or equivalent in other pay systems. Examples of specialized experience includes expert knowledge of a wide range of qualitative and quantitative methods to participate in the assessment and improvement in OPLANs, CONPLAN s and NGB-level plans and programs in support of major operations such as war, contingency operations, mobilization, deployment and domestic operations; the sequence and timing of key operational events and milestones; methods of evaluating the effectiveness of readiness programs and impact to combat operations; and the relationship of the various command entities involved in overall program planning and execution of military operations and evaluations; knowledge of the application of operations/maintenance/logistics expertise as it applies to readiness reporting; working knowledge of personnel, equipment and training systems that form the basis of readiness reporting; ability to ascertain the capabilities and measures of performance.

FEDERAL TIME-IN-GRADE (TIG) REQUIREMENT FOR GENERAL SCHEDULE (GS) POSITIONS: Merit promotion applicants must meet applicable time-in-grade requirements to be considered eligible. One year at the GS-12 level is required to meet the time-in-grade requirements for the GS-13 level. TIG applies if you are in a current GS position or held a GS position within the previous 52 weeks. NOTE: Applicants applying as VEOA candidates who are current GS civil service employees or are prior GS civil service employees within the past 52 weeks must also meet time-in-grade requirements.

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES (KSAs): Your qualifications will be evaluated on the basis of your level of knowledge, skills, abilities and/or competencies in the following areas:

1. Expert knowledge of a wide range of qualitative and/or quantitative methods to participate in the assessment and improvement of ANG participation in OPLANs, CONPLAN s and NGB-level plans and programs in support of major operations such as war, contingency operations, mobilization, deployment and domestic operations.

2. Knowledge of NGB and ANG program goals and objectives; the sequence and timing of key operational events and milestones; methods of evaluating the effectiveness of readiness programs and impact to combat operations; and the relationship of the various command entities involved in overall program planning and execution of military operations and evaluations.

3. Knowledge of the application of Air Force operations/maintenance/logistics expertise as it applies to readiness reporting; working knowledge of personnel, equipment and training systems that form the basis of readiness reporting; ability to ascertain the capabilities and measures of performance for ANG assigned missions.

4. Skill in designing and conducting comprehensive studies, and preparing solutions to resolve substantive problems and issues of effectiveness and efficiency of work operations at the higher headquarters' level.

5. Ability to plan, organize, and negotiate effectively with senior analysts and management to accept and implement recommendations, where proposals involve substantial resources, and require extensive changes in established concepts and procedures.

6. Demonstrated ability to communicate effectively both orally and in writing; present, negotiate, and defend complex, sometimes controversial advice, positions, and issues; and gain cooperation from others through technical competence, tact, courtesy, and diplomacy.


PART-TIME OR UNPAID EXPERIENCE: Credit will be given for appropriate unpaid and or part-time work. You must clearly identify the duties and responsibilities in each position held and the total number of hours per week.

VOLUNTEER WORK EXPERIENCE: Refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service Programs (i.e., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community; student and social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge and skills that can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP): For information on how to apply as an ICTAP eligible click here. To be well-qualified and exercise selection priority for this vacancy, displaced Federal employees must be rated well qualified or above for this position. You must submit a copy of the agency notice, your most recent performance rating, and your most recent SF-50 noting position, grade level, and duty location.

Employed Annuitants (Reemployed Annuitants): Applicants in receipt of an annuity based on civilian employment in the Federal Service are subject to the DoD Policy on The Employment of Annuitants. Click here for more information.

120-Day Register: This announcement may result in a 120-day register that may be used to fill like vacancies for 120 days after the closing date. Applicants may be referred for consideration as vacancies occur.

Military Spouse Preference (MSP) Eligible: MSP applicants, if determined best qualified, must be selected at the full performance level and placed at the full performance level. You must include a completed copy of the Military Spouse PPP Self-Certification Checklist dated within 30 days along with the documents identified on the checklist to verify your eligibility for MSP. Click here to obtain a copy of the Military Spouse PPP Self-Certification Checklist.

Direct Deposit: All federal employees are required to have direct deposit.

If you are unable to apply online, view the following link for information regarding Alternate Application. The Vacancy ID is 11133878.

If you have questions regarding this announcement and have hearing or speech difficulties click here.

Tax Law Impact for PCS: On 22-Dec-2017, Public Law 115-97 - the ""Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017"" suspended qualified moving expense deductions along with the exclusion for employer reimbursements and payments of moving expenses effective 01-Jan-2018 for tax years 2018 through 2025. The law made taxable certain reimbursements and other payments, including driving mileage, airfare and lodging expenses, en-route travel to the new duty station, and temporary storage of those items. The Federal Travel Regulation Bulletin (FTR) 18-05 issued by General Services Administration (GSA) has authorized agencies to use the Withholding Tax Allowance (WTA) and Relocation Income Tax Allowance (RITA) to pay for ""substantially all"" of the increased tax liability resulting from the ""2018 Tax Cuts and Jobs Act"" for certain eligible individuals. For additional information on WTA/RITA allowances and eligibilities please click here. Subsequently, FTR Bulletin 20-04 issued by GSA, provides further information regarding NDAA FY2020, Public Law 116-92, and the expansion of eligibility beyond ""transferred"" for WTA/RITA allowances. For additional information, please click here.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Your application package (resume, supporting documents, and responses to the questionnaire) will be used to determine your eligibility, qualifications, and quality ranking for this position. Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating or consideration for employment.

BASIS OF RATING:
Your application will be rated under the Cut Point procedures based on the extent to which the quality, depth, and complexity of your experience and education relate to the qualification requirements. Additional points are not added for Veteran's Preference; however, Veteran's Preference is considered where applicable.

Best Qualified Group: Candidates in this category possess exceptional skills and experience to exceed well above the minimum requirements
Fully Qualified Group: Candidates in this category possess good skills and experience above the minimum requirements.
Basically Qualified Group: Candidates in this category meet the minimum education and/or experience requirements.

The resume/documents you submit must support your responses to the online questionnaire. If your application contradicts or does not support your questionnaire responses, you will receive a rating of ""not qualified"" or ""insufficient information"" and you will not receive further consideration for this job.

For additional information on what to include in your resume, click here.

Applicants who meet the requirements for and apply as a non-competitive eligible that meet minimal qualifications and other requirements of this position, will be given consideration as a non-competitive candidate and will be referred unless blocked by an individual with priority/preference.

APPRAISALS/AWARDS: Hiring Managers use objective methods and consider previous performance appraisals and awards in the selection process. Current Federal Civilian employees should list any relevant performance related rating and/or awards in your resume.

Applicants who disqualify themselves will not be evaluated further.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Top Secret
Drug test required
Yes
Required Documents

Required Documents
The following documents are required and must be provided with your application. Applicants who do not submit required documentation to determine eligibility and qualifications will be eliminated from consideration. Other documents may be required based on the eligibility/eligibilities you are claiming. Click here to view the AF Civilian Employment Eligibility Guide and the required documents you must submit to substantiate the eligibilities you are claiming.

Online Application: Questionnaire
Resume: For qualification determinations your resume must contain hours worked per week (if part-time) and dates of employment (i.e., month/year to month/year or month/year to present). If your resume does not contain this information, your application may be marked as insufficient and you will not receive consideration for this position. If you are a current Federal employee or previous Federal employee, provide your pay plan, series and grade, i.e. GS-0301-09. Current Federal Civilian Employees should list any relevant performance related rating (given within the last three years) and/or incentive awards in your resume. Do NOT include photographs (or links to social media such as LinkedIn), inappropriate material, inappropriate content, nor personal information such as age, gender, religion, social security number, etc., on your resume.
Transcripts/Registration/License: If qualifying on education/position requires education, you must submit copies of your transcripts and if required for the position, submit an active, current registration/license.
Veterans: If claiming VEOA, VRA or 30% Disabled Veteran - Submit VOW certification memo or copy of the official DD-Form 214, which must include the character of service (i.e., with an honorable or general discharge). This will be annotated in block 24 on member copy 2, 4, or 7 of the DD-Form 214. If claiming 30% Disabled Veteran, you must also submit a VA Letter or a disability determination from a branch of the Armed Forces. NOTE: All veterans claiming 10-point preference must also submit a SF-15.
Current or Former Federal Civilian Employees (includes current Air Force employees): You must submit a legible copy of a SF-50, Notification of Personnel Action. The SF-50, block 24 must contain ""1"" or ""2"" AND block 34 must be a ""1"". Employees eligible under an OPM approved interchange agreement, block 34 may contain a ""1"" or ""2"".
Promotion Consideration: If you wish to be considered as a promotion candidate and your SF-50 has an effective date within the past year, it may not clearly demonstrate you meet the one-year time-in-grade requirements. You will need to provide additional SF-50s which clearly demonstrates you meet the time-in-grade requirements (examples of appropriate SF-50s include Promotions, Within-Grade, Grade/Range Increases, and SF-50s with an effective date more than one year old).
ACTIVE DUTY SERVICE MEMBERS: The VOW Act requires federal agencies to treat an eligible active duty service member as a veteran, disabled veteran, and preference eligible (as applicable) when applying for civil service positions before the effective release or discharge date. Appointment of military members before the release or discharge date is permissible if the member is on terminal leave. At the time the active duty member applies for a civil position, he or she must submit a ""certification"" memo in lieu of a DD-Form 214, Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty. Active duty members applying for a civil service position without submitting a valid certification memo or DD-Form 214 with their application will render the member ineligible for the position. The certification memo must originate from the member's military service branch on official letterhead and contain the following:
Name/Rank/Grade of Service Member
Branch of Armed Forces
Dates of Active Service (Start and End Date(s)
Expected Date of Discharge/Release from Active Duty
Terminal leave start date (if applicable)
Expected character of service/discharge and type of separation (i.e. separation or retirement)
Must be certified within 120 days of anticipated discharge
Signature by, or by direction of the adjutant, personnel office, unit commander, or higher headquarters commander.
Note: The VOW Act provides tentative preference. If appointed, a DD Form-214 must be submitted upon receipt.

OPTIONAL DOCUMENTS:
Performance Appraisals for Current Federal Civilian Employees - Most recent performance appraisals (dated within last 3 years) showing the official rating of record, signed by a supervisor, or statement why the performance appraisal is unavailable.
Awards for Current Federal Civilian employees - List any awards received within the last 3 years on the resume.
Note: Applicant must not submit award SF50s-Notification of Personnel Actions (SF50s).
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Federal employees - Excepted service
Current excepted service federal employees.
Individuals with disabilities
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Eligible NAF employees are considered under Hiring Path - ""Federal employees-Excepted service""",11150,Washington
229,Entry Level Project Manager - Language Services,"Schreiber Translations, Inc.","Rockville, MD 20850 (Town Center area)",None,"ABOUT THE POSITIONProject Managers (PM) at Schreiber Translations perform all aspects of project management for translation, interpretation, and other language services projects from start to finish, including: communicating with clients to accept and begin requests; following client requirements and timetables; setting project guidelines; scheduling, assigning, and reviewing the translators' work; troubleshooting/problem-solving client and translator issues; and following profit margin policies and strategy. You will work with Program Managers and leadership in the Operations department, as well as with other departments in the company. This is an entry-level job at our company, but it requires autonomy and the ability to manage yourself well.Come work with clients all over the DC area and the country who need to communicate with people in many other languages. Work with professional translators and interpreters in every language and from every culture all over the world.(Schreiber Translations is currently fully remote. At some point we will ""return to the office"", but with much more flexibility and more telework options for employees.)ABOUT THE COMPANYSchreiber Translations, Inc. (STI) is located in Rockville, MD (right on the Rockville stop of the Metro Red Line).Schreiber Translations is one of the nation’s most respected language service companies and has been a leader in the language services industry for over 30 years. Offering document translations, in-person and virtual interpretations, multilingual transcriptions, and other multilingual services. As a highly specialized firm, Schreiber Translations knows that some clients can’t risk just “good enough”, especially in technical fields. The company takes pride in providing precision language services to federal, state, and local government agencies as well as to high-stakes and regulated private industries across the country and beyond.Schreiber Translations has a dedication to helping people of diverse backgrounds communicate, helping people navigate language barriers to access the world around them, and promoting equality through language access.Our comprehensive benefits program includes: paid holidays, 15 days of vacation or personal leave (increases over time), sick leave, telework, free access to an onsite gym facility, health and vision insurance, dental insurance, parking/metro contribution, 401k program, employee events, casual dress code, professional development classes, team environment, a believe in work-life balance, and more.QUALIFICATIONSRequirements:· ability to pass a government background investigationTo Succeed in the Position:· excellent writing skills· attentive to deadlines· organized and detail-oriented· proactive and works independently· excellent communication skills· ability to learn new technology· enthusiasm to learn and growDesirable Qualifications:· experience in project management· customer service experience· experience in the language services industry· advanced foreign language skillsHOW TO APPLYLearn more about the benefits of working for Schreiber Translations on our Careers page.Interested candidates should send a COVER LETTER and RESUME to hiring @schreibernet .com for consideration. No phone calls.*STI values diversity and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer (EOE).Job Type: Full-timeBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:Microsoft Office: 1 year (Preferred)Project Management: 1 year (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",11150,Washington
230,Warehouse Associate,Crews Dca Llc,"Arlington, VA 22203 (Bluemont area)",None,"The warehouse person is responsible for the shipping and receiving of products from the warehouse to our airport stores.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, ability, physical demands and work environment associated with this position and are not intended to be all-inclusive. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Assist in shipping and receiving, uploading trucks, checking in merchandise, verifies and receive quantities against purchase orders.
Report all discrepancies immediately to the Distribution Center Manager.
Stock incoming merchandise on the appropriate shelves.
Sort and place materials or items on racks, shelves, or in bins according to pre-determined sequences such as size, type, style, color, or product code.
Record amounts of materials or items received or distributed via appropriate computer program.
Assist in counting of physical inventory.
May weigh and count items for distribution within the warehouse to ensure conformance to company standards.
Properly pack and seal all store order totes with numbered seals.
Operate a sit down type of forklift and pallet jack.
Pack merchandise for vendor return as needed.
May make deliveries to airport store as needed.
Help maintain a clean and organized warehouse work area. This includes sweeping and general housekeeping as needed.
May be assigned facilities maintenance duties as needed.
Ensure warehouse is accessible and safe for other employees.
Other duties as assigned by manager.
Performs other related duties, as required.
CORE VALUE AND COMPETENCY REQUIREMENTS
Competency
Definition
Business Acumen
Demonstrates comprehension of the job, including policies, practices, and relationships. Possesses the expertise and skill levels required of the job and performs with quality.
Dedication
Dependable, reliable and follows through on projects from inception to completion. Willing to put in as much time as necessary to complete tasks. Demonstrates a win-win attitude: “see it, own it, solve it.”
Ethics and Integrity
Acts with integrity, honesty and knowledge that promote the company’s culture, values and beliefs while maintaining the highest standards of professional conduct.
Safety & Security
Observes safety and security standards. Uses equipment and materials properly. Complies with safety standards and personal protective equipment requirements. Reports potential unsafe conditions or practices to appropriate person immediately. Promotes restaurant safety, cleanliness and security compliance at all times.
Teamwork
Cooperates and is willing to work as a team player to achieve goals and tasks accurately, efficiently and timely.

Communication
Communicates clearly and effectively with mutual respect, understanding and trust to Fellow associates, managers, supervisors and Guests. Listens carefully to opinions and views of others; states understanding of what has been heard.

Initiative
Contributes new ideas and suggestions to enhance productivity and efficiency. Is proactive in troubleshooting problems or issues and takes action to mitigate potential problems.
Adaptability & Planning
Possesses the ability to learn new tasks and adjusts well to new situations. Performs well under tight time schedules and pressures to change direction quickly.
Service Orientation
Demonstrates a sense of urgency. Is friendly and smiles

QUALIFICATIONS
Education and/or Experience
High School Diploma or Equivalent. One year related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Must have strong work ethic.
Language Skills: Ability to effectively communicate in the English language. Must be able to read and understand items outlined but not limited to the position binder, training supplement and MSDS binder.
Certificates, Licenses, Registrations: Must attend Orientation and agree to policies and procedures as outlined in the Associate Handbook Position Binder. Must attend and successfully complete and pass the designated training and testing program. Must successfully attend and complete all other required training.
Uniform Requirements: Adherence to Company Uniform Requirements outlined in the Associate Handbook and individual restaurant uniform requirements outlined in your orientation guidelines.
Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Must be able to lift 60-70 pounds. Be able to reach, bend, and stoop. Be able to work in a standing position for long periods of time (up to 8hrs) including periods of walking to store to store.
Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions.
Good written and verbal communications skills.
Able to work overtime as required; including weekends and holidays.
Work Environment: The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate to loud.",11150,Washington
231,Phlebotomist I,Quest Diagnostics,"Fairfax, VA",None,"Go the extra mile. Patients and Physicians rely on our diagnostic testing, information and services to help them make better healthcare decisions. These are often serious decisions with far reaching consequences, and require sensitivity, tact and a clear dedication to service. It’s about providing clarity and hope.
In Patient Services you will work for the world leader in the industry, with a career where you can expand your skills and knowledge. You’ll have a role where you can act with professionalism, you can inspire colleagues, and you can care about the work we do and the people we serve.
At Quest, Patient Service roles are tremendously important – it is a patient-focused role where it is essential to remember that there is a life and person behind every test tube. Your skills are critical, as is your ability to work with the patients. The role is varied and offers a developing career in Phlebotomy due to the scale and reach of Quest. You can grow and improve your skills in a fast-moving, supportive team environment. Most importantly, you can help us make a real difference.
Phlebotomist I - On Call - Fairfax, VA req68981
Schedule: On call, Saturday 6:00 am - 2:00 pm
Job Summary
The Patient Services Representative I (PSR I) represents the face of our company to patients who come to Quest Diagnostics, both as part of their health routine or for insights into life-defining health decisions. The PSR I draws quality blood samples from patients and prepares those specimens for lab testing while following established practices and procedures. The PSR I has direct contact with patients and creates an atmosphere of trust and confidence while explaining procedures to patients and drawing blood specimens in a skillful, safe and accurate manner. The PSR I will demonstrate Quest Leadership Behaviors while focusing on process excellence skills and sensitivity to confidentiality and accuracy to patient information. Successful applicants may be assigned to work in a doctor's office, a patient service center, in a house call environment, or as business needs dictate.
Job Accountabilities (Responsibilities)
1. Collect specimens according to established procedures. This includes, but not limited to: drug screens, biometric screening and insurance exams.
2. Administer oral solutions according to established training.
3. Research test/client information and confirm and verify all written and electronic orders by utilizing lab technology systems or directory of services.
4. Responsible for completing all data entry requirements accurately including data entry of patient registration; entry of test order from requisition or pulling order from database; managing Standing Orders.
5. Enter billing information and collect payments when required, including the safeguarding of assets and credit card information.
6. Data entry and processing specimens including: labeling, centrifuging, splitting, and freezing specimens as required by test order.
7. Perform departmental-related clerical duties when assigned such as data entry, inventory, stock supplies, and answer phones when needed.
8. Read, understand and comply with departmental policies, protocols and procedures: (i.e. Procedure Manuals, Safety Manual, Compliance Manual, Automobile Policies and Procedures, Employee Handbook, Quality Assurance Manual); and ensure that all staff members follow instructions.
9. Perform verification of patient demographic info / initials including patient signature post-venipuncture to verify tubes were labeled in their presence and that the name on the label is correct.
10. Assist with compilation and submission of monthly statistics and data.
11. Maintain all appropriate phlebotomy logs in a timely manner and based on frequency, such as maintenance logs and temperature logs.
12. Complete training courses and keep up-to-date with the latest phlebotomy techniques.
13. Travel to Territory Manager meeting if held off-site or off normal shift.
14. Participate on special projects and teams.
15. Stay up-to-date on company communications.
Job Requirements
1. Ability to provide quality, error free work in a fast-paced environment.
2. Ability to work independently with minimal on-site supervision.
3. Excellent phlebotomy skills to include pediatric and geriatric.
4. Flexible and available based on staffing needs, which includes weekends, holidays, on-call and overtime.
5. Committed to all Quest Diagnostics policies and procedures including company dress code, Employee Health & Safety, and Quest Diagnostics Everyday Excellence Guiding Principles.
6. Must have reliable transportation, valid driver license, and clean driving record, if applicable.
7. Must demonstrate superior customer focus; ability to communicate openly and transparently with peers, supervisors and patients; ability to accelerate and embrace change throughout Quest; and knowledge of our business.
Physical Requirements
1. Lift light to moderately heavy objects. The normal performance of duties may require lifting and carrying objects. Objects in the weight range of 1 to 15 pounds are lifted and carried frequently; objects in the weight range of 16 to 25 pounds are lifted and carried occasionally and objects in the weight range of 26 to 40 pounds are seldom lifted and carried. Objects exceeding 41 pounds are not to be lifted or carried without assistance.
2. Must be able to sit or stand for long periods of time; requires long hours of eye and hand coordination.
3. Must be able to perform repetitive tasks with dominant hand frequently to constantly throughout the day.
4. Position requires travel.
5. Extensive use of phone and PC.
6. Fine dexterity with hands/steadiness.
7. Talking.
8. Walking.
9. Balancing.
10. Bending/kneeling.
11. Pushing/pulling.
12. Reaching/twisting.

[All requirements are subject to possible modifications to reasonably accommodate individuals with disabilities. All duties and requirements are essential job functions.]

Required Education
1. High school diploma or equivalent.
2. Medical training: medical assistant or paramedic training preferred.
3. Phlebotomy certification preferred. Required in California, Nevada, and Washington.
Work Experience
1. One year phlebotomy experience preferred.
2. Customer service in a retail or service environment preferred.
3. Keyboard/data entry experience.
All requirements are subject to possible modifications to reasonably accommodate individuals with disabilities. Quest Diagnostics is an Equal Opportunity Employer: Women / Minorities / Veterans / Disabled / Sexual Orientation / Gender Identity / Citizenship.",11150,Washington
232,IT Specialist - Program Manager - PD 21R040 - Office of Information Technology,US Health Resources and Services Administration,"Rockville, MD","$103,690 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is located in Health Resources and Services Administration, Office of Information Technology, Business Office. The duty location for this position is in Rockville, MD.

For more information about Office of Information Technology click the ""Learn more about the Agency"" section.

Applicants please note: Additional selections may be made across the Department of Health and Human Services through this vacancy announcement.
Responsibilities
*As of 06/10/2021, the closing date for this announcement has been extended to 6/25/2021.*

This position is a mission critical occupation and is responsible for the analysis of system and/or security requirements, the development and implementation of mission critical applications for the agency's Information Technology operations.

MAJOR DUTIES:

As an IT Specialist, you will serve as an IT Program manager for various IT specialty areas while working with upper management to analyze existing processes and problems to resolve issues.

Your major duties and responsibilities will include:

Planning and managing IT contractor led projects involving interrelated technology specially areas and multiple stages of the systems development lifecycle.
Providing advice to IT program offices on using the most effective and efficient contracting/procurement methods for IT Software Development focused contracts.
Serving as a Contracting Officer's Representative (FAC-COR) Level II for IT services and products including software development contracts.
Overseeing the planning and execution of all IT contact management activities involved in obtaining the highly specialized products and services needed to support Division programs and operations.
Developing specifications, requirements and Statements of Works (SOWs) for information technology (IT) hardware and/or software, services, and maintenance in multi-year IT contracts.
Monitoring the contractor's efforts and progress in meeting the requirements of the contract.
NOTE: Do not cut and paste the duties, specialized experience, or occupational assessment questionnaire from this announcement into your resume as that will not be considered a demonstration of your qualifications for this position.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - Expected travel for this position is up to 5% of the time.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
None
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Similar jobs
Information Systems Managers
Information Technology Specialist (It Specialist)
Managers, Information Systems
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
U. S. Citizenship is required.
All qualifications and time-in-grade requirements must be met by the closing date of the announcement. Federal applicants must submit an SF-50 to show status and time-in-grade.
Males ages 18 through 25 must be registered with the Selective Service.
PHS Commissioned Corps applicants must submit current personnel orders.
A one year probationary period may be required.
Position is in the Bargaining Unit.
Recruitment incentives are not authorized.
Student loan repayment incentive is not authorized.
Employment is subject to the successful completion of the pre-appointment process (i.e., background investigation, verification of qualifications and job requirements, completion of onboarding forms, submission of required documents, etc.)
Qualifications
THESE QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS MUST BE MET BY THE CLOSING DATE: 06/25/2021

Do not cut and paste the duties, specialized experience, or occupational assessment questionnaire from this announcement into your resume as that will not be considered a demonstration of your qualifications for this position.

QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:

To qualify for this position you must possess IT related experience and/or training that demonstrates that you possess each of the following four competencies:
Attention to Detail - Is thorough when performing work and conscientious about attending to detail.
Customer Service - Works with clients and customers (that is, any individuals who use or receive the services or products that your work unit produces, including the general public, individuals who work in the agency, other agencies, or organizations outside the Government) to assess their needs, provide information or assistance, resolve their problems, or satisfy their expectations; knows about available products and services; is committed to providing quality products and services.
Oral Communication - Expresses information (for example, ideas or facts) to individuals or groups effectively, taking into account the audience and nature of the information (for example, technical, sensitive, controversial); makes clear and convincing oral presentations; listens to others, attends to nonverbal cues, and responds appropriately.
Problem Solving - Identifies problems; determines accuracy and relevance of information; uses sound judgment to generate and evaluate alternatives, and to make recommendations.
AND


SELECTIVE FACTOR:

Applicants must possess at least a Level 2 Federal Acquisition Certification as a Contracting Officer's Representative (FAC COR II) and must be current with continuous learning and training required to maintain the certification.

Applicants selected for an interview will be required to provide documentation that verifies that they possess at least a Level II FAC COR certification and are current with their continuous learning and training to maintain their certification.

AND

In order to qualify for this GS-13 position, your resume must clearly demonstrate that you have one full year of specialized experience comparable in difficulty and responsibility to at least the GS-12 level in the federal service.

Examples of qualifying specialized experience at the GS-12 level include performing the following types of tasks on a regular and recurring basis:

Reviewing and verifying IT project deliverables to ensure completeness and accuracy; assist in developing acquisition plans that include discussion of acquisition strategy, discussion of required approvals and clearances, selection of contract type, and development of milestones; and, assisting in developing statements of work, cost estimates and specifications for use in solicitation of IT contract services, hardware and/or software.

Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service Programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; community; student; social). If such experience is on a part-time basis, you must provide the average number of hours worked per week as well as the beginning and ending dates of the experience so it can be fully credited.

Applicants for this position will be evaluated on the following competencies:

SYSTEMS LIFE CYCLE - Knowledge of systems life cycle management concepts used to plan, develop, implement, operate, and maintain information systems.

CONTRACTING/PROCUREMENT - Knowledge of various types of contracts, techniques or requirements (for example, FAR) for contracting or procurement, and contract negotiation and administration.

ACQUISITION PLANNING - Develops and guides program management through a comprehensive plan for fulfilling acquisition needs in a timely manner and at a reasonable cost in accordance with Federal and Departmental regulations, policies and procedures.

PROJECT MANAGEMENT - Knowledge of the principles, methods, or tools for developing scheduling, coordinating, and managing projects and resources, including monitoring and inspecting costs, work, and contractor performance.

TO PREVIEW THE OCCUPATIONAL ASSESSMENT QUESTIONNAIRE, please click on the following link: https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11105665

Current status candidates must provide an SF50 that allows HR to verify that they meet Time-in-Grade (TIG) requirements by the closing date of the announcement.

Please Note: An SF50 for the current year pay adjustment is NOT acceptable for verifying TIG (ex. 2021 general increases cannot be used to verify TIG).


To allow us to verify that you meet TIG requirements, please provide any of the following SF-50s:
Competitive or Career-ladder promotion to your highest grade (this does not include 120 day temporary promotions)
Regular Within Range Increase (WRI) or With In Grade (WGI) increase at your highest grade (this does not include quality step increases (QSIs).
Competitive career/career-conditional appointment to your highest grade.
SF-50 at your highest grade held, that is at least one year older than the announcement closing date of 06/25/2021.
Not sure which SF-50 to submit? Check out our video... Go here to watch the video on the SF50s to submit in your application package.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
If you are unable to apply online or need to fax a document you do not have in electronic form, view the following link for information regarding an Alternate Application.

HHS is an equal opportunity employer. Selection for this position will be based solely on merit without regard to race, color, religion, age, gender, national origin, political affiliation, disability, sexual orientation, marital or family status or other differences.

Click here for information on ""Federal hiring for individuals with disabilities"".

Security and Background Requirements: If not previously completed, a background security investigation will be required for all appointees. Appointment will be subject to the applicant's successful completion of a background security investigation and favorable adjudication. False representation may be grounds for non-consideration, non-selection and/or appropriate disciplinary action.
E-Verify: HRSA participates in the USCIS Electronic Employment Eligibility Verification Program (E-Verify). E-Verify helps employers determine employment eligibility of new hires and the validity of their social security numbers.
Direct Deposit: All Federal employees are required to have Federal salary payments made by direct deposit to a financial institution of their choosing.
Creditable Service: A newly appointed or reappointed employee may receive service credit for annual leave for prior work experience directly related to the duties of the position being filled. The use of this service credit is at the discretion of the selecting official and must be finalized prior to selectee's entrance on duty. For more information, please click here.
Financial Disclosure: This position requires you to file a public or confidential financial disclosure report prior to receiving a final offer letter as well as within 30 days of your appointment. This will require you to report information such as recent sources of income, financial interests you hold, and outside activities you participate in, as well as similar information from a spouse or any dependent children. If you have questions, please contact AskHR@hrsa.gov.
If you are a veteran with preference eligibility and you are claiming 5-points veterans' preference, you must submit a copy of your DD-214 (Member 4 Copy), or other proof of eligibility. If you are claiming 10-point veterans' preference, you must also submit an SF-15, ""Application for 10-Point Veterans' Preference"" plus the proof required by that form. Click here for more information on veterans' preference.

Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP)/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP): Click here

HRSA supports the use of telework as a way to help attract and retain talented individuals in public service, increase worker productivity, and better prepare the agency to operate during emergencies. Telework eligibility may be discussed during the interview process.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Additional selections may be made for similar positions across the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) within the local commuting area(s) of the location identified in this announcement. By applying, you agree to have your application shared with interested selecting official(s) at HHS. Clearance of CTAP/ICTAP will be applied for similar positions across HHS.


To determine your qualifications and referral status, we may review your resume and supporting documentation and compare it against your responses to the vacancy questionnaire. Ensure you support your self-ratings by the information you provide in your application. We may verify or assess your qualifications at any time. Inflated or unsupported qualifications may affect your rating. Any misrepresentation or material omission of facts may be sufficient cause to end further consideration of your candidacy. Persons listed as having knowledge of your past accomplishments or experience in your application may be contacted for verification purposes at any time. Verification may, but need not, begin prior to receiving an offer.

To be considered well qualified for the purposes of the Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP) and the Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP), you must substantively exceed the basic qualifications by scoring at least an 85 on the assessment and meet all eligibility, physical, medical, suitability, and all other requirements.


Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your eligibility.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
This agency provides reasonable accommodation to applicants with disabilities. If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application and hiring process, please contact either HRSA's Office of Human Resources at (301) 443-3780 or by email: askhr@hrsa.gov or HRSA's Reasonable Accommodation programs at (301) 443-2538 or by email: RA-Request@hrsa.gov. You must contact the Reasonable Accommodations Program prior to the closing date of this announcement to receive assistance. The decision on granting reasonable accommodation will be made on a case-by-case basis. Hours of operation: Monday through Friday 7:30AM to 4:00PM EST (except Federal holidays).

Submission of a resume alone is not a complete application. To apply for this position, you must provide a complete online Application Package which includes:

1. A current Resume - For resume writing guidance, please visit USAJOBS Resources Center or view their video tutorial. Your resume must thoroughly describe how your skills and experiences align to the criteria defined in the ""Qualifications"" section of this announcement and it must support your responses to the assessment questionnaire. We cannot assume you have performed the necessary experience required for this position regardless of your employment history or academic career. To ensure all of the essential information is in your resume, we encourage you to use the USAJOBS online Resume Builder.
If you choose to use your own resume, curriculum vitae, or any other written form you choose, then you must ensure it contains all of the required information and you organize it so we can associate the following information for each experience/position:

Job title
Name of employer
Beginning and ending dates of employment (month/day/year format)
Hours worked per week. We will assume full-time unless otherwise stated. We will prorate part-time employment in crediting experience.
Detailed description of job duties, accomplishments, related skills, and responsibilities to include any supervisory/managerial responsibilities and number of staff supervised (if applicable)
Your resume must show the series and grade or equivalent for all federal positions you have held (if a federal position).
You must also ensure that the duties performed are clearly matched to each period of employment.

Do not include a photograph or video of yourself, or any sensitive information (age, date of birth, marital status, protected health information, religious affiliation, social security number, etc.) on your resume or cover letter. We will not access web pages linked on your resume or cover letter to determine your qualifications.

2. A complete Assessment Questionnaire

3. Other supporting documents to be submitted with application:
Veterans' Preference Documentation, if applicable, a DD-214 Member 4 copy, which shows type of discharge. If still active, provide an official Statement of Service. Any other documentation such as VA letter documenting disability, SF-15, and any other required supporting documentation based your veterans' preference claim.
SF-50: Federal applicants must submit an SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action) that shows status and time-in-grade, and its full performance level. If you are an HHS employee you may obtain a copy of your SF-50 from eOPF. If you have separated from Federal Government employment, you may obtain a copy of your SF-50 via: National Personnel Records Center, Annex, 1411 Boulder Boulevard, Valmeyer, IL, 62295; FAX (618) 935-3014; Email CPR; or visit the National Archives Website.
Personnel Orders: PHS Commissioned Corps Officers must submit a copy of latest personnel orders in lieu of SF-50.
Peace Corps volunteers must submit a copy of your ""Description of Service (DOS)"" in lieu of the SF-50. If you do not have one you should email the Peace Corps Office of Volunteer and PSC Financial Services at certify@peacecorps.gov.
If you are currently serving in a pay banded position, please include a copy of your pay band chart with your application.
College transcripts (if the position has a positive education requirement, or you are qualifying on the basis of education).
For Résumé and Application Tips visit the USAJOBS Resource Center.

The complete Application Package must be submitted by 11:59 PM (EST) on 06/25/2021.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Family of overseas employees
Family members of a federal employee or uniformed service member who is, or was, working overseas.
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Individuals with disabilities
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
This position is also open to PHS Commissioned Corps Officers. PHS Commissioned Corps (CC) Officers will be referred as CC personnel and not as a candidate for conversion to a permanent federal appointment.",11150,Washington
233,PROGRAM MANAGER,US U.S. Army Intelligence and Security Command,"Fort Belvoir, VA","$103,690 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
About the Position: This position is in the Defense Civilian Intelligence Personnel System (DCIPS). Employees occupying DCIPS positions are in the Excepted Service and must adhere to U.S. Code, Title 10, as well as Department of Defense Instruction 1400.25. This position is located at the US ARMY INTELLIGENCE AND SECURITY CMD MISSION SUPPORT COMMAND/ACOFS, G-6 FORT BELVOIR, VA..
Responsibilities
Works with assigned civilian and military employees, performing a variety of operational and administrative mission support functions.
Executes the G6/Ground Intelligence Support Activity (GISA) contract portfolios.
Providing technical and administrative direction to internal and external operations relating to intelligence, contracts, program management, and contract oversight activities.
Serves as a Program Manager and Contracting Officer?s Representative (COR) in support of the United States Army Intelligence and Security Command (USAINSCOM).
Travel Required
25% or less - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
None
Job family (Series)
0340 Program Management
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Appointment may be subject to a suitability or fitness determination, as determined by a completed background investigation.
Two year trial/probationary period may be required.
In accordance with Change 3 to AR 600-85, Alcohol and Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Program, individual must successfully pass a urinalysis screening for illegal drug use prior to appointment and periodically thereafter.
Must be willing to undergo and successfully complete a counterintelligence-scope polygraph examination with No Deception Indicated (NDI) on a pre-appointment and periodic basis.
Temporary duty (TDY) travel may be required 10% or less.
All INSCOM employees may be subject to extended TDY or worldwide deployments during crises to perform mission essential functions as determined by management.
Qualifications
Who May Apply:
Only applicants who meet one of the employment authority categories below are eligible to apply for this job. You will be asked to identify which category or categories you meet, and to provide documents which prove you meet the category or categories you selected. See Proof of Eligibility for an extensive list of document requirements for all employment authorities.

10-Point Other Veterans? Rating
30 Percent or More Disabled Veterans
5-Point Veterans' Preference
Current Army Defense Civilian Intelligence Personnel System (DCIPS) Employee
Current Department of Army Civilian Employees
Current DoD Defense Civilian Intelligence Personnel System (DCIPS) Employee (non-Army)
Current Permanent Department of Defense (DOD) Civilian Employee (non-Army)
Defense Civilian Intelligence Personnel System (DCIPS) Interchange Agreement
Disabled Veteran w/ a Service-Connected Disability, More than 10%, Less than 30%
Non-Department of Defense (DoD) Transfer
Prior Federal Service Employee
United States Citizen Applying to a DCIPS Position

Army DCIPS positions apply Veteran's Preference to preference eligible candidates as defined by Section 2108 of Title 5 U.S.C., in accordance with the procedures provided in DoD Instruction 1400.25, Volume 2005, DCIPS Employment and Placement.

In order to qualify, you must meet the experience requirements described below. Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community; student; social). You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience. Your resume must clearly describe your relevant experience.

To qualify based on your experience, your resume must describe at least one year of experience which prepared you to do the work in this job. Specialized experience is defined as experience with information technology roles that include administration, planning, evaluating and contracting directly related to information management. This definition of specialized experience is typical of work performed at the next lower grade/level position in the federal service (GG/GS-12).

You will be evaluated on the basis of your level of competency in the following areas:
Contracting/Procurement
Information Technology Program Management
Organizational Awareness
Project Management
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
Male applicants born after December 31, 1959, must complete a Pre-Employment Certification Statement for Selective Service Registration.
You will be required to provide proof of U.S. Citizenship.
Direct Deposit of Pay is required.
This position requires you to submit a Public Financial Disclosure Report (OGE 278) or a Confidential Financial Disclosure Report (OGE450) upon entry, and annually thereafter.
If you have retired from federal service and you are interested in employment as a reemployed annuitant, see the information in the Reemployed Annuitant information sheet.
This is a Career Program (CP) - 14 position.
Multiple positions may be filled from this announcement.
Salary includes applicable locality pay or Local Market Supplement.
When you perform a Civilian Permanent Change of Station (PCS) with the government, the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) considers the majority of your entitlements to be taxable. Visit https://www.dfas.mil/civilianemployees/civrelo/Civilian-Moving-Expenses-Tax-Deduction.htm for more information.
If you are unable to apply online or need to fax a document you do not have in electronic form, view the following link for information regarding an Alternate Application.
Permanent Change of Station (PCS) allowances may be authorized, subject to the provisions of the Joint Travel Regulations and an agency determination that a PCS move is in the Government Interest.
Recruitment, Retention, and/or Relocation expenses are not authorized.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Once the announcement has closed, a review of your application package (resume, supporting documents, and responses to the questionnaire) will be used to determine whether you meet the qualification requirements listed on this announcement. If you are minimally qualified, your résumé and supporting documentation will be compared against your responses to the assessment questionnaire to determine your level of experience. If, after reviewing your résumé and/or supporting documentation, a determination is made that you have inflated your qualifications and/or experience, you may lose consideration for this position. Please follow all instructions carefully when applying, errors or omissions may affect your eligibility.

You should list any relevant performance appraisals and incentive awards in your resume as that information may be taken into consideration during the selection process. If selected, you may be required to provide supporting documentation.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Sensitive Compartmented Information
Drug test required
Yes
Position sensitivity and risk
Special-Sensitive (SS)/High Risk
Trust determination process
Credentialing
Required Documents

Required Documents
WARNING: DO NOT INCLUDE CLASSIFIED INFORMATION IN YOUR APPLICATION PACKET! Application packages that contain Classified information WILL NOT receive consideration for this position. Should you submit a resume or any other document as part of your application package and it is confirmed that any of the information is Classified, in addition to being found ineligible for consideration for this position, your Security Office will be notified to determine if any further action is warranted.

The documents you are required to submit vary based on the authority you are using to apply (i.e., applying as a veteran, applying as a current permanent Federal employee, applying as a reinstatement, etc). Please review the following links to see which documents you need to provide to prove your eligibility to apply: Applicant Merit Checklist and Proof of Eligibility.

As described above, your complete application includes your resume, your responses to the online questionnaire, and documents which prove your eligibility to apply. If you fail to provide these documents, you will be marked as having an incomplete application package and you will not be considered any further.

1. Your resume:

Your resume may be submitted in any format and must support the specialized experience described in this announcement.
If your resume includes a photograph or other inappropriate material or content, it will not be used to make eligibility and qualification determinations and you may not be considered for this vacancy.
For qualifications determinations your resume must contain hours worked per week and the dates of employment (i.e., HRS per week and month/year to month/year or month/year to present). If your resume does not contain this information, your application may be marked as incomplete and you may not receive consideration for this position.
For additional information see: What to include in your resume.


2. Other supporting documents:
Cover Letter, optional
Most recent Performance Appraisal, if applicable
Proof of Eligibility to Apply: Your application must include the documents which prove you are eligible to apply for the vacancy. The Proof of Eligibility document describes authorities commonly used in merit promotion recruitment and what document(s) are required to prove you meet the requirements of the authority. You must meet the requirements of at least one of the authorities listed in the Who May Apply section above to receive further consideration.
NOTE: Documents submitted as part of the application package, to include supplemental documents, may be shared beyond the Human Resources Office. Some supplemental documents such as military orders and marriage certificates may contain personal information for someone other than you. You may sanitize these documents to remove another person's personal information before you submit your application. You may be asked to provide an un-sanitized version of the documents if you are selected to confirm your eligibility.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Federal employees - Excepted service
Current excepted service federal employees.
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
See ""Who May Apply"" in the ""Qualifications"" section for more information on who is eligible to apply for this position.",11150,Washington
234,Interface SME,Booz Allen Hamilton,"Washington, DC",None,"Key Role:
Support the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA) Electronic Health Record Modernization (EHRM) program as the Interface Oversight Programmatic Subject Matter Expert (SME). Serve as programmatic manager for a subset of all interfaces supporting the Office of Electronic Health Record Modernization (OEHRM)implementation. Acts as programmatic expert, addressing problems of risk, schedule, and process. SME will articulate and implement best practices as it relates to cost and schedule to leadership providing recommendations via senior leadership presentations. SME will also assist with data calls and interagency collaboration as needed.
Basic Qualifications:10 years of experience with working in a professional environmentExperience with costs, scope, and scheduleAbility to produce executive level written communications and analysisAbility to identify and mitigate risksBA or BS degree with 10+ years of professional work experience, or 18 years of professional work experience in lieu of a degree
Additional Qualifications:Experience with electronic health records (EHR)Experience with developing client-facing deliverables in Microsoft Project, PowerPoint, Excel, and WordExperience with VA meeting facilitationBA or BS degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Information Systems, or Business
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",11150,Washington
235,Project Manager,"LinTech Global, Inc.","Washington, DC 20032 (Anacostia area)",None,"Project ManagerWashington, DC, or open to remote.Clearance: Secret with ability to obtain TS/SCI10 years’ experience preferred.Project Management Professional (PMP) certification PreferredThis shall include organizing, directing, and managing multiple, complex and inter-related IT projects. The Contractor shall manage teams of project support personnel and interface with senior OIG leadership, including the CIO.The Contractor shall be responsible for the overall management of multiple IT projects and ensuring that the technical solutions and schedules in the projects are implemented in a timely manner.The project manager shall meet with OCIO customers and staff to formulate and review task plans and deliverable items, ensure conformance with program task schedules and costs, establish and maintain technical and financial reports to show progress of projects to management and customers, and oversee the successful completion of all assigned tasks.The Contractor shall work cohesively with the Contracting Officer (CO), IT support staff, customers, and senior leadership.Excellent written and verbal communication skills.Expert knowledge of Microsoft Project software.Experience providing Project briefs to senior executives.Experience implementing or working with Agile/Agile-Hybrid methodologies in the public sector.Company DescriptionLinTech Global is an award-winning, ISO 9001:2008 certified, and GSA contract holder providing diversified Information Technology services to both Civilian and Defense agencies. Services include Software Development, Systems Integration, Data Management, Project Management, Operations & Maintenance, Cyber Security, and Training and Audio/Visual (AV) Solutions. LinTech has received a number of recognitions, including rankings on “Top 50 Companies to Watch”, Washington Technology’s Annual “FAST 50”, and Inc. 500's List of “Fastest Growing Private Companies”. The LinTech Global team is comprised of individuals who are dedicated to the success and sustainability of our customers and their missions. Our combination of technical expertise, big business experience, and small business agility allows us to promptly provide our customers with exceptional IT and engineering solutions.BenefitsOur robust benefits package includes: Paid Time Off, Paid Holidays, Company-paid Life/AD&D, Short Term and Long-Term Disability, Health Insurance with Company Contribution, 401k Plan with Company Match; up to 5%, opportunity for Employee Referral Bonus, opportunity for annual Performance Bonus and much more!EEO StatementLinTech Global, Inc. provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, pregnancy, status as a parent, national origin, age, disability (physical or mental), family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, or other non-merit based factors, in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.Job Type: Full-timeBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee assistance programEmployee discountFlexible scheduleFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offParental leaveProfessional development assistanceReferral programRelocation assistanceRetirement planTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayExperience:IT Project management: 10 years (Preferred)Security Clearance:Secret (Required)Work Location:One location",11150,Washington
236,IT Project Manager,"Koniag, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22203 (Bluemont area)",None,"PacArctic (PAC) is currently looking for an experienced IT Project Manager to provide expert support to PAC and our government customer in the Arlington, VA area.
We offer competitive compensation and an extraordinary benefits package including health, dental and vision insurance, 401K with company matching, flexible spending accounts, paid holidays, three weeks paid time off, and more.
The IT Project Manager will provide subject matter expertise with project management for large complex projects related to mission-centric approach to IT operations focused on customer service, collaboration, and innovation.
Responsibilities:
Manage full lifecycle of many complex projects in the area of Information Technology
Work closely with all teams including team members, stakeholders and vendors as directed by Chief Information Officer (CIO) or designate to capture all projects.
Create and keep up to date project plans and document project tasks, timeframes, milestones, deliverables and dates of completion
Schedule and lead regular meetings for project and operational tasks, capture and record project and task status
Meet with staff and contractors outside of scheduled meetings on a daily basis if necessary, to ensure constant contact with them to collect work progress
Maintain and keep up to date, project plans, operational task tracking lists using various tools as directed
Manage operational tasks in addition to tasks for established projects
Meet with CIO and management on a regular basis to provide project and task status updates, discuss current issues that could affect delivery timeline or scope of projects or operational tasks by communicating assessed risks
Conduct planning sessions with CIO and management for future projects and tasks
Collaborate with IT budget staff and other offices in EX as required
Interface with other OIG offices by attending meetings and reaching out to established contacts
Create standard operating procedures and other technical documentation

Must possess a Secret security clearance
Eight years of project management experience, preferably with federal government agencies/departments with Information Technology projects
Eight years of experience successfully delivering project completion within the established parameters
Proven team player with three years of experience fostering collaborative work environment, ability to resolve differences of opinion on projects and tasks related topics
Five years of experience successfully working with multiple cross functional IT and nonIT teams and team members
Three years of experience using Microsoft Office 365 such as SharePoint Online, Power Automate Flow, Teams, Lists
PMP certification is desired

Personal Requirements
Have strong multitasking skills with ability to re-prioritize tasks on an ongoing basis
Possess excellent customer management skills with collecting requirements, conducting meetings, providing status and managing expectations
Able to successfully interface with individuals and collect information required for projects/tasks on a timely basis, update tracking documents and provide regular updates and reports to management
Be capable of rapidly adjusting to changing working conditions as they relate to projects and tasks
Have strong verbal and written communication skills
Have the ability to author project related documents from existing templates or by creating new templates
Prior experience using Microsoft Project, Microsoft Planner, and other project management tools to create project plans, tasks lists and time-based projections
Proficient with advanced features of Microsoft Office productivity tools such as creating document templates in Word, macros and pivot tables in Excel, and compelling visual and presentations in PowerPoint",11150,Washington
237,Able-Bodied Food Warehouse Assistants,Women Who Care Ministries,"Montgomery Village, MD 20886",$16.50 an hour,"PLEASE NOTE: THIS POSITION SEEKS ABLE-BODIED PERSONS WHO DO NOT HAVE PHYSICAL LIMITATIONS. ONE OF THE PRIMARY ASPECTS OF THE JOB IS TO BE ABLE TO CONSISTENTLY CARRY PLASTIC TOTES CONTAINING NON-PERISHABLE FOOD, WHICH WEIGH AT LEAST 40 POUNDS, DOWN A FLIGHT OF STAIRS! If this is you, then this position is a wonderful way to give back to the community and receive a salary at the same time! If you enjoy helping people in need, this may be the job for you!We are looking to immediately hire four (4) food service workers to assist with the preparation and, distribution of non-perishables for our meal program for low-income children and families.PLEASE NOTE: EXPERIENCE WITH DRIVING CARGO VAN AND/OR BOX TRUCK IS A PLUS!!!!If you are reliable, dependable, can follow instructions, work in a fast-paced environment, and willing to do whatever it takes to get the job done, then this job is for you!While training, the salary is $16.50 an hour, and once training is completed, approximately one month, the salary will be between $18 and $20/hr, commensurate with work performance.PLEASE NOTE - THIS POSITION COULD LEAD TO A FOOD SERVICE MANAGER POSITION AND THE STARTING SALARY IS BETWEEN $20-$35/HOUR.Basic duties include:The ability to consistently lift and carry bins with food down a flight of stairs that weigh about 40 pounds.Load and unload the van (food from stores such as Sams Club or WalmartAssembling non-perishable food sacks for low-income childrenPreparing food packages for families in needInspection (including washing and drying) of plastic binsShelving and sorting food and disposing of recyclablesYou will also, oversee volunteers; to get them started on projects and to ensure they are following the company protocols for quality assurance.Assisting in office upkeep/ bathrooms, vacuuming, etc.Helping to make deliveries to schools with integrity, and carefulnessBeing willing to follow the company instructed methods of delivery, best practices,etc.Essentially we are looking for cooperative, cheerful team players who are willing to do whatever it takes to get the job done in feeding precious low-income kids in our community.Overall we are looking for persons who are punctual, reliable, teachable, with a good attitude, and someone who has had at least 3 solid years of experience working in any capacity.Please send your resume today, and start tomorrow if you are the ideal candidateJob Type: Full-timePay: $16.50 per hourBenefits:Flexible scheduleSchedule:8 hour shiftDay shiftMonday to FridayWeekendsSupplemental Pay:Signing bonusCOVID-19 considerations:We practice strict CDC guidelines. Candidate must be willing to ""fully"" wear a mask at all times, frequently wash your hands, practice social distancing, etc.Work Location:One locationThis Job Is:Open to applicants who do not have a college diplomaBenefit Conditions:Waiting period may applyWork Remotely:NoCOVID-19 Precaution(s):Personal protective equipment provided or requiredTemperature screeningsSocial distancing guidelines in placeSanitizing, disinfecting, or cleaning procedures in place",11150,Washington
238,Information Technology (IT) Project Manager,RESCON,"Bethesda, MD 20814",None,"prepare, implement, monitor, and update the project schedule; manage project teams through all phases of software development lifecycle including requirements definition, architecture design, conversion, testing and deployment; manage resource assignment and track the project plan and project schedule; manage project budget and perform budget to actual variance analysis; ensure appropriate product-related training to end users and develop training documentation. Job duties require use of the following: MS Project, Clarity, MS Excel, MS PowerPoint, MS Word, HP ALM, RequisitePro, Rational ClearQuest, Toad, RapidSQL, DBVisualizer, Putty and MS Access.
Requires MS in computer science or information systems/technology plus 2 years’ experience.
Criminal background Check required.
Job in Bethesda, MD.
Email resumes to admin@resconisit.com",11150,Washington
239,Associate Project Manager,"The QED Group, LLC","Alexandria, VA 22331 (Eisenhower East area)",None,"Overview:

QED is a global consulting firm with more than 20 years of experience providing data-driven and insightful solutions in close to 100 countries. We are passionate about transforming lives through knowledge-based solutions. Leveraging deep expertise in monitoring, evaluation, global health, and learning, we help our clients collect, analyze, visualize, and ultimately use data in more effective ways. Our work maximizes results through the use of cutting-edge technologies and innovation, organizational development, and evidence-based decision-making.
The Associate Project Manager is responsible for supporting QED’s Project Management (PM) Team in program coordination, contract management, and timely and effective management and administration of projects including contractual, financial, and operational activities. The Associate Project Manager will report directly to the Project Manager. This position supports implementation of effective and efficient operations, financial oversight, and compliance activities that deliver projects in accordance with contractual obligations, Company policies, Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs), and client rules and regulations. The Associate Project Manager helps to identify opportunities to improve internal operations and implement best practices and assists in risk management by suggesting solutions to minimize risk. The Associate Project Manager will work closely with other QED teams, including Finance & Accounting, Contracts & Compliance, Talent Acquisition, Human Resources, Communications, Business Development, and Information Technology to support effective implementation and compliance across QED programs.
Responsibilities:
Project Coordination
Establish, monitor, and update work plans and other standard templates and tools as needed
Oversee mobilization and logistical preparations for team travel.
Work with Finance Department to ensure that financial reporting requirements are met, to monitor project financial status, and ensure compliance with project and task budgets.
Identify and recruit personnel for contracts as needed.
Identify and assist in selecting local service providers and vendors.
Be primarily responsible for field operations of STTA and teams carrying out technical tasks, including travel logistics, consultant and subcontractor invoices, and travel expenses
Coordinate team inputs for contract deliverables.
Serve as a responsive point of contact for clients, and support contract reporting requirements.
Draft and edit program reports for donors and clients, as needed
Develop activity budgets and oversee financial management of project budgets; including creating budget forecasting and projections, tracking invoices and project finances
Review monthly project expenditures and send invoices to clients
Track and ensure timely submission of all deliverables, including in the assistance of reviewing, editing and finalizing all deliverables for submissions to client
Contract Management
Draft contracts for consultants, subcontractors, and service providers. Serve as primary reference point for contracting questions
Lead the internal approval process for contracts for services and procurement for the assigned project
Review basic legal issues for employment and procurement
Ensure administrative and financial compliance with USG regulations, including regular review of the USAID ADS, FAR, AIDAR to ensure compliance
Technical Tasks
Ensure project reports and deliverables are developed and submitted
Contribute to quality assurance measures as assigned
Assist with development of PMPs, program indicators, and other key deliverables as needed
Conduct background research for the development tools and deliverables as needed
Oversee the work of local contractors and vendors and conduct regular quality control on service delivery
Business Development
The Associate Project Manager is expected to support marketing, business and proposal development as time permits. The Associate Project Manager may be asked to provide limited inputs to technical proposals, review draft proposals, and work with the Finance Department to develop budgets.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in international relations, international development, business, or relevant field required
Minimum of 3-5 years’ experience performing project coordination/management/operations for USAID and other donor-funded projects
Knowledge in acquisition mechanisms, USAID ADS, FAR, AIDAR and other USG international regulations
Detail-oriented, experience developing/managing program budgets
Practical hands-on experience with Excel
Demonstrated ability to oversee and manage multiple projects simultaneously and provide advice and guidance in a timely fashion.
Demonstrated ability to oversee team mobilization, written reports and deliverables, and quality assurance processes.
Knowledge of government and/or donor contracting practices.
Demonstrated ability to understand and implement pertinent company and client policies and procedures clearly and accurately.
Can-do attitude able to think creatively to find solutions
Willingness to travel overseas as needed
English fluency required
Knowledge and fluency of additional languages is a plus
This position requires the ability to travel overseas to developing countries at least 25% of the time.
How to Apply:

To apply for this position please follow the following steps:
Complete the online application.
Attach your resume/CV.
Click on this link to complete a USAID Biodata/1420 form, fill out the form, sign it, and attach/upload it to your application.
You may also include other documents such as cover letter and/or a work sample.
Submit your application, resume/CV, completed biodata, and any additional documents.
Please note that applications submitted by other means; or without either a resume/CV and/or biodata may not be considered. Only finalists will be contacted; no phone calls please.
A submitted application to QED in response to a position on a bid or proposal, indicates your agreement to be included in our submission to the client at least on an illustrative named basis.
The QED Group, LLC is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Women, Minorities, Veterans, and individuals with disabilities are strongly encouraged to apply. AA/V/D. Reasonable accommodation requests will be considered on a case-by-case basis.",11150,Washington
240,Supervisory IT Program Manager (INFOSEC/PLCYPLN),"US Offices, Boards and Divisions","Washington, DC","$144,128 - $172,500 a year","Duties
Summary
The primary purpose of this position is to provide the overall direction and oversight for the Security, Compliance and Internal Controls (SCIC) section, including personnel management, strategy development, security assessment, and operations direction that provides a disciplined, reliable approach to the management of systems in Service Delivery Staff (SDS).
Responsibilities
Advises IT experts throughout Service Deliver Staff (SDS) on a variety of situations and issues that involve applying or adapting new theories, concepts, standards and practices.
Plans and coordinates SDS wide implementation of government wide IT security defense strategies.
Manages policies, government standards, security training and education for roles throughout SDS.
Formulates implementation of long-range security policies for SDS and management guidelines for complex and changing information technology systems.
Drafts, updates, edits, and reviews policies, documents compliance controls, and identifies required supporting materials.
Recommends selections for subordinate supervisory positions, work leaders, group leaders, and project director positions responsible for coordinating the work of others.
Provide administrative and technical supervision necessary for accomplishing the work.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - Business travel required approximately 10% of the time.
Supervisory status
Yes
Promotion Potential
None
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a United States Citizen or National.
This position requires the candidate to be able to hold a security clearance at the TOP SECRET/SCI security clearance.
You may be required to complete a one-year probationary or two-year trial period.
Selective Service registration is required for males born on, or after, December 31st 1959. Those not registered should have an approved exemption on file.
You must meet all eligibility requirements by the closing date of this announcement and continue to meet these requirements throughout the hiring process. Offers can be rescinded if requirements are not met.
This position requires you to submit a Confidential Financial Disclosure Report (OGE-450) upon entry, and annually thereafter.
Additional selections may be made from this announcement, for up to 90 days, if openings occur in other offices serviced by Justice Management Division.
This position requires a Federal Acquisition Certificate for Contracting Officers Representative (FAC-COR) and/or Federal Acquisition Certificate for Program Manager (FAC-PM) Level III within 12 months of appointment.
This position is supervisory as defined by the Office of Personnel Management's (OPM) General Schedule Supervisory Guide (GSSG). A one year probation to assess your ability to perform supervisory duties is required unless previously completed.
This position is a Testing Designated Position (TDP). Applicants must pass a drug screen prior to employment and be subject to random drug testing for the duration of employment.
Qualifications
To qualify for the position of Supervisory IT Program Manager (INFOSEC/PLCYPLN) at (GS-2210-15), you must meet the basic qualification requirements listed below AND possess the required specialized experience specific to this series and grade you're applying to.


If you are a current or former government employee on a permanent appointment in the competitive service, you will need to demonstrate 1-year (52-weeks) at the next lower grade level, to meet the time-in-grade requirements for this occupational series and grade.

Basic Qualifications for the position are as follows:

1. Attention to Detail - Is thorough when performing work and conscientious about attention to detail.
2. Customer Service - Works with clients and customers (that is, any individuals who use or receive the services or products that your work unit produces, including the general public, individuals who work in the agency, other agencies, or organizations outside the Government)to assess their needs, provide information or assistance, resolve their problems, or satisfy their expectations; knows about available products and services; is committed to providing quality products and services.
3. Oral Communication - Expresses information (for example, ideas or facts) to individuals or groups effectively, taking into account the audience and nature of the information (for example, technical, sensitive, controversial); makes clear and convincing oral presentations;listens to others, attends to nonverbal cues, and responds appropriately.
4. Problem Solving - Identifies problems; determines accuracy and relevance of information; uses sound judgment to generate and evaluate alternatives, and to make recommendations,

Specialized Experience Statement: One year of specialized experience which includes organizing activities for the implementation of cybersecurity policies, security training, compliance initiatives, and cyber defense strategies; experience with various IT technology domains, networks, software development, security operations, and cloud service providers; and overseeing, planning, directing, and administrating the work through subordinates. This definition of specialized experience is typical of work performed at the second lower grade/level position in the federal service (GS 14).

You MUST meet all qualification requirements, including Time-in-Grade, by the closing date of this announcement, 06/23/2021.

Your resume must support your responses to the online questionnaire and the qualification requirements. Failure to do so may result in an ineligible rating.

See the Required Documents section for important notes about what must be included in your resume.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
The bullets below outline the various groups of applicants that fall under the term ""status candidates"". This vacancy is open to applicants from any of the groups listed below: When you apply you'll have the chance to claim an eligibility pathway, be sure you fully read each statement and any links provided to make sure you know which eligibility you qualify for.

See a full list and learn more at USAJOBS, see: What does Status Candidate mean? or Which Jobs am I Eligible to Apply for?

CURRENT AND FORMER FEDERAL EMPLOYEES: For more information, see USAJOBS Federal Employees.
CAREER TRANSITION PROGRAMS (CTAP or ICTAP): For more information visit: USAJOBS Career Transition Programs
VETERANS AND MILITARY SPOUSES: Please see USAJOBS Veterans Preference for more details.
SCHEDULE A, PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES Learn more at USAJOBS - Individuals with Disabilities.
General Employment Information:
REASONABLE ACCOMMODATION: Our policy can be found at: https://www.justice.gov/jmd/eeos/manual-and-procedures-providing-reasonable-accommodation
DOJ EEO STATEMENT: The U.S. Department of Justice fosters an inclusive and diverse workforce, find our EEO statement online at: http://www.justice.gov/jmd/eeos/08-eeo-policy.pdf
SELECTIVE SERVICE: If you were born male, on or after December 31, 1959, you must certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System, or are exempt from having to do so under the Selective Service Law. Additional information is found at: www.sss.gov.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications described above.
Once the announcement closes, a review of your resume and supporting documentation will be conducted by the HR Specialist. This information will be compared against your responses to the assessment questionnaire to determine your eligibility for Federal employment, and then whether you are qualified for this particular position. If a determination is made that you have inflated your responses when compared to your background information, you may be deemed ineligible, or your score may be adjusted to more accurately reflect your skills and abilities.

Additionally, we will review your supporting documents and resume to determine if you are in the ""Area of Consideration"" for this vacancy. Government-Wide Merit Promotion vacancies may only accept applications from a limited audience, pay careful attention to the ""Who May Apply"" and the ""Hiring Paths"" information. Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your eligibility.

BASIS OF RATING:

DOJ's Merit Promotion Procedures will be used to evaluate candidates.

Your qualifications will be evaluated on the following competencies (knowledge, skills, and other characteristics):
Customer Service
Information Assurance
Information Systems Security Certification
Information Systems/Network Security
Managing Human Resources

Career Transition Programs (CTAP or ICTAP): These programs apply to Federal and/or DOJ employees who meet the definition of surplus or displaced from a position in the competitive service. To receive selection priority for this position, you must:
Meet CTAP or ICTAP eligibility criteria;
Be rated well-qualified for the position with a score of 85 or above based on the competencies listed above; and
Submit the appropriate documentation to support your CTAP or ICTAP eligibility.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Top Secret
Drug test required
Yes
Position sensitivity and risk
Special-Sensitive (SS)/High Risk
Trust determination process
National security
Required Documents

Required Documents
Documentation requirements may vary from applicant to applicant based on your eligibility claims.


It is your responsibility to carefully review the list of document descriptions below, to see which documents are required for your application.

ALL APPLICANTS: You must submit a detailed resume containing the following information:

Official position title;
Employer name and contact information;
Start and end dates (including month and year);
A detailed list of duties & accomplishments,
Your highest salary (or grade/step) achieved; and
The number of hours worked per week (or indicate full-time).
If you are a current or former Federal employee:
You must submit your most recent SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action) or equivalent agency form. Do not submit an award SF-50, these do not contain sufficient information about your appointment
Your SF-50 should list the full position title, series, grade and step, organization, duty location, service computation date, effective date, and your service type and tenure status.
Submit a copy of your most recent performance evaluation or appraisal, signed, showing your final rating. If a performance appraisal is not available submit a statement explaining why one is not available.
See USAJOBS Current & Former Employees for more information.
If you are a Veteran or a qualifying parent or spouse:
Submit all DD-214 (Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty, Member-4 Copy) forms.
If you are a Veteran with a service-connected disability rating you will need to submit the SF-15 (Application for 10-point Veterans Preference) and a copy of your VA Letter stating your disability rating.
If you are the qualifying parent or spouse of a disabled, deceased, or deployed Veteran, and are seeking a derived preference eligibility, you must submit appropriate supporting documentation such as the Veterans DD-214, SF-15, VA Letter.
For more information on each type of Veterans Preference, and the documentation required for each, see FedsHireVets.

If you are a person with a disability, claiming eligibility under Schedule A:
You must submit ""proof of a disability"" documentation (""Proof of a disability"" is a letter stating that you have an intellectual disability, severe physical disability or psychiatric disability).
You must get this letter from your doctor, a licensed medical professional, a licensed vocational rehabilitation specialist, or any Federal, state, or local agency that issues or provides disability benefits.
For more information about Schedule A and verification requirements, please see OPM's Schedule A site.

If you are a displaced Federal employee claiming eligibility under CTAP or ICTAP:
You must submit your separation notice or agency RIF letter from your agency.
If you have not yet been separated, you can provide the letter of intent to separate you from the agency because of reduction-in-force.
See USAJOBS' Career Transition Programs for more information.
USAJOBS - What documents might I need to provide?
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Family of overseas employees
Family members of a federal employee or uniformed service member who is, or was, working overseas.
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Individuals with disabilities
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
This vacancy announcement is open to Federal employees and other eligible applicants. Please read the ""This job is open to"" section above, to ensure you are eligible for consideration.",11150,Washington
241,"Senior Manager, IT Project Management",ZeniMax Media Inc.,"Rockville, MD 20850",None,"Overview:

ZeniMax IT is looking for an exceptional leader to help guide the creation of our new project management team.
The successful applicant will work as part of the ZeniMax IT senior management team ensuring that the IT group is collaborating across the organization to manage and drive our products and services. This leader will ensure high quality scheduling and milestone planning, identify dependencies and possible workflow blockages, facilitate communication between stakeholders and internal departments, and manage high risk areas of development. They will also be responsible for building the project management team to be able to fulfill these objectives. This role will be a strong influence on the global IT organization’s burgeoning work management processes.
Responsibilities:
Continue to build a first-class enterprise IT project management organization.
Collaborate with a wide variety of staff to create project schedules, drive milestones, and successfully deploy and operate enterprise IT products.
Develop and refine organization processes to increase production efficiency, work life balance, and quality.
Lead a team of project managers effectively, while mentoring and growing their skillsets.
Communicate and collaborate with senior management on the status of all IT projects.
Manage work ingest and planning for IT in partnership with their external stakeholders and customers:
Corporate functions (Finance, Legal, Marketing, Sales etc.)
External software developers
Game Studios
Qualifications:
At least 5 years of project management experience in enterprise IT or live operations with a clear understanding of how to lead IT project management teams.
Proven track record building and developing enterprise IT project management teams.
Strong expertise in the product owner role, and mentoring others to become effective product owners.
Passion for an improvement mindset, both at an organization and personal level
Excellent at receiving and incorporating feedback.
Must thoroughly understand the mechanics behind cross discipline team collaboration and product ownership.
Ability to prioritize development initiatives, balancing both business and qualitative needs.
Ability to create project schedules and milestones, and monitor the progress of department milestones, and individual tasks against those schedules.
Ability to collaboratively create and implement best project management practices and processes regarding the specific needs of the individual teams and projects.
Excellent organizational skills, detail orientated and can multi-task under pressure.
Project management software skills using Jira or other project management software.
Preferred Skills:

Preferred Certifications
Scaled Agile Framework (SAFe)
Agile Alliance
Scrum Alliance
PMP",11150,Washington
242,Control Tower Analyst (GFPVAN),Panagora Group,"Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)",None,"Experience : 3-5 years
Job Location: Remote with preference for East Coast US or West/Central Africa and/or willingness to work on those time zones.


Panagora seeks a Control Tower Country Analyst for the USAID Global Health Supply Chain-Procurement and Supply Chain Management project (GHSC-PSM) to support the Global Family Planning Visibility & Analytics Network (GFPVAN) . The GFPVAN is governed by a Steering Committee of supply chain professionals and managed by the Reproductive Health Supplies Coalition (RHSC) . The GFPVAN supports cost-effective delivery of family planning products to developing countries by allowing supply chain professionals to make coordinated supply and planning decisions based on shared visibility into a common set of data. The Analyst will work with other GFPVAN Control Tower Members to ensure that all required inventory and supply plan data is uploaded on-time, is complete, and meets defined quality standards, so as to be reliable for decision-making.

As a key person collecting country stock level and shipment data, this position is a critical member of the team that drives the development and roll-out of the GFPVAN. Seconded to the Reproductive Health Supplies Coalition, this position will get to see first-hand how an active supply chain Control Tower works across organizations to balance supply and demand for FP products and facilitate more timely supply chain responses. It is an exciting role for someone looking to gain more exposure to providing technical assistance in health system strengthening to countries and in developing a strong network with key partners in the reproductive health field. This position is drawn upon to provide vital insights gained from close communication with the field and country data management.

This position may engage in domestic US and potential international travel, including to developing countries, estimated at 15%.

Responsibilities

Review, validate and manage data.

Act as main point of contact between GFPVAN and country data providers for the collection, translation, and validation of national inventory data for a portfolio of countries.

Serve as Control Tower Planner for assigned GFPVAN member countries and review supply plan, inventory and order and shipment data directly with the assigned country data provider

Ensure that supply plans, inventory, and order/shipment data as presented in the GFPVAN are in alignment with one another for a portfolio of countries

Create data validation tickets and work to resolve data validation issues for a portfolio of countries using the GFPVAN ticketing system when possible, or directly with country data providers

Resolve supply chain issues in collaboration with country stakeholders and the global RH community.

Collaborate with assigned Country Program Liaisons or country data providers to review supply exceptions flagged by the system and to determine the appropriate action to request of donors/procurers to avoid stock outs, shortages, and overstocks for at least the next 12 months

Support training of assigned Country Program Liaisons, Country Viewers and other country data providers on GFPVAN processes and platform

Contribute to process improvement efforts of the GFPVAN.

Support continuous process improvement efforts through active participation and leadership in cross-organization taskforces and workstreams

Support the development of analytics to be leveraged by the Control Tower Planning Manager, other Control Tower Members, as well as by international, multi-donor working groups

Support ad hoc translation to help bridge understanding between the Francophone and Anglophone communities



Requirements
Bachelor’s degree required

At least one year of experience in data analysis, forecasting and/or supply planning for pharmaceuticals, preferably family planning Minimum of two years in pharmaceutical supply chain management

Strong interpersonal skills and proven experience managing relationships with global and country-level stakeholders including demonstrated ability to collaborate and partner with ministry of health and other key government stakeholders

Experience working in a cross-cultural environment

Advanced analytical skills and ability to present data and analysis in easily understood infographics and data visualizations

Experience working with global donors/procurers and demonstrated understanding of their procurement practices, specifically UNFPA and USAID

Excellent oral and written communication ability; able to communicate and document complex processes in a clear and concise manner

Demonstrated ability to work effectively as part of a team, preferably with remote team members

Proven ability to operate in ambiguous environments with multiple reporting lines

Fluency in French and English, with a willingness to support ad hoc translation needs

Preferred Skills

Experience working with programs in Africa and Asia

Experience working with and knowledge of family planning products

Experience in software training and/or digital change management is an asset
Bachelor's degree",11150,Washington
243,Assistant Front Office Manager,"Marriott International, Inc","Oxon Hill, MD 20745",None,"Posting Date May 03, 2021
Job Number 21041829
Job Category Rooms & Guest Services Operations
Location Gaylord National Resort & Convention Center, 201 Waterfront Street, National Harbor, Maryland, United States VIEW ON MAP
Brand Gaylord Hotels
Schedule Full-Time
Relocation? N
Position Type Management
Located Remotely? N

Gaylord Hotels is a multi-location hospitality brand guided by a single focus: extraordinary meetings and conventions. From guest rooms and meeting space, to entertainment and dining all in a self-contained environment, Gaylord Hotels makes meeting planning easy and provides attendees great networking opportunities. As a Gaylord Hotels STAR, you'll bring your warm smile, genuine excitement and a “consider it done” spirit to work. In return, you’ll experience the rewards of growing your career among a team of professionals with a passion for excellence. Ready for a change? Take the initiative. Enjoy the Rewards.


JOB SUMMARY
Assists the Front Office Manager in administering front office functions and supervising staff on a daily basis. Front office areas include Bell/Door Staff, Switchboard and Guest Services/Front Desk. Position directs and works with managers and employees to carry out procedures ensuring an efficient check in and check out process. Ensures guest and employee satisfaction and maximizes the financial performance of the department.
CANDIDATE PROFILE
Education and Experience
High school diploma or GED; 2 years experience in the guest services, front desk, or related professional area.
OR
2-year degree from an accredited university in Hotel and Restaurant Management, Hospitality, Business Administration, or related major; no work experience required.
CORE WORK ACTIVITIES
Supporting Management of Front Desk Team
Utilizes interpersonal and communication skills to lead, influence, and encourage others; advocates sound financial/business decision making; demonstrates honesty/integrity; leads by example.
Encourages and builds mutual trust, respect, and cooperation among team members.
Supervises and manages employees. Managing all day-to-day operations. Understanding employee positions well enough to perform duties in employees' absence.
Ensures employee recognition is taking place on all shifts.
Establishes and maintains open, collaborative relationships with employees.
Monitoring and Supporting Progress Toward Guest Services and Front Desk Goals
Manages day-to-day operations, ensuring the quality, standards and meeting the expectations of the customers on a daily basis.
Develops specific goals and plans to prioritize, organize, and accomplish your work.
Handles complaints, settling disputes, and resolving grievances and conflicts, or otherwise negotiating with others.
Strives to improve service performance.
Collaborates with the Front Office Manager on ways to continually improve departmental service.
Communicates a clear and consistent message regarding the Front Office goals to produce desired results.
Participates in the development and implementation of corrective action plans based on review of comment cards and guest satisfaction results.
Emphasizes guest satisfaction during all departmental meetings and focuses on continuous improvement.
Ensuring Exceptional Customer Service
Provides services that are above and beyond for customer satisfaction and retention.
Improves service by communicating and assisting individuals to understand guest needs, providing guidance, feedback, and individual coaching when needed.
Serves as a role model to demonstrate appropriate behaviors.
Sets a positive example for guest relations.
Displays outstanding hospitality skills.
Empowers employees to provide excellent customer service.
Interacts with customers on a regular basis to obtain feedback on quality of product, service levels and overall satisfaction.
Provides feedback to employees based on observation of service behaviors.
Handles guest problems and complaints effectively.
Interacts with guests to obtain feedback on product quality and service levels.
Managing Projects and Policies
Implements the customer recognition/service program, communicating and ensuring the process.
Ensures compliance with all Front Office policies, standards and procedures.
Monitors adherence to all credit policies and procedures to reduce bad debts and rebates.
Additional Responsibilities
Provides information to supervisors and co-workers by telephone, in written form, e-mail, or in person.
Analyzes information and evaluating results to choose the best solution and solve problems.
Informs and/or updates the executives, the peers and the subordinates on relevant information in a timely manner.
Functions in place of the Front Office Manager in his/her absence.
Communicates critical information from pre- and post-convention meetings to the Front Office staff.
Participates in department meetings.
Marriott International is an equal opportunity employer. We believe in hiring a diverse workforce and sustaining an inclusive, people-first culture. We are committed to non-discrimination on any protected basis, such as disability and veteran status, or any other basis covered under applicable law.",11150,Washington
244,IT Asset Manager,General Dynamics Information Technology,"Rosslyn, VA",None,"Travel Required: None
Public Trust: None
Requisition Type: Regular
Develop and maintain logistics data, accurate material, software and equipment inventory, prepare and monitor material purchases, process material for disposal, provide supply support, and participate in process improvement activities as that pertain to logistics processes. Through analysis of parts and material demand trend data identify and perform packaging, handling, shipping, receiving and transportation of materials and supplies to ensure the timely and efficient delivery and continuity of support for the 7 x 24 operations.
Maintains inventory of Government Furnished Equipment (GFE) hardware/software.
Exercises control over receipt of hardware/software.Enters information into approved inventory systems and provide reports on hardware/software items and locations as directed.
Maintains accountability of non-expendable equipment items.Conducts cost/benefit analysis for acquisition of GFE and conducts evaluation of vendor products and prices to meeting requirements.
Manages the process of receiving, issuing, testing, packing, shipping and tracking of classified and unclassified equipment and supplies locally.
Performs asset control, coordination and control of internal and external moves of GFE, verification of invoices and accountability inspections as required.Maintains required stock levels of materials and supplies to support the operation and engineering efforts.Develop and maintain a CMDB for hardware and software assets.
Required Qualifications:
Bachelors of Art or Bachelors of Science degree or 8 years of related field experience.Currently possess a DOD Secret security clearance
Desired Skills:Experience with ServiceNow or RemedyHighly organized
Proven ability to coordinate with a wide variety of stakeholders
Working knowledge of basic Microsoft office applications
Effective written and verbal communication skills
Persistent and polite follow-up with leadership and staff to maintain delivery schedules
Problem solving and attention to detail
We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.
GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",11150,Washington
245,Program Manager - IT,Axiologic Solutions,"Herndon, VA",None,"Axiologic Solutions is Anything But Ordinary!!!!!

Our team members are exceptional people who care deeply about their work, their clients, and their mission by listening and delivering. Come help us to make an impact on our client’s toughest mission challenges.

Here are just some of the fringe benefits to joining the Axiologic team as a Program Manager:

*Commitment to employees *Meaningful work *Career advancement *Collaborative spirit *Work-life balance *Diverse workforce *Veteran proud

We have a generous compensation package to include but is not limited to, competitive medical/dental/401(k) plans, an electronic stipend and an opportunity for profit sharing!

We are seeking a Program Manager to be responsible for the integration, application and implementation of cyber security programs. The PM will provide computer/network defense and malware solutions for classified, unclassified, networked, or stand-alone systems. The PM will provide technical analysis and correlation of threats to the customers' networks by monitoring all sensors and audit logs for any malicious code, intrusion detection, suspicious network activity, denial of service, or user misuse of resources.

Required:

The Program Manager (PM) will provide project management to new and existing projects. The PM will assist projects in defining scope and will help identify requirements. The PM will help develop project plans and will help prepare cost estimates and will monitor project execution across the division and facilitate meetings such as technical exchange meetings or boards. The PM will prepare meeting documents such as minutes nd action tracking and process action items. The PM will respond to data calls and coordinate with organizations as necessary to respond to actions. The PM will coordinate information flow between all programs, branch managers, and division leadership and gather information from division personnel, other divisions within the group, internal IT customers, and external Sponsor. The PM will draft responses appropriate for intended audience and submit response drafts to management for approval and release in accordance with established due dates. The PM will participate in portfolio management activities to ensure alignment of division activities against overall group-level strategic direction and goals and advise management of potential gaps in business process or technical capability. The PM will maintain an “unfunded” list of associated with gaps in business process or technical capability and prepare briefings, drafts or edit various activity reports for executive consumption upon request.

Required Skills -

8-10 years of relevant experience with the following:

Demonstrated experience with computer and telecommunications systems and experience using standard office productivity software applications
Demonstrated experience eliciting/identifying/drafting requirements
Demonstrated experience reviewing program documentation and generating formal review documentation
 Demonstrated experience coordinating, supporting, and participating in program meetings and reviews
Demonstrated experience capturing meeting minutes and reviewing program plans
Demonstrated experience identifying inconsistencies in program plans
Demonstrated experience with portfolio management, supporting division-level budget and plans activities, project management activities such as planning projects, meeting objectives, developing contingencies, and producing schedules
Demonstrated experience with project management methodologies, executive report preparation, managing meetings to include organizing, scheduling, and facilitating.
Demonstrated experience resolving complex problems including organizing and structuring solutions.

Certification Requirements:
 None

Clearance Requirements:

Full Scope Poly

Desired Skills:

Demonstrated experience with social collaborative tools such as wikis, blogs, and chats.
Demonstrated experience coordinating with appropriate task managers for problem resolution and task clarification
Demonstrated experience analyzing the computer and information needs of the organization from an operational and strategic perspective and determining immediate and long range requirements
 Demonstrated experience communicating with senior customers, senior management, and implementation partners.


 All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status or disability.
Equal Opportunity Employer–minorities/females/veterans/individuals with disabilities/sexual orientation/gender identity.


Applicants with a physical or mental disability, who require a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process, may e-mail their request to Jennifer.chavira@axiologicsolutions.com, call 571-758-3780, or visit our office at 8280 Willow Oaks Corp. Dr. Suite 450, Fairfax Virginia for assistance. Determinations on request for reasonable accommodation will be made on a case-by-case basis.",11150,Washington
246,Project Manager,SkyePoint Decisions,"Washington, DC",None,"OverviewSkyePoint Decisions is seeking a Project Manager (PM) to serve as the Government’s single focal point for a Treasury Department program. The PM shall have responsibility for the planning, execution, control, and direction of prime contractor employees’ and any subcontractors’ programmatic and technical work performed under this task order. The PM shall effectively and efficiently manage cost, schedule, and performance using integrated program management processes across all the tasks in this SOW and in a manner that yields performance efficiencies.ResponsibilitiesManaging contract tasks and activities using industry-standard project management processes to initiate, plan, execute, control, and close the project in agreement with the Project Management Body of Knowledge (PMBOK)Creating and maintaining project documentation for each task, including the following as needed: project charters, project plans, project schedules, work breakdown structures, risk registers, lessons learned, requirements documents, meeting agendas, meeting minutes, and othersCreating and maintaining an integrated master project schedule of all task areas, dependencies, and resourcesAttending and organizing status meetings with CSO members and stakeholdersProactively tracking and following up on deliverables and subtasks for each taskDeveloping monthly status reports summarizing the status of completed, ongoing, upcoming tasks, work performed, and issues requiring the Contracting Officer’s Representative (COR) attention as well as mitigation for identified issuesQualificationsA bachelor's degree from an accredited collegeAt least eight (8) years of concurrent experience in program and project management supporting information security or cybersecurity projects for the Federal GovernmentProject Management Professional (PMP) certification requiredPreferred QualificationsDepartment of Treasury ExperienceCybersecurity certifications, experience, or other qualificationsExperience with NIST Risk Management Framework for Government clientsPublic Trust or other Government clearanceSkyePoint Decisions is a leading Cybersecurity Architecture and Engineering, Critical Infrastructure and Operations, and Applications Development and Maintenance IT service provider headquartered in Dulles, Virginia with operations across the U.S. We provide innovative enterprise-wide solutions as well as targeted services addressing the complex challenges faced by our federal government clients. Our focus is on enabling our clients to most efficiently and effectively deliver their mission – anytime, anywhere, securely. We combine technical expertise, mission awareness, and an empowered workforce to produce meaningful results.SkyePoint Decisions is an established ISO 9001:2015 and ISO/IEC 27001:2013 certified small business and appraised at CMMI Level 3 (with SAM) for Services. We possess a common vision of excellence and foster a collaborative team culture built upon individual performance and accountability. We invest in our people and systems to create value for our clients. It is the SkyePoint Way. We are grateful for the opportunity to work with exceptional people and give back to the communities we serve.SkyePoint Decisions is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.Job Types: Full-time, ContractBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee assistance programFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offReferral programRetirement planVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:program and project: 3 years (Required)License/Certification:PMP (Required)Security Clearance:Confidential (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",11150,Washington
247,IT Project Coordinator,CMT Services Inc,"Largo, MD 20774",$23 an hour,"CMT Services is recruiting for a IT Project Coordinator.
Disclaimer: By submitting your resume for this job posting, you authorize CMT Services, Inc. to forward your resume to all applicable internal and external managers, agencies, and recruitment personnel for review and consideration to hire.


ABOUT US


CMT Services, Inc. is a dynamic and growing small business supporting Federal, State, and Local government agencies. As a SBA-certified HUBZone, Woman Owned Small Business (WOSB), we deliver quality, professional services to support the missions and strategic business goals of our clients. Leaning on our core values of Integrity & Commitment, CMT’s mission is to continue delivering the highest quality services to our customers by applying best practices from our team of Industry experts ensuring not only our customers success, but the establishment of CMT Services as their Reliable Partner of Choice.


Job Title: IT Project Coordinator


Location: Cherverly/Largo, MD - Prince George’s County Health Department


Department Category: Information Technology Support Services


FLSA Status: Non-Exempt


Supervisory Responsibility: No Supervisory responsibilities


POSITION SUMMARY - The IT Project Coordinator is responsible to assist in the preparation of a clinic’s go-live and to support end-users during Practice Management (PM) and Electronic Medical Record (EMR) implementations. Following an implementation, the Site Specialist will remain permanently on-site as the application expert, end user training and support person, and technical support for testing and for maintaining member-managed components of the software. The number of locations an Epic Site Specialist will support depends on the member organization’s number of users, geography, and cross-coverage requirements.

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS, DUTIES, AND RESPONSIBILITIES


The IT Project Coordinator be responsible for:


Supports the successful implementation of Epic applications at the clinic
Participates as a key member of the clinic’s implementation team(s) to understand workflows, configuration/design decisions, and policy considerations, and to assist with project coordination and site readiness
Provides direct support to clinical operations and patient care teams to facilitate the introduction, acceptance, integration, and optimal use of the Epic application in the clinic
Demonstrates outstanding interpersonal communications skills and adult teaching techniques
Collaborates and coordinates with OCHIN and any Member support teams, including Help Desk, to translate learnings and experiences into documentation, training aides, newsletters or other materials appropriate for your clinic.
Performs other job-related duties as assigned


EQUIPMENT OPERATED:

Computer (PC), printer, fax, and other office equipment


MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS

Must have at least 2-3 year of working experience as a Systems Analyst
Must have knowledge of PC hardware and software capabilities and accounting applications
Must be skilled in using standard office equipment, including computers, computer applications, and software, communicating accounting information, both in writing and orally
Must have good written and verbal communication
Must have a working Internet connection when working remote


CERTIFICATIONS

N/A


EDUCATION

Must have a Bachelor’s degree


PHYSICAL, MENTAL, AND ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONS

The work entails the performance of physical activities including walking, standing, bending, stooping, lifting and carrying possibly heavy objects. The work will entail the individual to be able to concentrate and pay attention for long periods of time. The work will contain you in a stationary position for long periods of times. This environment is indoors of the office. This is a fast pace moving environment and must be able to, collaborates well with others and proactively contributes to group objectives.


WORKING HOURS

Monday through Friday 8:00 am – 5:00 pm
PLACE OF PERFORMANCE

Prince George’s County Health Department and working remotely

TRAVEL

N/A


TELECOMMUTE OPTIONS

 N/A

ANTICIPATED START DATE FOR ASSIGNMENT
Immediately - through June 2021


CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT

Must be legally authorized to work in the United States of America. Sponsorship will not be a part of this contract
Must successfully complete a successful background


EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER & ANTI-DISCRIMINATION


CMT Services, Inc. is an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, ethnicity, color, national origin, ancestry, sex, gender identity, pregnancy, family status, religion, age, marital status, sexual orientation, military status, veteran status, disability, genetic information/history or any other personal characteristic protected by law.


DRUG AND ALCOHOL-FREE WORKPLACE


CMT Services, Inc. maintains a workplace free of drug and alcohol abuse. Any unlawful manufacture, distribution, dispensing, possession, or use of drugs, and the abuse of drugs or alcohol is prohibited in the business’ workplace. Any violation of the Drug and Alcohol-Free Workplace policy may result in disciplinary action, up to and including discharge/termination.",11150,Washington
248,IT Agile Project Manager,Guidehouse,"Washington, DC 20036 (Dupont Circle area)",None,"Overview:

Guidehouse is a leading management consulting firm serving the public and commercial markets. We guide our clients forward towards new futures that build trust in society and your professional skills along the journey. Join us at Guidehouse.
Responsibilities:

Guidehouse is supporting a large IT platform at a federal client, which supports several integrated agile teams responsible for discrete applications and engines on one shared platform. This project requires a strong Agile Project Manager with experience leading large IT applications leveraging scaled agile framework (SAFe) methodologies. The Project Manager will be a key contributor on the consulting team to help facilitate the optimization of technology capabilities, manage timeline, enable change, and champion the development team to exceed client expectations. The Project Manager will lead and define stakeholder and technology strategies and identify gaps within the process. The Project Manager will contribute to the success of several agile products and agile teams and lead the road mapping efforts and effectively execute the Guidehouse standard of delivery at all phases. The Project Manager will have a comprehensive view of the financial implications of the project, in addition to building client rapport, proactively mitigating project risks/issues, and leading change efforts. As a key team member on the project, the Project Manager will guide customers through the implementation of several IT application solutions using our adaptive SAFe methodology.
Qualifications:

The following skills/experience/knowledge are required to be considered for this role:
Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent work experience
5+ years of consulting experience; preference 2+ years in IT project management
US Citizen
Ability to obtain DHS Public Trust
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
The following skills/experience/knowledge are preferred to be considered for this role:
Experience working within Federal Emergency Management Agency, Homeland security, or other Federal agencies, and/or experience in Emergency Management.
Certified ScrumMaster (CSM) or equivalent
Familiar with Jira/Kanban or Atlassian Suite tools leveraged in software development projects
Familiar with advanced agile practices including release trains, DevOps, CI/CD pipeline management, Federal security requirements, and SELC document requirements.
Experience monitoring project progress and implementing effective corrective actions if actual progress falls behind plan
Experience working in a multi-contractor environment
Have experience supporting Agile development projects and implementing process improvements that align with Agile best practices.
Have exceptional written and oral communication skills and experience with stakeholder engagement and outreach processes, including communication plan development, stakeholder assessments, and training program design and development.
Experienced demonstrating product capabilities to clients and stakeholders
Analytical and solution-oriented to help clients assess and improve business processes
Experience identifying and integrating advance solutions to large scale IT application
Experience using Agile Scrum and/or Kanban methodology to plan and manage work against iterations and releases
Additional Requirements:

The successful candidate must not be subject to employment restrictions from a former employer (such as a non-compete) that would prevent the candidate from performing the job responsibilities as described.
Disclaimer:

About Guidehouse
Guidehouse is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law, ordinance, or regulation.
Guidehouse will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law or ordinance including the Fair Chance Ordinance of Los Angeles and San Francisco.
If you have visited our website for information about employment opportunities, or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation, please contact Guidehouse Recruiting at 1-571-633-1711 or via email at RecruitingAccommodation@guidehouse.com. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.
Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of Guidehouse and Guidehouse will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.
Rewards and Benefits
Guidehouse offers a comprehensive, total rewards package that includes competitive compensation and a flexible benefits package that reflects our commitment to creating a diverse and supportive workplace.
Benefits include:
Medical, Rx, Dental & Vision Insurance
Personal and Family Sick Time & Company Paid Holidays
Position may be eligible for a discretionary variable incentive bonus
Parental Leave and Adoption Assistance
401(k) Retirement Plan
Basic Life & Supplemental Life
Health Savings Account, Dental/Vision & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts
Short-Term & Long-Term Disability
Tuition Reimbursement, Personal Development & Learning Opportunities
Skills Development & Certifications
Employee Referral Program
Corporate Sponsored Events & Community Outreach
Emergency Back-Up Childcare Program",11150,Washington
